AIRCRAFT HISTORY
The AH-64D is the second generation of the AH-64 legacy, which pre-dates the AH-64 itself. In 1963, the
Advanced Aerial Fire Support System (AAFSS) program was created, which produced the AH-56 prototype
helicopter. This was succeeded by the Advanced Attack Helicopter (AAH) program in 1972, which resulted in the
delivery of the AH-64A in 1983, and subsequently the AH-64D in 1997. The conceptual design of AH-64D centered
around the AN/APG-78 fire control radar, an upgraded communications system that permitted the sharing of
targeting data between AH-64 team members, and more advanced AGM-114 anti-armor missiles.


Advanced Aerial Fire Support System
In 1948, James V. Forrestal, the first U.S. Secretary of Defense, drafted the Key West Agreement, which codified
the separation of air assets between the Army and the newly founded U.S. Air Force. In particular, it limited Army
Aviation to employing fixed-wing aircraft below 2,500 pounds weight and helicopters below 4,000 pounds. It was
believed that the Air Force would provide fixed-wing aircraft for the close air support (CAS) role with a new
generation of multirole fighter aircraft.
In 1960, President Kennedy’s Secretary of Defense, Robert S. McNamara, revisited this agreement by creating
the Army Tactical Mobility Requirements Board. The Board and its chairman, Lieutenant General Hamilton H.
Howze, recommended that Army Aviation be greatly expanded to include a well-developed attack role, among
many others. McNamara followed the board’s recommendation, which garnered an immediate rebuke from U.S.
Air Force leadership, insistent that fixed-wing fighters were the only effective platforms for performing CAS.
U.S. Army leadership was eager to demonstrate otherwise, having noted the success of armed UH-1 helicopters.
To that end, in 1963, the Army initiated the Advanced Aerial Fire Support System (AAFSS) development program
to design a purpose-built attack helicopter, rather than an armed variant of an existing utility helicopter. In 1964,
                                                      the request for proposals (RFP) was announced; and in 1968,
                                                      Lockheed won the competition with its proposal for the AH-
                                                      56 Cheyenne, a purpose-built attack helicopter, also
                                                      commonly referred to as a “gunship”.
                                                      In the late 1960s, the U.S. military’s strategic concern shifted
                                                      to the large numbers of tanks that Warsaw Pact countries
                                                      could employ in a European ground war. Thus, aircraft
                                                      development priority shifted from close air support to the
                                                      anti-armor role. In response to this shift, the Air Force
                                                      founded the A-X program (which would eventually result in
                                                      the A-10A “Warthog”), and in 1972, the Army canceled
                                                      development of the AH-56 in favor of a program to develop
         Lockheed AH-56 Cheyenne (US Army)            a more capable anti-tank platform.


Advanced Attack Helicopter Program
The U.S. Army’s subsequent program to build an anti-tank helicopter was called the Advanced Attack Helicopter
(AAH) program, and its goal was to design a capable replacement for the AH-1 Cobra, the Army’s dedicated
attack helicopter of the period.
The AAH program’s RFP was announced in November 1972, specifying that the helicopter would need to operate
at night at extremely low altitudes, should utilize the same General Electric T700 engine as the Utility Tactical
Transport Aircraft System (which would eventually evolve into the UH-60 Blackhawk), and should be armed with
a 30mm cannon and sixteen anti-tank TOW missiles. As the separately developed AGM-114 Hellfire missile neared
completion, the RFP was amended to include a requirement to carry sixteen Hellfires in place of the TOW missiles.
Bell, Boeing, Vertol/Grumman, Hughes, Lockheed, and Sikorsky all submitted proposals for the AAH program;
and in July of 1973, the Department of Defense selected the Hughes Model 77 and the Bell Model 409 as the
prototypes that would be built to compete for the contract. A few months later, the Army designated the AAH
program as one of its “Big Five” top priority projects, reflecting the importance of developing a capable anti-tank
helicopter.




               Bell Model 409 (US Army)                                   Hughes Model 77 (US Army)

The Bell Model 409, designated the YAH-63, first flew on September 30, 1975, and the Hughes Model 77
(designated YAH-64) performed its first flight only a day later. After a series of trials and tests, the Army decided
to move ahead with the YAH-64; citing its increased survivability over the YAH-63, stemming from the YAH-64’s
four-blade main rotor and tailwheel landing gear configuration.


AH-64A
Per Phase Two of the AAH program, the YAH-64 entered pre-
production. In Phase Two, the YAH-64 airframe was
integrated with the weapon and sensor systems it would
employ, in particular the AGM-114, which would be the
cornerstone anti-tank missile for the helicopter. During pre-
production, the aircraft was re-designated as the AH-64A.
The AH-64A was equipped with two revolutionary targeting
systems, called the Integrated Helmet And Designation
Sighting System (IHADSS) and Target Acquisition
Designation Sight (TADS). These systems enabled aircrews
to acquire targets at long-range under total darkness, while
operating mere feet over the terrain and amongst obstacles,              YAH-64A (US Army)
and rapidly engage targets with the 30mm cannon using
helmet-mounted displays. Combined with the Pilot Night Vision System (PNVS), the helmet-mounted displays
made the AH-64A a lethal day and night attack aircraft.
                                                      Following pre-production, in 1981, three AH-64As were
                                                      delivered to the Army for Operational Test II. The engines
                                                      were upgraded to the more powerful T700-GE-701, with a
                                                      shaft horsepower of 1,690 SHP. In 1982, the Army approved
                                                      the AH-64A for full-scale production, and in 1983, the first
                                                      production AH-64A rolled off the line at Hughes’s production
                                                      facility in Mesa, Arizona. In January 1984, the Army took
                                                      delivery of its first production AH-64A, and in March 1986,
                 AH-64A (US Army)                     began training its first operational AH-64A unit, the 7th
                                                      Battalion, 17th Cavalry Brigade, in Fort Hood, Texas.
The AH-64A first saw combat in 1989 as part of Operation Just Cause, the U.S. invasion of Panama. But it wouldn’t
be until Operation Desert Shield in 1990 that the AH-64A would be deployed in significant numbers for a large-
scale conflict.
In January 1991, two teams of AH-64As from the 101st Airborne
Division, along with U.S. Air Force MH-53 Pave Low helicopters, struck
the first targets in Iraq during the initial hours of Operation Desert
Storm.
Guided by the precision GPS navigation units on board the MH-53’s
across the featureless desert, the teams of AH-64’s approached two
separate early warning radar sites along the border between Saudi
Arabia and Iraq. Flying radio silent, each AH-64 aircrew acquired their
assigned targets through their Forward-Looking Infrared (FLIR)
sensors. With a single radio call, the attack commenced with an
onslaught of Hellfire missiles, followed by rockets and 30mm fire.
Within minutes, the radar sites were disabled, and hundreds of
coalition aircraft streamed through the gap in radar coverage to begin
the air campaign against the Iraqi military.
When the ground phase of Desert Storm began in late February of
that year, battalions of AH-64A attack helicopters would be launched
en masse against multiple objectives forward of friendly ground
forces. On several occasions, an entire brigade of Iraqi armor would        AH-64As during Desert Shield (US DoD)
be decimated by a single battalion of AH-64A helicopters in just one
battle.
Over 1,000 AH-64As were produced, most of which have since been upgraded to the D model. The AH-64A was
operated by the U.S. Army until July 2012, when the last A model was taken out of service for upgrades.


AH-64D
                                                      Following Operation Desert Storm, McDonnell Douglas
                                                      (which had since acquired Hughes) proposed the AH-64B
                                                      upgrade, which would incorporate a modernized cockpit
                                                      and fire control system as well as new rotor blades. The
                                                      program was approved and funded by the U.S. Congress
                                                      but was canceled merely a year later in favor of the AH-64D
                                                      proposal; a much more ambitious upgrade to the airframe
                                                      that had originally been conceived in the late 1980’s as the
                                                      Airborne Adverse Weather Weapon System (AAWWS).
                                                      The AH-64D incorporated upgraded engines and an
                                                      expanded fuselage to house an entirely new suite of
                                                      sensors. Most notable was the addition of the AN/APG-78
                                                      fire control radar, mounted above the main rotor, making
                                                      many D models immediately identifiable. In addition, the
                                                      AH-64D was upgraded with a new communications suite
                                                      that included a modem for transmitting data across the
                                                      voice radios and integrated SINCGARS radios, avionics
                                                      supporting a MIL-STD 1553B data bus, a modern “glass”
                   AH-64D (US Army)                   cockpit equipped with multi-purpose displays, more
                                                      powerful T700-GE-701C engines rated at 1,940 SHP, and
the ability to fire the radar-guided AGM-114L Hellfire missile. The first D model prototype was flown in April of
1992, and by 1995 testing had concluded, and full-scale production began. The first AH-64D was delivered to the
U.S. Army on March 31, 1997.
Since August 1997, Boeing (which acquired McDonnell-Douglas) has produced AH-64D’s domestically for the
United States and for foreign partners. Partnered with Boeing, AgustaWestland produced AH-64D’s (designated
AH Mk1) for the United Kingdom, and Fuji Heavy Industries produced AH-64D’s (designated AH-64DJP) for the
Japanese Ground Self Defense Force. Along with the U.S., U.K., and Japan, the AH-64D is also operated by the
militaries of the Netherlands, Greece, Israel, United Arab Emirates, Singapore, Saudi Arabia, Kuwait, and Egypt.




            UK Army Air Corps AH Mk1 (UK MoD)                            RNLAF AH-64Ds in Afghanistan (RNLAF)


In addition to newly manufactured AH-64D’s, the U.S. Army awarded McDonnell-Douglas a $1.9 billion contract
to upgrade existing A models to D models. Starting in August of 1997, Boeing has since upgraded all U.S. Army
AH-64A’s to D models. In all, 2,400 AH-64’s have been produced since 1975; over a thousand of them AH-64D’s.




                                     UAE Joint Aviation Command AH-64D (US Navy)
AIRCRAFT OVERVIEW
The AH-64D is a two-person day/night attack helicopter initially developed by McDonnell Douglas for the U.S.
Army. The helicopter was originally designed by Hughes for the anti-tank role, employing the AGM-114 Hellfire
missile as its primary weapon. Its design incorporates significant survivability and systems redundancy after
lessons learned in the Vietnam war. The AH-64D provides the U.S Army (and other militaries) with one of the
most maneuverable, survivable, and heavily armed rotary-winged aircraft on the modern battlefield.




DCS: AH-64D features a U.S. Army AH-64D Block 2 in service between the years of 2005-2010. The DCS: AH-
64D simulates Lot 9.1 avionics, which was fielded in 2005, along with additional equipment that was fielded to
the U.S Army fleet between 2005 and 2007, such as the Modernized TADS (M-TADS), Common Missile Warning
System (CMWS), and revised engine exhaust assemblies.


Cockpit
                                                                       The AH-64D uses a tandem cockpit
                                                                       layout, with the Pilot (PLT) in the aft
                                                                       cockpit and the Copilot/Gunner (CPG)
                                                                       in the forward cockpit. Identical flight
                                                                       controls are present in both cockpits,
                                                                       and each can employ any of the AH-
                                                                       64’s weapon systems, but the Pilot
                                                                       lacks several targeting and weapon
                                                                       employment controls that are only
                                                                       present in the CPG cockpit.
                                                                       Both cockpits are protected with
                                                                       ballistic armor, and an additional
                                                                       ballistic shield separates the two
                                                                       cockpits. Each crewmember sits within
an armored seat that is mounted on compressible pistons that stroke downward during high-speed vertical
impacts. Coupled with the stroking action of the landing gear, this system is designed to attenuate the impact
forces translated to the crewmembers’ spines, resulting in higher survival rates during crash sequences.
Both cockpit canopies consist of two heated glass windshields, four acrylic side panels, and a fifth acrylic panel
over the Pilot’s crewstation. The canopy doors open upward and to the side for ingress and egress, and manually
latched for flight. Improper latching is detected and annunciated by the onboard avionics.
For emergency egress, both cockpits include a canopy jettison system. Jettison handles are installed for the Pilot
and CPG, as well as an exterior jettison handle for rescue personnel. The jettison system consists of a detonating
cord that ejects the four acrylic side panels for crew egress.


Fuselage
The AH-64D fuselage is armored in
strategic locations, with 2,500
pounds      of   ballistic   shielding
designed to sustain hits from
projectiles up to 23mm in caliber.
The aft fuselage includes three
integral fire/overheat detectors:
one adjacent the main transmission,
and one on each firewall louver door
(where transmission oil is cooled).
The indication of a fire in these
areas will trigger a visual and audio
warning to the crew.
Critical system relays and wiring are installed in opposing areas, permitting redundancy within the avionics in the
case of computer failure or damage. Each processor group is composed of two individual computers: one primary
and one backup. If the primary processor fails or is damaged from weapons fire, the backup processor
immediately takes over the required computing tasks.


Fire Protection System
Engine fire detection is provided by two optical flame detectors in each engine compartment, and two in the APU
compartment. Two fire bottles, a primary and a reserve, contain halon fire suppressant. If a fire is detected in
either engine compartment or the APU compartment, a voice warning message will announce to the crew the
location of the fire, along with fire warning lights on the instrument panel. These warning lights will illuminate
which buttons the crew must press to discharge the fire suppressant in an attempt to extinguish the fire.
An additional fire detection circuit is installed into the aft deck area behind the main transmission, near the
accessory gearbox and between the two engines. This fire detection circuit will generate a voice warning message
and an AFT DECK FIRE warning on the EUFD, but there is no fire suppression capability in this area.


Engines
The AH-64D is powered by two General Electric T700-GE-701C turboshaft engines, each generating up to 1,940
shaft horsepower. The engine output shafts are coupled with frontal-mounted nose gearboxes and regulated by
a Digital Electronic Control (DEC) and integral Hydro-Mechanical Units (HMU). Each engine is assembled in a
modular layout, consisting of a cold section, hot section, power turbine section, and accessory section.
                                                                              The cold section consists of an inlet particle
                Maintenance platform stand                     Nose gearbox   separator for dust and sand protection, a six-
                                                                              stage compressor, variable inlet guide vanes
                                                                              (IGVs), and variable stator vanes. The DEC is
                                                                              mounted to underside of the cold section.
                                                                              The hot section consists of the annular
                                                                              combustor, nozzle assembly and gas
                                                                              generator turbine stages. The gas generator is
                                                                              connected to the cold section’s compressor
  Power turbine stage
   “danger” markings              Maintenance platform brace                  through a central shaft, which rotates the
                                                                              compressor stage to produce self-sustaining
                                                                              engine power.
The power turbine section consists of two free turbine stages and the exhaust frame. The power turbine shaft
rotates within the gas generator compressor shaft and runs the full length of the engine to the front-mounted
nose gearbox. The engine turbine gas temperature (TGT) thermocouples are mounted to this stage, just aft of
the gas generator stages, along with the engine speed and torque sensors that provide cockpit indications of N P
and TQ respectfully.
The accessory section includes the HMU, NG speed sensor, fuel boost pump, oil system, and the Air Turbine
Starter. Each engine’s nose-mounted reduction gearbox powers the main transmission through an over-running
“sprag” clutch that will disengage the engine from the main transmission if the powertrain system is operating at
a higher RPM than the engine’s power turbine.


Digital Electronic Control and Hydro-Mechanical Unit
The DEC and HMU work together to manage each engine, managing fuel flow based on the position of the power
levers and collective handles. The power lever position is mechanically transmitted to the HMU via a Power
Available Spindle (PAS), and the collective position mechanically via a Load Demand Spindle (LDS). During normal
operation, the HMU controls fuel flow to the combustor according to the PAS and LDS. The HMU also schedules
the inlet guide vanes, controls the anti-ice and start bleed valve, and regulates discharge air pressure and NG
(gas generator RPM). The HMU includes an automatic NG overspeed cut-off that will flame out the engine to
prevent an engine overspeed.
The DEC coordinates automatic torque load-sharing between the two engines, monitors NP (power turbine RPM),
and limits turbine gas temperature (TGT). Like the HMU’s automatic NG overspeed cut-off, the DEC has an
automatic NP overspeed cut-off. The DEC is normally powered by the engine’s alternator but can use aircraft
power as a backup. The DEC for each engine can be disabled by momentarily placing the engine’s power lever
into the “lock-out” position.
The DEC has a contingency power feature that automatically activates during single-engine operations. If an
engine fails, the DEC of the opposite engine automatically increases the TGT limiter of the remaining engine to a
higher value, permitting an increase in operating temperature at the expense of engine life.


Starter System
The starter system consists of a pneumatic starter valve, an ignition system with two igniter plugs, and the DEC.
Pneumatic pressure for engine start can be supplied by the Auxiliary Power Unit (APU), Aircraft Ground Power
Unit (AGPU), or a running engine (cross-bleed start).
During engine start, the DEC will monitor engine parameters and automatically abort the start if an imminent hot
start is detected.
Auxiliary Power Unit (APU)
The GTCP36-155 APU, manufactured by Allied Signal/Garret, is a self-contained gas turbine engine that drives
the accessory section of the main transmission to generate electrical and hydraulic power without operating the
main engines or rotating the rotor blades. The APU can generate pressurized air, which is primarily used to start
the main engines without requiring external ground power sources.
The APU draws fuel from the aft fuel cell only
and consumes approximately 175 pounds per
hour when operating.
The APU is automatically monitored by an
Electronic Control Unit (ECU), which detects
overspeed and overcurrent anomalies, as well as
abnormal oil pressure. The ECU will
automatically shut down the APU when an                         APU exhaust duct
anomaly is detected. The ECU also controls the
power takeoff (PTO) clutch engagement to the
accessory section of the main transmission.


Drivetrain
The main rotor drive system consists of the main rotor drive shaft, main rotor transmission, three-stage reduction
gearing, and dual independent integral oil systems. The main transmission receives power from two nose gearbox
inputs, one mounted on each turboshaft engine. The main transmission is used to drive the main rotor.


    Tail Rotor Gearbox
                                                      Engines
                                                                                   Main Transmission




     Intermediate Gearbox
                              APU & APU drive shaft
                                                                Nose Gearboxes




An accessory gearbox is mounted to the aft side of the main transmission. This gearbox provides mechanical
power to the aircraft’s two electrical AC generators and two hydraulic pumps, one for the Primary hydraulic
system and the other for the Utility hydraulic system. This prevents the loss of generator and hydraulic power
during an autorotation when both engines have failed. The APU powers the transmission’s accessory gearbox via
the APU drive shaft, which provides full electrical power to the aircraft avionics and hydraulic power to the flight
controls prior to starting the main engines. The accessory gearbox also includes the rotor brake and the main
rotor RPM (NR) sensor.
The tail rotor drive system consists of the tail rotor drive shaft, intermediate gearbox, and tail rotor gearbox. The
tail rotor drive shaft consists of four sections within the tail boom. The sections are connected with flexible
couplings and mounted with hanger bearings to accommodate aerodynamic and maneuvering loads from the tail
boom. The intermediate gearbox is at the base of the vertical stabilizer, and the tail rotor gearbox is at the base
of the tail rotor static mast. Both gearboxes reduce the transmission RPM and change the angle of the drive.
The main and tail rotor drive shafts are designed to carry torque loads only. Each of these shafts pass through
and rotate within a static mast. The main rotor static mast carries all vertical and bending loads, and the tail rotor
static mast absorbs all tail rotor loads. This allows the aircraft to perform aggressive or aerobatic maneuvers
while minimizing stresses to the drive train system.


Rotors
The AH-64D has a four-blade main rotor for lift and propulsion, and a four-blade tail rotor for anti-torque and
directional control.


                                                    De-rotation Unit         Rotor Hub



                Lead-Lag Dampeners                                                        Strap Pack




              Lead-Lag Link
                                                                                                         Pitch Change Housings




                                                                                     Pitch Change Link


                               Scissors Assembly                                           Rotating Swashplate


                                Spherical Bearing                                          Non-rotating Swashplate




The main rotor is fully articulated, with each blade able to
flap, feather, lead, and lag independently. Mechanical
droop stops under each Pitch Change Housing limits blade                                                 Delta hinge

droop.                                                                 55°

The four-blade tail rotor is semi-rigid of a teetering design.
Each opposing pair of rotor blades are offset at 55° for
ease of maintenance and to increase tail rotor efficiency.
Flapping and feathering of the tail rotor to counter
dissymmetry of lift in forward flight is facilitated by the use
of a delta hinge installed to each pair of tail rotor blades.
Flight Controls
AH-64D flight controls are hydromechanical, consisting of mechanical linkages between the flight controls and
control surfaces, augmented by transmission-driven hydraulic power. The flight controls are conventional and
consist of a cyclic stick, collective lever, and anti-torque pedals.
The cyclic is mechanically connected to the swashplate on the rotor mast that tilts the main rotor for attitude
control using cyclic feathering of the rotor blades. The collective is mechanically connected to the swashplate and
each engine’s Load Demand Spindle (LDS) and directly controls lift by collectively feathering all rotor blades at
once. The anti-torque pedals feather the tail rotor blades for anti-torque and directional control.


          Directional (Yaw) servo-actuator

                                               Collective servo-actuator
                                                                                   Lateral (Roll) servo-actuator




                                             Longitudinal (Pitch) servo-actuator




Hydraulic augmentation is provided by the Stability and Command Augmentation System (SCAS), which consists
of electro-hydraulic actuators commanded by the Flight Management Computer (FMC). The FMC provides rate
damping and enhanced aircraft stability for accurate weapons employment; and command augmentation for
immediate, smooth, and consistent control feel across the full range of helicopter airspeeds. The FMC also
provides attitude and altitude hold capability for limited hands-off flying.
The AH-64D has an articulating horizontal stabilator
                                                           Static discharge wick Asymmetric Gurney flaps
controlled by an electric actuator. The horizontal
stabilator improves pitch control and improves over-
the-nose visibility at low airspeeds. In automatic
mode, the FMC schedules the horizontal stabilator
position according to collective position and airspeed.
In nap-of-the-earth/approach mode (NOE/A), the
horizontal stabilator is driven to the 25° trailing edge
down position when below 80 knots, to further
improve over-the-nose visibility. In manual mode, either crewmember may control the stabilator position with a
switch on the collective.
To ease pilot workload, a force trim system is provided for the cyclic and pedals. The force trim system consists
of lateral, longitudinal, and directional force trim springs and magnetic solenoids that engage and disengage the
force trim. A button on the cyclic disengages the force trim springs, allowing the cyclic and anti-torque pedals to
move freely without resistance. When re-engaged, the force trim springs hold the cyclic and pedals in their current
position and provide an increasing force gradient as the cyclic and/or pedals are deflected away from this
reference position.
Back-Up Control System (BUCS)
Normally, the Pilot and CPG flight controls are mechanically linked. The mechanical linkages are protected by
shear pins and mis-track sensors to prevent a control jam or severance from affecting both sets of flight controls.
If the flight controls are decoupled by the shear pin, or a mis-track is otherwise sensed, the Back-Up Control
System is automatically activated. The BUCS is a single-channel, four-axis, non-redundant electric fly-by-wire
(FBW) system. The FBW system is designed to replicate the feel of the hydromechanical controls but does not
replicate SCAS functionality.
BUCS can only be active for the Pilot or the CPG station. Either the Pilot or the CPG can transfer BUCS control to
their station if necessary, depending on the nature and location of the jam or severance within the flight controls.


Landing Gear
The AH-64D has two trailing-link, main landing gear wheels and a lockable, free-castoring tailwheel. The main
landing gear consists of two single wheels with integral disc brakes, mounted on separate nitrogen-oil shock
struts.

                                          Shock strut




                                                                                             Foot steps




         WSPS deflector
                                                WSPS blades




Each anti-torque pedal is connected to a hydraulic disc brake on the corresponding main landing gear wheel.
Each brake is connected to its own master cylinder, which provides hydraulic pressure to the braking system.
The Pilot and CPG anti-torque pedals, when pressed downwards, actuate the hydraulic brake system for the
corresponding wheel. A parking brake valve maintains brake pressure when closed.
The tailwheel is free-castoring in a full 360° of rotation. A spring-loaded tailwheel lock can be hydraulically
                                                                       actuated to hold the tailwheel in its
                                                                       forward position. The tailwheel lock is
   WSPS guide vane                                                     activated from the Collective Flight Grips
                                                                       or the tail wheel lock pushbuttons.
                                                                        Both main landing gear shock struts have
                                                                        a one-time capability to absorb loads from
                                                                        a high-stress impact. Shear rings and
                                                                        rupture discs on each strut, when
                                                                        activated by a hard landing, start a
                                                                        controlled collapse of the strut to reduce
                                                                        crash loads on the airframe.
Fuel System
The AH-64D includes two internal self-sealing, crash-resistant fuel cells. The forward fuel cell holds up to 156
gallons, and the aft fuel cell holds up to 220 gallons. Fuel is normally balanced between the two cells automatically
by the avionics.
A 230-gallon ERFS external fuel tank can be mounted on each of the four stub wing pylons. The external fuel
tank mounted under the left inboard pylon feeds the forward fuel cell, and the external fuel tank mounted under
the right inboard pylon feeds the aft fuel cell. If an additional two fuel tanks are mounted under the outboard
pylons, the outboard external fuel tanks feed fuel to each respective inboard external fuel tank.
An Internal Auxiliary Fuel System (IAFS) may be installed into the ammunition bay, storing 100 gallons at the
expense of reducing the 1200 round ammunition capacity to 300 rounds.

                                Left inboard ERFS feeds
                                 forward main fuel cell



                                                                       Outboard ERFS
                                                                     feeds inboard ERFS




       Outboard ERFS
     feeds inboard ERFS




                             Right inboard ERFS            IAFS feeds forward
                           feeds aft main fuel cell       and aft main fuel cells




Fuel Transfer Sub-system
Fuel is transferred between the forward and aft cells using pneumatic pressure. Transfer is normally automatic
but can be manually controlled by the aircrew.
Fuel transfer from the IAFS or external tanks is one-way only. Transfer from the external tanks to the internal
cells is pneumatic, and an electric fuel pump transfers fuel from the IAFS to the internal cells. If fuel is being
transferred between the forward and aft fuel cells, any fuel transfer from external or internal auxiliary fuel systems
will be paused.
Normally, the forward cell feeds engine 1 and the aft cell feeds engine 2. However, if necessary during abnormal
circumstances, the aircrew can manually select different crossfeed modes where both engines feed from one fuel
cell.
An electric boost pump is used to provide motive flow from the aft cell during engine start. This boost pump can
also be manually selected on during an emergency or operations in extreme cold temperatures. The APU has its
own electric boost pump that also draws from the aft cell.
Nitrogen Inerting Unit (NIU)
The fuel cells are inerted using nitrogen to reduce the risk of fire. The NIU is completely self-contained and
automatic. It uses aircraft power and pressurized air and generates an inerted mix containing around 99%
nitrogen. This inerted gas is used to pressurize the internal cells, to include the IAFS during fuel transfer, if the
IAFS is installed.


Electrical System
Electrical aircraft power is managed by the Electrical Power Management System (EPMS). The EPMS is a fully
redundant and automatic power system consisting of a distributor for battery, AC, and DC power.
The battery is a 24-volt, 15-amp fiber nickel-cadmium (FNC) design. It can provide power for normal flight loads
for up to 12 minutes, assuming at least an 80% charge.
AC power is provided by two brushless, air-cooled generators. Each generator outputs 45 kVA three-phase four-
wire power at 115 or 200 volts and 400 Hz. Each generator has its own Generator Control Unit (GCU). A single
generator is capable of handling full flight loads without shedding. The generators are mounted to the
transmission accessory gearbox, which is powered by the main transmission while at flight RPMs or the APU
during ground operations.
DC power is provided by two Transformer-Rectifier Units (TRUs), each providing 28 volts and 350 amps of DC
power. Like the generators, a single TRU can provide sufficient power for full flight loads without shedding.
Power is distributed by four AC busses, four DC busses, four battery busses, and a battery hot bus. Each bus and
power consumer is protected by a resettable circuit breaker.
An external power receptacle can provide DC and AC power for all systems from an Auxiliary Ground Power Unit
(AGPU).


Hydraulic System
The AH-64D has two independent hydraulic systems, labeled Primary and Utility. The Primary system exclusively
powers the hydraulic flight control system via the FMC and mechanical flight control linkages. It’s powered by the
main transmission and has a total capacity of six pints with a one-pint reservoir.
The Utility system is a secondary source of hydraulic power for the flight controls (bypassing the FMC), and
powers all other hydraulic systems: rotor brake, Area Weapon System turret drive, ammunition handling system,
APU start motor, tailwheel unlock actuator, and external weapon pylon elevation actuators. Because of the higher
loads placed on the utility system, it has a higher-volume manifold and larger reservoir.
The utility system also charges a 3,000-psi hydraulic accumulator. The hydraulic accumulator is used to provide
hydraulic damping during gun fire, hydraulic power to the APU starter, and can be used to temporarily power the
flight controls via the utility system in an emergency.
Both hydraulic systems are pressurized by a corresponding hydraulic pump powered by the transmission
accessory gearbox, which is powered by the main transmission while at flight RPMs or the APU during ground
operations.
Integrated Pressurized Air System (IPAS)
The IPAS provides pressurized air to aircraft pneumatic systems from engine bleed air. Bleed air is drawn from
two ports on each engine: a high-pressure port is exclusively used by each hydraulic pump, and a low-pressure
port is used by all other consumers. Low-pressure air is used by the engine air turbine starters, fuel boost and
transfer pumps, anti-ice system, ice detection probe, nitrogen inerting unit, vapor cycle cooling system, and
environmental control system.
IPAS bleed air can be provided by one or both engines, the APU, or an external source such as an AGPU.


Anti-Ice System
Ice detection is provided by an aspirating ice
detect probe, powered by pneumatic air from
the IPAS. The ice detect probe activates
whenever free air temperature drops to 5° C
or below. When the anti-ice system is in AUTO
mode, detection of ice will automatically
command activation of all anti-ice systems.
Ice protection is provided by engine inlet anti-
ice from main engine bleed air, electrical heat           Ice Detect Probe
to the pitot and air data system (ADS) sensors,
electric sensor aperture anti-ice, and
electrically heated canopies.
The canopies also include crewmember-controllable windshield wipers and a defog system powered by the IPAS.




                                                                                  WSPS guide vane




         WSPS guide vane
Environmental Control System (ECS)
The ECS provides avionics cooling via ventilation fans that force conditioned cooling air into each of the four
avionics bays. The ECS also provides crewmember comfort through ventilation, heating, and air conditioning.
Cockpit environmental control is provided via four gaspers installed in each crewstation, two over each shoulder
and another two mounted within the forward instrument panels.
Cockpit heating is provided by regulated bleed air from the IPAS.
Air conditioning is provided from two independent vapor cycle cooling systems. One system provides cooled air
for the Pilot and aft sections of each Extended Forward Avionics Bay (EFAB); the other system provides cooled
air for the CPG, the TADS and PNVS turrets, and the forward sections of each EFAB. A digital control unit (DCU)
manages the flow of cooled air for each system.




                          ECS 1 system




                                                             ECS 2 system




In the event of a failure of one of the ECS systems, the DCU of the functioning system will automatically open an
interconnect valve between the two cockpits. The ventilation fans in the failed cockpit will stop, and the functional
cockpit’s ventilation fans will force cooled air into both cockpits.
Lighting System
The AH-64D’s interior lighting consists of primary instrument lighting and secondary floodlights. The primary
lighting provides backlighting for all panels within the cockpit, such as switch labels, display bezels, and the
keypad. The floodlights are used to illuminate the main instrument panel and side consoles of each cockpit.
Each crewmember also has a dimmable utility light that can be aimed around the cockpit like a flashlight. The
standby instruments in the Pilot cockpit have their own independent lighting and, along with the utility light and
NVG-compatible floodlights, are powered by the battery in the event of a dual generator failure.
Exterior lighting consists of formation lights, navigation lights, anti-collision lights, and a steerable search and
landing light. The landing light is powered by the battery in the event of a dual generator failure.



          White/Red Anti-collision Light             Green Nav Light




                                                                                                     Searchlight




                                                Formation Lights                            Formation Lights




               Red Nav Light          White/Red Anti-collision Light                            White Nav Light
Avionics
AH-64D avionics subsystems communicate across four redundant multiplex (MUX) bus channels at 1 Mbps. Each
bus channel consists of a primary and secondary bus. Channel 1 is used for controls and displays, communications
and transponder equipment, and aircraft systems. Channel 2 is used by the Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE),
Data Transfer Unit (DTU), flight controls, and navigation systems. Channel 3 is used by the sighting, sensors,
and weapons systems. Channel 4 is used exclusively by the Fire Control Radar (FCR) and Radar Frequency
Interferometer (RFI).




Avionics systems are controlled in both cockpits by Multi-Purpose Displays (MPDs), two per cockpit. Each MPD
has six variable-action buttons (VAB) per side. The buttons of the top row are labeled (left to right) T1–T6, the
bottom row B1–B6, and the left and right columns are labeled (top to bottom) L1–L6 and R1–R6, respectively.
Button B1, labeled “M”, returns the crewmember to the MPD Menu page. Each MPD also includes six fixed-action
buttons (FAB) that allow immediate access to the FCR, WPN, TSD, A/C, COM and VID pages; and a "favorites"
button that allows quick access of up to three frequently used MPD pages.
With external power connected and both throttles in the OFF position, the MPDs will enter a “screen saver” mode
after five minutes of inactivity. Pressing any MPD button will re-activate all MPDs.
Unlike most other aircraft, the AH-64D’s primary flight information is presented to the crewmembers through a
helmet-mounted display, in lieu of dedicated instruments or displays on the instrument panel. This not only frees
up the MPDs to display mission-, sensor-, or weapons-related data, it also ensures the crewmembers can monitor
the flight state of the aircraft while keeping their focus “heads out” of the cockpit, regardless of the direction they
may be looking.
Navigation System
The AH-64D’s navigation system consists of two Embedded GPS Inertial Navigation Systems (EGI), the Doppler
Radar Velocity Sensor (DRVS), radar altimeter, automatic direction finder (ADF), Helicopter Air Data System
(HADS), and Flight Management Computer (FMC).
Each EGI consists of a five-channel encrypted GPS receiver that provides position updates to a ring laser gyro
(RLG) inertial navigation unit (INU). The two EGIs are labeled INU1 and INU2, and the navigation system will
automatically select between each as either primary or backup.


                                                               ADF receiver              Radar altimeter transmitter


                                                                                                    Radar altimeter receiver




                                  GPS receiver
                                                               Doppler velocity sensor




In addition, the AH-64D uses the AN/ASN-157 Doppler Radar Velocity Sensor (DRVS) as a velocity-aiding source
for the EGI. The DRVS uses Doppler radar measurements to determine aircraft ground speed and direction.
The AN/APN-209 Radar Altimeter provides height above ground level (AGL) to the navigation system. The APN-
209 uses a downward-facing radar transmitter and a separate receiver antenna to determine AGL altitude.
The AN/ARN-149 Automatic Direction Finder (ADF) provides audio and radio direction-finding capability for
transmissions between 100 and 2199.5 kHz.
                                                                    The Air Data System (ADS) consists of two
                                                                    independent air data subsystems: the Flight
   AADS probe                    Temperature probe
                                                                    Management Computer (FMC) and the
                                                                    Helicopter Air Data System (HADS). The HADS
                                                                    is comprised of the High Integrated Air Data
                                                                    Computer (HIADC) and two Airspeed And
                                                                    Direction Sensor (AADS) probes mounted to
                                                                    the engine nacelles. The AADS probes sense
                                                                    airspeed magnitude, direction, and free
                                                                    airstream temperature. The HIADC uses this
                                                                    data, along with ambient and pitot pressure
                                                                    sensors, to compute air mass related data.
                                                                     The FMC uses static and dynamic air pressures
measured from the static ports and pitot tubes to compute pressure altitude, air speed, and density altitude
related information. The FMC receives longitudinal and lateral true air speeds, static temperature, and non-filtered
true air speeds from the HIADC.
Communications System
The communications system includes an intercom for crewmember communication, an ARC-186(V) VHF-AM radio,
an ARC-164(V) UHF-AM radio, two ARC-201D VHF-FM radios, and an ARC-220 HF radio.




                                                                          VHF/FM1 “whip” antenna




                                                                   HF “towel bar” antenna




                                        FM2 “blade” antenna        UHF “blade” antenna




The VHF radio can receive between 108.000 and 115.975 MHz and transmit/receive between 116.000 and
151.975 MHz. The VHF radio includes no frequency-hopping or encryption capability.
The UHF can transmit and receive between 225.000 and 399.975 MHz; and includes a separate GUARD receiver
tuned to 243.000 MHz. The radio is capable of HAVE QUICK and HAVE QUICK II frequency-hopping as an
electronic counter-countermeasures (ECCM) capability. A KY-58 is installed which facilitates voice and data
encryption for the UHF radio.
The two FM radios can transmit and receive between 30.000 and 87.975 MHz. The radios support SINCGARS
combat nets for frequency-hopping and include internal encryption for secure voice and data. The FM1 radio can
be augmented by an improved FM amplifier capable of providing up to 40 watts of transmit power for extending
the transmission range of the radio.
The HF radio can transmit and receive between 2.0000 and 29.9999 MHz and utilizes a KY-100 for voice and data
encryption.
The AH-64D includes an MD-1295A modem that can transmit and receive AFAPD (Air Force Applications Program
Development) messages over any radio except the ARC-220 HF radio, which has its own internal modem.
All radios are connected to the battery bus and can be utilized without generator power, but are limited to single-
channel radio frequencies that have been pre-loaded into the avionics.
Identification System
The AH-64D includes an APX-118(V) transponder, capable of responding to interrogations in Mode 1, Mode 2,
Mode 3/A, and Mode C formats. The APX-118(V) can also reply to encrypted Mode 4 interrogations.




                     Upper transponder monopole antenna               Lower transponder monopole antenna




Sensor and Sighting Systems
The primary sensor and sighting system for
the AH-64 is the Integrated Helmet And                    Integrated Helmet Unit
Display Sighting System (IHADSS). The
IHADSS consists of the Helmet Display Unit
(HDU), a small, collimated display placed in
front of the crewmember’s right eye (on a
rotatable arm); the Integrated Helmet Unit
(IHU) and Sensor Surveying Units (SSU), a                                                             Sensor Surveying Unit
series of sensors in the cockpit that determine
crewmember head position and line-of-sight;
                                                          Helmet Display Unit
the Boresight Reticle Units (BRU), which
establishes sensor boresight; and avionics
systems that can slave sensor and weapon
systems to the IHADSS line of sight.
                                                                                The IHADSS displays sensor, targeting, and
                                                                                aircraft information in the crewmember’s
                                      AN/AAQ-11 M-PNVS turret                   line-of-sight, helping the crewmembers to
                                                                                locate and track targets and maintain
                                                                                situational awareness. The HDU symbology
                                                                                format changes depending on the display
                                                                                mode selected by the crew. The display is
                                                                                also capable of overlaying video from the
                                                                                PNVS or TADS sensors, augmenting the
                                                                                crewmembers’ view of terrain, obstacles,
                                                                                and targets at night or inclement weather.
                                                                                FLIR video for the Pilot comes from the
                                                                                AN/AAQ-11 Pilot Night Vision System
                                                                                (PNVS), which provides day- and night-
                                                                                capable infrared video.
The AN/ASQ-170 Target Acquisition Designation Sight (TADS) is an integrated target acquisition and tracking
system for the AH-64D’s Copilot/Gunner. It consists of both FLIR and Day TV (DTV) video systems, a laser
rangefinder/designator (LRF/D), and a laser spot tracker (LST). This gives the CPG the ability to locate, track,
and laser designate targets day and night, and in inclement weather conditions.




                                                                                        AN/AAQ-11 M-PNVS turret




                                                                                        AN/ASQ-170 M-TADS turret




Unique to the D model AH-64 is the AN/APG-78 Fire Control Radar (FCR) and AN/APR-48A Radar Frequency
Interferometer (RFI). The APG-78 is a millimeter-wave radar with the capability to detect and classify up to 256
air or ground targets. The radar is mounted atop the main rotor mast, allowing the helicopter to remain masked
while scanning for targets. It has a scan capability of ±45° in azimuth and ±25° in elevation, but can be rotated
±90° in azimuth to scan a sector to either side in air-to-ground mode, or a full 360° in air-to-air mode.



                             AN/APG-78 FCR                        AN/APR-48A RFI




Along with the IHADSS and TADS, the FCR can be used as a source of targeting data for the 30mm Area Weapon
System, 2.75-inch unguided rockets, and AGM-114 Hellfire anti-tank missiles.
WEAPONS & MUNITIONS
The AH-64D was designed primarily to employ the Hellfire Modular Missile System (HMMS), along with its Area
Weapon System and Aerial Rocket Subsystem. It has four hardpoints, two mounted to each stub wing. Each
hardpoint is capable of articulating between +4° to -15° in elevation.


M139 Area Weapon System (AWS)
The Area Weapon System (AWS) consists of an M230 30mm
automatic chain-driven gun mounted on the underside of the
helicopter between the two main landing gear, its turret,
controls, and the ammunition handling system. The weapon is
mounted on a hydraulically steered turret that can be slaved to
the TADS line-of-sight, the IHADSS line-of-sight, or a fixed
forward-firing position. The turret can steer up to ±86° in
azimuth and can elevate up to +11° or depress down to -60°.
The M230 fires 30x113mm link-less, tracer-less ammunition at a rate of up to 625 rounds per minute. Ammunition
is stored in a magazine in the main fuselage under the transmission and can hold up to 1200 rounds. When the
Internal Auxiliary Fuel System (IAFS) is installed, magazine size is reduced to 300 rounds.
M788 Target Practice. The M788 is an inert training round used for target
practice. The M788 is ballistically matched to the M789 HEDP rounds.
M789 High Explosive/Dual Purpose. The M789 is a dual-purpose tactical
round used for combat operations. The round has a light armor penetrating
capability as well as a bursting fragmentation effect for anti-material and anti-
personnel use.


Aerial Rocket Sub-System (ARS)
The Aerial Rocket Sub-system consists of M261 lightweight
rocket launchers, capable of firing 2.75-inch folding fin aerial
rockets (FFARs), primarily variants of the Hydra-70 rocket
family. The M261 consists of 19 individual rocket tubes, and
may be loaded on all four pylons, for a maximum of 76 rockets.
Each M261 rocket launcher is "zoned", allowing for carriage of
up to three different rocket types with one pair of launchers
mounted, or up to five rocket types with two pairs of rocket
launchers mounted. Each tube includes individual firing and
fusing circuits.
The Hydra-70 rocket family is typically employed with the Mk 66 motor, with many different warhead options
available. Variants employed by the U.S. Army include the following:
M151 High Explosive. Also called the "10-pounder", the M151 is used
against lightly armored and soft targets. The warhead may be equipped with
the either M423 point-detonating (PD) fuze or the M433 resistance-
capacitance (RC) programmable delay fuze.
M229 High Explosive. Also called the "17-pounder", the M229 is used
as an enhanced “aerial artillery” warhead over the M151. The warhead
is equipped with the M423 point-detonating (PD) fuze. Minimum range:
140 meters.


M156 White Phosphorus. The M156 “Willie Pete” rocket is used for
target marking. The warhead is equipped with an M423 point-detonating
fuze for ground dispersal of the warhead’s effects, which generates a        Not Implemented
white smoke marking signal for approximately 2 minutes (depending on
wind conditions). (N/I)


M264 Red Phosphorus. The M264 is used for generating smoke-
screen concealment. The warhead is equipped with an M439 variable
time delay fuze, which generates a white smoke concentration across          Not Implemented
several hundred meters for approximately 5 minutes (depending on wind
conditions). (N/I)


M261 Multi-Purpose Sub-Munition. The MPSM contains 9
submunitions for use against lightly- to medium-armored vehicles and
soft targets. The warhead is equipped with an M439 variable time delay       Not Implemented
fuze for an airburst just prior to the target. Minimum range 1,000 meters.
(N/I)


M255A1 Flechette. The “Flechette” contains 1,179 60-grain
hardened steel flechettes for use against soft targets or personnel. The
warhead is equipped with an M439 variable time delay fuze for an             Not Implemented
airburst just prior to the target. Minimum range 800 meters; effective
range 1 to 3 kilometers. (N/I)


M257 Illumination. The “Overt Illum” is used for battlefield
illumination, and is equipped with an M442 fixed time fuze, which
will deploy a parachute-equipped flare approximately 3,500 meters
from its launch point. Provides illumination for approximately 3
minutes.


M278 IR Illumination. The M278 “Covert Illum” is used for covert
battlefield illumination, and is equipped with an M442 fixed time fuze,
which will deploy a parachute-equipped flare approximately 3,500             Not Implemented
meters from its launch point. Provides IR illumination for night vision
goggle-equipped personnel for approximately 3 minutes. (N/I)


M274 Training. Also called the "blue spear", the M274 training rocket
produces a brief smoke signature for target practice. An M423 point-
detonating (PD) fuze is integrated into warhead casing, which detonates
to provide a small, but noticeable flash and smoke signature for impact
spotting. This rocket is ballistically matched to the M151 HE rocket to
provide identical targeting and engagement training for aircrews.
Hellfire Modular Missile System (HMMS)
The Hellfire Modular Missile System is the primary weapon system
of the AH-64D. It can employ both semi-active laser-guided (SAL)
and active radar-guided (RF) variants of the AGM-114 Hellfire
missile. The system consists of the M299 four-rail missile launcher,
which can fire all variants of the Hellfire missile.
The Hellfire is an air-to-ground, anti-armor missile that has been
expanded in capability to include other air-to-surface applications.
The Hellfire is an effective standoff weapon which can be employed
as a direct- or indirect-fire weapon and can be fired from behind
cover or in the open. The Hellfire weighs approximately 100 lbs.
and has a 20-pound high-explosive anti-tank (HEAT) warhead,
which includes a tandem shaped-charge for defeating reactive armor.
Up to four Hellfires can be loaded on a single launcher, for a total of up to sixteen.
AGM-114K Laser-guided HEAT. The AGM-114K is a semi-active
laser-homing variant with both Lock-On Before Launch (LOBL) and
Lock-On After Launch (LOAL) capability. In LOBL mode, the Hellfire uses
a nose-mounted laser seeker to lock on to a coded laser designation
prior to launch. When launched in LOAL mode, the crew can select from
multiple trajectories that the missile will fly using a digital autopilot
system until it detects a laser designation mid-flight that matches its
assigned laser code.
AGM-114L Radar-guided HEAT. The AGM-114L is an active
radar-guided variant, making it a fire-and-forget weapon, and
retains LOBL and LOAL capability like its laser-guided predecessor.
In LOBL mode, the Hellfire uses an onboard millimeter wave
(MMW) radar seeker to lock on to the target prior to launch. In
LOAL mode, the Hellfire uses an inertial guidance system to fly to
the target location prior to acquiring the target with its MMW radar.


Auxiliary Fuel Systems (IAFS & ERFS)
The AH-64D can be equipped with auxiliary fuel systems to increase range and combat radius, extend endurance
at the objective area, or enable the AH-64D to self-deploy over long distances.
100-gallon Internal Auxiliary Fuel System (IAFS). The 100-gallon IAFS replaces the standard 1200-round
ammunition magazine for the Area Weapon System. The IAFS provides 98 gallons of usable fuel and storage for
up to 242 rounds of 30mm ammunition (300 rounds total). Like the main fuel tanks, the IAFS is crashworthy,
self-sealing if punctured by hostile fire, and nitrogen-inerted to prevent incendiary effects.
230-gallon Extended Range Fuel System
(ERFS). The 230-gallon ERFS tanks can be
mounted to the external wing stations. Unlike
the IAFS, the ERFS tanks do not have a fuel
quantity measurement system, but each ERFS
tank does have a sensor to indicate when the
tank itself is empty. In addition, the ERFS tanks
are not crashworthy or self-sealing, and are
typically only used for self-deployment.
However, on occasion these tanks may be used
in combat areas if absolutely necessary.
PILOT COCKPIT OVERVIEW
The Pilot’s primary task is to facilitate the Copilot/Gunner’s ability to operate the aircraft sensors and weapon
systems. The Pilot maintains awareness of the aircrew’s surroundings and the tactical situation; and maneuvers
the aircraft as necessary to ensure the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) can perform unimpeded sensor scans or employ
weapon systems.
The Pilot’s secondary task is to maintain security of the aircraft and aircrew. As the CPG will often be focused
inside the cockpit while operating the aircraft sensors, weapons, and radios, the Pilot maintains a “heads-out”
focus as much as possible. The Pilot remains on the look-out within the immediate vicinity around the aircraft
and is ready to employ the Area Weapon System (AWS) against close-in threats to protect the aircraft or other
team members if necessary.
When equipped with the mast-mounted Fire Control Radar (FCR), the Pilot can use the FCR to assist the CPG in
the targeting process by directing the CPG to specific areas within which to perform TADS sensor scans, or even
hand over individual targets to the CPG for engagement. Alternatively, the Pilot can use the FCR to autonomously
detect, acquire and engage enemy targets with any of the aircraft’s three weapon systems.


                                                         Boresight Reticle Unit (BRU)
                             Instrument Panel                                                CMWS Control Panel




             Keyboard Unit

                                                                                                         Data Transfer Unit (DTU)




      Left Console
                                                                                                                  Right Console

                                             Cyclic &                   Anti-Torque Pedals
                                            Collective
                                            Controls




It is important to have a general understanding of where the various controls are located. To help locate items
more easily, the cockpit has been delineated into five primary areas: Instrument Panel, the Keyboard Unit
(KU), Left Console, Right Console, and the CMWS Control Panel.
Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that instrument panel or console,
to include the Cyclic & Collective Controls. Selecting the image of the instrument panel or console will return
the manual back to this page.
The CMWS Control Panel is described in the Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) chapter.
Instrument Panel


                                                     Master Warning/Master Caution
                  Standby Magnetic Compass                Lighted Pushbuttons




    Fire Detection/Extinguishing Panel                                                  Enhanced Upfront Display (EUFD)

    Left Multi-Purpose Display (MPD)                                                    Right Multi-Purpose Display (MPD)

    Canopy Jettison Handle                                                                       Master Zeroize Switch

                                                                                                 Standby Attitude Indicator




     Armament Panel                                                                                      Standby Altimeter

          Video Panel                                                                           Standby Airspeed Indicator

                          Parking Brake Handle                      Check Overspeed Test/Generator Reset Panel

                                                                    Windshield Wiper Control Panel


Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that instrument or panel. Selecting
the image of the instrument or panel will return the manual back to this page.
The Enhanced Upfront Display (EUFD) and Multi-Function Display (MPD) are described in dedicated sections later
in this chapter.


Standby Magnetic Compass
The standby magnetic compass is used by the Pilot for heading reference
when there has been a failure of primary power, or the navigation system
has become unreliable.
Due to magnetic variances and other inaccuracies during normal flight
maneuvers, the standby magnetic compass should not be relied upon for
precise heading or navigation information. The aircraft should immediately
be recovered to a suitable friendly location. Visual landmarks may be used
to maintain awareness of aircraft position and aid in navigation back to
maintenance facilities or friendly-controlled areas.
Master Warning/Master Caution Lighted Pushbuttons
The Master Warning/Master Caution lighted pushbuttons alerts the
Pilot to observe the EUFD WCA area for warning and caution messages
indicating conditions that require their immediate attention.
1.   MSTR WARN Button. Acknowledges the MASTER WARNING
                                                                                1. MSTR WARN Button
     condition. Extinguishes the MSTR WARN light in the Pilot
     crewstation and ceases the corresponding voice warning
     message in both crewstations.
     •    MSTR WARN Light. Flashes to alert the Pilot to a                      2. MSTR CAUT Button
          WARNING message displayed on the EUFD.
2.   MSTR WARN Button. Acknowledges the MASTER CAUTION
     condition. Extinguishes the MSTR CAUT light and ceases the
     corresponding caution audio tone in the Pilot crewstation.
     •    MSTR CAUT Light. Illuminates to alert the Pilot to a CAUTION message displayed on the EUFD.


Fire Detection/Extinguishing Panel
The FIRE DET/EXTG Panel controls the fire detection      1. ENG 1 FIRE Button      2. APU FIRE Button   3. ENG 2 FIRE Button
and suppression equipment. It consists of three
pushbutton warning lights, with covers, that
illuminate when a fire is detected and two
pushbuttons that discharge extinguishing agents into
the selected component.
Fire detection sensors are present in each engine
nacelle, the APU compartment, and the aft deck area
near the transmission accessory gearbox. However,
the Halon extinguishing agent can only be discharged
into either engine nacelle or the APU compartment.
1.   ENG 1 Button. The ENG 1 FIRE button is used                              5. TEST Switch
                                                               4. PRI Button                  6. RES Button
     to indicate when a fire is detected within the left
     engine nacelle and to arm the fire extinguishing system for discharge into the left engine nacelle.
     •    FIRE Light. The yellow FIRE light will illuminate at any time a fire is detected within the left engine
          nacelle, and will extinguish when a fire is no longer detected.
     •    RDY Light. The green RDY light will illuminate when the ENG 1 FIRE button has been pressed in either
          crewstation. When pressed, the following occurs:
          o    Fuel flow to engine 1 is shut off, however the engine will continue to operate until the remaining
               fuel within the fuel lines and engine fuel manifold is consumed.
          o    The fire extinguishing system is armed.
          o    Bleed air from engine 1 is shut off.
          o    The MSTR WARN light is acknowledged and the “ENGINE 1 FIRE” voice warning message will
               cease.
     •    Once armed, only the crewstation within which the ENG 1 FIRE button was pressed can dis-arm it and
          restore the systems to their normal operating conditions.
2.   APU Button. The APU FIRE button is used to indicate when a fire is detected within the APU compartment
     and to arm the fire extinguishing system for discharge into the APU compartment.
     •    FIRE Light. The yellow FIRE light will illuminate at any time a fire is detected within the APU
          compartment, and will extinguish when a fire is no longer detected.
     •    RDY Light. The green RDY light will illuminate when the APU FIRE button has been pressed in either
          crewstation. When pressed, the following occurs:
          o    Fuel flow to APU is shut off, however the APU will continue to operate until the remaining fuel
               within the fuel lines and APU fuel system is consumed.
          o    The fire extinguishing system is armed.
          o    Bleed air from the APU is shut off.
          o    The MSTR WARN light is acknowledged and the “APU FIRE” voice warning message will cease.
     •    Once armed, only the crewstation within which the APU FIRE button was pressed can dis-arm it and
          restore the systems to their normal operating conditions.
3.   ENG 2 Button. The ENG 2 FIRE button is used to indicate when a fire is detected within the right engine
     nacelle and to arm the fire extinguishing system for discharge into the right engine nacelle.
     •    FIRE Light. The yellow FIRE light will illuminate at any time a fire is detected within the right engine
          nacelle, and will extinguish when a fire is no longer detected.
     •    RDY Light. The green RDY light will illuminate when the ENG 1 FIRE button has been pressed in either
          crewstation. When pressed, the following occurs:
          o    Fuel flow to engine 2 is shut off, however the engine will continue to operate until the remaining
               fuel within the fuel lines and engine fuel manifold is consumed.
          o    The fire extinguishing system is armed.
          o    Bleed air from engine 2 is shut off.
          o    The MSTR WARN light is acknowledged and the “ENGINE 2 FIRE” voice warning message will
               cease.
     •    Once armed, only the crewstation within which the ENG 2 FIRE button was pressed can dis-arm it and
          restore the systems to their normal operating conditions.
4.   PRI Button. Pressing this button will discharge the Primary fire extinguishing bottle into the compartment
     selected using the ENG 1, ENG 2, or APU pushbuttons above.
     •    DISCH Light. Illuminates when the Primary extinguisher bottle is armed and available for use. When
          the Primary bottle is discharged, the light will extinguish; or if the fire extinguishing system is disarmed
          by de-selecting the ENG 1, ENG 2, or APU pushbuttons above.
5.   Test Switch. Pressing this switch to the TEST 1 or TEST 2 positions will test the fire detection circuits.
     When released, the switch is spring-loaded back to the center position.
     •    TEST 1. Tests fire detection circuit 1. A successful test is indicated by the following:
          o    All three FIRE lights on the ENG 1, ENG 2, and APU pushbuttons are illuminated in both
               crewstations.
          o    The MSTR WARN lighted pushbutton will be illuminated in both crewstations.
          o    The AFT DECK FIRE warning message will be displayed on the EUFD.
          o    “AFT DECK FIRE”, “ENGINE 1 FIRE”, “ENG 2 FIRE”, “APU FIRE” voice warning messages will be
               heard in sequence.
     •    TEST 2. Tests fire detection circuit 2. A successful test is indicated by the same items as the TEST 1
          position, with the addition of the following:
          o    Both DISCH lights on the PRI and RES pushbuttons are illuminated in both crewstations.
6.   RES Button. Pressing this button will discharge the Reserve fire extinguishing bottle into the compartment
     selected using the ENG 1, ENG 2, or APU pushbuttons above.
     •    DISCH Light. Illuminates when the Reserve extinguisher bottle is armed and available for use. When
          the Reserve bottle is discharged, the light will extinguish; or if the fire extinguishing system is disarmed
          by de-selecting the ENG 1, ENG 2, or APU pushbuttons above.


Armament Panel
The Armament Panel controls the master arm state of the aircraft.
Each button is common to both crewstations, in that pressing a
button in one crewstation will change the state of the button in the
other crewstation accordingly.
1.   A/S Button. Pressing this button toggles the master arm
     state between ARM and SAFE when the aircraft is not weight-
     on-wheels, or any time the Ground Override is ON.
     •    ARM Light. Indicates the aircraft is Armed.
                                                                             1. A/S Button    2. GND ORIDE Button
          o    Weapons may be fired from the aircraft.
          o    The laser rangefinder/designator may be fired.
     •    SAFE Light. Indicates the aircraft is Safe.
          o    Weapons are inhibited from firing.
          o    The laser rangefinder/designator is inhibited from firing.
2.   GND ORIDE Button. Pressing this button enables/disables the Ground Override. The Ground Override
     state will have no effect on aircraft systems when airborne.
     •    ON Light. Indicates the Ground Override is enabled. When on the ground (weight-on-wheels), the
          following inhibits are affected:
          o    The A/S button may be toggled to the ARM state. Disabling the Ground Override will automatically
               set the A/S button to the SAFE state.
          o    Weapon systems may be actioned. Disabling the Ground Override will automatically de-action any
               actioned weapon systems.
          o    FCR emissions are permitted. Disabling the Ground Override will automatically cease any FCR
               emissions.
          o    The Chaff dispenser may be armed. Disabling the Ground Override will automatically set the Chaff
               state to SAFE.
Video Panel
The Video Panel controls the brightness and display of sensor          1. IHADSS BRT/CON Knob       2. SYM BRT Knob
video.
1.   IHADSS BRT/CON Knob. Two concentric knobs that
     controls the brightness and contrast of the Helmet Display
     Unit (HDU). The outer knob controls video brightness and the
     inner knob controls video contrast.
2.   SYM BRT Knob. Controls the brightness of the IHADSS
     symbology displayed on the HDU independently of the video
     underlay.
3.   ACM Switch. When on, FLIR gain and level is controlled
     automatically. When off, the FLIR knob is enabled. (N/I)
4.   FLIR LVL/GAIN Knob. Two concentric knobs that control                     3. ACM Switch    4. FLIR LVL/GAIN Knob
     the display of FLIR video from the PNVS or TADS. The outer
     knob controls level and the inner knob controls gain.


Canopy Jettison Handle
The Canopy Jettison handle can be used to aid in emergency egress from
the aircraft. When initiated, the canopy side panels on either side of each
crewstation will be explosively jettisoned from the canopy frame. Either
crewmember can initiate the canopy jettison process, as can rescue crews
via an external jettison handle. (N/I)
Each of the three Canopy Jettison handles are physically locked in place via
a safety pin, which are stowed prior to flight. A stowage slot is present in
each crewstation for storing the safety pins during flight.


Master Zeroize Switch
The guarded Master Zeroize switch erases all sensitive data onboard the aircraft in the
event the aircraft is forced down in a hostile area. (N/I)
Standby Attitude Indicator
The standby attitude indicator is a self-
contained attitude indicator that displays              1. Bank Angle Scale

±85° of aircraft pitch and 360° of aircraft
                                                     2. Bank Angle Indicator
roll. The indicator is used by the Pilot for
attitude reference when there has been                    3. Attitude Sphere
a failure of primary power, or the flight
reference system has become unreliable.        4. Aircraft Symbol (Waterline)

The attitude indicator can develop errors                      5. Pitch Scale
during aggressive maneuvers, which may
require it to be caged in flight using the            6. Slip Indicator (Ball)
PULL TO CAGE knob.
                                                   7. Rate-of-Turn Indicator
A yellow OFF warning flag will appear
when the indicator is caged, or electrical
                                                     8. PULL TO CAGE Knob
power to the attitude indicator has been
lost.
1.   Bank Angle Scale. Indicates the bank angle when used in conjunction with the Bank Angle Indicator. A
     white triangular bank angle index is set at 0° of bank. Major tick marks are placed at 30°, 60° and 90°
     angles of bank. Minor tick marks are placed at 10° and 20° angles of bank.
2.   Bank Angle Indicator. Indicates bank angle relative to the horizon. When the indicator is aligned with the
     fixed triangular bank angle index, the aircraft is in a level attitude.
3.   Attitude Sphere. Rotates within the indicator to indicate pitch and roll attitude throughout most
     orientations of flight, in relation to the Aircraft Symbol. The white hemisphere indicates the aircraft nose is
     pointed above the horizon toward the sky, in a climb. The black hemisphere indicates the aircraft nose is
     pointed below the horizon toward the ground, in a dive.
4.   Aircraft Symbol (Waterline). Provides a fixed attitude reference of the aircraft nose around which the
     Attitude Sphere rotates. The vertical alignment of the symbol can be manually adjusted by rotating the PULL
     TO CAGE knob.
5.   Pitch Scale. Provides an attitude reference scale of aircraft pitch in relation to the Aircraft Symbol. Major
     tick marks are placed at every 10° of pitch and minor tick marks are placed at every 5° of pitch.
6.   Slip Indicator (Ball). Indicates whether the aircraft is in coordinated flight. With the ball centered between
     the two black marks, the aircraft is in coordinated flight, which minimizes drag. If the ball is left of center,
     applying left pedal will adjust tail rotor thrust to bring the aircraft back into coordinated flight. Likewise, if
     the ball is right of center, applying right pedal will adjust tail rotor thrust to bring the aircraft back into
     coordinated flight.
7.   Rate-of-Turn Indicator. Indicates the aircraft rate of turn, with the lower white bar moving left and right
     to indicate an increased turn rate in that direction. One bar width equates to 1° to 1.2° per second turn
     rate. If the lower white bar is aligned with the upper white bar in the center, the aircraft is not turning. If
     the lower white bar is aligned with the upper white bars on the left or right, the aircraft is in a standard rate,
     3° per second turn. If the lower white bar is centered between two of the upper white bars, the aircraft is
     in a half standard rate turn.
8.   PULL TO CAGE Knob. Cages the attitude indicator and is used to adjust the relative pitch of the Aircraft
     Symbol in relation to the Attitude Sphere. When the knob is pulled outward, the Attitude Sphere is caged to
     a level attitude orientation regardless of the aircraft’s actual attitude, causing the OFF warning flag to appear.
     When pulled outward and rotated fully clockwise, the attitude indicator is locked in the caged position.
Standby Airspeed Indicator
The standby airspeed indicator is used by the Pilot
for airspeed reference when there has been a failure
of primary power, or the flight reference system has
become unreliable. The indicator is pneumatically            1. Airspeed Indicator
operated by the right pitot probe.
1.   Airspeed Indicator. Indicates indicated
     airspeed along the Indicated Airspeed Scale.
2.   Indicated Airspeed Scale. The outer scale
     of the instrument, from 0 to 250 knots. Tick      2. Indicated Airspeed Scale
     marks are set at 50-knot increments, and dots
     are set at 10-knot increments starting at 20
     knots.


Standby Altimeter
The standby altimeter is used by the Pilot for
barometric altitude reference when there has been a     1. 1000-foot Altitude Scale
failure of primary power, or the flight reference
system has become unreliable. The altimeter is            2. 1000-ft Scale Indicator
pneumatically operated by the static pressure
system.
                                                               3. Altitude Indicator
1.   1000-foot Altitude Scale. Each major tick
     mark corresponds with 100-foot increments,              4. “Kollsman” Window
     with minor tick marks corresponding to 50-foot
     increments.                                        5. Barometric Setting Knob

2.   1000-foot Scale Indicator. Indicates the
     aircraft altitude on the outer 1000-foot scale.
3.   Altitude Indicator. Indicates the current barometric altitude in 1000-foot increments from 0 feet to 20,000
     feet.
4.   “Kollsman” Window. Indicates current altimeter setting correction in inches of mercury (in/Hg). The
     altimeter setting on the AH-64D is designed to be used in conjunction with QNH barometric altimeter settings
     to calibrate the altimeter to altitudes above mean sea level (MSL).
5.   Barometric Setting Knob. Sets altimeter setting correction as displayed in the “Kollsman” Window.


Check Overspeed Test/Generator Reset Panel
Tests engine overspeed circuits and provides a means to
reset the generators if the MPDs are non-functional
following a power failure.
1.   CKT A Switch. Tests the overspeed protection
     Circuit A for each engine.
     •    ENG 1. Not implemented.
                                                              1. CKT A Switch          2. CKT B Switch   3. GEN RST Switch
     •    OFF. The switch is spring-loaded to this
          position.
     •    ENG 2. Not implemented.
2.   CKT B Switch. Tests the overspeed protection Circuit B for each engine.
     •    ENG 1. Not implemented.
     •    OFF. The switch is spring-loaded to this position.
     •    ENG 2. Not implemented.
3.   GEN RST Switch. Performs a reset of either generator in the case of a power failure.
     •    GEN 1. Resets Generator 1.
     •    GEN 2. Resets Generator 2.


Windshield Wiper Control Panel
Controls the external windshield wipers and canopy
defog functions.
1.   DEFOG Button. Directs hot air mixed with ambient
     air from the cockpit against the canopy side panels
     to remove fogging. (N/I)
2.   WINDSHIELD WIPER Knob. Sets the speed for
     the windshield wiper or returns the wiper to the
     PARK position.                                                 1. DEFOG Button   2. WINDSHIELD WIPER Knob

     •    PARK. Holding the knob in this position will move the windshield wiper to its designated parking
          location. When released, the knob will be spring-loaded to the OFF position.
     •    OFF. Powers off the windshield wiper at its current position.
     •    LO. Powers the windshield wiper and sets the motion to low speed.
     •    HI. Powers the windshield wiper and sets the motion to high speed.


Parking Brake Handle
The PARK BRAKE handle can be used by the Pilot to set the wheel brakes without
needing to continuously apply pressure to the anti-torque pedals themselves. To
set the brakes using this method, the brakes are engaged by applying pressure
to the anti-torque pedals in either crewstation, and the Pilot then pulls the PARK
BRAKE handle out. The pressure on the anti-torque pedals is then released.
To release the brakes after they have been set using the PARK BRAKE handle,
either crewmember may simply apply brake pressure using the anti-torque
pedals, and the Parking Brake handle will snap inward.
Note that the PARK BRAKE handle can be pulled and locked in the outward
position without applying the wheel brakes, and therefore the outward position
of the handle does not directly correlate to the brakes being set. However, if the
PARK BRAKE handle is in the forward position, the brakes are indeed released.
Keyboard Unit
5The Keyboard Unit (KU) is used by
the crewmembers to input data into
the aircraft computers, perform
arithmetic functions, or be used as
a scratchpad to temporarily record
data for a brief time.
Each      Keyboard       Unit     is
independently operated by either
crewmember, and data is only
entered and utilized by the onboard
computers when a data prompt is
present on the KU display itself.
The N, E, S and W keys are boxed
for easy recognition if coordinates
are to be input using Latitude and
Longitude.




Data Entry and Arithmetic Functions
The KU uses an “overtype” method of data          1. Display Prompt      2. Scratchpad Display      3. Arithmetic Buttons
entry, in that any data underneath the flashing
cursor will be overwritten by the next
character entered, and each subsequent
character to the right of the cursor will be
continuously overwritten as more characters
are entered.
1.   Display Prompt. Indicates the type of
     data that will be input if accepted by the
     avionics. Pressing an MPD pushbutton
     associated with a data entry symbol >
     will show the corresponding prompt on
     the KU followed by a colon. The desired
     data can then be input into the
     scratchpad.
2.   Scratchpad Display. The maximum
     number of characters that can be
     displayed on the KU scratchpad itself is
     22, but the scroll buttons can be used to
     move the cursor left or right in a
                                                                 4. CLR Button         5. Scroll Arrows       6. ENTER Button
     continuous scrolling fashion if the data
     entry exceeds the 22 characters on the        7. Display Brightness Knob    8. BKS Button       9. SPC Button
     display.
3.   Arithmetic Buttons. If a display prompt is not present on the scratchpad display, basic arithmetic functions
     may be performed using these keys. To perform basic arithmetic, enter a number, followed by either the *
     (multiply), ÷ (divide), + (add), or - (subtract) keys. Enter another number and press Enter (equal). The
     resultant value will display on the scratch pad.
4.   CLR Button. Removes all data entered on the scratchpad but will not remove or cancel a display prompt if
     present.
5.   Scroll Arrows. Moves the cursor position left or right on the display to set the data entry point over existing
     characters.
6.   ENTER Button. Used to accept a data input to an MPD data entry prompt. If data input is invalid, the
     characters on the scratchpad display will flash, and the data will need to be edited before it can be accepted
     into the MPD data prompt.
7.   Display Brightness Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the KU scratchpad display.
8.   BKS Button. Removes the character to the left of the cursor and shifts the cursor to the left, along with
     any characters underneath or to the right of the cursor.
9.   SPC Button. Places a blank character space at the cursor position.
Left Console

                                                  Free Air Temperature Gauge


                                 Power Quadrant Panel                          Tail Wheel/NVS Mode Panel


       Exterior Lighting/
     Interior Lighting Panel




                                                                                       Emergency Panel

                               Stores Jettison Panel




                                                                                                 Canopy Jettison Handle Pin




Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that panel. Selecting the image
of the panel will return the manual back to this page.


Tail Wheel/NVS Mode Panel
Controls the tail wheel locking mechanism and the
operating mode of the crewstation’s Night Vision System.
1.   TAIL WHEEL Button. Toggles the commanded
     state of the tail wheel locking mechanism between
     locked and unlocked.
     •     UNLOCK Light. Illuminates to indicate when
           the tail wheel is unlocked, regardless of the                           1. TAIL WHEEL Button         2. NVS MODE Switch
           commanded state of the locking mechanism.
2.   NVS MODE Switch. Sets the operating mode of the Night Vision System within the crewstation. The default
     NVS sensor selections are the PNVS in the Pilot crewstation and the TADS in the CPG crewstation, unless
     the NVS Select Switch on the Collective Flight Grip has been used to swap the NVS sensor selections.
     •     FIXED. Activates the selected NVS sensor and slaves it to the fixed forward position (0° in azimuth
           and -4.9° in elevation). If the selected NVS sensor is the PNVS, it will be un-stowed. If the selected
           NVS sensor is TADS, it will switch to FLIR in Wide field-of-view, regardless of the TEDAC switch settings.
     •     NORM. Activates the selected NVS sensor and slaves it to the crewmember’s IHADSS line-of-sight. If
           the selected NVS sensor is the PNVS, it will be un-stowed. If the selected NVS sensor is TADS, it will
           switch to FLIR in Wide field-of-view, regardless of the TEDAC switch settings.
     •     OFF. Deactivates the selected NVS sensor and stows it. The PNVS will return to the stowed position
           and the TADS will stow in the fixed forward position (0° in azimuth and -4.9° in elevation).
Emergency Panel
The Emergency Panel provides a singular location for the       1. GUARD Button   3. ZEROIZE Switch
crewmember to perform miscellaneous emergency
actions, without requiring navigation through MPD pages
to access the associated functions. (N/I)
1.   GUARD Button. Tunes the UHF radio to the
     GUARD frequency of 243.000 MHz. The frequency
     in the Primary slot of the UHF radio will be moved
     to the Standby slot, and GUARD will be displayed
     as the frequency callsign.
                                                                         2. XPNDR Button     4. EMERG HYD Button
     Pressing this button when it is already set to ON will
     return the previous UHF frequency to the Primary
     slot and place the GUARD frequency in the Standby slot.
     •    ON Light. Illuminates to indicate that the GUARD button has been pressed in either crewstation.
2.   XPNDR Button. Sets the transponder Mode 3/A code to 7700 to indicate the aircraft is experiencing an in-
     flight emergency. If the transponder is in STBY, it will automatically be set to NORM, and EUFD transponder
     information will indicate a status of “7700 EMER”.
     Pressing this button when it is already set to ON will return the transponder to the NORM status, but the
     Mode 3/A code will need to be manually changed by either crewmember.
     •    ON Light. Illuminates to indicate that the XPNDR button has been pressed in either crewstation.
3.   ZEROIZE Switch. When set to the forward position, all communications encryption, modem settings, and
     any TSD points within the navigational database will be erased.
4.   EMERG HYD Button. Activates the emergency hydraulics system. This system provides emergency
     hydraulic pressure to the utility hydraulic system for a very brief period in order to perform an immediate
     emergency landing.
     •    ON Light. Illuminates to indicate that the emergency hydraulics has been activated by either
          crewmember.
Power Quadrant Panel
The Pilot’s Power Quadrant includes
controls for battery, APU and engine
start, and rotor brake operation. The
POWER levers manage engine output
during normal and manual control         1. RTR BRK Switch
                                              Button
operations.
1.   RTR BRK Switch. Controls the
     commanded state of the rotor
                                          2. MSTR IGN Knob
     brake mounted to the accessory
     gearbox      of   the    main
     transmission.
                                             3. FRICT Lever
     •    OFF. The rotor brake is
          commanded to disengage.
                                             4. APU Button
     •    BRK. The rotor brake is
          commanded to engage in a
          low-pressure     state    to       5. ENG START
          reduce the time it takes for          Switches

          the    rotor   system     to
          decelerate to a stop. Used
          when shutting down in high
                                            6. ENG POWER
          winds or when on board a
                                                Levers
          naval vessel in rough sea
          conditions.
     •    LOCK. The rotor brake is
          commanded to engage in a
          high-pressure     state   to
          prevent the rotor from spinning. Used when performing an engine start in high winds or when on board
          a naval vessel in rough sea conditions.
     Rotor brake operation is electronically inhibited if either ENG POWER lever is beyond the IDLE position.
2.   MSTR IGN Knob. Enables battery or external power to the aircraft.
     •    OFF. Disconnects the battery from the DC battery bus.
     •    BATT. Connects the battery to the DC battery bus. If the aircraft is receiving DC power from the
          Transformer-Rectifier Units (TRUs), the battery will be set to a charging state, but will automatically
          provide emergency power to the battery bus if a TRU failure occurs.
     •    EXT PWR. Enables external AC and DC power to be supplied via the external power receptacle.
3.   FRICT Lever. Adjusts the friction resistance when moving the engine power levers. (N/I)
4.   APU Button. Intiates the APU automatic start-up and shutdown sequences.
     •    ON Light. Illuminates to indicate when the APU has successfully started and is operating.
5.   ENG START Switches. Controls the pneumatic air starters and ignition systems of each main engine.
     •    START. Moving the switch momentarily to this position initiates an automatic start sequence for the
          respective engine and enables the engine ignitors. The System Processor (SP) will automatically
          activate the fuel boost pump and open the pneumatic valve to the engine air starter to spool the NG
          section of the engine. The SP will automatically close the pneumatic valve to disengage the starter
          when the NG reaches 52% RPM.
     •    OFF. Normal position of the ENG START switch after initiating a START sequence or motoring the
          engine using the IGN ORIDE position.
     •    IGN ORIDE. Moving the switch to this position manually opens the pneumatic valve to the engine air
          starters to spool the NG section of the engine. The System Processor (SP) will not activate the fuel
          boost pump nor the engine ignition system. The pneumatic air starters will continue to spool the N G
          section of the engine at ~25% RPM until the ENG START switch is returned to the OFF position, which
          will close the close the pneumatic valve to disengage the starter.
          An engine start sequence may be aborted by setting the ENG START switches to the IGN ORIDE
          position and then to OFF. This will disable the engine ignition system, disengage the engine air starters,
          and the fuel boost pump will be automatically deactivated by the SP.
6.   ENG POWER Levers. Controls the fuel flow and control mode of each main engine. Each ENG POWER
     lever is connected to the corresponding Hydromechanical Unit (HMU) on the engine through the Power
     Available Spindle (PAS).
     Each ENG POWER lever includes a detent that prevents the lever from being inadvertantly advanced beyond
     FLY into the LOCK OUT range, or retarded below IDLE to OFF. A finger-lift detent lever on each ENG POWER
     lever disengages the mechanical detents.
     •    LOCK OUT. Setting the ENG POWER lever to this position will lock out the Digital Electronic Control
          (DEC) from electronically regulating fuel flow and will set the engine throttle to fully open. This will also
          disable the NP overspeed protection and TGT limiting functions of the DEC, so the engine throttle will
          need to be manually controlled using the ENG POWER lever to prevent an overspeed or
          overtemperature condition.
          This position is only used during emergency procedures in which the DEC has malfunctioned or failed
          in some manner, requiring the aircrew to manually control the engine throttle in order to prevent an
          engine overspeed or overtemperature, or to maintain the rotor RPM (NR) within an acceptable range
          for flight.
     •    FLY. Setting the ENG POWER lever to this position will set the PAS to the FLY position and command
          the DEC to trim fuel flow to maintain the rotor RPM (NR) at 101%. Each engine will automatically
          regulate their respective throttle settings to equally balance the torque requirement between each
          engine (load-sharing).
     •    IDLE. Setting the ENG POWER lever to this position will set the PAS to the IDLE position. The DEC will
          no longer regulate the fuel flow based on rotor RPM (NR) and the load-sharing logic between the
          engines is disabled.
          Setting the ENG POWER lever to this position will also reset the DEC from the LOCK OUT condition,
          returning DEC-related functionality to the respective engine.
     •    OFF. Setting the ENG POWER lever to this position will set the PAS to the OFF position, shutting off
          fuel flow to the engine.
     When the RTR BRK switch is in the BRK or LOCK positions, the ENG POWER levers will be physically inhibited
     from advancing beyond the IDLE position.
Stores Jettison Panel
The Stores Jettison panel allows the crewmembers to                            2. L INBD Button          4. R OUTBD Button
selectively jettison individual weapon stations in lieu of
performing an emergency jettison of all stations at once.     1. L OUTBD Button             3. R INBD Button

Each weapon station can be armed/disarmed by toggling
the corresponding pushbutton on this panel. Each
pushbutton includes an ARM light which indicates that
that station will be jettisoned when the JETT button is
pressed.
Only the crewstation that has armed a weapon station
for jettison can disarm it. However, once any stations are
armed, either crewmember can initiate the jettison
sequence by pressing the JETT button.
1.   L OUTBD Button. Arms/disarms the left outboard
     wing station for jettison.
                                                                 5. No function      6. JETT Button     7. No function
2.   L INBD Button. Arms/disarms the left inboard
     wing station for jettison.
3.   R INBD Button. Arms/disarms the right inboard wing station for jettison.
4.   R OUTBD Button. Arms/disarms the right outboard wing station for jettison.
5.   L TIP Button. No function.
6.   JETT Button. Jettisons any weapon stations that have been selectively armed.
7.   R TIP Button. No function.


Exterior Lighting/Interior Lighting Panel
The Exterior Lighting/Interior Lighting panel controls the     1. NAV Switch        2. SIGNAL Knob       3. PRIMARY Knob
exterior aircraft lighting and the interior lighting within
the Pilot cockpit.
1.   NAV Switch. Sets the brightness levels of the
     engine nacelle-mounted red/green and the tail
     mounted white navigation lights.
     •    BRT. Sets the navigation lights to bright.
     •    OFF. Sets the navigation lights to off.
     •    DIM. Sets the navigation lights to dim.
2.   SIGNAL Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the signal
     lights within the cockpit when set to nighttime
     brightness levels. This knob will have no function if
     the signal lights are set to daytime brightness level.
     Rotating the knob to the RST (Reset) detent will set
     the signal light brightness scale to nighttime levels    4. FORM Knob           5. FLOOD Knob       6. STBY INST Knob

     if the PRIMARY knob is not in the OFF position and
                                                               7. ANTI COLL Switch         8. PRESS TO TEST Button
     the FLOOD knob is less than 50%.
3.   PRIMARY Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the primary instrument backlighting within the cockpit. Rotating
     this knob to the OFF position will revert the signal lights to daytime mode.
4.   FORM Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the exterior formation lights on the wing tips, tail boom, and vertical
     stabilizer.
5.   FLOOD Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the interior flood lights within the cockpit. Rotating this knob
     clockwise beyond the 50% setting will revert the signal lights to daytime mode.
6.   STBY INST Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the standby instrument illumination within the cockpit.
7.   ANTI COLL Switch. Sets the operating mode of the engine nacelle-mounted anti-collision strobe lights.
     •    WHT. Sets the anti-collision lights to a white, alternating flash pattern.
     •    OFF. Sets the anti-collision lights to off.
     •    RED. Sets the anti-collision lights to a red, alternating flash pattern.
8.   PRESS TO TEST Button. Illuminates all signal lights to verify their function.


Free Air Temperature Gauge
The Free Air temperature gauge indicates the
temperature of the external air mass via a probe
directly protruding from the gauge itself through the
fuselage to the outside of the aircraft.                   1. Temperature Indicator

1.   Temperature        Indicator.     Indicates   air
     temperature in Celsius (°C) as directly measured
     outside the pilot cockpit.
                                                              2. Temperature Scale
2.   Temperature Scale. Each major tick mark
     corresponds with 10-degree increments, with
     minor tick marks corresponding to 2-degree
     increments.
Right Console



                         Communications Panel

                                                                     M4 Rifle




                       HDU Storage Holster




Communications Panel
The Communications panel controls the                                     1. FM1 Knob      2. FM2 Knob   3. HF Knob
volume of the intercom, radios, and
other audio sources within the
crewstation.                                        4. VHF Knob
1.   FM1 Knob. Adjusts the volume of
                                                    5. UHF Knob
     the FM1 radio. Rotating the knob
     clockwise will increase the volume
     level; and pulling the knob                 6. SQL Switches

     outward will mute the audio from
                                                   7. SENS Knob
     the FM1 radio.
2.   FM2 Knob. Adjusts the volume of            8. MASTER Knob
     the FM2 radio. Rotating the knob
     clockwise will increase the volume            9. ICS Switch
     level; and pulling the knob
     outward will mute the audio from           10. IDENT Button
     the FM2 radio.
                                                    11. IFF Knob
3.   HF Knob. Adjusts the volume of
     the HF radio. Rotating the knob      12. RLWR Knob
     clockwise will increase the volume
                                                                   13. No function      14. VCR Knob     15. ADF Knob
     level; and pulling the knob
     outward will mute the audio from the HF radio.
4.   VHF Knob. Adjusts the volume of the VHF radio. Rotating the knob clockwise will increase the volume level;
     and pulling the knob outward will mute the audio from the VHF radio.
5.   UHF Knob. Adjusts the volume of the UHF radio. Rotating the knob clockwise will increase the volume
     level; and pulling the knob outward will mute the audio from the UHF radio.
6.   SQL Switches. Momentarily pressing these switches to the forward or aft positions will toggle the squelch
     function of the corresponding radio.
7.   SENS Knob. Adjusts the voice-activation sensitivity when the intercom switch is in the VOX position.
     Rotating the knob clockwise will increase the sensitivity and lower the voice-activation threshold.
8.   MASTER Knob. Adjusts the overall volume level of all audio sources received within the crewmember’s
     helmet.
9.   ICS Switch. Controls the operating mode of the crewmember’s mic on the intercom audio circuit.
     •    PTT. The crewmember’s mic will only be activated when the Push-To-Talk switch on the cyclic or the
          floor button is depressed.
     •    VOX. The crewmember’s mic will be activated any time the voice level exceeds the threshold set by
          the SENS knob, or when the Push-To-Talk switch on the cyclic or the floor button is depressed.
     •    HOT MIC. The crewmember’s mic is continuously activated.
10. IDENT Button. When pressed, the transponder performs an identification-of-position function. This is
    used to momentarily highlight the ownship position when replying to non-encrypted transponder
    interrogations (non-Mode 4 interrogations). (N/I)

11. IFF Knob. Adjusts the volume of the IFF interrogation audio. Rotating the knob clockwise will increase
    the volume level. (N/I)

12. RLWR Knob. Adjusts the volume of the voice warning messages received from the APR-39/AVR-2
    Radar/Laser Warning Receiver system; as well as the Radar Frequency Interferometer (RFI) if the mast-
    mounted FCR is installed and the RFI is operational. Rotating the knob clockwise will increase the volume
    level.
13. ATA Knob. No function.
14. VCR Knob. Adjusts the volume of the VCR audio when video playback is enabled. Rotating the knob
    clockwise will increase the volume level; and pulling the knob outward will mute the audio from the VCR
    playback. (N/I)
15. ADF Knob. Adjusts the volume of the audio received from the ARN-149 Automatic Direction Finder (ADF).
    Rotating the knob clockwise will increase the volume level; and pulling the knob outward will mute the audio
    from the ADF receiver.
COPILOT/GUNNER COCKPIT OVERVIEW
The Copilot/Gunner’s primary task is to utilize the aircraft sensors to continuously search, acquire, identify, and
(when appropriate) engage targets on the battlefield with the aircraft’s weapon systems. When enemy targets
are located and identified, the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) coordinates with the Pilot (PLT) to determine the best course
of action to accomplish the mission. Effective communication and coordination between the crewmembers are
critical to mission success.
The CPG’s secondary task is to manage the aircraft navigation and communication systems during the mission.
As the Pilot will often be focused on flying the aircraft and maneuvering around the terrain and obstacles, the
CPG will typically be focused inside the cockpit to tune radio frequencies, monitor the aircraft movement along
the current route, and receive or transmit tactical reports. Accordingly, the CPG coordinates with other units, to
include ground forces, or the other Copilot/Gunners within the team to delineate sectors of fire, sensor coverage,
and fires distribution on enemy targets.
The CPG can effectively utilize any sensor on the aircraft to search for or engage enemy targets. While the Pilot
can assist in the targeting process by using the FCR to hand over targets to the Copilot/Gunner, the CPG can also
directly control the FCR, and may autonomously hand over targets between the FCR and the TADS. If necessary,
the CPG may even hand over a TADS target to the Pilot for an engagement using the FCR, while the CPG continues
to scan the battlefield for additional targets with the electro-optical sensors in the TADS.



                                                Boresight Reticle Unit (BRU)


                             Instrument Panel                                  TADS Electronic Display And Control (TEDAC)

      Cockpit Mirror




             Keyboard Unit

                                                                                                             Right Console




      Left Console

                                                 Cyclic &               Anti-Torque Pedals
                                                Collective
                                                Controls




It is important to have a general understanding of where the various controls are located. To help locate items
more easily, the cockpit has been delineated into five primary areas: Instrument Panel, the Keyboard Unit
(KU), Left Console, Right Console, and the TADS Electronic Display And Control (TEDAC).
Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that instrument panel or console,
to include the Cyclic & Collective Controls. Selecting the image of the instrument panel or console will return
the manual back to this page.
Instrument Panel

                          Fire Detection/Extinguishing Panel   Master Warning/Master Caution
                                                                    Lighted Pushbuttons
     Canopy Jettison Handle




                                                                                           Enhanced Upfront Display (EUFD)




     Left Multi-Purpose Display (MPD)       Armament Panel     Master Zeroize Switch      Right Multi-Purpose Display (MPD)




Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that panel. Selecting the image
of the panel will return the manual back to this page.
The Enhanced Upfront Display (EUFD) and Multi-Function Displays (MPD) are described in dedicated sections
later in this chapter.
The Fire Detection/Extinguishing Panel, Armament Panel, Canopy Jettison Handle, and Master Zeroize Switch
function identically to those in the Pilot cockpit.


Master Warning/Master Caution Lighted Pushbuttons
The Master Warning/Master Caution lighted pushbuttons alerts the
CPG to observe the EUFD WCA area for warning and caution messages
indicating conditions that require their immediate attention.
1.   MSTR WARN Button. Acknowledges the MAST ER WARNING
     condition. Extinguishes the MSTR WARN light in the CPG
     crewstation and ceases the corresponding voice warning message
     in both crewstations.
     •      MSTR WARN Light. Flashes to alert the CPG to a                     1. MSTR WARN Button       2. MSTR CAUT Button
            WARNING message displayed on the EUFD.
2.   MSTR WARN Button. Acknowledges the MASTER CAUTION condition. Extinguishes the MSTR CAUT light
     and ceases the corresponding caution audio tone in the CPG crewstation.
     •      MSTR CAUT Light. Illuminates to alert the CPG to a CAUTION message displayed on the EUFD.
Keyboard Unit
The Keyboard Unit (KU) functions
identically to the KU in the Pilot
cockpit.




Left Console


                                                          Power Quadrant Panel       Emergency Panel




               Utility Light



               Stores Jettison Panel


                                                                                                       Canopy Jettison Handle Pin




                                                         Tail Wheel/NVS Mode Panel


                               Interior Lighting Panel


                                                                                                                  First Aid Kit




Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that panel. Selecting the image
of the panel will return the manual back to this page.
The Emergency Panel, Tail Wheel/NVS Mode Panel, and Stores Jettison Panel function identically to those in the
Pilot cockpit.
Power Quadrant Panel
The ENG POWER levers in the Copilot/Gunner cockpit
function identically to those located on the Pilot’s Power
Quadrant Panel.
The CPG’s ENG POWER levers are connected to the
Pilot’s ENG POWER levers through linkages between the
cockpits. When either crewmember moves an ENG
POWER lever, the corresponding lever in the other
cockpit will move accordingly.
However, the CPG’s finger-lift detent levers are not
mechanically linked to the physical detents of the Pilot’s
ENG POWER levers. The detent levers on the ENG
POWER levers in the CPG cockpit use microswitches to
electrically command the detents in the Pilot cockpit. As
such, the electrical power is required for the CPG to
physically move the ENG POWER levers beyond the
LOCK OUT or IDLE detents.




Interior Lighting Panel
The Interior Lighting panel controls the exterior aircraft        1. SIGNAL Knob     2. PRIMARY Knob
lighting and the interior lighting within the
Copilot/Gunner cockpit.
1.   SIGNAL Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the signal
     lights within the cockpit when set to nighttime
     brightness levels. This knob will have no function if
     the signal lights are set to daytime brightness level.
     Rotating the knob to the RST (Reset) detent will set
     the signal light brightness scale to nighttime levels
     if the PRIMARY knob is not in the OFF position and
     the FLOOD knob is less than 50%.
2.   PRIMARY Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the
     primary instrument backlighting within the cockpit.
     Rotating this knob to the OFF position will revert
                                                                   3. FLOOD Knob     4. PRESS TO TEST Button
     the signal lights to daytime mode.
3.   FLOOD Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the interior flood lights within the cockpit. Rotating this knob
     clockwise beyond the 50% setting will revert the signal lights to daytime mode.
4.   PRESS TO TEST Button. Illuminates all signal lights to verify their function.
Right Console




                                                              Windshield Wiper Control Panel




         Communications Panel

                                                                                          HDU Storage Holster




                 Processor Select Panel




The Communications Panel and Windshield Wiper Control Panel function identically to those in the Pilot cockpit.


Processor Select Panel
The Processor Select panel controls the System
Processor (SP) selection for aircraft functions. (N/I)
1.   SP1/SP2 Lights. Illuminates either SP1 or SP2 to
     indicate which System Processor is primary.
2.   Processor Select Switch. Sets primary SP
     selection to automatic or manual selection.
                                                                   1. SP1/SP2 Lights           2. PROCESSOR SELECT Switch
     •      SP1. Manually selects SP1 as the primary SP.
     •      AUTO. Enables automatic switchover of aircraft functions if the primary SP malfunctions.
     •      SP2. Manually selects SP2 as the primary SP.
TADS Electronic Display And Control (TEDAC)
The TEDAC is a modernized replacement for the Optical Relay Tube (ORT) from the AH-64A and early AH-64D
aircraft. Its primary purpose is to present the CPG with high-resolution sensor video from the Modernized Target
Acquisition Designation Sight (M-TADS).


    TEDAC Display Unit (TDU)




     TEDAC Left Handgrip (LHG)                                                         TEDAC Right Handgrip (RHG)




Along with the TDU bezel controls, fixed handgrips on either side of the TEDAC are used to control aircraft
sensors, weapons, and the CPG’s MPD cursor. Many of these controls replicate functions on the CPG’s cyclic and
collective controls but allow the CPG to utilize such functions without actively interfering with the Pilot’s flight
control inputs.
The TEDAC can also be used to display the FCR page as an alternative to an MPD. However, since the TEDAC
does not have Variable Action Buttons along the bezel of its display, the bezel FCR controls may only be utilized
using the left handgrip cursor controller.
Each text box above may be selected to jump to a more detailed description of that TEDAC component. Selecting
the image of the component will return the manual back to this page.
TEDAC Display Unit (TDU)
The TEDAC Display Unit provides the CPG with a “heads-out” display for presenting TADS or PNVS sensor video,
or FCR targeting information. The TDU will display sensor video in a grayscale format when the TDU Display Knob
is set to DAY mode, or in a greenscale format when the Display Knob is set to NT mode.
                             1. TAD Button   2. FCR Button   3. PNV Button   4. G/S Button



                                                                                                        5. TDU Display Knob




         6. FLIR LEV Knob
                                                                                                        8. SYM Rocker Switch




        7. FLIR GAIN Knob
                                                                                                        9. BRT Rocker Switch




     12. R/F Rocker Switch
                                                                                                        10. CON Rocker Switch




      13. EL Rocker Switch
                                                                                                        11. Asterisk Button




     14. AZ Rocker Switch



                                   15. AZ/EL Button   16. ACM Button    17. FREEZE Button    18. FILTER Button

     If the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set to NORM or FIXED, the TDU will function as a repeater of the CPG’s
     Helmet Display Unit (HDU) and display HMD Flight symbology and NVS sensor video. The TAD, FCR, PNV,
     and G/S buttons along the top of the TDU will be inhibited.
1.   TAD Button. If the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set OFF, the TDU will display HMD Weapon symbology when
     the CPG’s selected sight is HMD, or TADS Weapon symbology and TADS sensor video when the CPG’s
     selected sight is TADS.
2.   FCR Button. If the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set OFF, the TDU will display the FCR page. All FCR page
     functions (except for accessing the UTIL sub-page) are mirrored on the TDU; however, they may only be
     accessed by using the MPD cursor.
     The MPD cursor can only be moved to the TDU using the “bump” method, and only when the FCR page is
     displayed. To bump the cursor to the TDU FCR page, move the cursor to the inboard edge of either MPD,
     release input on the Cursor Controller, and then re-apply pressure input inboard toward the TDU.
3.   PNV Button. If the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set OFF, the TDU will display the Pilot’s HMD Flight symbology
     and NVS sensor video. If the CPG’s selected sight is TADS or FCR, this button will also display the Pilot’s
     HMD Flight symbology and NVS sensor video within the CPG’s HDU.
4.   G/S Button. If the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set OFF, the TDU will display a grayscale pattern. The
     grayscale pattern is used to set the appropriate brightness and contrast levels for the TDU video output.
5.   TDU Display Knob. Powers the TDU video screen and selects the overall brightness scale.
     •    DAY. Powers on the TDU and sets the overall brightness scale to daytime levels.
     •    NT. Powers on the TDU and sets the overall brightness scale to nighttime levels.
     •    OFF. Powers off the TDU screen only. All TEDAC functions and TDU bezel buttons remain functional.
6.   FLIR LEV Knob. Controls the relative brightness scale of thermographic video from the PNVS or TADS FLIR
     cameras.
7.   FLIR GAIN Knob. Controls the relative thermographic gain from the PNVS or TADS FLIR cameras.
8.   SYM Rocker Switch. Controls the brightness level of displayed symbology on the TDU or within the CPG’s
     HDU. When the CPG’s selected sight is HMD, the symbology within the CPG’s HDU will be adjusted. When
     the CPG’s selected sight is TADS or FCR, the symbology brightness on the TDU will be adjusted. The
     symbology brightness may be incrementally adjusted using short presses, or continually adjusted using
     continuous presses.
9.   BRT Rocker Switch. Controls the overall brightness level of the TDU or CPG’s HDU. When the CPG’s
     selected sight is HMD, the overall brightness level of the CPG’s HDU will be adjusted. When the CPG’s
     selected sight is TADS or FCR, the overall brightness level of the TDU will be adjusted. The brightness level
     may be incrementally adjusted using short presses, or continually adjusted using continuous presses.
10. CON Rocker Switch. Controls the contrast level of the TDU or CPG’s HDU. When the CPG’s selected sight
    is HMD, the contrast level of the CPG’s HDU will be adjusted. When the CPG’s selected sight is TADS or FCR,
    the contrast level of the TDU will be adjusted. The contrast level may be incrementally adjusted using short
    presses, or continually adjusted using continuous presses.
11. Asterisk Button. Resets the overall brightness and contrast levels to their default settings. When the CPG’s
    selected sight is HMD, the overall brightness and contrast of the CPG’s HDU will be reset. When the CPG’s
    selected sight is TADS or FCR, the overall brightness and contrast of the TDU will be reset.
12. R/F Rocker Switch. Adjusts the range focus of the selected TADS sensor. Pressing up on the rocker switch
    sets the focus to longer ranges. Pressing down on the rocker switch sets the focus to shorter ranges. The
    focus may be incrementally adjusted using short presses, or continually adjusted using continuous presses.
13. EL Rocker Switch. Not implemented.
14. AZ Rocker Switch. Not implemented.
15. AZ/EL Button. Not implemented.
16. ACM Button. Not implemented.
17. FREEZE Button. Freezes the current frame on the TDU video screen. The video output will continue to
    update normally on other displays within either crewstation.
18. FILTER Button. Not implemented.
TEDAC Left Handgrip (LHG)
                         1. Image Auto Track/Offset Switch   2. TADS Field-Of-View Switch




               3. Video Record Button
                                                                                       4. TADS Sensor Select Switch



                     7. FCR Mode Switch                                                5. Weapon Action Switch


                  8. Cursor Controller/Enter
                                                                                       6. Store/Update Switch

             9. Cursor Display Select Button


                       10. Weapon Trigger                                 11. FCR Scan Switch
                         (opposite side)

                                                                              12. Cued Search Button




                                                                          13. No function (opposite side)


                                                                        14. Linear Motion Compensation
                                                                             Button (opposite side)




1.   Image Auto Track/Offset Switch. Controls the Image Auto-Track (IAT) targeting functions of the TADS.
     •   IAT (Forward). Commands an auto-track on the target within the TADS line-of-sight (LOS) reticle
         and sets it as the IAT primary track.
         If the TADS LOS reticle is within the IAT primary track gates, commands the primary track Aim Point
         to update its position to the centroid of the TADS LOS reticle.
     •   OFS (Aft). If the TADS LOS is outside the IAT primary track gates, a short press (<0.5 second) to the
         OFS position will command the TADS LOS reticle to return to the IAT primary track from its offset
         postion.
         If the TADS LOS is within the IAT primary track gates, a short press (<0.5 second) to the OFS position
         will drop the primary track.
         A long press (>0.5 second) to the OFS position will command the TADS to drop the primary track and
         any secondary tracks, regardless of the current position of the TADS LOS reticle.
2.   TADS Field-Of-View Switch. Selects the magnification field-of-view of the TADS FLIR/DTV cameras.
     •   W (Wide, Right). Sets the FLIR/DTV optical magnification to wide field-of-view.
     •   M (Medium, Aft). Sets the FLIR optical magnification to medium field-of-view. If DTV is the selected
         sensor, sets the DTV optical magnification to wide field-of-view.
     •   N (Narrow, Left). Sets the FLIR/DTV optical magnification to narrow field-of-view.
     •   Z (Zoom, Forward). Sets the FLIR/DTV video to a 2:1 electronic magnification.
3.   Video Record Button. Not implemented.
4.   TADS Sensor Select Switch. Selects the TADS sensor to be used for targeting. This switch position is
     overridden and commanded to FLIR when the CPG NVS Mode switch is set to NORM or FIXED.
     •    FLIR (Forward). Sets the TADS sensor video to the Forward-Looking Infrared thermographic camera.
     •    DTV (Center). Sets the TADS sensor video to the Day Television camera.
     •    DVO (Aft). No function.
5.   Weapon Action Switch (WAS). Selects, or “actions”, a weapon system for employment. (Also known as
     “WASing”, pronounced “Wahz-ing”). Selecting the same weapon a second time will de-select, or “de-action”,
     the weapon. If the Copilot/Gunner actions a weapon from the TEDAC Left Handgrip (LHG), only the weapon
     trigger on the LHG will be activated for weapons employment from the CPG station.
     Neither crewstation has priority over the other, allowing either cyclic Weapon Action Switch to action the
     weapon, taking control away from the other crewstation in a “last actioned” logic.
     •    G (Gun, Forward). Actions/de-actions the Area Weapon System (AWS) for employment and slaves
          the gun to the weapon solution of the selected sight within the crewstation.
     •    R (Rocket, Left). Actions/de-actions the Aerial Rocket Sub-system (ARS) for employment, activates
          pylon articulation, and displays the Rocket Steering Cursor symbology within the crewstation.
          If the CPG actions rockets using the Weapon Action Switch on the LHG and the Pilot actions rockets,
          the crew will enter COOP (Cooperative) rocket mode.
          If the CPG actions rockets using the Weapon Action Switch on the CPG cyclic and the Pilot actions
          rockets, the rockets will be assigned to either crewstation using the “last actioned” logic.
     •    M (Missile, Right). Actions/de-actions the Hellfire Modular Missile System (HMMS) for employment,
          activates pylon articulation, and displays the Missile Launch symbology within the crewstation.
     •    A (Air-To-Air, Aft). No function.
6.   Store/Update Switch. Stores new target or waypoint locations using the CPG’s selected sight or perform
     position updates to the aircraft navigation system.
     •    STORE (Forward). When the CPG’s selected sight is set to TADS, moving the switch momentarily to
          this position stores a Target (TG) point along the TADS line-of-sight at the current range. When the
          CPG’s selected sight is set to FCR, moving the switch momentarily to this position stores a Target (TG)
          point at the location of the Next-To-Shoot (NTS Target).
          When used in conjunction with the TSD Point sub-page, may be used to store a Waypoint (WP) or
          Target Point (TG), and may be used in conjunction with either the HMD or the TADS.
     •    UPDT (Aft). Not implemented.
7.   FCR Mode Switch. Not implemented.
8.   Cursor Controller/Enter. Controls the MPD cursor movement on the MPD, allowing bezel options to be
     selected by the cursor in lieu of the bezel buttons; or cursor-selection of points on the MPD itself. Depressing
     the Cursor Controller commands the highlighted item underneath the cursor to be selected.
9.   Cursor Display Select Button. Sets the MPD cursor to the center of the opposite MPD.
10. Weapon Trigger. Fires the weapon system that has been actioned within the crewstation.
     •    First Detent. Fires the weapon system if no Performance or Safety Inhibits are present.
     •    Second Detent. Fires the weapon system if no Safety Inhibits are present.
11. FCR Scan Switch. When the CPG’s selected sight is set to FCR, momentarily setting the switch to either
    position will initiate an FCR scanburst. If the FCR is already performing a single or continuous scanburst,
    momentarily setting the switch to either position will terminate the ongoing scanburst.
     •   S-SCAN (Forward). Initiates a single scanburst. The FCR will perform several scans of the FCR scan
         volume and then terminate scanning. The number of scans that are performed within a single scanburst
         are dependent on the selected scan size.
     •   C-SCAN (Aft). Initiates a continuous scanburst. The FCR will perform scans of the FCR scan volume
         continuously until manually terminated by the crewmember or until a different sight is selected.
12. Cued Search Button. Not implemented.
13. Cage Button. No function.
14. Linear Motion Compensation Button. Toggles the Linear Motion Compensation function of the TADS
    system. (See Target Acquisition Designation Sight (TADS) for more information.)


TEDAC Right Handgrip (RHG)
                                               1. FCR Scan Size Switch   2. C-Scope Button


                                                                                        3. FLIR Polarity Button


               4. Laser Tracker Mode Switch



                      5. Sight Select Switch                                            7. Sight Slave Button


                                                                                     8. Sight Manual Tracker
                       6. Image Auto Track
                          Polarity Switch
                                                                                     9. Display Zoom Button


                          11. MTT Track Promote Switch                               10. LRFD Trigger
                                                                                      (opposite side)

                             12. Cursor Enter Button




                          13. No function (opposite side)


                              14. Missile Advance Button
                                   (opposite side)




1.   FCR Scan Size Switch. Selects the FCR scan size when the CPG’s selected sight is set to FCR.
     •   Wide (W). Sets the FCR scan volume to 90° in azimuth.
     •   Medium (M). Sets the FCR scan volume to 45° in azimuth.
     •   Narrow (N). Sets the FCR scan volume to 30° in azimuth.
     •   Zoom (Z). Sets the FCR scan volume to 15° in azimuth.
2.   C-Scope Button. Not implemented.
3.   FLIR Polarity Button. Toggles the FLIR image polarity between white-hot and black-hot.
4.   Laser Tracker Mode Switch. Enables/disables the Laser Spot Track (LST) mode of the TADS system.
     •   A (Automatic). Enables the LST in Automatic mode and inhibits the LRFD from firing.
     •    O (Off). Disables the LST and permits the LRFD to fire.
     •    M (Manual). Enables the LST in Manual mode and inhibits the LRFD from firing.
5.   Sight Select Switch. Selects the sight to be used for targeting and weapon employment within the
     Copilot/Gunner (CPG) crewstation.
     •    HMD (Forward). Sets the CPG sight to the CPG’s Helmet-Mounted Display. The CPG’s HDU will display
          HMD Flight symbology.
     •    FCR (Left). Sets the CPG crewstation sight to the Fire Control Radar and displays the FCR page on
          the left MPD if not already displayed. When selected while the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set to OFF,
          the CPG’s HDU will display TADS Weapon symbology and TADS sensor video. If the Pilot is using the
          TADS as his/her NVS sensor, the CPG’s HDU will display HMD Flight symbology.
          Neither crewstation has priority over the other, allowing either Sight Select Switch to select the FCR as
          the sight, taking control away from the other crewstation in a “last selected” logic.
     •    TADS (Right). Sets the CPG sight to the Target Acquisition Designation Sight. The CPG’s HDU will
          display TADS Weapon symbology and TADS sensor video. If either crewmember is using the TADS as
          their NVS sensor, this switch position will be inhibited.
     •    LINK (Aft). Not implemented.
6.   Image Auto Track Polarity Switch. Not implemented.
7.   Sight Slave Button. Slaves/de-slaves the CPG’s selected sight to the selected acquisition source.
8.   Sight Manual Tracker. Manually controls the CPG’s selected sight when de-slaved from the selected
     acquisition source. Also called the “thumb force controller”.
9.   Display Zoom Button. Not implemented.
10. LRFD Trigger. Fires the laser rangefinder/designator if the A/S button on the Armament panel is set to
    ARM and the LRFD is powered (VAB L6 on the WPN Utility sub-page).
     •    First Detent. Fires a short pulse of laser energy for range-finding purposes. To fire additional range-
          finding pulses, the trigger must be released prior to pulling the trigger again.
     •    Second Detent. Fires a continuous pulse of laser energy for designation purposes, for the duration
          the trigger is depressed.
11. MTT Track Promote Switch. When using the Multi-Target Track sub-mode of the Image Auto-Track, this
    switch cycles the primary track through each auto-tracked target.
     •    – (Forward). Promotes the previous secondary track as the primary track and commands the TADS
          LOS reticle to the Aim Point of the new primary track.
     •    + (Aft). Promotes the next secondary track as the primary track and commands the TADS LOS reticle
          to the Aim Point of the new primary track.
12. Cursor Enter Button. Commands the highlighted item underneath the cursor to be selected. Used as an
    alternate method of cursor-selection in lieu of depressing the Cursor Controller itself.
13. HDD Button. No function.
14. Missile Advance Button. Steps to the next Hellfire missile in sequence. This button is only functional when
    the missile mode is set to MAN.
CYCLIC & COLLECTIVE HAND CONTROLS
The cyclic and collective hand controls allows either crewmember to control many of the aircraft functions
regarding sensors, weapons, communications, and defensive systems without removing their hands from the
flight controls.
The Pilot and Copilot/Gunner cyclic and collective grips are identical in form and function. The only exception is
this is the BUCS trigger on the Pilot’s Collective Flight Grip is non-functional.


Cyclic Grip
The Cyclic Grip is used to control weapons, communications, and countermeasure functions. It also includes
functions for controlling the IHADSS flight symbology.
                                      2. Weapon Action Switch

                                                                3. Symbology Select Switch
                  1. Force Trim/
                 Hold Mode Switch




         4. PTT/RTS Switch
                                                                    7. Weapon Trigger



                  5. Chaff Dispense Button

                                                                                     8. No function
                  6. Flare Dispense Button


                                                                             9. FMC Release Button




1.   Force Trim/Hold Mode Switch. Controls the force trim and Hold modes provided by the Flight
     Management Computer (FMC).
     •      R (Release, Forward). When held forward, the force trim is interrupted, releasing the magnetic
            brakes on the cyclic and pedals. While force trim is interrupted, Heading Hold and Attitude Hold will be
            disengaged.
            When the switch itself is released, the force trim will re-engage the magnetic brakes on the cyclic and
            pedals, set a new force trim reference point at the current cyclic/pedal positions in pitch, roll and yaw,
            and any applicable hold modes will re-engage (assuming their specific re-engagement logic is met).
     •      AT (Attitude Hold, Left). Activates/deactivates Attitude Hold.
     •      AL (Altitude Hold, Right). Activates/deactivates Altitude Hold.
     •      D (Disengage, Aft). Deactivates Attitude Hold and Altitude Hold.
2.   Weapon Action Switch (WAS). Selects, or “actions”, a weapon system for employment. (Also known as
     “WASing”, pronounced “Wahz-ing”). Selecting the same weapon a second time will de-select, or “de-action”,
     the weapon. If the Copilot/Gunner actions a weapon from the Cyclic Grip, only the weapon trigger on the
     Cyclic Grip will be activated for weapons employment from the CPG station.
     Neither crewstation has priority over the other, allowing either cyclic Weapon Action Switch to action the
     weapon, taking control away from the other crewstation in a “last actioned” logic.
     •    G (Gun, Forward). Actions/de-actions the Area Weapon System (AWS) for employment and slaves
          the gun to the weapon solution of the selected sight within the crewstation.
     •    R (Rocket, Left). Actions/de-actions the Aerial Rocket Sub-system (ARS) for employment, activates
          pylon articulation, and displays the Rocket Steering Cursor symbology within the crewstation.
          If the CPG actions rockets using the Weapon Action Switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip (LHG) and the
          Pilot actions rockets, the crew will enter COOP (Cooperative) rocket mode.
          If the CPG actions rockets using the Weapon Action Switch on the CPG cyclic and the Pilot actions
          rockets, the rockets will be assigned to either crewstation using the “last actioned” logic.
     •    M (Missile, Right). Actions/de-actions the Hellfire Modular Missile System (HMMS) for employment,
          activates pylon articulation, and displays the Missile Launch symbology within the crewstation.
     •    A (Air-To-Air, Aft). No function.
3.   Symbology Select Switch. Selects the IHADSS symbology mode. The symbology mode is common to
     both crewstations, in that the symbology will remain the same for both crewmembers, regardless of which
     Symbology Select Switch was used to change the IHADSS symbology mode.
     •    CT (Cruise/Transition, Forward). Selects Transition symbology mode. If Transition symbology is
          already displayed, each subsequent press will toggle between Cruise and Transition symbology modes.
     •    HB (Hover/Bob-Up, Aft). Selects Hover symbology mode. If Hover symbology is already displayed,
          each subsequent press will toggle between Bob-Up and Hover symbology modes.
          Each time Bob-Up mode is entered, a new Bob-Up box will be “dropped”, and the command heading
          will be referenced to the current heading value.
     •    FLT Page Access/Return (Z-Axis, Depress). Displays the FLT page on the left MPD within the
          crewstation. If the FLT page is already displayed, it will have no effect. If the FLT page is displayed on
          the right MPD, the MPD pages will be swapped.
          If no button is pressed on the FLT page within 10 minutes, depressing the Symbology Select Switch
          will return the left MPD to the previous page. After 10 minutes, the return logic will timeout and will no
          longer be available.
4.   PTT/RTS Switch. Activates the crewmember’s microphone or selects the next radio for transmission.
     •    RADIO (Left). Transmits over the radio currently selected by the RTS indicator on the EUFD.
     •    ICS (Right). Transmits over the cockpit intercom to the opposite crewstation and/or ground crews.
     •    RTS (Depress). Cycles the Radio Transmit Select indicator on the EUFD to the next radio in sequence.
          If the RTS indicator is set to the HF radio at the bottom of the list, RTS indicator will cycle to the VHF
          radio at the top of the list.
5.   Chaff Dispense Button. Dispenses the chaff program.
6.   Flare Dispense Button. Dispenses the flare program.
7.   Weapon Trigger (Guarded). Fires the weapon system that has been actioned within the crewstation.
     •    First Detent. Fires the weapon system if no Performance or Safety Inhibits are present.
     •   Second Detent. Fires the weapon system if no Safety Inhibits are present.
8.   Cage Button. No function.
9.   FMC Release Button. Deactivates the Pitch, Roll, Yaw and Collective FMC channels.
Collective Flight Grip
The Collective Flight Grip is used to control flight and navigation functions.
           1. Emergency Jettison Button   2. Boresight/Polarity Switch




                                                                 3. Searchlight Switch




                                                                  4. Searchlight Position Switch


      5. NVS Select Switch


6. Stabilator Control Switch                        7. Chop Button




                                                             8. Tail Wheel Lock/Unlock Button      9. BUCS Trigger (CPG only)
                                                                                                            Button


1.   Emergency Jettison Button (Guarded). Jettisons all weapon stations from the underwing pylons.
2.   Boresight/Polarity Switch. Controls the FLIR polarity for the NVS sensor assigned to the crewstation.
     •      B/S (Boresight). No function.
     •      PLRT (Polarity). Toggles the FLIR image polarity between white-hot and black-hot.
3.   Searchlight Switch. Activates, deactivates or stows the fuselage-mounted search/landing light.
     •      ON (Forward). Powers the searchlight on.
     •      OFF (Center). Powers the searchlight off.
     •      STOW (Aft). Commands the searchlight to retract to the stowed position. The switch will be spring-
            loaded from STOW to the OFF position.
4.   Searchlight Position Switch. Controls the position of the fuselage-mounted search/landing light.
     Searchlight position control will be inhibited for 1 minute after STOW is commanded.
     •      EXT (Extend, Forward). Rotates the searchlight bulb forward and up.
     •      L (Left). Rotates the searchlight bulb left/counter-clockwise.
     •      R (Right). Rotates the searchlight bulb right/clockwise.
     •      RET (Retract, Aft). Rotates the searchlight bulb down and back.
5.   NVS Select Switch. Selects the NVS sensor within the crewstation. When this occurs, the format of the
     Field-Of-Regard Box within each crewmember’s IHADSS symbology will update to reflect their selected NVS
     sensor azimuth/elevation slew limits. (See IHADSS Flight Symbology for more information.)
     Neither crewstation has priority over the other, allowing the NVS Select Switch in either crewstation to select
     either NVS sensor.
     •   TADS (Forward). Selects the TADS as the NVS sensor in the crewstation.
     •   PNVS (Aft). Selects the PNVS as the NVS sensor in the crewstation.
6.   Stabilator Control Switch. Sets the horizontal stabilator to Manual or Automatic mode, and controls the
     stabilator angle when set to Manual mode.
     •   ND (Nose-Down, Forward). Slews the stabilator trailing edge down, causing the nose to pitch
         forward. If the stabilator is in Automatic mode, this position will set the mode to Manual.
     •   NU (Nose-Up, Aft). Slews the stabilator trailing edge up, causing the nose to pitch up. If the stabilator
         is in Automatic mode, this position will set the mode to Manual.
     •   RESET (Depress). Resets the stabiliator mode to Automatic.
7.   Chop Button (Guarded). Pressing this button activates the Engine Chop circuit, which reduces engine
     power to idle. Pressing it again resets the Engine Chop circuit and restores normal engine power. (N/I)
8.   Tail Wheel Lock/Unlock Button. Toggles the commanded state of the tail wheel locking mechanism
     between locked and unlocked.
9.   BUCS Trigger (CPG only). Enables the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) to override the flight controls in the Pilot
     crewstation when the Back-Up Control System (BUCS) is on. This trigger is non-functional in the Pilot
     crewstation. (N/I)
Collective Mission Grip
The Collective Mission Grip is used to control aircraft sensors and the MPD cursor.
     1. FCR Mode Switch    2. FCR Scan Size Switch



                                               3. Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                         4. Sight Select Switch



      5. Cursor Display
        Select Button                      6. FCR Scan Switch




7. Cued Search Button




                                                            8. Missile Advance Button   9. Alternate Cursor Enter Trigger




1.     FCR Mode Switch. Not implemented.
15. FCR Scan Size Switch. Selects the FCR scan size when the crewmember’s selected sight is set to FCR.
       •     Wide (W). Sets the FCR scan volume to 90° in azimuth.
       •     Medium (M). Sets the FCR scan volume to 45° in azimuth.
       •     Narrow (N). Sets the FCR scan volume to 30° in azimuth.
       •     Zoom (Z). Sets the FCR scan volume to 15° in azimuth.
2.     Cursor Controller/Enter. Controls the MPD cursor movement on the MPD, allowing bezel options to be
       selected by the cursor in lieu of the bezel buttons; or cursor-selection of points on the MPD itself. Depressing
       the Cursor Controller commands the highlighted item underneath the cursor to be selected.
3.     Sight Select Switch. Selects the sight to be used for targeting and weapon employment within the
       crewstation.
       •     HMD (HMD). Sets the crewstation sight to the Helmet-Mounted Display. The crewmember’s HDU will
             display HMD Flight symbology.
       •     FCR (Left). Sets the crewstation sight to the Fire Control Radar and displays the FCR page on the left
             MPD if not already displayed. When selected in the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) crewstation while the CPG’s
             NVS Mode switch is set to OFF, the CPG’s HDU will display TADS Weapon symbology and TADS sensor
             video. If the Pilot is using the TADS as his/her NVS sensor, the CPG’s HDU will display HMD Flight
             symbology.
             Neither crewstation has priority over the other, allowing either Sight Select Switch to select the FCR as
             the sight, taking control away from the other crewstation in a “last selected” logic.
       •     TADS (Right). Sets the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) sight to the Target Acquisition Designation Sight. If the
             CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set to OFF, the CPG’s HDU will display TADS Weapon symbology and TADS
          sensor video. If either crewmember is using the TADS as their NVS sensor, this switch position will be
          inhibited.
          This switch position is non-functional in the Pilot crewstation.
     •    LINK (Aft). Not implemented.
4.   Cursor Display Select Button. Sets the MPD cursor to the center of the opposite MPD.
5.   FCR Scan Switch. When the crewmember’s selected sight is set to FCR, momentarily setting the switch to
     either position will initiate an FCR scanburst. If the FCR is already performing a single or continuous
     scanburst, momentarily setting the switch to either position will terminate the ongoing scanburst.
     •    S-SCAN (Forward). Initiates a single scanburst. The FCR will perform several scans of the FCR scan
          volume and then terminate scanning. The number of scans that are performed within a single scanburst
          are dependent on the selected scan size.
     •    C-SCAN (Aft). Initiates a continuous scanburst. The FCR will perform scans of the FCR scan volume
          continuously until manually terminated by the crewmember or until a different sight is selected.
6.   Cued Search Button. Not implemented.
7.   Missile Advance Button. Steps to the next Hellfire missile in sequence. This button is only functional when
     the missile mode is set to MAN.
8.   Alternate Cursor Enter Trigger. Commands the highlighted item underneath the cursor to be selected.
     Used as an alternate method of cursor-selection in lieu of depressing the Cursor Controller itself.
INTEGRATED HELMET AND DISPLAY
SIGHTING SYSTEM (IHADSS)
The IHADSS allows the crewmembers to view flight and navigation information, sensor video, targeting
information, and weapon status. The IHADSS also allows each crewmember to independently cue weapons and
sensors using their head movements. The system is an integral part of flight operations during the day, and a
crucial system in performing flight operations at night.


            IHU tracking sensors                         Integrated Helmet Unit (IHU)




    Sensor Surveying Unit
                                                                  Sensor Surveying Unit




                                             HDU Combiner Lens

                 Helmet Display Unit (HDU)




As a subcomponent of the IHADSS, each crewmember’s individual Helmet Display Unit (HDU) projects symbology
and video onto a combiner lens directly in front of the crewmembers’ right eye. Similar to a Heads-Up Display
(HUD) found in many other aircraft types, the HDU is the primary source of flight and navigation data for the
crewmember that is on the controls. However, unlike many HUD designs that are fixed to an aircraft’s instrument
panel, the HDU in the AH-64 is designed to allow a crewmember to view and effectively utilize this data without
requiring them to focus their attention straight ahead over the nose of the aircraft.
Symbology is displayed within the crewmember HDU’s in one of two formats: Flight symbology or Weapon
symbology. Weapon symbology is displayed within the CPG’s HDU when the CPG’s selected sight is TADS.
(See TADS Weapon Symbology for more information.)


Flight Symbology
The Pilot is always presented with Flight symbology within the HDU. The Copilot/Gunner (CPG) is presented with
Flight symbology within the HDU when the CPG’s selected sight is HMD, or any time the CPG’s NVS Mode is set
to NORM or FIXED. Flight symbology is presented to the crewmembers in one of four symbology modes: Cruise,
Transition, Hover, or Bob-Up. The Symbology Select Switch on either Cyclic Grip is used to change the selected
symbology mode for both crewstations simultaneously.
                             1. Heading Tape    2. Aircraft Heading   3. Lubber Line




       4. Engine Torque                                                                11. Bank Angle Indicator



         5. Horizon Line                                                               12. Barometric Altitude



         6. Head Tracker                                                               13. Flight Path Vector



        7. True Airspeed                                                               14. Vertical Speed Indicator



         8. Pitch Ladder                                                               15. Rate-of-climb Scale


      9. Waypoint Status                                                               16. Radar Altitude



      10. Ground Speed                                                                 17. Skid/Slip Indicator




                                                 Cruise Mode




  18. Command Heading



         19. Engine TGT


                                                                                       25. Alternate Sensor Bearing
20. Navigation Fly-To Cue


                                                                                       26. Cued Line-Of-Sight Reticle
            21. G Status


                                                                                       27. Cueing Dots
 22. Line-Of-Sight Reticle



   23. Field-Of-View Box                                                               28. Cued Line-Of-Sight Dot


 24. Field-Of-Regard Box




                                               Transition Mode
29. Acceleration Cue

                                                 31. Radar Altimeter Tape
 30. Velocity Vector




                            Hover Mode




    32. Bob-Up Box




                       33. High Action Display

                         Bob-Up Mode
1.   Heading Tape. Displays a 180° hemisphere of magnetic headings. Major tick marks are displayed in 30°
     increments and marked by a cardinal direction or heading in the tens value. Minor tick marks are displayed
     in 10° increments.
2.   Aircraft Heading. Displays a digital readout of the aircraft’s current magnetic heading in 1° increments,
     superimposed over the Heading Tape.
3.   Lubber Line. The Lubber Line is aligned to the centerline of the aircraft and serves as a reference for both
     the aircraft heading and for the Bank Angle Indicator when in Cruise symbology mode.
4.   Engine Torque. Displays the highest torque value of the two engines, in 1% increments. A box will be
     displayed around the torque at 98% or greater. If the difference in engine torque values exceeds 12%, the
     torque digital readout will flash.
5.   Horizon Line. Indicates the horizon position and orientation relative to the aircraft nose, which is referenced
     to the LOS Reticle.
     When in Cruise symbology mode, the the Horizon Line is displaced in pitch in a 2:1 movement ratio.
     When in Transition symbology mode, the Horizon Line is displaced in pitch in a 4:1 movement ratio, up to
     a maximum of ±30°. When aircraft pitch attitude exceeds ±30° in pitch, the Transition mode Horizon Line
     will remain saturated at maximum deflection until the pitch attitude is less than ±30°.
6.   Head Tracker. Represents the armament datum line (ADL, or centerline) of the aircraft; 0° in azimuth and
     -4.9° in elevation. The Head Tracker assists the crewmembers in maintaining awareness of their head
     position relative to the nose of the aircraft, especially under low-light conditions while using the PNVS or
     TADS sensors for flight and navigation.
7.   True Airspeed. Indicates the true airspeed (TAS) of the aircraft in 1 knot increments, from 0 to 210 knots.
     The airspeed indication is boxed if the airspeed exceeds VNE.
     When Attitude Hold is engaged, a rounded “status window” box is displayed around the TAS digital readout.
8.   Pitch Ladder. Indicates aircraft pitch attitude when in Cruise symbology mode. Pitch ladder increments are
     displayed at ±10°, ±20°, ±30°, ±45° and ±60° pitch.
9.   Waypoint Status. Displays the point selected for navigation, its distance in
     kilometers or nautical miles, and estimated time enroute (ETE). The ETE is based
     on the current ground speed and distance remaining, and is presented in HH:MM
     format when the ETE is ≥5 minutes, or M:SS format when ETE is <5 minutes.
     The ETE is not displayed when ground speed is <15 knots or ETE is >10 hours.
     Waypoint Status information is not displayed if there is no active destination point.
10. Ground Speed. Indicates the speed across the surface in 1 knot increments. Ground Speed is only displayed
    in Cruise and Transition symbology modes, and only when the primary INU is aligned.
11. Bank Angle Indicator. Indicates bank angle relative to the horizon when in Cruise symbology mode. When
    the Bank Angle Indicator is aligned with the lubber line below the heading tape, the aircraft is in a level
    attitude.
12. Barometric Altitude. Indicates the barometric altitude when Cruise mode symbology is displayed.
    Barometric Altitude is displayed in 10-foot increments from -2,300 feet to 20,000 feet.
13. Flight Path Vector. The Flight Path Vector (FPV) represents the point towards which the helicopter is
    flying. It is a 3-dimensional representation of the aircraft’s velocity vector. The FPV is not displayed in Hover
    or Bob-Up symbology modes, if the 3-dimensional velocity is <5 knots ground speed, or if the aircraft is
    weight-on-wheels.
14. Vertical Speed Indicator (VSI). The Vertical Speed Indicator moves up and down the rate-of-climb scale
    to indicate vertical speed. The VSI becomes saturated at the ±1,000 fpm tick marks at the top or bottom of
    the Rate-of-climb Scale, augmented by digital readouts of rate-of-climb in 100 fpm increments.
15. Rate-of-climb Scale. Major tick marks are placed at 0, ±500 and ±1,000 feet per minute (fpm) rates of
    climb/descent. Minor tick marks are placed in 100 fpm increments between 0 and ±500 fpm. When the rate-
    of-climb/descent exceeds ±1,000 fpm, a digital readout to the nearest 100 fpm value is displayed adjacent
    to the 1,000 fpm major tick marks.
     When Altitude Hold is engaged, a rounded “homeplate” box is displayed next to the Rate-of-climb Scale at
     0 fpm.
16. Radar Altitude. Indicates the radar-detected altitude above ground level from 0 to 1,428 feet. The Radar
    Altitude is displayed in increments of 1 foot from 0 to 50 feet in altitude, and increments of 10 feet between
    50 feet and 1,428 feet in altitude.
     The Radar Altitude is not displayed when the altitude exceeds 1,428 feet above ground level.
17. Skid/Slip Indicator. Also called the “trim ball”; indicates whether the aircraft is in coordinated flight (also
    known as “in aerodynamic trim”, or simply “in trim”). With the ball is centered between the tick marks, the
    aircraft is in coordinated flight, which minimizes drag. If the ball is left of center, applying left pedal will
    adjust tail rotor thrust to bring the aircraft back into coordinated flight. Likewise, if the ball is right of center,
    applying right pedal will adjust tail rotor thrust to bring the aircraft back into coordinated flight.
18. Command Heading. Indicates the magnetic heading to the Navigation Fly-To Cue when in Cruise,
    Transition, or Hover symbology modes. When Bob-up symbology mode is entered, the Command Heading
    chrevron is set to the heading of the aircraft, and maintained at that value until Bob-Up mode is exited.
19. Engine TGT. Displays the highest of the two engines’ Turbine Gas Temperature (TGT) indications if
    operating in an intermediate or contingency TGT limit.
     When operating under dual engine intermediate power, the TGT (in °C) will be displayed during the final
     two minutes of either the 30-minute or 10-minute allowable timers.
     When operating under single engine contingency power, the TGT (in °C) will be displayed during the entire
     2.5 minutes allowable for operating in the contingency power temperature range.
20. Line-Of-Sight (LOS) Reticle. Indicates the crewmember’s helmet line-of-sight (LOS). The LOS Reticle is
    used as a positional reference for the Head Tracker, Horizon Line, Velocity Vector, Acceleration Cue, and
    Bob-Up Box. It is also used as an aiming crosshair for weapons employment, and is bolded when in Cruise
    symbology mode.
     The LOS Reticle flashes when the crewmember’s LOS is invalid, the selected NVS sensor is at its slew limit,
     or if the gun is actioned and the gun system has failed and is no longer following the crewmember’s helmet.
21. Navigation Fly-To Cue. Indicates the location of the current point selected for navigation. Also called the
    “homeplate” symbol, the Navigation Fly-To Cue is sized so the Flight Path Vector fits within it for precise 3-
    dimensional navigation.
     The Navigation Fly-To Cue is not displayed when the aircraft is weight-on-wheels.
22. G Status. Displays the accelerometer measured G-force on the aircraft when the load factor exceeds 2G’s,
    or if within ¼G of the G load factor limit under the current conditions of velocity, density altitude, and gross
    weight.
23. Field-Of-View (FOV) Box. The FOV box indicates the relative position of the crewmember’s helmet line-
    of-sight within the larger Field-of-Regard box. The FOV box represents a 30° x 40° field of view and is driven
    by the crewmember’s helmet orientiation as detected by helmet sensors within each resepective cockpit.
24. Field-Of-Regard (FOR) Box. The FOR box indicates azimuth limits for the crewmember’s Night Vision
    System (NVS) sensor turret. The format of the FOR box is determined by the NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS)
    assigned to that crewstation. Tick marks around the edges of the PNVS FOR box mark 0° in azimuth and
    elevation. Tick marks around the edges of the TADS FOR box mark 0° and ±90° in azimuth, and 0° elevation.
                                                                 -90°              +90°




            +20°                                                                               +30°
                                                       0°


             -45°                                                                              -60°



                     -90°          0°         +90°           -120°         0°         +120°


                               PNVS Format (Left) & TADS Format (Right)

25. Alternate Sensor Bearing. Indicates the magnetic heading of the opposite crewmember’s selected sight
    when the opposite crewmember’s sight is HMD or TADS.
     The Alternate Sensor Bearing symbol is not displayed when the other crewmember’s selected sight is FCR.
26. Cued Line-Of-Sight Reticle. Indicates the virtual location of the crewmember’s selected acquisition
    source.
     If CUEING is deselected on the Pilot’s WPN Utility (UTIL) sub-page, this symbol is not displayed.
27. Cueing Dots. Indicates the quadrant direction of the selected acquisition source to “cue” the crewmember’s
    helmet position to the location of the Cued LOS Reticle. The dots are removed when the Cued LOS Reticle
    is with 4° of that quadrant relative to the LOS Reticle.
     All four dots flash when the “IHADSS B/S REQUIRED” message is present within the Sight Status field of the
     High Action Display, indicating the crewmember needs to boresight their IHADSS.
     If CUEING is deselected on the Pilot’s WPN Utility (UTIL) sub-page, these dots are not displayed.
28. Cued Line-Of-Sight Dot. Indicates the relative location of the selected acquisition source within the Field-
    of-Regard box.
29. Acceleration Cue. The Acceleration Cue indicates magnitude and direction of the aircraft’s rate of
    acceleration. The Acceleration Cue is displayed in Transition, Hover, and Bob-Up symbology modes.
     When in Transition mode, or in Hover or Bob-Up modes when the ground speed is <6 knots, the Acceleration
     Cue is displaced from the outer point of the Velocity Vector. When in Hover or Bob-Up modes and the
     Velocity Vector becomes “saturated” at 6 knots ground speed, the Acceleration Cue displacement originates
     from the center of the LOS reticle.
30. Velocity Vector. The Velocity Vector indicates the aircraft’s 2-dimensional direction and magnitude of
    velocity across the surface.
     In Hover and Bob-Up symbology modes, the Velocity Vector will become “saturated” (reaching it’s maximum
     displacement) at 6 knots ground speed. In Transition symbology mode, the Velocity Vector will become
     saturated at 60 knots ground speed.
31. Radar Altimeter Tape. The Radar Altimeter Tape displays altitude above ground level in an “analog”
    format. Major tick marks are displayed in 50-foot increments between 0 and 200 feet. Minor tick marks are
    displayed in 10-foot increments between 0 and 50 feet.
     When the aircraft has exceeded 200 feet AGL, the Radar Altimeter Tape will be removed from the symbology.
     The Radar Altimeter Tape will not be subsequently displayed until the aircraft descends below 180 feet AGL.
32. Bob-Up Box. The Bob-Up Box represents a 12-foot wide octogonal box anchored to a position on the
    surface below the helicopter.
     When Bob-Up symbology mode is entered, the Bob-Up Box is displayed and referenced to the 2-dimensional
     position on the surface the helicopter was located over when Bob-Up mode was entered. This is termed
     “dropping a Bob-Up box”. The box will remain in this position until the crew changes symbology modes.
     As the aircraft moves laterally across the surface, the Bob-Up Box moves within the symbology to indicate
     the relative position of the reference location. When the Bob-Up box has become “saturated” (reaching it’s
     maximum displacement), the aircraft has displaced 40 feet from the reference position on the surface. Once
     the aircraft returns to within 40 feet of the reference position, the Bob-Up Box will become de-saturated.
33. High Action Display. The High Action Display is displayed in both Flight and Weapons symbology. The
    HAD provides prioritized sight and weapon status messages to the crew for targeting and weapons
    employment. (See High Action Display in the Helmet-Mounted Display chapter for more information.)


Symbology Categories
Symbology elements can be grouped into one of four categories: Informational elements, Longitudinally scaled
elements, Laterally scaled elements, and Virtual elements.

Informational Symbology Elements
Symbology elements that provide data and status indications are fixed in location within the symbology. Some of
these elements are only displayed in specific symbology modes, such as Ground Speed and Barometric Altitude.
Other elements are only displayed when relevant; or when approaching an aircraft limitation, such as the G Status
or Turbine Gas Temperature (TGT) indications.


                                                                                Barometric Altitude



                  TGT




                  G Status




                                   Informational Symbology Elements
Longitudinally Scaled Symbology Elements
Symbology elements that are longitudinally scaled include the Horizon Line, Pitch Ladder, Bank Angle Indicator,
Skid/Slip Indicator, Vertical Speed Indicator and Rate-of-climb Scale, and the Heading Tape along with its
associated azimuth indicators. These symbology elements can be thought of as representing a front-facing
viewpoint from behind the helicopter, or as the IHADSS equivalent of the MPD FLT page.
                                                      180° heading hemisphere




                                                                                                      +1000
                                                                                                    ft per min



                                                         5°


                                                                                                      -1000
                                                                                                    ft per min
                                                                                10°
                  The height of the LOS Reticle
              represents 5° in pitch in Cruise mode
               and 10° in pitch in Transition mode




               Attitude Indicator                                                     Magnetic Compass




              Skid/Slip Indicator                                                     Vertical Speed Indicator




                                    Longitudinally Scaled Symbology Elements
Laterally Scaled Symbology Elements
Symbology elements that are laterally scaled include the Velocity Vector, Acceleration Cue, and Bob-Up Box.
These symbology elements can be thought of as representing a top-down view of the helicopter over the surface.

                                                  12 feet
   Acceleration Cue indicates a
    steady velocity and vector




      The relative distance from the center                                           Bob-Up Box becomes saturated when
     of the LOS Reticle to the furthest edge                                         the helicopter is displaced 40 feet from
     of the Bob-Up Box when it is saturated                                              the Bob-Up reference position
      is approximately one rotor diameter




                                                  1 rotor diameter




                                                                                         Velocity Vector becomes saturated
                                                                                             at 6 knots ground speed in
                                                                                          Hover/Bob-Up symbology modes



                                               Laterally Scaled Symbology Elements
Virtual Symbology Elements
Virtual symbology elements include the Flight Path Vector, Head Tracker, Cued LOS Reticle, and Navigation Fly-
To Cue. These symbology elements are displayed at their true positions relative to the crewmember’s line-of-
sight, as virtual representations of locations “out-the-window”. As the crewmember turns his or her head, the
positions of these symbols are updated within the symbology field-of-view in real-time so they reflect the true
positions of their respective sources.




         Navigation Fly-To Cue                                                      Flight Path Vector




                 Head Tracker                                                       Cued LOS Reticle




                                       Virtual Symbology Elements
Night Vision System (NVS)
The IHADSS integrates the use of a Night Vision System
(NVS) mode for flight operations at night. Each
crewmember can enable a FLIR video underlay within
their respective HDU by setting the NVS Mode switch in
their crewstation to NORM or FIXED.
(See Tail Wheel/NVS Mode Panel for more information.)
By default, the PNVS is assigned to the Pilot crewstation and the TADS assigned to the CPG crewstation, but
either crewmember can take control of either NVS sensor by using the NVS Select switch on the Collective Flight
Grip. This can be especially critical in the case of a failure in the NVS system while operating at extremely low
altitudes at night. (See Collective Flight Grip for more information.)
When the NVS Mode switch is set to NORM, the NVS sensor assigned to the crewstation will unstow if necessary
and become slaved to the crewmember’s helmet line-of-sight. If the crewmember’s helmet reaches or exceeds
the slew limits of their NVS sensor, the LOS Reticle will flash and “LIMITS” will be displayed within the Sight
Status field of the High Action Display.
When the NVS Mode switch is set to FIXED, the NVS sensor assigned to the crewstation will slave to the fixed
forward location (0° in azimuth/-4.9° elevation). This can be used in the case of a failure in the IHADSS helmet
tracking, which will result in the sensor turret remaining at its last commanded position. If this were to occur, the
last detected helmet position may be off to one side or at an extreme look-down angle, preventing the
crewmember from viewing the aircraft’s current flight path and any imminent obstacles.
When the NVS is set to NORM or FIXED, virtual symbology elements within the HDU become “video-stabilized”.
This is to reduce visual disorientation if the crewmember rotates their head faster than the NVS turret can slew.
If this occurs, virtual elements such as the Flight Path Vector will remain stabilized to their relative locations within
the FLIR video, to prevent a false perception of the aircraft’s flight path within the FLIR imagery.
The exception to this logic is the Head Tracker symbol, which will always remain “helmet-stabilized” to the
crewmember’s line-of-sight, even when the NVS is in FIXED mode.




                                              PNVS at its turret limit
AN/AAQ-11 Pilot Night Vision System (PNVS)
The PNVS is a Forward-Looking Infrared (FLIR) sensor housed within a steerable turret on the topside of the
aircraft nose sensor assembly. The PNVS is primarily intended to aid the Pilot in performing low-altitude flight
under any lighting conditions, ranging from twilight to total darkness without ambient lighting from celestial or
terrestrial light sources.
The PNVS can slew ±90° in azimuth and +20° to -45° in elevation, at up to 120° per second. As the crewmember
moves his or her head, the IHADSS sensors within the cockpit track the movements of the helmet and translate
those motions into steering commands. As the crewmember looks left or right, the PNVS turret slews left and
right to follow. As the crewmember looks up or down, the FLIR sensor itself articulates up and down within the
turret housing.
The Modernized PNVS (M-PNVS) includes an enlarged sensor housing with a second optical sensor aperture for
potential upgrades and “growth” within the system.




                                      PNVS Sensor Turret Slew Range
AN/ASQ-170 TADS as Night Vision System
The TADS is a multi-sensor targeting system housed within a steerable turret on the underside of the aircraft
nose sensor assembly. The TADS is primarily intended to allow the Copilot/Gunner to target and designate enemy
locations and vehicles for the aircraft’s weapon systems. Like the PNVS, the TADS includes a Forward-Looking
Infrared (FLIR) sensor. Unlike the PNVS, the TADS FLIR sensor is intended for targeting purposes, and includes
three levels of optical magnification. However, if required, the TADS FLIR can be used as an NVS sensor for the
Copilot/Gunner, or as a backup NVS sensor for the Pilot (should the PNVS fail).
The TADS can slew ±120° in azimuth and +30° to -60° in elevation, at up to 60° per second. As the crewmember
moves his or her head, the IHADSS sensors within the cockpit track the movements of the helmet and translate
those motions into steering commands. As the pilot looks around, the TADS turret rotates in azimuth and elevation
to follow. However, due to the slower slew rate of the TADS, the crewmember must be more deliberate when
moving his or her head to avoid “outrunning the TADS” and inducing visual disorientation.
If the CPG is using the TADS for targeting as their selected sight and moves their NVS Mode switch to NORM or
FIXED, their sight selection will automatically switch to HMD, the TADS video will switch to FLIR (overriding the
TADS Sensor Select switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip), the TADS Field-Of-View will switch to Wide, and the
TADS will be slaved to the CPG’s helmet position.
If the Pilot’s NVS Mode switch is in NORM or FIXED and the Pilot presses forward on the NVS Select Switch, the
same events will occur, except the TADS turret will be slaved to the Pilot’s helmet position.




                                      TADS Sensor Turret Slew Range
ENHANCED UP-FRONT DISPLAY (EUFD)
The Enhanced Up-Front Display (EUFD) provides the aircrew with a consolidated location for viewing critical
message alerts about aircraft systems and managing voice and data communications. Unlike the MPDs, the EUFD
functionality is retained when the aircraft is operating on battery power.
The display itself is divided into three primary areas: warnings/cautions/advisories (WCA), radio status, and
information display. Additional controls for interacting with and controlling the EUFD are located to either side of
the LED display.
                                                                                                           5. Brightness Control Knob
     1. Warning/Caution/Advisory       2. Warning          3. Caution          4. Advisory
            Scroll Rocker             Message Area        Message Area        Message Area         6. Preset Button          7. Enter Button




8. Datalink Transmit     9. Radio Transmit           10. Information Display Area            11. Radio Status Area          13. Swap Button
   Select Rocker           Select Rocker
                                                                                                            12. Stopwatch Button

1.    Warning/Caution/Advisory (WCA) Scroll Rocker. Accesses additional WCA messages by scrolling the
      WCA areas up or down in a scrolling manner. This may be necessary if 8 or more messages exist in any of
      the three WCA columns. A double arrowhead symbol is displayed along the EUFD display if any column
      contains 8 or more active message alerts to indicate to the crew that WCA scrolling is necessary to view all
      messages.
2.    Warning Message Area. Warning messages alert the crew to critical aircraft emergencies or malfunctions
      that could result in death to the aircrew and/or catastrophic loss of the aircraft. These emergency conditions
      will be accompanied by the flashing illumination of the MSTR WARN pushbutton light and an audio voice
      message alerting the crew to the nature of the emergency.
      Examples of warning alerts include an engine fire, an engine flameout, or a total loss of hydraulics.
3.    Caution Message Area. Caution messages alert the crew to less critical but potentially hazardous aircraft
      malfunctions or conditions that could affect safe flight operations. These conditions will be accompanied by
      the illumination of the MSTR CAUT pushbutton light and an audio caution tone to the crew.
      Examples of caution alerts include a loss of oil or transmission pressure, overtemperature conditions, failures
      in the electrical system, or low fuel levels.
4.    Advisory Message Area. Advisory messages alert the crew to non-critical conditions, status of systems,
      or reception of datalink transmissions. Some messages may be accompanied by unique audio tones to cue
      the crew to their presence.
     Examples of advisory alerts include the commanded state of the tail wheel lock (when weight-on-wheels),
     completion of an automatic fuel check, or an unlatched canopy door.
5.   Brightness Control Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the EUFD display.
6.   Preset Button. Toggles display of the Preset frequency list. (See Tuning a Radio using the EUFD for more
     information.)
7.   Enter Button. Tunes the currently selected radio frequency from the displayed Preset frequency list.
8.   Datalink Transmit Select Rocker. Selects a radio for datalink transmission.
9.   Radio Transmit Select (RTS) Rocker. Cycles the Radio Transmit Select indicator on the EUFD to the
     next or previous radio in sequence. If the RTS indicator is set to the HF radio at the bottom of the list,
     pressing down on the RTS rocker will cycle the indicator to the VHF radio at the top of the list. If the RTS
     indicator is set to the VHF radio at the top of the list, pressing up on the RTS rocker will cycle the indicator
     to the HF radio at the bottom of the list.
10. Information Display Area. Displays fuel, transponder and time information in a single line.
     •    Total onboard fuel quantity, in pounds (lbs).
     •    Transponder Mode S enabled status. This data field will be blank if Mode S is disabled. (N/I)
     •    Transponder Mode 3A code (“squawk” code). This data field will be blank if Mode 3/A is disabled. (N/I)
     •    Transponder Mode 4 code (A or B). This data field will be blank if Mode 4 is disabled. (N/I)
     •    Transponder status (STBY, NORM or EMER). (N/I)
     •    Current time (Local or Zulu). If the stopwatch is enabled, elapsed time is displayed above current time.




            Total Fuel Quantity   Mode S   Mode 3/A   Mode 4   Transponder Status   Current Time   Local/Zulu

11. Radio Status Area. The 6 rows in the center of the EUFD display each of the five radios, their various
    states and settings, and the primary and standby frequency information for each radio.
     •    Primary Frequency List. Displays the currently tuned frequency for each radio.
     •    Primary Callsign List. Displays the 5-character callsign associated with the currently tuned preset
          frequency. If the primary frequency is manually tuned, “MAN” will be displayed in this data field. If the
          primary frequency is a GUARD frequency, “GUARD” will be displayed in this data field.
     •    Primary Datalink Network List. Displays the datalink network number currently tuned to the radio. If
          no datalink protocol has been tuned, this data field will be blank.
     •    Standby Frequency List. Displays the standby frequency for each radio.
     •    Standby Callsign List. Displays the 5-character callsign associated with the standby preset frequency.
          If the standby frequency is manually tuned, “MAN” will be displayed in this data field. If the standby
          frequency is a GUARD frequency, “GUARD” will be displayed in this data field.
     •    Radio Monitor Status. Displays which radios are being monitored by each crewmember. If a dot is
          present along the left row, the respective radio is being monitored within the crewstation. If a dot is
          present along the right row, the respective radio is being monitored within the opposite crewstation.
          Pulling out the volume knob of the VHF, UHF, FM1, FM2, or HF radio on the crewstation’s
          Communications panel will blank the dot that corresponds with that radio on in this data field.
    •      Squelch Status. Displays which radios have squelch enabled. If an asterisk is present alongside a radio,
           squelch is enabled for that radio. Squelch can be toggled using the Squelch switches on the
           Communications panel in either cockpit.
    •      HF Radio Status. When the RTS indicator for the current crewstation is set to the HF radio, the 6th radio
           status line will display additional information regarding the HF transmit frequency. (N/I)
    •      UHF GUARD Receiver. Displays “G” if the dedicated GUARD receiver of the ARC-164 radio is enabled
           to monitor 243.0 MHz.
    •      HF Power Setting. Displays the current power setting of the ARC-220 HF radio. (N/I)
    •      IFM Power Setting. Displays the current power setting of the IFM amplifier for the ARC-201D FM1 radio.
    •      Standby Datalink Network List. Displays the datalink network number in standby. If no datalink protocol
           is present, this data field will be blank.
                             Radio Transmit        Primary          Primary            Primary         Standby        Standby
                            Select Indicators   Frequency List    Callsign List      Network List   Frequency List   Callsign List




        Datalink Transmit
        Select Indicators




                             Radio Monitor      Squelch     HF Radio      GUARD          HF Power     IFM Power        Standby
                                Status           Status      Status       Receiver        Setting       Setting      Network List


    •      Radio Transmit Select Indicator. The icons shown indicates which radio has been selected for voice
           transmission:
                 o      Voice transmissions from the current crewstation are selected to this radio.
                 o      Voice transmissions from the opposite crewstation are selected to this radio.
                 o      Voice transmissions from both crewstations are selected to this radio.
                 o      Voice transmissions from neither crewstation are selected to this radio.
    •      Datalink Transmit Select Indicator. The icons shown indicates which radio has been selected for
           data transmission:
                 o      Data transmissions from the current crewstation are selected to this radio.
                 o      Data transmissions from the opposite crewstation are selected to this radio.
                 o      Data transmissions from both crewstations are selected to this radio.
12. Stopwatch Button. Starts and stops the stopwatch, which is displayed
    above the current time. A square symbol is displayed to the right of the
    stopwatch timer when the stopwatch is paused.
    Holding this button for >2 seconds resets the stopwatch timer and
    removes it from the EUFD.
    NOTE: The EUFD stopwatch in each crewstation is independent of the other. Starting, stopping, or resetting
    the EUFD stopwatch in one crewstation will have no effect on the EUFD stopwatch in the other crewstation.
13. Swap Button. Swaps the radio frequency, encryption mode, and network configuration with the standby
    values of the currently selected radio.
MULTI-PURPOSE DISPLAYS (MPD)
The Multi-Purpose Displays (MPDs) are color liquid crystal displays that allow the Pilot and CPG to access different
pages and/or formats of information. Each page allows the crewmember to view different information or access
different functions. There are two MPDs in each crewstation. The MPDs are identical; either can display any page,
sub-page, or format. Many functions that would be controlled by switches or physical controls in other aircraft
are included as MPD functions in the AH-64D.
If on the ground while on external power and the engine Power Levers set to OFF, the MPDs will enter a
screensaver mode if no buttons are pressed within 5 minutes. Pressing any button on either MPD will re-initialize
turn them back on.
                                                  1. Variable Action
                                                   Buttons T1→T6

                 2. VID Knob                                                              4. Mode Knob




          3. BRT Knob
                                                                                               5. Asterisk Button




     1. Variable Action                                                                       1. Variable Action
      Buttons L1 ↓ L6                                                                          Buttons R1 ↓ R6




6. Fixed Action Buttons                                                                        6. Fixed Action Buttons




                                    7. M Button   1. Variable Action
                                                   Buttons B1→B6

1.   Variable Action Buttons (VAB). Selects the option corresponding with the displayed text adjacent to the
     MPD button itself.
     •      VAB T1-T6. The top row of Variable Action Buttons are numbered from T1 starting on the far left to
            T6 on the far right.
     •      VAB L1-L6. The left column of Variable Action Buttons are numbered from L1 starting on the at the
            top to L6 at the bottom.
     •      VAB R1-R6. The right column of Variable Action Buttons are numbered from R1 starting on the at the
            top to R6 at the bottom.
     •    VAB B1-B6. The bottom row of Variable Action Buttons are numbered from B1 starting on the far left
          to L6 on the far right.
2.   VID Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the video or map underlay independently of the primary symbology
     displayed on the MPD.
3.   BRT Knob. Adjusts the overall brightness setting of the MPD display within the overall brightness level
     selected by the Mode Knob.
4.   Mode Knob. Sets the brightness level of the MPD.
     •    DAY. Sets the MPD to daytime brightness levels.
     •    NT. Sets the MPD to nighttime brightness levels.
     •    MONO. Sets the MPD to nighttime brightness levels and an NVG-friendly monochromatic color scheme.
5.   Asterisk (*) Button. Not implemented.
6.   Fixed Action Buttons. Sets the MPD to the corresponding page.
     •    FCR. Displays the Fire Control Radar page.
     •    WPN. Displays the Weapon page.
     •    TSD. Displays the Tactical Situation Display page.
     •    VID. Displays the Video page.
     •    COM. Displays the Communications page.
     •    A/C. Displays the Flight page if in the air. Displays the Engine page if on the ground with weight-on-
          wheels.
7.   M Button. Variable Action Button B1 is used to access the Menu and DMS pages.
     •    Menu page: If any page is displayed on the MPD other than the Menu page, this button will display
          the Menu page.
     •    DMS page: If the Menu page is displayed on the MPD, this button will access the DMS page.


Auto-paging
Some MPD pages will be displayed automatically when certain events occur; this is called “auto-paging”.
Autopaging by the DMS system is automatic and contextual based on specific aircraft conditions.
DMS autopaging can be suppressed in the CPG crewstation from the DMS Utility page.
     •    The ENG page will display in Emergency format when a new Warning message is displayed.
     •    The ENG page will display in Emergency format when the EMERG HYD button on the Emergency panel
          in either crewstation is pressed.
     •    The ENG page will display when an ENG START switch is engaged on the Pilot’s Power Quadrant panel.
ASE autopaging occurs when a threat is detected that exceeds the ASE Autopage threshold set within the
crewstation on the TSD Utility or ASE pages. (See Aircraft Survivability Equipment for more information.)
     •    The TSD page will display when the RLWR or RFI detects radar or laser energy exceeding the ASE
          Autopage threshold. If the ASE page is displayed, ASE autopaging is suppressed.
FCR autopaging occurs when the FCR is selected as that crewstation’s sight.
Variable Action Button (VAB) Functions
The function of a Variable Action Button is indicated by the format of its label. When a VAB command is in-
progress, the label will be displayed in “inverse video”.
                                                          Two-State button
Page button                                               Toggles a mode or option between
Displays a different MPD page or                          two states, which are maintained
sub-page, annotated by an                                 after switching to a different page.
arrow. When a sub-page is
accessed, the button label will be
boxed.

                                                          Grouped buttons
Momentary button                                          Selects a mode or option from
Commands an action. The                                   a list of grouped buttons. The
button    label   will  be                                label along the border of the
displayed in inverse video                                grouped buttons displays
while the action is being                                 what the options pertain to.
performed.


Maintained button
Changes the page to a                                     Multi-State button
different format or toggles                               Displays an expanded list from which to choose a
an option or mode. The                                    mode or option. Once a selection is made, the
state of the button is                                    expanded list will collapse. If a different option is
maintained if the MPD is                                  no longer desired, pressing the currently selected
switched to a different page.                             option with
                                                          the      box
                                                          displayed
                                                          around its
On/Off button                                             label    will
Toggles       a    system     or                          collapse the
component on or off. If the                               list with no
circle is hollow, the system is                           changes
not powered. If the circle is                             made.
filled, the system is powered.


Disabled button
Buttons that are inhibited or                             Data Entry button
“barriered” from selection will                           Pressing a button marked
be marked with a green line                               with a > symbol will activate
next to their label.                                      the Keyboard Unit for data
                                                          entry. While the KU is
                                                          active, the current data
Missing/Invalid Data button                               entry is boxed. If the KU
Button labels displayed in white with a                   entry is valid, the new data
question mark indicate data that is                       is displayed once accepted.
missing or currently invalid.
Paging buttons                                              Search buttons
Cycles forward and back                                     Scrolls up and down
through multiple pages of                                   through a list of grouped
data displayed on the MPD.                                  button options.




MPD Cursor
Each crewstation has an independent MPD cursor for accessing MPD commands or interacting with
MPD displayed data and symbols. The Cursor Controller on the Collective Mission Grips and TEDAC
Left Handgrip is used to slew the cursor on the active MPD. The cursor provides the crewmembers
a means to select VAB commands on the MPD without removing their hands from the flight controls
or the TEDAC handgrips. When placed over a VAB label, the label text will be bolded to indicate
Cursor-Enter can be pressed.
The cursor can be moved to the opposite MPD using the Cursor Display Select button on the
Collective Mission Grip or TEDAC Left Handgrip or by “bumping” the cursor between MPDs. To
bump the cursor to the opposite display, move the cursor to the inboard edge of the MPD, release input on the
Cursor Controller, and then re-apply pressure input toward the opposite MPD. The cursor can also be utilized on
the TDU in the CPG crewstation if the FCR page is displayed on the TDU. However, the cursor can only be moved
to the TDU FCR display using the “bump” method.
The MPD cursor itself may be displayed in several formats, depending on the specific page that is displayed on
the MPD and the position of the cursor itself.
Normal format                                              Target Reference Point format
The cursor may be used for selecting                       The cursor is being used to place a
Variable Action Button commands                            TRP-shaped Priority Fire Zone on the
along the bezel of the MPD.                                TSD Battle Area Management page.
Crosshairs format                                          Opposite Crewmember format
The cursor may be used for selecting                       Distinguishes the cursor belonging to
symbols or map locations within the                        the opposite crewmember from the
central “footprint” of the MPD page.                       crewmember’s own cursor, if enabled
                                                           for display on the TSD.
Symbol Select format
A symbol is identified for cursor
selection using Cursor-Enter.
MPD Symbology Colors
All MPD pages share a 6-color template for consistent indication of various types of symbology. These colors
increase the efficiency of a crewmember’s interpretation and prioritization of displayed data within the cockpit.

     •    Green. Default symbology color, normal conditions, and Advisory messages.
     •    Yellow. Hazards to flight, intermediate or transient operating conditions, and Caution messages
     •    Red. Targets, enemy threats, conditions exceeding allowable parameters, and Warning messages.
     •    White. Items requiring a crewmember’s attention, or invalid selection/data.
     •    Cyan. Ownship, friendly units, pitch attitudes above the horizon (sky).
     •    Brown. Pitch attitudes below the horizon (ground).

In addition to colors, the intensity of the symbology itself may also be adjusted to indicate relevance or recency
of the information.

     •    Full-intensity color. Relevant or current data.
     •    Partial-intensity color. Less relevant or stale data.
Menu (M) Page
The Menu page provides immediate access to any “top-level” MPD page within the three page categories, as well
as the DMS, VIDEO, VCR, and Favorites (*) pages. The Menu page may be accessed at any time by pressing the
M button (VAB B1).




         VIDEO page                                                                 Favorites page




           VCR page




                                                                                    COMMUNICATION pages


      MISSION pages




                                 DMS page      AIRCRAFT pages




Page Categories
Most MPD pages are grouped within one of three categories: AIRCRAFT, COMMUNICATIONS, and MISSION.
AIRCRAFT pages                   COMMUNICATION pages                   MISSION pages
Aircraft systems.                Communication systems.                Navigation, weapons, radar, and
                                                                       defensive systems.
•    ENG Engine and              •    DL Datalink                      •    ASE Aircraft Survivability
     powertrain information      •    XPNDR Transponder                     Equipment
•    FLT Flight instruments      •    UHF UHF radio                    •    TSD Tactical Situation Display
•    FUEL Fuel systems           •    FM FM1/FM2 radios                •    WPN Weapon systems
•    PERF Performance data       •    HF HF radio                      •    FCR Fire Control Radar
•    UTIL Utility systems        •    COM Comms presets and
                                      network management
Engine (ENG) Page
The ENG page displays engine and powertrain data and is displayed in either Ground, Flight, or Emergency
formats, based on aircraft status. ENG page data may be displayed as digital numerical values and/or analog
vertical tapes.
       •       Values displayed in green represent normal operating parameters.
       •       Values displayed in yellow represent intermediate or transient operating parameters that will result in
               component damage or fatigue if maintained continuously.
       •       Values displayed in red represent maximum operating parameters that have been exceeded that has
               most likely resulted in component damage or fatigue and may result in imminent failure.
For data that is also displayed as an analog tape, the entire vertical tape is color-coded to indicate operating
condition, and the width of the tape will widen when outside of normal operating parameters. The increase in
the width of the tape allows crewmembers to recognize when indications are outside normal operating parameters
when the MPD is set to MONO (monochromatic) mode.


Engine Page, Ground format
During initial start-up of the APU, the ENG page will be displayed in Ground format, with engine oil and hydraulic
pressure windows displayed in the lower half of the page. The ENG page will return to Ground format any time
the ENG START switches are moved to the START or IGN ORIDE positions on the Pilot’s Power Quadrant panel.
                                1. Engine Torque   2. Engine Turbine Gas Temperatures




     3. Maximum TGT Limit

                                                                                              8. Maximum NR/NP Limit
4. Intermediate TGT Limit

5. Maximum Torque Limit                                                                       9. Powertrain Tachometer


                                                                                              10. Engine NP Tachometer
           6. Digital Readout
                                                                                             11. Engine NG Tachometer
             7. Analog Tape
                                                                                              12. Engine Start Box


                                                                                             13. Hydraulic System Pressures


                                                                                             14. Engine Oil Pressures




                                15. SYS sub-page   16. ETF sub-page      17. WCA sub-page


1.     Engine Torque (TQ). Displays the torque, as a percentage, that is being exerted by engines 1 and 2 on
       the powertrain system as measured at each engines’ power turbine output shaft.
2.   Engine Turbine Gas Temperatures (TGT). Displays the temperature, in degrees Celsius, of the exhaust
     gases being expelled by the gas generator sections of engine 1 and 2 into each engines’ power turbine
     sections.
3.   Maximum TGT Limit. Indicates the maximum engine turbine gas temperature (TGT) limit of 949° C.
4.   Intermediate TGT Limit. Indicates the intermediate engine turbine gas temperature (TGT) limits of 870°
     C and 878° C.
5.   Maximum Torque Limit. Indicates the maximum engine torque limit for the current main rotor speed NR.
6.   Digital Readout. Digital readouts are displayed to provide precise, numerical values of engine and
     powertrain components.
7.   Analog Tape. Vertical analog tapes are color-coded and varied in width to provide rapid and intuitive
     analysis of display normal, intermediate/transient, and maximum operating ranges of the engines and
     powertrain. As the digital readouts of torque, temperature, or speed increase, the analog tapes increase in
     length.
8.   Maximum NR Limit. Indicates the maximum main rotor speed (NR) limit of 110%.
9.   Powertrain NR/NP Tachometer. Displays the main rotor speed (NR), as measured at the main
     transmission, as a percentage. Includes analog tapes for NR and each engines’ NP speed.
10. Engine NP Tachometer. Displays the power turbine speed of engines 1 and 2, as a percentage.
11. Engine NG Tachometer. Displays the gas generator speed of engines 1 and 2, as a percentage.
12. Engine Start Box. Displayed when either Air Turbine Starter (ATS) is engaged in the START or IGN ORIDE
    modes.
     •    If either ENG START switch is positioned to the START position on the Pilot’s Power Quadrant panel,
          “ON” will be displayed under the corresponding NG digital readout to indicate that a normal start
          sequence has been initiated for that engine.
     •    If the ENG START switch is positioned to the IGN ORIDE position on the Pilot’s Power Quadrant panel,
          “OVRD” will be displayed under the corresponding NG digital readout to indicate that the engine is being
          motored by the ATS.
13. Hydraulic System Pressures (PSI). Displays the hydraulic pressures of the primary (PRI) and utility
    (UTIL) hydraulic systems, and the hydraulic accumulator (ACC), in pounds-per-square-inch. The hydraulic
    system pressures box is removed when the ENG page transitions to In-Flight format.
14. Engine Oil Pressures (PSI). Displays the oil pressures of engines 1 and 2, in pounds-per-square-inch.
    The engine oil pressure box is removed when the ENG page transitions to In-Flight format.
15. SYS sub-page. Displays the ENG Systems sub-page.
16. ETF sub-page. Not implemented.
17. WCA sub-page. Displays the DMS Warning/Caution/Advisory sub-page.
Engine Page, In-Flight Format
When both power levers are brought to FLY, the ENG page will transition from Ground to In-Flight format.




                                                                                        20. Engine Oil & Hydraulic
                                                                                            System Pressures


   18. Engine TORQUE %
                                                                                        21. Engine NP %

                                                                                        22. Engine NG %




      19. Engine TGT °C                                                                 23. Transmission NR %




18. Engine TORQUE % (Indications & limits). Displays the
    torque, as a percentage, that is being exerted by engines 1 and 2
    on the powertrain system as measured at each engines’ power
    turbine output shaft. The analog tapes and digital readouts will be
    displayed separately for each engine in red when above these
    limits under these conditions.
     The red maximum limit is dynamic and will re-position based on
     the maximum allowable torque for the current conditions, which
     is driven by the main rotor RPMs (NR) and whether the aircraft is
     operating under dual- or single-engine power.
                                     If NR is <50% the TQ red line will
                                                                          Torque Limits         Torque Limits
                                     be displayed at 30%.
                                                                           (NR <50%)             (NR <90%)
                                     If NR is <90% the TQ red line will
                            6 secs   be displayed at 70%.
                                     If NR is >90% the TQ red line will be displayed at 115% under dual engine
                            6 secs   power and at 125% under single-engine power.
                                     If either TQ indicates <51%, the other engine’s TGT limiter is increased to
                                     896 °C, allowing the healthy engine to operate in a single-engine
                                     contingency mode. A yellow sub-range limit will be displayed at 123% within
                                     both TQ analog tape ranges above the TQ digital readout, delineating
        Dual Engine Torque           between the 2.5-minute single-engine contingency range and the 6-second
        Limits (NR >90%)             single-engine transient range.
    If either engine TQ enters the dual-engine transient operating
    range (101-115% when NR is >90%) a 6-second countdown timer                                   6 secs
    will be displayed instead of the engine numbers below the analog
    tapes.
                                                                                                  6 secs
    If either engine TQ enters a single-engine contingency range (111-
    122% when NR is >90%) a 2.5-minute countdown timer will be                                     2.5 mins

    displayed instead of the engine numbers below the analog tapes.
    If either engine TQ enters a single-engine transient operating range                           2.5 mins

    (123-125% when NR is >90%) a 6-second countdown timer will be
    displayed instead of the engine numbers below the analog tapes.


                                                                           Single Engine Torque Limits
                                                                                   (NR >90%)

19. Engine TGT °C (Indications & limits). Displays                             Dual Engine
    the temperature, in degrees Celsius, of the exhaust                        TGT Limiter
                                                                                               12 secs
    gases being expelled by the gas generator sections
    of engine 1 and 2 into each engines’ power turbine
    sections.                                                                                  12 secs
                                                                                               Single Engine
    Each engine incorporates a TGT limiter within the                                          Limit (±12°C)
    Digital Electronic Control that will limit the engine to                                   2.5 mins
    a maximum TGT of 867±12 °C when under dual
    engine conditions, or 896±12 °C when under single-
                                                                                               2.5 mins
    engine conditions.
                                                                                                Dual Engine
    If either engine’s torque indicates <51%, the other                                        Limit (±12°C)
                                                               Dual Engine TGT Limits          10 mins
    engine’s TGT limiter is increased to 896±12 °C,
    allowing the healthy engine to operate in a single-
    engine contingency mode for 2.5 minutes.                                                   10 mins

    TGT timers indicate the maximum acceptable time                                            30 mins
    limit for the intermediate, contingency, and transient
    operating ranges.                                                                             Max
                                                                                               During Start
    If an engine’s TGT enters an intermediate operating
    range, a 30-minute (811-870 °C) or 10-minute (871-                                         30 mins
    878 °C) countdown timer will be displayed instead                                             Max
    of the engine numbers below the analog tapes.                                              Continuous
                                                                                                 Power
    If under single-engine power, a third intermediate
    sub-range limit will be displayed, delineating
    between the 2.5-minute single-engine contingency           Single Engine TGT Limits
    range (879-896 °C) and the 12-second transient             and TGT range in Lockout
    range (897-949 °C). When operating within these
    ranges, a 2.5-minute or 12-second timer will be
    displayed respectively.
    The maximum TGT limit is 949 °C.
20. Engine Oil & Hydraulic System Pressures (Indications & limits). Displays the oil pressures of engines
    1 and 2, in pounds-per-square-inch; or the hydraulic pressures of the primary (PRI) and utility (UTIL)
    hydraulic systems, and the hydraulic accumulator (ACC), in pounds-per-square-inch. If these systems are
    outside their normal operating parameters, the applicable box will be displayed above the digital NP readouts
    when the ENG page is in In-Flight format.
     If the oil pressure of an                          a PSI LOW or LEVEL LOW                    >5 secs
     engine is above 120 PSI                            caution exists for either                 >5 mins
     or below 23 PSI, the                               system, the digital readout for
     digital readout for that                           that hydraulic system will be
     engine will be displayed                           displayed in yellow.                      >5 mins
     in red and boxed.
                                                        If the hydraulic pressures of
                                                        the primary or utility hydraulic
                                 Engine Oil
                                                        systems, or the accumulator,
                                  Pressure
                                                        are above 3300 for greater
                                   Limits
                                                        than 5 minutes, above 3400
                                                        PSI for 5 seconds, or below         Hydraulic System
     If the hydraulic pressures of the primary          1260 PSI, the digital readout
                                                                                             Pressure Limits
     or utility hydraulic systems, or the               for that hydraulic system will
     accumulator, are above 3300 PSI, or if             be displayed in red and boxed.

21. Engine NP % (Indications & limits). Displays engine power turbine
    speed (NP) as a percentage. NP is displayed as analog tapes on either side
    of the main rotor (NR) analog tape and digitally to the right of the #2                                    12 secs
    engine NP analog tape.
     If the power turbine speed of an engine is between 106-121%, the analog                                   12 secs
     tape and digital readout for that engine will be displayed in yellow, with
     the digital readout boxed at 107% and above, and a 12-second countdown                                    12 secs

     timer will be displayed instead of the engine numbers below the analog
     tapes.
     If the power turbine speed of an engine is above 121%, the analog tape
     and digital readout for that engine will be displayed in red (with the digital
                                                                                       Engine Power Turbine
     readout boxed).
                                                                                         Speed (NP) Limits


22. Engine NG % (Indications & limits). Displays engine #1 and #2 gas
    generator speeds (NG) as a percentage. NG is indicated digitally to the right of                        12 secs
    the #2 engine NP analog tape, and below the engine NP digital readouts.
     If the gas generator speed of an engine is between 102.3-105.1%, the digital
                                                                                                            12 secs
     readout for that engine will be displayed in yellow.
     If the gas generator speed of an engine is above 105.1% or below 63.1%, the
     digital readout for that engine will be displayed in red and boxed



                                                                                           Engine Gas Generator
                                                                                             Speed (NG) Limits
23. Transmission NR % (Indications & limits). Displays main rotor
    speed (in percent NR) as analog vertical tapes with digital readouts and
    maximum limits. NR is indicated digitally above the center analog tape.
     If the rotor is operating within 106-111% NR, the analog tape and digital
     readout will be displayed in yellow.
     If the rotor is operating below 95% or above 110%, the analog tape
     and digital readout will be displayed in red.




                                                                                       Main Rotor Speed
                                                                                          (NR) Limits
Engine Page, Emergency Format
If Warning or Caution messages are displayed on the EUFD, the ENG page will enter Emergency format and
display the Warning or Caution messages in the lower half of the page.
If the hydraulic or engine oil pressures are out of normal operating parameters, the applicable window will be
displayed in the top right corner of the ENG page.




     24. Warning Message
                                                                                            25. Caution Message




24. Warning Message. Warning messages are displayed in red and alert the crew to critical aircraft
    emergencies or malfunctions that could result in death to the aircrew and/or catastrophic loss of the aircraft.
25. Caution Message Area. Caution messages are displayed in yellow and alert the crew to less critical but
    potentially hazardous aircraft malfunctions or conditions that could affect safe flight operations.
ENG Systems (SYS) Sub-page
The SYS page displays powertrain pressures and temperatures, hydraulic pressures, environmental temperatures
of the Extended Forward Avionics Bays (EFAB) and cockpits, and stabilator angle and nominal speed. Either
generator may be disabled from this page.



     1. Engine Oil Pressures


     2. Engine Nose Gearbox
          Oil Pressures
                                                                                          7. Hydraulic System
     3. Engine Nose Gearbox                                                                    Pressures
        Oil Temperatures


            4. Transmission
             Oil Pressures

         5. Transmission Oil
            Temperatures                                                                  8. ECS Temperatures

      6. AC Generator Power

                                                                                          9. Stabilator Status




1.    Engine Oil Pressures (PSI). Displays the engine oil pressures, in pounds-per-square-inch.
2.    Engine Nose Gearbox (NGB)                            4. Transmission (XMSN) Oil
      Oil Pressures (PSI). Displays the                       Pressures (PSI). Displays
      oil pressures of the engine nose                        the oil pressures for the main
      gearboxes, in pounds-per-square-                        transmission, in pounds-per-
      inch.                                                   square-inch.
      If the nose gearbox oil pressure is     NGB Oil        If the transmission oil pressure    Transmission
      below 30 PSI, the digital readout       Pressure       is below 30 PSI, the digital        Oil Pressure
      will be displayed in red and boxed.      Limits        readout will be displayed in red       Limits
                                                             and boxed.
3.    Engine Nose Gearbox (NGB)
      Oil Temperatures. Displays the                       5. Transmission (XMSN) Oil
      oil temperatures of the nose                            Temperatures. Displays the
      gearboxes for engines 1 and 2, in                       oil pressures for the main
      degrees Celsius.                                        transmission,  in   degrees
                                                              Celsius.
      If the oil temperature of a nose         NGB Oil
      gearbox is above 134°C, the            Temperature     If    the    transmission    oil    Transmission
      digital readout will be displayed in      Limits       temperature is above 134 in              Oil
      red and boxed.                                         °C, the digital readout will be     Temperature
                                                             displayed in red and boxed.            Limits
     NOTE: During extended APU operations on the ground without either engine operating, monitor the XMSN
     OIL TEMP. Do not operate the APU with a XMSN OIL TEMP (1 or 2) between 120°-130° C for greater than
     5 minutes. If the temperature exceeds 130° C, shut down the APU and allow the transmission oil to cool for
     30 minutes.
6.   AC Generator Power. Enables/Disables AC Generators 1 and 2. If both generators are disabled, the MPDs
     will blank and the generators must be reset in the Pilot crewstation to re-enable AC power. (see Pilot’s Check
     Overspeed Test/Generator Reset Panel)
7.   Hydraulic System Pressures. Displays the hydraulic pressures of the primary (PRI) and utility (UTIL)
     hydraulic systems, and the hydraulic accumulator (ACC), in pounds-per-square-inch.
8.   ECS Temperatures. Displays the environmental temperatures inside the forward and aft sections of each
     Extended Forward Avionics Bay (EFAB) and each cockpit, in degrees Fahrenheit.
9.   Stabilator Status. Displays the current stabilator angle and nominal airspeed restriction. The angle is
     referenced to the trailing edge of the stabilator and displays a range of 10° UP to -35° DN.
     If the stabilator is in manual mode, the angle and nominal airspeed values are displayed in white.
     If the stabilator is detected as failed, the nominal airspeed value will be displayed in yellow.
     If the position of the stabilator is unknown, the angle indication will be displayed as a white “?” and the
     nominal airspeed will be displayed in red as the true airspeed equivalent of 90 knots IAS.
Flight (FLT) Page
The FLT page displays flight and basic navigation information; and includes controls for configuring navigation
and instrument settings such as altimeter settings, altitude warnings, and units of measurement.
                            1. Heading Tape      2. Aircraft Heading   3. Lubber Line




       4. Engine Torque                                                                    11. Bank Angle Indicator



 5. Navigation Fly-to Cue                                                                  12. Barometric Altitude


         6. Horizon Line                                                                   13. Flight Path Vector



        7. True Airspeed                                                                   14. Vertical Speed Indicator



          8. Pitch Ladder                                                                  15. Rate-of-climb Scale


      9. Waypoint Status                                                                   16. Radar Altitude



      10. Ground Speed                                                                     17. Turn Rate Indicator



                                                                                           18. Skid/Slip Indicator




1.   Heading Tape. Displays a 180° hemisphere of magnetic headings. Major tick marks are displayed in 30°
     increments and marked by a cardinal direction or heading in the tens value. Minor tick marks are displayed
     in 10° increments.
2.   Aircraft Heading. Displays a digital readout of the aircraft’s current magnetic heading in 1° increments,
     superimposed over the Heading Tape.
3.   Lubber Line. The Lubber Line is aligned to the centerline of the aircraft and serves as a reference for both
     the aircraft heading and for the Bank Angle Indicator when in Cruise symbology mode.
4.   Engine Torque. Displays the highest torque value of the two engines, in 1% increments. A box will be
     displayed around the torque at 98% or greater. If the difference in engine torque values exceeds 12%, the
     torque digital readout will flash.
5.   Navigation Fly-To Cue. Indicates the location of the current point selected for navigation. Also called the
     “homeplate” symbol, the Navigation Fly-To Cue is sized so the Flight Path Vector fits within it for precise 3-
     dimensional navigation. The Navigation Fly-To Cue is not displayed when the aircraft is weight-on-wheels.
6.   Horizon Line. Indicates the horizon position and orientation relative to the aircraft nose, which is referenced
     to the Waterline.
7.   True Airspeed. Indicates the true airspeed (TAS) of the aircraft in 1 knot increments, from 0 to 210 knots.
     The airspeed indication is displayed in red and boxed if the airspeed exceeds VNE.
     When Attitude Hold is engaged, a rounded “status window” box is displayed around the TAS digital readout.
8.   Pitch Ladder. Indicates aircraft pitch attitude. Major pitch ladder increments are displayed at ±10°, ±20°,
     ±30°, ±45° and ±60° pitch, with minor increments placed at ±5°, ±15°, ±25°, ±37.5°, and ±52.5°.
9.   Waypoint Status. Displays the point selected for navigation, its distance in kilometers or nautical miles,
     and estimated time enroute (ETE). The ETE is based on the aircraft’s current ground speed, and is presented
     in HH:MM format when the ETE is ≥5 minutes, or M:SS format when ETE is <5 minutes. The ETE is not
     displayed when ground speed is <15 knots or ETE is >10 hours. Waypoint Status information is not displayed
     if there is no active destination point.
10. Ground Speed. Indicates the speed across the surface in 1 knot increments. Ground Speed is only displayed
    when the primary INU is aligned.
11. Bank Angle Indicator. Indicates bank angle relative to the horizon, with major tick marks placed at 10°
    increments and minor tick marks placed at 5° increments. When the Bank Angle Indicator is aligned with
    the lubber line below the heading tape, the aircraft is in a level attitude.
12. Barometric Altitude. Indicates the barometric altitude when Cruise mode symbology is displayed.
    Barometric Altitude is displayed in 10-foot increments from -2,300 feet to 20,000 feet.
13. Flight Path Vector. The Flight Path Vector (FPV) represents the point towards which the helicopter is
    flying. It is a 3-dimensional representation of the aircraft’s velocity vector. The FPV is not displayed if the 3-
    dimensional velocity is <5 knots ground speed, or if the aircraft is weight-on-wheels.
14. Vertical Speed Indicator (VSI). The Vertical Speed Indicator moves up and down the rate-of-climb scale
    to indicate vertical speed. The VSI becomes saturated at the ±1,000 fpm tick marks at the top or bottom of
    the Rate-of-climb Scale, augmented by digital readouts of rate-of-climb in 100 fpm increments.
15. Rate-of-climb Scale. Major tick marks are placed at 0, ±500 and ±1,000 feet per minute (fpm) rates of
    climb/descent. Minor tick marks are placed in 100 fpm increments between 0 and ±500 fpm. When the rate-
    of-climb/descent exceeds ±1,000 fpm, a digital readout to the nearest 100 fpm value is displayed adjacent
    to the 1,000 fpm major tick marks.
     When Altitude Hold is engaged, a rounded “homeplate” box is displayed next to the Rate-of-climb Scale at
     0 fpm.
16. Radar Altitude. Indicates the radar-detected altitude above ground level from 0 to 1,428 feet. The Radar
    Altitude is displayed in increments of 1 foot from 0 to 50 feet in altitude, and increments of 10 feet between
    50 feet and 1,428 feet in altitude. The Radar Altitude is not displayed when the altitude exceeds 1,428 feet
    above ground level.
17. Turn Rate Indicator. Indicates the rate of turn as the aircraft enters a bank. The rate of turn is displayed
    as a solid square moving underneath three “doghouses”. The center doghouse cooresponds with no turn
    (level attitude), and the left and right doghouses coorespond with standard-rate turns to the left and right,
    respectively. If the indicator is located between the center doghouse and either of the outer doghouses, the
    aircraft is in a half-standard-rate turn.
18. Skid/Slip Indicator. Also called the “trim ball”; indicates whether the aircraft is in coordinated flight (also
    known as “in aerodynamic trim”, or simply “in trim”). With the ball is centered between the tick marks, the
    aircraft is in coordinated flight, which minimizes drag. If the ball is left of center, applying left pedal will
    adjust tail rotor thrust to bring the aircraft back into coordinated flight. Likewise, if the ball is right of center,
    applying right pedal will adjust tail rotor thrust to bring the aircraft back into coordinated flight.
                                                                                              24. Command Heading


           19. Engine TGT
                                                                                              25. Extended Bank
                                                                                                 Angle Scale

              20. G Status
                                                                                              26. HI Altitude Alert
   21. Stabilator Position
                                                                                              27. LO Altitude Alert

         22. Waterline Bias
                                                                                              28. Radar Altimeter Tape

    23. Waterline Symbol




                                                                  29. FLT SET format

19. Engine TGT. Displays the highest of the two engines’ Turbine Gas Temperature (TGT) indications if
    operating in an intermediate or contingency TGT limit.
     When operating under dual engine intermediate power, the TGT (in °C) will be displayed during the final
     two minutes of either the 30-minute or 10-minute allowable timers.
     When operating under single engine contingency power, the TGT (in °C) will be displayed during the entire
     2.5 minutes allowable for operating in the contingency power temperature range.
20. G Status. Displays the accelerometer measured G-force on the aircraft when the load factor exceeds 2G’s,
    or if within ¼G of the G load factor limit under the current conditions of velocity, density altitude, and gross
    weight.
21. Stabilator Position. Displays the position of the stabilator when the stabilator is in Manual mode; the
    symbol is not shown when the stabilator is in Automatic mode. The position is shown graphically on an arc
    from 10° trailing edge up to -35° trailing edge down, with a small tick mark at 0°.
     The color of the symbol indicates operating mode:
     •        White: Stabilator is in Manual mode.
     •        Yellow: Stabilator Manual mode has failed. If the stabilator position is known, it is shown graphically;
              otherwise, a question mark “?” symbol is shown inside the stabilator symbol. The maximum true
              airspeed for the current stabilator position is shown below the symbol.
     •        Red: Stabilator manual mode has failed, and current airspeed exceeds the maximum true airspeed for
              current stabilator position.
22. Waterline Bias. Toggles the pitch bias of the waterline no bias and -5°. The “-W-” symbol will be boxed
    when bias is applied.
     NOTE: Adjusting the pitch bias on this page adjusts the pitch bias for both crewstations, to include the pitch
     bias of the horizon line in Transition and Cruise symbology modes.
23. Waterline Symbol. The waterline symbol indicates nose position and is a central reference for the pitch
    ladder. The symbol can be biased (adjusted upward or downward from its normal position) by using the FLT
    SET format. When the waterline is biased, the symbol will be partially “filled”.



                                Waterline un-biased (Left) & biased (Right)

24. Command Heading. Indicates the magnetic heading to the Navigation Fly-To Cue.
25. Extended Bank Angle Scale. When the bank angle exceeds 20°, the scale is displayed in white and will
    be extended in the direction of the current bank.
26. HI Altitude Alert. If an altitude value other than 0 is set into the HI Altitude Alert data field on the FLT
    SET format, and the aircraft is above that altitude as indicated by the radar altimeter, “HI” is displayed in
    yellow above the radar altimeter digital readout. In addition, the radar altimeter digital readout is displayed
    in yellow, as is the radar altimeter analog tape if shown.
27. LO Altitude Alert. If an altitude value other than 0 is set into the LO Altitude Alert data field on the FLT
    SET format, and the aircraft is below that altitude as indicated by the radar altimeter, “LO” is displayed in
    red below the radar altimeter digital readout. In addition, the radar altimeter digital readout is displayed in
    red, as is the radar altimeter analog tape if shown, and an “ALTITUDE LOW…ALTITUDE LOW” voice message
    will sound over the ICS.
28. Radar Altimeter Tape. The Radar Altimeter Tape displays altitude above ground level in an “analog”
    format. Major tick marks are displayed in 50-foot increments between 0 and 200 feet. Minor tick marks are
    displayed in 10-foot increments between 0 and 50 feet.
     When the aircraft has exceeded 200 feet AGL, the Radar Altimeter Tape will be removed from the symbology.
     The Radar Altimeter Tape will not be subsequently displayed until the aircraft descends below 180 feet AGL.
29. FLT SET format. Displays the FLT Settings format.
FLT Settings (SET) Format
Pressing the SET button (VAB B6) displays the FLT page in Settings format. Pressing the SET button a second
time returns the FLT page to standard format.
                1. HI Altitude Alert   2. LO Altitude Alert   3. Barometric Units   4. Barometric Altitude   5. Barometric Pressure




                                                                                                                  9. Barometric
                                                                                                                 Pressure Setting
     6. Accelerometer Reset



          7. Accelerometer




               8. Waterline
               Bias Setting
                                                                                                                 10. Radar Altimeter Power




                                                   11. Distance Units

1.     HI Altitude Alert. Activates the KU for inputting a high-altitude alert. When the aircraft is above this
       altitude as indicated by the radar altimeter, “HI” is displayed in yellow above the radar altimeter digital
       readout. In addition, the radar altimeter digital readout is displayed in yellow.
       If set to an altitude of “0”, the high-altitude alert is disabled.
2.     LO Altitude Alert. Activates the KU for inputting a low-altitude alert. When the aircraft is below this altitude
       as indicated by the radar altimeter, “LO” is displayed in red below the radar altimeter digital readout. In
       addition, the radar altimeter digital readout is displayed in red, as is the radar altimeter analog tape if shown,
       and an “ALTITUDE LOW…ALTITUDE LOW” voice message will sound over the ICS.
       If set to an altitude of “0”, the low-altitude alert is disabled.
3.     Barometric Units. Toggles the units used to display and edit the barometric pressure setting within the
       crewstation between inches of mercury (IN) and millibars (MB).
4.     Barometric Altitude. Activates the KU for inputting the current altitude above sea level (MSL). When this
       value is changed, the barometric pressure setting is re-calculated based on the pressure altitude detected
       by the Helicopter Air Data System (HADS) and displayed accordingly.
5.     Barometric Pressure. Activates the KU for inputting the current barometric pressure setting. When this
       value is changed, the current altitude above sea level (MSL) is re-calculated based on the pressure altitude
       detected by the Helicopter Air Data System (HADS) and displayed accordingly.
6.     Accelerometer Reset. Pressing this button resets the positive and negative accelerometer telltales to 1 G.
7.   Accelerometer. Displays current load factor (in G-force or G) along a vertical scale. A bolded tick mark
     indicates 1 G, with non-bolded tick marks every additional G in either direction, for a display range of +4 G
     to -1 G. Red dots indicate maximum positive and negative load factors for the current environmental
     conditions, gross weight, and airspeed. The solid green triangle indicates current load factor and is displayed
     in red if a limit is exceeded. Hollow green triangles are positive and negative telltales, which indicate
     maximum positive and negative G experienced since the accelerometer was last reset.
8.   Waterline Bias Setting. Adjusts the pitch bias of the waterline symbol up or down in 1° degree increments
     for each button press, up to a maximum of 10° in either direction. “BIAS” is displayed if a bias is applied.
     NOTE: Adjusting the pitch bias on this page adjusts the pitch bias for both crewstations, to include the pitch
     bias of the horizon line in Transition and Cruise symbology modes.
9.   Radar Altimeter Power. Enables/disables the radar altimeter. When enabled, the radar altimeter will
     perform a Built-In Test (BIT) for 10 seconds before displaying radar altitude measurements.
10. Distance Units. Toggles the units used for distance measurement within the crewstation between
    kilometers (KM) and nautical miles (NM). The Waypoint Status window on the FLT page, TSD page, and
    IHADSS Flight Symbology within the crewstation will display the distance to current waypoint based on this
    selection. The TSD scale and TSD grid lines within the crewstation will also be displayed based on this
    selection.
     NOTE: The Range Source displayed within the High Action Display is unaffected by this selection and will
     always be displayed in metric.
Fuel (FUEL) Page
The FUEL page displays fuel quantity and distribution; and includes controls for configuring the crossfeed settings
for supplying fuel to engines and transferring fuel between individual fuel tanks.
                                                  1. Forward Main Fuel Cell



            2. Fuel Feed Line                                                                  12. Fuel Transfer Line


         3. Internal Auxiliary                                                                 13. Extended Range Fuel
         Fuel System (IAFS)                                                                      System (ERFS) Tank


           4. L AUX Transfer                                                                   14. R AUX Transfer


           5. C AUX Transfer                                                                   15. Boost Pump


         6. Aft Main Fuel Cell


            7. Transfer Mode                                                                   16. CROSSFEED Mode


             8. External Fuel
             Quantity Input
                                                                                               17. Fuel Type
       9. Specific Fuel Range
                                                                                               18. Endurance
           10. Fuel Quantity

     11. Calculated Fuel Flow



                                                                    19. FUEL CHECK format

1.      Forward Main Fuel Cell. Indicates the quantity of fuel remaining in the forward main fuel cell, in pounds
        (LB). If the quantity remaining is 240 pounds or less, the digital fuel quantity will be displayed in yellow to
        indicate a low fuel condition. If the fuel cell is empty, a white “E” will be displayed.
2.      Fuel Feed Line. When fuel is being transferred between auxiliary fuel tanks and the main fuel cells, a solid
        line will be displayed between the auxiliary fuel tank and either of the main fuel cells. The Fuel Feed Line
        will be displayed in white for 3 seconds after transfer has been commanded before reverting to a full intensity
        green color. If fuel transfer has been commanded but is not occurring, the Fuel Feed Line will be displayed
        in partial intensity green.
        Fuel supplied from the main fuel cells to either engine are displayed as bolded Fuel Feed Lines.
        NOTE: If fuel is being transferred between the main fuel cells (either automatically or manually), fuel
        transfer from auxiliary fuel tanks cannot occur and will be paused until the main fuel cells are no longer
        transferring fuel.
3.      Internal Auxiliary Fuel Cell. Indicates the quantity of fuel remaining in the Internal Auxiliary Fuel System
        (IAFS), in pounds (LB). If the fuel cell is empty, a white “E” will be displayed. If the IAFS is not installed,
        this symbol is not displayed.
4.      L AUX Transfer. Enables/disables fuel transfer from Extended Range Fuel System (ERFS) tanks mounted
        on the left wing to the forward main fuel cell. If two ERFS tanks are loaded on the left wing, fuel will be
        transferred from the outboard ERFS tank to the inboard ERFS tank, and then to the forward main fuel cell
        in turn. Fuel transfer from wing-mounted ERFS tanks to the main fuel cells cannot occur if bleed air is
        disabled or unavailable. If no external fuel tanks are loaded on the left wing, this option is not displayed.
5.   C AUX Transfer. Enables/disables fuel transfer from Internal Auxiliary Fuel System (IAFS) to both main
     fuel cells. If ERFS tanks are mounted on either wing are also commanded to transfer fuel to the main fuel
     cells, the IAFS will not transfer fuel until the ERFS tanks are empty. Fuel transfer from the IAFS to the main
     fuel cells cannot occur if bleed air is disabled or unavailable. If the IAFS is not installed, this option is not
     displayed.
6.   Aft Main Fuel Cell. Indicates the quantity of fuel remaining in the aft main fuel cell, in pounds (LB). If the
     quantity remaining is 260 pounds or less, the digital fuel quantity will be displayed in yellow to indicate a
     low fuel condition. If the fuel cell is empty, a white “E” will be displayed.
7.   Transfer Mode. Displays the Transfer selection menu for transferring fuel between the forward and aft
     main fuel cells. Fuel transfer between the main fuel cells cannot occur if bleed air is disabled or unavailable.
     •    AUTO. Fuel is automatically transferred between the main fuel cells to maintain leveling. Automatic
          fuel transfer will only occur if both engines are running.

          Automatic fuel transfer from the aft fuel cell to the forward fuel cell will occur if:
          o   The forward fuel cell contains <814 lbs of fuel and the aft fuel contains >240 lbs of fuel.
          o   The aft fuel cell contains >500 lbs of fuel and contains >100 lbs more than the forward fuel cell;
              or the aft fuel cell contains <500 lbs of fuel and contains >50 lbs more than the forward fuel cell.
          o   An AFT FUEL LOW caution does not exist.

          Automatic fuel transfer from the forward fuel cell to the aft fuel cell will occur if:
          o   The aft fuel cell contains <814 lbs of fuel and the forward fuel contains >280 lbs of fuel.
          o   The forward fuel cell contains >500 lbs of fuel and contains >100 lbs more than the aft fuel cell;
              or the forward fuel cell contains <500 lbs of fuel and contains >50 lbs more than the aft fuel cell.
          o   A FWD FUEL LOW caution does not exist.

          Automatic fuel-leveling will be stopped if:
          o   The difference between the forward and aft fuel quantities is <20 lbs.
          o   A low fuel caution exists from the fuel cell that is being transferred from.
     •    FWD. Fuel is transferred from the aft main fuel to the forward main fuel cell.
     •    AFT. Fuel is transferred from the forward main fuel to the aft main fuel cell.
     •    OFF. Fuel transfer between the main fuel cells is disabled. Automatic fuel transfer to maintain leveling
          between the main fuel cells will not occur.
8.   External Fuel Quantity Input. Activates the KU to manually input the total amount of fuel within all
     external auxiliary fuel tanks loaded on the wing pylons. If ERFS tanks are not installed, this option is not
     displayed.
     NOTE: Only fuel within the 230-gallon ERFS tanks must be input manually using the KU due to the lack fuel
     quantity sensing probes. The IAFS is equipped with a fuel quantity probe which provides an indication of
     fuel quantity.
9.   Specific Fuel Range (SFR). When ground speed exceeds 10 knots, the SFR window will display an SFR
     factor that is calculated by dividing the current ground speed by the total fuel flow for the current power
     setting. This can be used to determine optimum power settings for fuel economy during cruise; higher SFR
     values indicate better fuel economy.
     When SFR calculation is not being performed, “NA” will be displayed.
10. Fuel Quantity. Displays the fuel quantity onboard the aircraft. INT (Internal) fuel only includes fuel in the
    forward and aft main fuel cells. The IAFS (if installed) is calculated as an “external” fuel tank and is only
    included in the TOT (Total) fuel amount.
     •    INT. Displays the fuel quantity within the forward and aft main fuel cells only. If either main fuel cell
          is displayed in a “low fuel” status, the internal fuel quantity is displayed in yellow.
     •    TOT. Displays the total fuel quantity, including internal and external auxiliary fuel tanks. The TOT fuel
          quantity is not displayed if there are no internal or external auxiliary fuel tanks loaded.
11. Calculated Fuel Flow. Displays the fuel consumption rate (in pounds per hour; LB/HR) of each engine (1
    and 2) and the total fuel flow (TOT). Fuel consumption by the APU (175 lb/hr) is not included within the
    calculations.
12. Fuel Transfer Line. A bolded, dashed line will marquee between the main fuel cells any time fuel is being
    transferred between them in either direction. The Fuel Transfer Line will be displayed in white for 3 seconds
    after transfer has been initiated before reverting to a full intensity green color.
13. Extended Range Fuel System (ERFS) Tank. Indicates the presence of a 230-gallon ERFS external
    auxiliary fuel tank loaded onto a wing pylon. If the external fuel tank is empty, a white “E” will be displayed.
14. R AUX Transfer. Enables/disables fuel transfer from Extended Range Fuel System (ERFS) tanks mounted
    on the right wing to the aft main fuel cell. If two ERFS tanks are loaded on right wing, fuel will be transferred
    from the outboard ERFS tank to the inboard ERFS tank, and then to the aft main fuel cell in turn. Fuel
    transfer from wing-mounted ERFS tanks to the main fuel cells cannot occur if bleed air is disabled or
    unavailable.
     If no external fuel tanks are loaded on the right wing, this option is not displayed.
15. Boost Pump. Enables/disables the fuel boost pump. When enabled, the crossfeed valves will automatically
    be set to their AFT positions, with both engines being fed from the aft main fuel (which is the only fuel cell
    equipped with a boost pump). When the boost pump is disabled, the crossfeed valves will automatically
    return to their NORM positions.
16. Crossfeed Mode. Controls the sources of fuel supplied from the main fuel cells to the engines.
     •    CROSSFEED – FWD. Both engines are supplied with fuel from the forward main fuel cell.
     •    CROSSFEED – NORM. Engine 1 is supplied with fuel from the forward main fuel; engine 2 is supplied
          with fuel from the aft main fuel cell.
     •    CROSSFEED – AFT. Both engines are supplied with fuel from the aft main fuel cell.
17. Fuel Type. Sets the type of fuel that is loaded into the aircraft for accurate fuel weight calculations. (N/I)
18. Endurance. Displays the remaining flight time (endurance) until fuel is depleted. The INT (Internal) fuel
    only includes fuel in the forward and aft main fuel cells; the IAFS (if installed) is calculated as an “external”
    fuel tank and is only included in the TOT (Total) endurance calculation.
     •    INT. Displays the flight time remaining calculated by the fuel quantity within the forward and aft main
          fuel cells only.
     •    TOT. Displays the flight time remaining calculated by the total fuel quantity, including internal and
          external auxiliary fuel tanks. The TOT endurance calculation is not displayed if there are no internal or
          external auxiliary fuel tanks loaded.
     If the endurance calculation is less than 20 minutes, the time remaining will be displayed in white.
19. FUEL CHECK format. Displays the FUEL Check format.
FUEL Check (CHECK) Format
Pressing the CHECK button (VAB B6) displays the FUEL page in Check format. Pressing the CHECK button a
second time returns the FUEL page to standard format.




         1. Fuel Check
         Status Window




                                                                                          2. Fuel Check
                                                                                         MINUTES Option




                                                                                         3. Fuel Check
                                                                                         START/STOP




1.   Fuel Check Status Window. If a fuel consumption check has been started, this status window will appear
     to display the progress of the fuel check.
     •    RUN. Displays the amount of time that has elapsed since starting the current fuel consumption check.
     •    START. Displays the time that the fuel consumption check was started. If the time format is toggled
          between Local (L) and Zulu (Z) on the TSD Utility sub-page, the fuel consumption check START time
          will be converted to the selected time format.
     •    RATE. Displays the average fuel consumption rate (in pounds per hour; LB/HR) as measured since the
          fuel consumption check START time.
2.   Fuel Check MINUTES Option. Controls the duration of the fuel consumption check. A “FUEL CHECK
     COMPLETE” advisory message will be displayed on the EUFD when the fuel consumption check has
     completed.
     •    15. The fuel consumption check will run for a duration of 15 minutes.
     •    20. The fuel consumption check will run for a duration of 20 minutes.
     •    30. The fuel consumption check will run for a duration of 30 minutes.
3.   Fuel Check START/STOP. If a fuel consumption check is not being performed, “START” will be displayed
     to command a fuel consumption check to begin for the duration that is selected above. If a fuel consumption
     check is in progress, “STOP” will be displayed to command a fuel consumption check to terminate before
     the selected duration has been reached.
                                                                                             4. Completed Fuel
                                                                                            Check Status Window




4.   Completed Fuel Check Status Window. When a fuel consumption check has been completed or stopped,
     this status window will appear to display the results of the fuel check. If the time format is toggled between
     Local (L) and Zulu (Z) on the TSD Utility sub-page, the results displayed within the status window will be
     converted to the selected time format.
     •    BURNOUT. Displays the time the aircraft engines are estimated to flameout due to fuel exhaustion,
          based on the average consumption rate calculated during the fuel check and the total fuel quantity
          remaining onboard at the termination of the fuel check.
     •    VFR RES. Displays the time the aircraft will enter the VFR reserve (20 minutes of flight time remaining),
          based on the average consumption rate calculated during the fuel check and the total fuel quantity
          remaining onboard at the termination of the fuel check.
     •    IFR RES. Displays the time the aircraft will enter the IFR reserve (30 minutes of flight time remaining),
          based on the average consumption rate calculated during the fuel check and the total fuel quantity
          remaining onboard at the termination of the fuel check.
Performance (PERF) Page
The PERF page displays predictive aircraft performance data based on current environmental conditions as
measured by the Helicopter Air Data System (HADS). The PERF page includes options for manually inputting
conditions for calculating aircraft performance based on predicted changes in air density and/or gross weight.




                                                                                          4. Hover Torque
                                                                                           Status Window



      1. Pressure Altitude
                                                                                             5. Cruise
                                                                                          Status Window
 2. Free Air Temperature


         3. Gross Weight
                                                                                          6. True Airspeed
                                                                                           Status Window
     7. Max Gross Weight
        Status Window

                                                                                          9. Wind Status Window
          8. Max Torque
          Status Window
                                                                                          10. Center-of-Gravity Scale




                                       11. PERF MODE   12. HIT sub-page   13. WT format


1.   Pressure Altitude (PA). Displays the pressure altitude (PA) used for performance
     calculations. When the PERF page is set to CUR mode, the PA will be measured by the HADS.
     When the PERF page is set to MAX or PLAN modes, the PA may be manually input by the
     aircrew or uploaded from the DTC.
2.   Free Air Temperature (FAT). Displays the free air temperature (FAT) used for performance
     calculations. When the PERF page is set to CUR mode, the FAT will be measured by the HADS.
     When the PERF page is set to MAX or PLAN modes, the FAT may be manually input by the
     aircrew or uploaded from the DTC.
3.   Gross Weight (GWT). Displays the gross weight (GWT) of the aircraft used for performance calculations.
     When the PERF page is set to CUR mode, the GWT will be calculated by the System Processor (SP). When
     the PERF page is set to MAX or PLAN modes, the GWT may be manually input by the aircrew or uploaded
     from the DTC. Current gross weight is calculated by the SP based on the following factors:
     •      Weight values entered on the PERF Weight format.
            o     Aircraft basic weight, to include any operational equipment installed (such as the FCR).
            o     Payload within the aircraft storage bays, such as survival equipment.
            o     Pilot and CPG weights.
            o     “Dummy” munitions.
     •      Fuel quantity as measured by the fuel system.
     •      Auxiliary fuel systems (IAFS/ERFS), weapon stations (M299/M261), and loaded munitions and
            ammunition as inventoried by the SP.
4.   Hover Torque Status Window. Displays predicted engine torque (Q) values when performing hovering
     flight, based on air density and gross weight. The values in this status window are used to assess the aircraft
     engine performance during a hover power check. (See Hover Power Check for more information.)
     •    Hover Torque – REQUIRED IGE. Displays the predicted hover torque
          required to hover in-ground-effect (IGE) at 5 feet over the surface, based
          on the current or predicted gross weight and air density.
     •    Hover Torque – REQUIRED OGE. Displays the predicted hover torque
          required to hover out-of-ground-effect (OGE) at 80 feet over the surface,
          based on the current or predicted gross weight and air density.
     •    Hover Torque – GO-NO/GO IGE. Displays the predicted hover torque
          required to hover in-ground-effect at 5 feet over the surface, at the maximum allowable gross weight
          specified for dual-engine, in-ground-effect (IGE) hovering flight, based on the air density.
     •    Hover Torque – GO-NO/GO OGE. Displays the predicted hover torque required to hover in-ground-
          effect at 5 feet over the surface, at the maximum allowable gross weight specified for dual-engine,
          out-of-ground-effect (OGE) hovering flight, based on the air density.
     •    Hover Torque – INDICATED. Displays the current engine torque value, the highest of the two
          engines, in 1% increments. If the difference in engine torque values exceeds 12%, the torque value
          will flash.
5.   Cruise Status Window. Displays predicted engine torque and fuel flow values at cruise airspeeds, based
     on air density and gross weight. The values in this status window are used to assess the performance and
     fuel flow requirements when flying at either Maximum Range or Maximum Endurance airspeeds.
     •    CRUISE – Q RNG. Displays the predicted engine torque (Q) required to
          maintain level flight at Maximum Range (RNG) airspeed, based on the predicted
          gross weight and air density.
     •    CRUISE – Q END. Displays the predicted engine torque (Q) required to maintain
          level flight at Maximum Endurance (END) airspeed, based on the predicted gross
          weight and air density.
     •    CRUISE – FF RNG. Displays the predicted dual-engine fuel flow (FF) required to maintain level flight
          at Maximum Range (RNG) airspeed, based on the predicted gross weight and air density.
     •    CRUISE – FF END. Displays the predicted dual-engine fuel flow (FF) required to maintain level flight
          at Maximum Endurance (END) airspeed, based on the predicted gross weight and air density.
6.   True Airspeed Status Window. Displays crucial airspeeds within the flight envelope, based on air density
     and gross weight. The values in this status window are used to maintain the aircraft within safe flight margins
     or to maximize the performance of the aircraft.
     •    TAS – VNE. Displays the true airspeed Velocity Never Exceed (VNE), based on the
          predicted gross weight and air density. If the true airspeed exceeds this value,
          controllability of the aircraft may be negatively affected, or structural damage may
          occur due to aerodynamic effects on the airframe and/or rotor system.
     •    TAS – VSSE. Displays the true airspeed Velocity Safe Single Engine (VSSE), based on
          the predicted gross weight, air density, and maximum torque available under single-
          engine conditions. When operating under single-engine power, level flight at a
          constant altitude may not be possible below this true airspeed.
     •    TAS – RNG. Displays the true airspeed that will result in the Maximum Range (RNG) of the aircraft,
          based on the predicted gross weight and air density.
     •    TAS – END. Displays the true airspeed that will result in the Maximum Endurance (END) of the aircraft,
          based on the predicted gross weight and air density.
7.   Max Gross Weight Status Window. Displays the maximum gross weight in which hovering flight can be
     performed, based on air density and gross weight, without exceeding the limitations of the main transmission
     or engine nose gearboxes. The values in this status window are used to maintain the aircraft within safe
     flight margins or to evaluate the allowable payload based on the calculated performance of the aircraft.
     •    MAX GWT – DE IGE. Displays the maximum allowable gross weight in
          which a hover can be maintained in-ground-effect (IGE), at 5 feet over the
          surface, under dual-engine (DE) power, based on the air density.
     •    MAX GWT – DE OGE. Displays the maximum allowable gross weight in
          which a hover can be maintained out-of-ground-effect (OGE), at 80 feet
          over the surface, under dual-engine (DE) power, based on the air density.
     •    MAX GWT – SE IGE. Displays the maximum allowable gross weight in which a hover can be
          maintained in-ground-effect (IGE), at 5 feet over the surface, under single-engine (SE) power, based
          on the air density.
     •    MAX GWT – SE OGE. Displays the maximum allowable gross weight in which a hover can be
          maintained out-of-ground-effect (OGE), at 80 feet over the surface, under single-engine (SE) power,
          based on the air density.
8.   Max Torque Status Window. Displays the maximum torque available from the engines, based on air
     density and engine condition. The values in this status window are used to assess how much torque can be
     demanded from the engines without causing a decay in rotor RPM (NR); also known as “rotor droop”.
     •    MAX Q – DE. Displays the maximum torque (Q) available under dual-engine (DE)
          power.
     •    MAX Q – SE. Displays the maximum torque (Q) available under single-engine (DE)
          power.
     NOTE: These values do not take into account the limitations of the engine nose gearboxes or the main
     transmission. The torques displayed in this window may be used for a short duration in an emergency, but
     will impart excessive loads into the powertrain system, likely incurring post-flight inspection or replacement.
9.   Wind Status Window. Displays the current wind direction and velocity, as measured
     by the Helicopter Air Data System (HADS).
10. Center-of-Gravity Scale. Displays the calculated
    longitudinal center-of-gravity (CG) of the aircraft, between a
    minimum of 201.0 inches and a maximum of 207.0 inches,
    referenced from the nose of the aircraft. The CG is calculated
    using the same data used to calculate the current aircraft
    gross weight.
11. PERF Mode. Sets the PERF calculation mode between Current conditions, Maximum conditions, and
    Planned conditions. The calculations displayed on the PERF page will be based on the conditions displayed
    (or input) within the selected mode.
     •    CUR. Calculations performed on the PERF page are based on the current PA and FAT as measured by
          the HADS, and the current GWT as calculated by the SP.
     •    MAX. Calculations performed on the PERF page are based on values of PA, FAT, and GWT, as manually
          input by the aircrew or loaded by the DTC.
     •    PLAN. Calculations performed on the PERF page are based on values of PA, FAT, and GWT, as manually
          input by the aircrew or loaded by the DTC.
12. HIT sub-page. Displays the PERF Health Indicator Test sub-page. (N/I)
13. WT format. Displays the PERF Weight format.
PERF Weight (WT) Format
Pressing the WT button (VAB B6) displays the PERF page in Weight format. Pressing the WT button a second
time returns the PERF page to standard format. The Weight format allows either crewmember to enter the weight
of the aircrew and other equipment onboard the aircraft for performance and center-of-gravity calculations.
These values are typically configured in advance by maintenance personnel based on the aircraft configuration
of installed equipment. The aircrew is only required to update their own personal weights and any additional
survival equipment they may have loaded prior to the flight.




     1. Aircraft Basic Weight                                                               6. Dummy Missiles Quantity

      2. Left Aft Bay Weight                                                                7. Dummy Rockets Quantity

      3. Survival Kit Weight


             4. Pilot Weight


             5. CPG Weight




1.      Aircraft Basic Weight. Activates the KU for inputting the basic weight and moment of the aircraft. The
        basic weight includes the weight of the aircraft itself, permanently installed equipment, hydraulic fluid,
        engine and transmission oil, and unusable fuel.
        Upon activation, the KU prompt will display “WEIGHT:”. After entering the weight into the KU and pressing
        ENTER, the prompt will display “MOMENT”, after which the empty moment (weight × arm) may be input.
2.      Left Aft Bay Weight. Activates the KU for inputting the weight of any payload loaded within the left aft
        fuselage storage bay.
3.      Survival Kit Weight. Activates the KU for inputting the weight of any payload loaded within the survival
        kit bay in the aft fuselage.
4.      Pilot Weight. Activates the KU for inputting the weight of the Pilot (including clothing and gear).
5.      CPG Weight. Activates the KU for inputting the weight of the Copilot/Gunner (including clothing and gear).
6.      Dummy Missiles Quantity. Activates the KU for inputting the number of M34 dummy missiles loaded onto
        the aircraft (0–16). Dummy missiles are not automatically inventoried by the SP and must be input manually.
7.      Dummy Rockets Quantity. Activates the KU for inputting the number of dummy rockets loaded onto the
        aircraft (0–76). Dummy rockets are not automatically inventoried by the SP and must be input manually.
Utility (UTIL) Page
The UTIL page displays cockpit and outside air temperatures, and status of the ice detector. The page also
includes controls for managing the anti-ice components, environmental systems, and Flight Management
Computer (FMC) functions.
                              1. Ice Detector Status   2. Free Air Temperature      3. Cockpit Temperature




         4. FMC Controls                                                                                     5. Anti-Ice Controls




                           6. Bleed Air Controls   7. Cockpit Temperature Setting     8. ECS Power

1.   Ice Detector Status. Displays the level of ice accumulation sensed by the external ice detection probe.
     (N/I)
2.   Free Air Temperature. Displays free air temperature in °C as sensed by the external HADS temperature
     probe.
3.   Cockpit Temperature. Displays the current temperature within the crewstation. (N/I)
4.   FMC Controls. Toggles individual Flight Management Computer functions.
     •    PITCH. Enables/disables the FMC Pitch channel inputs to the longitudinal flight control servo.
     •    ROLL. Enables/disables the FMC Roll channel inputs to the lateral flight control servo.
     •    YAW. Enables/disables the FMC Pitch channel inputs to the directional flight control servo.
     •    COLL. Enables/disables the FMC Pitch channel inputs to the collective flight control servo.
     •    TRIM. Enables/disables the force trim magnetic brakes on the cyclic and pedals in the Pilot crewstation.
          Disabling this function will also disable the associated functions of the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch on
          the cyclic.
     •    NOE/A. Enables/disables Nap-of-the-Earth/Approach FMC mode. In NOE/A mode, the stabilator is
          commanded to 25° trailing edge down when airspeed is below 80 knots, but will revert to automatic
          mode when airspeed is 80 knots or greater. This improves “over-the-nose visibility” for low-altitude
          flight or during approach to landing.
5.   Anti-Ice Controls. Toggles individual anti-ice elements. (N/I)
     •    SYSTEM. Toggles the anti-ice system between Automatic and Manual modes of operation.
               o    AUTO. Anti-ice systems are automatically enabled if ice is detected by the ice detect probe.
                    When ice is no longer detected, anti-ice systems will remain enabled but may be manually
                    disabled by the aircrew.
               o    MANUAL. Anti-ice systems must be manually enabled by the aircrew.
     •    PITOT. Enables/disables the electrical heating elements within the pitot and air data sensors.
     •    INLET. Enables/disables the engine inlet and nose gearbox electrical heating elements.
               o    NOTE: The engine inlet fairings and inlet guide vanes are heated using bleed air from the
                    engine compressor’s 5th stage. Activation of the INLET anti-ice heating will cause an increase
                    in turbine gas temperatures (TGT), which may incur TGT temperature limiting and loss of
                    rotor RPMs when operating at high power settings.
     •    CANOPY. Enables/disables the electrical heating elements embedded in the forward canopy
          windscreens for the Pilot and CPG.
     •    SENSOR. Enables/disables the electrical heating of the TADS/PNVS turret shrouds and sensor
          windows. The sensor anti-ice will be disabled with aircraft weight-on-wheels and will be inhibited from
          selection.
6.   Bleed Air Controls. Enables/Disables the bleed air supply from engines 1 and 2.
7.   Cockpit Temperature Setting. Activates the KU for inputting the desired crewstation temperature. Each
     crewstation can be set independently. (N/I)
8.   ECS Power. Enables/Disables the Environmental Control System (ECS).
Tactical Situation Display (TSD) Page
The Tactical Situation Display presents a top-down overview of the battlespace around the aircraft. The TSD is a
versatile, full color, moving map that fuses pre-planned mission data with real-time information and symbology
received from the various onboard sensors, or received from offboard platforms through the datalink modem.
The TSD in each crewstation can be independently customized by each crewmember to tailor the information
displayed based on the mission, changes in the tactical environment, and personal preferences. The TSD is also
used as the aircrew’s primary navigational display, whether performing a simple training flight in the local
airspace, using the ADF receiver for radio-based navigation in low-visibility conditions, or navigating to an tactical
objective within a combat area.
The Point (POINT), Route (RTE), and Instrument (INST) sub-pages are described in the Navigation chapter.
The Report (RPT), Shot (SHOT), Fuel/Ammo/Rockets/Missiles (FARM), and Battle Area Management (BAM) sub-
pages are described in the Datalink chapter.
                             1. PAN sub-page   2. SHOW sub-page   3. Aircraft Heading   4. COORD sub-page




          5. RPT sub-page                                                                                   6. UTIL sub-page


                                                                                                            13. Grid Status

         7. INST sub-page
                                                                                                            14. Scale Setting
       8. Message Receive




               9. Ownship                                                                                   15. Freeze Mode


       10. Waypoint Status                                                                                  16. Cursor Acquisition

           11. SA Overlay                                                                                   17. Acquisition Source

     12. Command Heading                                                                                    18. Endurance Status

                                                                                                            19. Wind Status




1.   PAN sub-page. Displays the TSD Pan sub-page.
2.   SHOW sub-page. Displays the TSD Show sub-page.
3.   Aircraft Heading. Displays a digital readout of the aircraft’s current magnetic heading in 1° increments.
4.   COORD sub-page. Displays the TSD Coordinates sub-page.
5.   RPT sub-page. Displays the TSD Report sub-page.
6.   UTIL sub-page. Displays the TSD Utility sub-page.
7.   INST sub-page. Displays the TSD Instruments sub-page.
8.   Message Receive (REC). Displays the Receive selection menu for receiving datalink messages.
9.   Ownship. Indicates the present location of the aircraft.
10. Waypoint Status. Displays the point selected for navigation, its distance in kilometers or nautical miles,
    and estimated time enroute (ETE). The ETE is based on the aircraft’s current ground speed, and is presented
    in HH:MM format when the ETE is ≥5 minutes, or M:SS format when ETE is <5 minutes. The ETE is not
    displayed when ground speed is <15 knots or ETE is >10 hours. Waypoint Status information is not displayed
    if there is no active destination point.
     NOTE: The Waypoint Status window is not displayed when the TSD is set to Attack (ATK) Phase.
11. SA Overlay. Not implemented.
12. Command Heading. Indicates the magnetic heading to the point selected for navigation.
13. Grid Status. Displays the distance between each TSD grid line in kilometers or nautical miles. If GRID is
    disabled on the MAP sub-page, the Grid Status window will not be displayed.
14. Scale Setting. Adjusts the scale of the TSD up or down. The current setting is shown between the arrow
    buttons and is scaled based on the UNIT (KM/NM) selection within the crewstation on the FLT Settings page.
    The available TSD scales are shown below:
     •    400 KM/216 NM                         •    50   KM/27 NM                         •    5 KM/2.7 NM
     •    150 KM/81 NM                          •    25   KM/13.5 NM                       •    2 KM/1.1 NM
     •    100 KM/54 NM                          •    15   KM/8.1 NM                        •    1 KM/0.5 N
     •    75 KM/40.5 NM                         •    10   KM/5.4 NM
     When either of the scale buttons are depressed for more than 1 second, the TSD scale will become bolded
     and will smoothly zoom in/out while retaining the current chart scale. If neither scale button is pressed for
     1 second, the zoom function will be disabled and the TSD scale buttons will revert to normal function.
15. Freeze Mode (FRZ). When enabled, sets the TSD to Freeze mode. All TSD symbology and
    navigation data will continue to update as normal, but the focal point of the TSD “footprint”
    will be the white Ghostship symbol. The cyan Ownship symbol will continue to move across
    the map independently of the TSD footprint to display the actual aircraft position. (See TSD
    Pan sub-page for more information.)
                                                                                                        Ghostship
     FRZ mode may also be enabled by cursor-selecting any location within the TSD footprint
     when no other MPD cursor action is available, such as CAQ or point-select.
16. Cursor Acquisition (CAQ). Enables the cursor to designate a point on the TSD as the acquisition Source.
    After pressing the CAQ button, the TSD will enter Freeze mode and enable any points displayed within the
    TSD footprint to be selected by the MPD cursor. Pressing Cursor-Enter when over a point symbol designates
    that point as the acquisition source.
     Acquisition selection may be a Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, pre-planned or stored Target/Threat, or
     an FCR detected target. If a map location on the TSD is selected instead of a point, a Terrain point (TRN
     PT) is created at that location. If a Terrain point is designated, the location is stored as Target/Threat points
     T55 (PLT) or T56 (CPG) in the COORD file (see TSD Coordinates sub-page). A white cross labeled “PLT” or
     “CPG” will appear on the map.
17. Acquisition Source (ACQ). Displays the acquisition source selection menu. (See Acquisition Sources in
    the Tactical Employment chapter for more information.)
18. Endurance Status (EN). Displays the remaining flight time (endurance) until fuel is depleted, based on
    the TOT (Total) endurance calculation. If the endurance calculation equals 20 minutes or less, the time
    remaining will be displayed in white and “EN” will flash.
     NOTE: If the calculated fuel flow to the engines is “0” (when the engines are off), the Endurance Status
     window is not displayed.
19. Wind Status. Displays the wind speed and direction of origin as computed by the aircraft Helicopter Air
    Data System (HADS). If wind speed is computed as <5 knots, the Wind Status will display “CALM”. If the
    NR is <50% and wind speed is >45 knots, the Wind Status will display the wind speed in yellow.
                                                    19. Present Position




                                                                                              22. TADS Footprint




                                                                                              23. Center Mode
         20. Present
        Position Status




        21. TSD Phase                                                                         24. POINT sub-page




                                 25. BAM sub-page   26. MAP sub-page       27. RTE sub-page


20. Present Position. When enabled, displays the Present Position Status window below the Ownship.
21. Present Position Status. Displays the Ownship aircraft’s MGRS coordinates, Latitude/Longitude
    coordinates, and the aircraft’s altitude in feet above mean sea level (MSL).
22. TSD Phase. Sets the TSD Phase to Navigation (NAV) or Attack (ATK). The TSD will display different
    elements of information relevant to the corresponding phase of the mission. Many of these elements may
    be configured within each crewstation based on crewmember preferences or mission requirements. (See
    TSD Show sub-page and TSD Coordinates Show sub-pages for more information.)
    •     NAV. The Navigation phase is used for flights to and from the combat area. As such, its default Show
          settings are configured with a focus on navigation, routing, and avoidance of obstacles. However, most
          Show settings can be enabled/disabled similar to the Attack phase, with a few exceptions:
          o      Waypoint symbols and the current Route cannot be hidden.
          o      Low-priority FCR target symbols cannot be seen.
          o      Shot-At symbols cannot be seen.
    •     ATK. The Attack phase is used for operations within the combat area or in the vicinity of the objective.
          As such, its default Show settings are configured with a focus on pre-planned targets and threats, FCR
          targeting data, and avoidance of obstacles. However, most Show settings can be enabled/disabled
          similar to the Navigation phase, with a few exceptions:
          o      Waypoint Status window cannot be seen.
          o      Only waypoints that are part of the current Route can be seen if CURRENT ROUTE is enabled. In
                 addition, waypoints set as the crewmember’s acquisition source can also be seen.
          o      Low-priority FCR target symbols can be seen, if enabled.
          o      Shot-At symbols can be seen.
23. TADS Footprint. Displays a top-down representation of the TADS line-of-
    sight and range when the CPG’s selected sight is set to TADS. The distance
    between the Ownship and the crosshairs represent the CPG’s current range
    value and may not directly represent the true range to the location seen
    through the TADS line-of-sight itself.
    When the TADS Laser Rangefinder/Designator (LRFD) is firing, the solid
    green line projected between the Ownship and the TADS Footprint will be
    displayed in white.
24. Center Mode (CTR). When enabled, sets the TSD to Center mode, in
                                                                                 TADS Footprint
    which the TSD is centered on the Ownship. When disabled, the TSD is
    focused forward of the Ownship in a depressed mode.
25. POINT sub-page. Displays the TSD Point sub-page.
26. BAM sub-page. Displays the TSD Battle Area Management sub-page.
27. MAP sub-page. Displays the TSD Map sub-page.
28. RTE sub-page. Displays the TSD Route sub-page.
TSD Pan (PAN) Sub-page
The PAN sub-page allows the crewmember to move and rotate the map independently of the Ownship location
and orientation. When using the PAN sub-page, the TSD is automatically set to Freeze mode, indicated by a
dashed border displayed around the “TSD footprint”.
The PAN sub-page not only allows the aircrew to view areas of the battlespace from a different perspective, it
also allows them to more effectively plan, modify, or preview different aspects of the mission from within the
aircraft itself, which may become necessary due to changes on the battlefield. As such, the PAN sub-page is a
critical extension of other TSD functions on the Point (POINT), Route (RTE), or Battle Area Management (BAM)
sub-pages.
                                                           1. TSD Heading




                                                                                           8. Freeze Footprint
          2. Pan to Point


          3. Pan to next
           Route Point


           4. Route Pan                                                                    9. Ghostship


       5. Pan to previous
          Route Point                                                                      10. Last Pan

            6. Pan Mode


           7. Pan Cursor




1.   TSD Heading. Adjusts the heading of the TSD footprint independently of the aircraft heading. Pressing the
     left arrow (VAB T4) or right arrow (VAB T6) rotates the map in 1° increments for each momentary press, or
     40° each second when pressed and held. Alternatively, HDG> (VAB T5) can be used to activate the KU for
     directly inputting the desired TSD heading.
2.   Pan to Point. Activates the KU for inputting a point within the navigational database. After entry, the TSD
     will pan to the location of the point so that it is centered within the TSD footprint.
3.   Pan to next Route Point. The Ghostship will pan to the corresponding point along the currently selected
     route and will orient toward the required heading on course to the subsequent route point. This can be used
     to preview the current route as if it were being flown in a sequential order as planned.
4.   Route Pan. The Ghostship will pan along the route. Pressing the up arrow (VAB L3) or down arrow (VAB
     L4) will advance the Ghostship along the route a distance equal to one TSD grid square. When the up or
     down arrows are pressed and held, the TSD footprint will smoothly pan along the route in a continuous
     motion.
5.   Pan to previous Route Point. The TSD footprint will pan to the corresponding point along the currently
     selected route and will orient toward the required heading on course to the subsequent route point. This
     can be used to preview the current route as if it were being flown in a reversed sequential order as planned.
         Panning to each subsequent Route Point (Left) and continuously in reverse (Right)

6.   Pan Mode. Sets the PAN mode to either CURSR (default mode) or NORM mode.
     •    CURSR. The TSD footprint may be moved in any direction using the Cursor Controller on the Collective
          Mission Grip or the TEDAC Left Handgrip in the CPG crewstation. Pressing Cursor-Enter will switch the
          mode to NORM.
     •    NORM. The TSD footprint is re-centered on the MPD cursor location each time Cursor-Enter is pressed
          on the Collective Mission Grip or the TEDAC Left Handgrip, or the Alternate Cursor Enter Trigger is
          pulled on the Collective Mission Grip or the Alternate Cursor Enter button is pressed on the TEDAC
          Right Handgrip.
7.   Pan Cursor. When the MPD cursor is assigned to an MPD that is displaying the TSD PAN sub-page while
     the PAN mode is set to CURSR, the cursor is placed in the bottom left corner of the MPD. The TSD footprint
     is slaved to the MPD cursor and will move with it until PAN mode is toggled to NORM, PAN sub-page is
     exited, or the MPD cursor is re-assigned to the opposite MPD using the Cursor Display Select button on the
     Collective Mission Grip or the TEDAC Left Handgrip.
8.   Freeze Footprint. Indicates the TSD is in Freeze mode. All TSD symbology and navigation data will
     continue to update as normal, but the focal point of the TSD footprint will be the white Ghostship symbol.
     The cyan Ownship symbol will continue to move across the map independently of the TSD footprint to
     display the actual aircraft position.
9.   Ghostship. Indicates the focal point of the TSD footprint any time the TSD is in Freeze mode.
10. Last Pan. Resets the TSD to the previous location and heading prior to the most
    recent Pan action.
11. Altitude Control. Enables/disables the Ghostship altitude controls. This option is
    only displayed when COLOR BAND is set to A/C or ELEV on the MAP sub-page.
12. Altitude Controls. Adjusts the Ghostship’s altitude above ground level (AGL)
    independently of the Ownship. Pressing the up arrow (VAB R3) or down arrow
    (VAB R5) adjusts the altitude in 10 foot increments for each momentary press, or
    10 feet each second when pressed and held. Alternatively, ATL> (VAB R4) can be
    used to activate the KU for directly inputting the desired Ghostship altitude.
                                                                                         Altitude Controls
TSD Show (SHOW) Sub-page
The SHOW sub-page allows each crewmember to configure their TSD to suit the mission, tactical situation, or
personal preferences. In addition, independent SHOW options are available for the Navigation and Attack phases.
NAV Phase
The Navigation Phase is used for flights to and from the combat area. As such, the default SHOW settings (shown
below) are configured with a focus on navigation, routing, and avoidance of obstacles.
                              1. SA sub-page   2. THRT SHOW sub-page   3. COORD SHOW sub-page




          4. Waypoint Data


          5. Inactive Zones


              6. Obstacles                                                                      9. HSI


            7. Opposite                                                                         10. Endurance
        Crewmember Cursor
                                                                                                11. Wind
             8. Cursor Info




1.   SA sub-page. Not implemented.
2.   THRT SHOW sub-page. Displays the TSD Threat Show sub-page.
3.   COORD SHOW sub-page. Displays the TSD Coordinate Show sub-page.
4.   Waypoint Data. Enables/disables the display of the Waypoint Status window when the TSD is set to NAV
     phase. The Waypoint Status window cannot be displayed in ATK phase.
5.   Inactive Zones. Enables/disables the display inactive Priority Fire Zones or No Fire Zones.
6.   Obstacles. Enables/disables the display FCR-detected obstacles when the TSD is set to NAV phase. (N/I)
7.   Opposite Crewmember Cursor. Enables/disables the display of the opposite crewmember’s MPD cursor
     when being used on their respective TSD.
8.   Cursor Info Status. Enables/disables the display the Cursor Info Status window.
9.   Horizontal Situation Indicator (HIS). Enables/disables the display Horizontal Situation Indicator around
     the Ownship. When the TSD is set to Freeze mode, the HSI will be referenced to the Ghostship. (See TSD
     Pan sub-page for more information.)
10. Endurance Status (ENDR). Enables/disables the display the Endurance Status window.
11. Wind Status (WIND). Enables/disables the display of the Wind Status window.
      12. Cursor Info Status                                                                  13. HSI Compass




12. Cursor Info Status. Displays the aircraft’s selected Earth datum, the MGRS coordinates of the MPD cursor
    position within the TSD “footprint” in 8-digit grid format, the elevation of the terrain under the MPD cursor
    position in feet (FT) above mean sea level (MSL), and the distance from the Ownship to the cursor position.
13. HSI Compass. Displays the magnetic heading reference around the Ownship or Ghostship symbols.
    Cardinal directions and numerals to the nearest tens value are placed every 30° of azimuth, major tick marks
    are placed at every 10° of azimuth, and minor tick marks are placed at every 5° of azimuth. Quadrant lines
    indicate relative azimuths around the aircraft in relation to the aircraft’s heading independently of the HSI
    compass itself, in 45° increments.
     If the ADF is powered and is receiving a radio signal over the frequency to which it is tuned, the ADF Bearing
     Pointer will be displayed within the HSI Compass any time the HSI itself is shown, even if the TSD is not set
     to the Instruments (INST) sub-page. (See TSD Instruments sub-page for more information.)
ATK Phase
The Attack phase is used for operations within the combat area or in the vicinity of the objective. As such, the
default SHOW settings (shown below) are configured with a focus on fires distribution, FCR targeting data,
avoidance of obstacles, and operations within a battle position.




       14. Current Route




         15. FCR Targets
          and Obstacles




14. Current Route. Enables/disables the display of the waypoints and route lines of the current Route when
    the TSD is set to Attack phase. All waypoints are displayed on the TSD in NAV phase.
15. FCR Targets/Obstacles. Enables/disables the display of low-priority FCR targets and FCR-detected
    obstacles when the TSD is set to ATK phase. Low-priority FCR targets cannot be displayed on the TSD in
    NAV phase.
TSD Threat Show (THRT SHOW) Sub-page
The THRT SHOW sub-page allows each crewmember to configure hostile threat and intervisibility information on
the TSD. Unlike the SHOW and COORD SHOW sub-pages, options on the THRT SHOW sub-page are used for
both TSD phases, and will remain the same if the phase is toggled between NAV and ATK.




                                                                                              3. Visibility Source


             1. ASE Threats




         2. Visibility Shading




1.   ASE Threats. Enables/disables the display of the ASE “footprint” around the outer edge of the TSD. When
     enabled, the ASE footprint will be displayed on the TSD if any threats are detected by the ASE system. When
     disabled, the ASE will still provide voice message alerts of detected threats, but the ASE footprint will not
     be displayed on the TSD.
     NOTE: The ASE Autopage setting overrides the ASE Threats THRT SHOW setting. If a threat meets or
     exceeds the threshold corresponding with the ASE Autopage setting, the ASE footprint will be displayed on
     the TSD even if the ASE THREATS option is disabled.
     (See Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) page for more information.)
2.   Visibility Shading (VIS SHADE). Not implemented.
3.   Visibility Source (VIS). Selects the visibility source for displaying threat rings and visibility shading.
     •       THRT. Yellow shading is drawn within yellow and red threat rings to display areas in which the Ownship
             will be visible to, and likely detected by, hostile threats based on the current aircraft altitude.
     •       OWN. Cyan shading is drawn within the Ownship ring to display areas of terrain that are currently
             visible to the Ownship at its current location and altitude.
THRT Visibility
Threat detection and lethality rings are displayed on the TSD to indicate areas in which the aircraft is likely to be
detected and/or engaged by hostile threats.




     4. Threat Detection Ring                                                                   9. Target Point


      5. Threat Lethality Ring


              6. Terrain Point




                 7. Terrain                                                                     10. Rings/Visibility
                Point Altitude                                                                   Point Selections




              8. Threat Point




4.   Threat Detection Ring. Yellow rings indicate the estimated range at which hostile threats are able to
     detect the aircraft. If VIS SHADE (VAB L6) is enabled, yellow visibility shading is drawn within the ring to
     display areas in which the Ownship will be visible to, and likely detected by, hostile threats based on the
     current aircraft altitude.
5.   Threat Lethality Ring. Red rings indicate the estimated range at which hostile threats are able to engage
     the aircraft with weapon systems. If VIS SHADE (VAB L6) is enabled, yellow visibility shading is drawn within
     the ring to display areas in which the Ownship will be visible to, and likely engaged by, hostile threats based
     on the current aircraft altitude.
6.   Terrain Point. Terrain points (TRN) are displayed as white crosses and labeled by the crewstation that set
     them onto the TSD; PLT for the Pilot crewstation and CPG for the Copilot/Gunner crewstation. Only one
     Terrain point can be stored in each crewstation at any given time, with the Pilot’s Terrain point stored in the
     Target/Threat database at T55, and the CPG’s Terrain point stored in the Target/Threat database at T56.
7.   Terrain Point Altitude. When TRN PT (VAB R3) is enabled, three options will be displayed at VAB L3, L4
     and L5. These options allow the crewmember to adjust the visibility shading altitude of the Terrain point
     corresponding with their crewstation. (N/I)
     Pressing the up arrow (VAB L3) or down arrow (VAB L5) increases or decreases the altitude in 5-foot
     increments for each momentary press, or continuously when pressed and held. Alternatively, ALT> (VAB
     L4) can be used to activate the KU for directly inputting the desired visibility altitude.
8.   Threat Point. Threat points are displayed as red, hostile air defense symbols with a two-digit alphanumeric
     label corresponding with the threat type. (See Appendix C for more information.)
9.   Target Point. Target points are displayed as red “T” symbols with a two-digit numeric label corresponding
     with the point index within the Target/Threat database (T01-T50). (See the Navigation chapter for more
     information.)
10. Rings/Visibility Point Selections. Enables/disables the display of threat rings and visibility shading for
    selected point types.
     •    ACQ. If a Target, Threat, or Terrain point is set as the acquisition source within the crewstation, the
          corresponding threat ring(s) for that point will be displayed, regardless of the threat ring selections
          below. If a different acquisition source is selected, the threat ring(s) for that point will be removed
          unless enabled by the threat ring selections below.
     •    TRN PT. Terrain points set by the Pilot and/or CPG will display a yellow threat ring with a radius of 8
          kilometers, regardless of whether those points are set as the current acquisition source within the
          crewstation.
     •    FCR/RFI. Not implemented.
     •    THREATS. All threat points will display yellow and/or red threat rings, based on the type of threat
          corresponding with that point type, regardless of whether the point is set as the current acquisition
          source within the crewstation.
     •    TARGETS. All target points (TG) will display red threat rings with a radius of 3 kilometers, regardless
          of whether those points are set as the current acquisition source within the crewstation.
OWN Visibility
Cyan shading is drawn within the Ownship ring to display areas of terrain that are currently visible to the Ownship
at its current location and altitude.




                                                                                           12. Ownship Rings/
                                                                                         Visibility Point Selections



     11. Visibility Ring



                                                                                         13. Ownship
                                                                                          Point Rings




11. Visibility Ring. Cyan rings are displayed around the Ownship, Terrain Points, and Ghostship, if enabled by
    the corresponding point selections (VAB R2, R3 and R4 respectively) and the RINGS option (VAB R6).
12. Ownship Rings/Visibility Point Selections. Enables/disables the display of Ownship visibility rings (VAB
    R6) and/or visibility shading (VAB L6) for selected point types.
     •     OWN. Visibility rings and/or visibility shading is displayed around the Ownship with a radius of 8
           kilometers.
     •     TRN PT. Terrain points set by the Pilot and/or CPG will display cyan visibility rings and/or visibility
           shading with a radius of 8 kilometers, regardless of whether those points are set as the current
           acquisition source within the crewstation.
     •     GHOST. Visibility rings and/or visibility shading is displayed around the Ghostship with a radius of 8
           kilometers any time the Ghostship is displayed. (See TSD Pan sub-page for more information.)
13. Ownship Point Rings. Enables/disables the display of cyan visibility rings for point types enabled by the
    corresponding point selections (VAB R2, R3 and R4).
TSD Coordinate Show (COORD SHOW) Sub-page
The COORD SHOW sub-page allows each crewmember to configure what tactical graphics are displayed on the
TSD. In addition, independent COORD SHOW options are available for the Navigation and Attack phases.
NAV Phase
That Navigation Phase is used for flights to and from the combat area. As such, the default COORD SHOW settings
(shown below) are configured with a focus on navigation and control of the flight within the battlespace.




                                                                                             5. Tactical Lines

       1. Control Measures                                                                   6. Engagement Areas


           2. Friendly Units


            3. Enemy Units


 4. Planned Targets/Threats




1.    Control Measures. Enables/disables the display of general control measures. General control measures
      that are part of the current route, the navigation destination, or set as the acquisition source will be shown
      on the TSD regardless of this option.
2.    Friendly Units. Enables/disables the display of friendly unit control measures. Friendly control measures
      that are part of the current route, the navigation destination, or set as the acquisition source will be shown
      on the TSD regardless of this option.
3.    Enemy Units. Enables/disables the display of enemy unit control measures. Enemy control measures that
      are part of the current route, the navigation destination, or set as the acquisition source will be shown on
      the TSD regardless of this option.
4.    Planned Targets/Threats. Enables/disables the display of targets and threats, to include targets/threats
      that are added by the crew during the mission. Targets and threats cannot be part of a route, but they can
      be set as the navigation destination or set as the acquisition source; in which case they will be shown on
      the TSD regardless of this option.
5.    Tactical Lines. Not implemented.
6.    Engagement Areas. Not implemented.
ATK Phase
The Attack phase is used for operations within the combat area or in the vicinity of the objective. As such, the
default COORD SHOW settings are configured with a focus on the prevention of fratricide (“friendly fire”), pre-
planned targets and threats, battle damage assessment, and control of the flight within the battlespace.




                                                                                         7. SHOT Locations




7.   SHOT Locations. Enables/disables the display of missile engagement locations as green X symbols.
     Ownship missile engagement locations are displayed in full-intensity green. Missile engagement locations
     received via the datalink are displayed in partial-intensity green.
TSD Coordinate (COORD) Sub-page
The COORD sub-page displays a list of all Target and Threat points residing within the database.
Each point entry within the list may be selected              Point Index     Free Text   Datum Code
to view additional information regarding the
point itself or selected as the crewmember’s
acquisition source.
                                                                 Identification    Earth Datum    MGRS Coordinates        Altitude (MSL)
(See Acquisition Sources for more information.)
Additional sub-pages may be accessed from the COORD sub-page that allow the crewmembers to review other
portions of the database within the aircraft memory. The COORD sub-page also allows the crewmembers to
review SHOT files and FARM reports received from other aircraft within the team.
                          1. WPTHZ sub-page    2. CTRLM sub-page       3. LINE sub-page    4. AREA sub-page




                                                                                                              5. SHOT sub-page




      6. Acquisition Source                                                                                   10. Expanded Point
          Point Select                                                                                         Information Select




                                         7. Paging Controls     8. Point Search    9. FARM sub-page


1.   WPTHZ sub-page. Displays the TSD Waypoint/Hazard sub-page.
2.   CTRLM sub-page. Displays the TSD Control Measure sub-page.
3.   LINE sub-page. Not implemented.
4.   AREA sub-page. Not implemented.
5.   SHOT sub-page. Displays the TSD Shot sub-page.
6.   Acquisition Source Point Select. Selecting a VAB to the left of a Target/Threat point will set that point
     as the acquisition source and return the MPD to the main TSD page.
7.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of Target/Threat points.
8.   Point Search. Activates the KU for inputting alphanumeric characters to search for a specific Target/Threat
     point within the database. Displayed points will be filtered accordingly based on the results.
9.   FARM sub-page. Displays the TSD Fuel/Ammunition/Rockets/Missiles sub-page.
10. Expanded Point Information Select. Selecting a VAB to the right of a Target/Threat point will display
    an information window with expanded details regarding that Target/Threat point.
                        Identification   Free Text     Estimated Time Enroute    Estimated Time of Arrival



          Point Index
                                                                                                             Distance to Point (KM)

         Earth Datum
                                                                                                             Distance to Point (NM)
         Datum Code
                                                                                                             Bearing to Point


                            Latitude/Longitude Coordinates    MGRS Coordinates      Altitude (MSL)


     •    Point Index. The database partition and location within which the point resides. (see the Navigation
          chapter for more information.)

     •    Identification. The one- or two-character abbreviated code of the point, which determines its specific
          symbol and color.

     •    Free Text. The one-, two-, or three-character text that may be added to the point for additional
          context as to the nature of the location.

     •    Estimated Time Enroute (ETE). The estimated elapsed time to travel to the point, based on the
          distance to the point from the ownship’s current position and the ownship’s current ground speed.

     •    Estimated Time of Arrival (ETA). The estimated time of arrival at the point, based on the current
          system time and the estimated time enroute (ETE). The ETA time format (Local or Zulu) is based on
          the system time format selected on the TSD Utility sub-page.

     •    Earth Datum. The geodetic system used to determine the point’s location on the Earth.

     •    Datum Code. The one- or two-character abbreviated code of the point’s Earth datum.

     •    Distance to Point (KM). The distance from the ownship position to the point’s location, in kilometers.

     •    Distance to Point (NM). The distance from the ownship position to the point’s location, in nautical
          miles.

     •    Bearing to Point. The magnetic heading from the ownship position to the point’s location.

     •    MGRS Coordinates. The location of the point, in Military Grid Reference System 8-digit grid format.

     •    Latitude/Longitude Coordinates. The location of the point, in Latitude/Longitude Degrees,
          Minutes, Minute-Decimals format (DD°MM.MM DDD°MM.MM).

     •    Altitude. The altitude of the point above mean sea level (MSL).
TSD Waypoint/Hazard (WPTHZ) Sub-page
The WPTHZ sub-page displays a list of all Waypoint and Hazard points residing within the database. This page
functions identically to the TSD Coordinate sub-page.




TSD Control Measure (CTRLM) Sub-page
The CTRLM sub-page displays a list of all Control Measure points residing within the database. This page functions
identically to the TSD Coordinate sub-page.
TSD Map (MAP) Sub-page
The MAP sub-page allows the crewmember to configure the map underlays and enhancements displayed on the
TSD, as well as the TSD orientation around the Ownship symbol.
Chart Underlay
The CHART selection (VAB L2) displays a color moving map underlay on the TSD using map image tiles loaded
within the database.
                                                         1. Grid Overlay   2. Slope Shading




                                                                                              3. Grid Status




         4. TSD Underlay Type


     5. Chart Underlay Scale


         6. Color Band Shading


                                                                                              7. TSD Orientation


                                                                                              8. TSD View Angle




1.   Grid Overlay. Enables/disables the grid overlay on the TSD.
2.   Slope Shading. Not implemented.
3.   Grid Status. Displays the distance between each TSD grid line in kilometers or nautical miles. If GRID (VAB
     T5) is disabled, the Grid Status window will not be displayed.
4.   TSD Underlay Type. Selects the type of moving map to be underlaid on the TSD.
     •       CHART. Displays a tactical navigation chart underlaid beneath all TSD symbology, generated by chart
             tiles of various scales stored within the aircraft database.
     •       DIG. Displays an elevation relief map underlaid beneath all TSD symbology, generated by Digital
             Terrain Elevation Database (DTED) information stored within the aircraft database.
     •       SAT. Displays satellite-based photo imagery beneath all TSD symbology, generated by Controlled
             Image Base (CIB) imagery stored within the aircraft database.
     •       STICK. No map underlay is displayed on the TSD. A video source may be selected as a TSD underlay
             from the Video (VID) page.
5.   Chart Underlay Scale. Manually selects a chart scale for display as the moving map underlay. This option
     is only displayed if the TYPE (VAB L2) is set to CHART. The available chart scale selections are shown below:
     •    1:5M (1:5,000,000)                   •    1:500K (1:500,000)                   •    1:50K (1:50,000)
     •    1:2M (1:2,000,000)                   •    1:250K (1:250,000)                   •    1:12.5K (1:12,500)
     •    1:1M (1:1,000,000)                   •    1:100K (1:100,000)
     Chart rasters may not be available for all scale selections or may be limited to certain areas.
6.   Color Band Shading. Selects the altitude reference for applying color shading to the map underlay, based
     on terrain elevation. This option is only displayed if the TYPE (VAB L2) is set to CHART, DIG, or SAT.
     •    NONE. No color shading is applied.
     •    A/C. Color shading is applied based on the aircraft altitude above mean sea level (MSL). Color shading
          is dynamically updated as the aircraft altitude changes.
          o    Red shading. Terrain with an elevation that is at
               or above the current aircraft altitude.
          o    Yellow shading. Terrain with an elevation that is
               within 50 feet below the aircraft altitude.              50 feet below aircraft altitude
          o    No shading. Terrain that is more than 50 feet            No shading
               below the aircraft altitude.
     •    ELEV. Color shading is applied based on the terrain                                  Highest Elevation
          elevation above mean sea level (MSL). The shading
          scale will be from green to brown if the MPD mode is
          set to DAY or NIGHT, or from green to black if the MPD      Lowest Elevation
          mode is set to MONO.




                           Color Band set to A/C (Left) or set to ELEV (Right)
7.   TSD Orientation. Sets the orientation of the TSD.
     •   HDG-UP. The TSD will be aligned to the aircraft’s heading.
     •   TRK-UP. The TSD will be aligned to the aircraft’s ground track across the surface. If the ground speed
         is 30 knots or less, or if the difference between the aircraft’s heading and ground track is >30°, the
         TSD orientation will temporarily revert to HDG-UP.
     •   N-UP. The TSD will be aligned to true North. Note that if Center mode (VAB R3) is disabled, the TSD
         footprint will shift in an angular fashion around the Ownship as the aircraft heading changes.




                            TSD Orientation set to N-UP with CTR disabled

8.   TSD View Angle. Not implemented.
Digital Terrain Underlay
The DIG selection (VAB L2) displays an elevation relief map underlay on the TSD using Digital Terrain Elevation
Database (DTED) information.
                                                      9. Gray Shading




          10. DTED Level




            11. Contours


          12. Foundation
           Feature Data




9.   Gray Shading. Enables/disables gray terrain shading. This option is only displayed if the TYPE (VAB L2) is
     set to DIG, and is enabled by default. When disabled, digital terrain will be displayed with a green shading.
10. DTED Level. Not implemented.
11. Contours. Not implemented.
12. FFD Display. Not implemented.
Satellite Photo Underlay
The SAT selection (VAB L2) displays a black and white satellite photo underlay on the TSD using Controlled Image
Base (CIB) imagery.




      13. Resolution Level




13. Resolution Level. Not implemented.
“Stick Map” (no underlay)
The STICK selection (VAB L2) displays TSD symbology only in a “stick map” format, with no moving map underlay.
However, this selection allows a video underlay to be displayed under TSD symbology, based on video source
underlays selected on the Video (VID) page.
TSD Utility (UTIL) Sub-page
The UTIL sub-page allows the aircrew to monitor the status of the navigation system components, configure the
system time format between Local and Zulu times zones, modify the system time or date, and set the ASE
autopage setting.
                                      1. ASE page    2. ABR sub-page   3. COORD sub-page




            4. INU Position
           Confidence Status                                                               11. Doppler Data Status


                                                                                           12. ASE Autopage Setting
               5. INU Reset
                                                                                           13. Time Format


       6. Primary INU Select                                                               14. System Time Input

     7. GPS Satellites Status                                                              15. System Date Input

     8. GPS Key Type Status


        9. Doppler Radar
                                                                                           16. Earth Datum Input
      Velocity Sensor Power


 10. GPS Keys Load Status




                                         17. Navigation Mode


1.     ASE page. Displays the Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) page.
2.     ABR sub-page. Displays the TSD Abbreviation sub-page.
3.     COORD sub-page. Displays the TSD Coordinate sub-page.
4.     INU Position Confidence Status. Displays the estimated radial position error for INU1 and INU2. If the
       radial position error is 0.050 km (50 meters) or greater, the position error will be displayed in white.
5.     INU Reset. Resets INU1 and INU2. If the INU data becomes invalid or unreliable, a reset is used to
       command the corresponding INU to attempt a re-alignment and update.
6.     Primary INU Select. Sets the primary INU used by the aircraft avionics to INU1 or INU2, with the other
       used as a backup. The System Processor (SP) will automatically select the primary INU, but the aircrew may
       manually select either INU as primary as long as both INU’s are providing valid and reliable data. If the
       backup INU is detected as unreliable or in a reset/re-alignment state, this option will be unavailable and
       “barriered”
       •      INU1. Sets INU1 as the primary INU; sets INU2 as the backup INU.
       •      INU2. Sets INU2 as the primary INU; sets INU1 as the backup INU.
7.     GPS Satellites Status. Displays the ID’s of GPS satellites that are visible to the GPS antenna. If a signal
       from a satellite is being received and utilized by the EGI’s, the satellite ID will be boxed.
8.     GPS Key Type. Displays the type cryptographic keys loaded into each GPS receiver. (N/I)
9.   Doppler Radar Velocity Sensor Power. Enables/disables power to the Doppler navigation sensor.
10. GPS Keys Load Status. Displays the state of the cryptographic keys loaded into each GPS receiver. (N/I)
11. Doppler Data Status. Displays the status of Doppler data utilization by each INU.
     •    USED. INU is using Doppler-aided navigation.
     •    MEMORY. INU is using Doppler-aided navigation in dead-reckoning mode.
     •    REJECTED. INU is not using Doppler-aided navigation.
12. ASE Autopage Setting. Displays the ASE autopage setting for the crewstation. Pressing VAB R1 will display
    an expanded selection of autopage options.
     •    SEARCH. If a new threat is detected, the TSD will be autopaged if the ASE or TSD pages are not
          already displayed within the crewstation.
     •    ACQUISITION. If a detected threat elevates to ACQUISITION, the TSD will be autopaged if the ASE
          or TSD pages are not already displayed within the crewstation.
     •    TRACK. If a detected threat elevates to TRACK, the TSD will be autopaged if the ASE or TSD pages
          are not already displayed within the crewstation.
     •    OFF. ASE autopaging is disabled.
13. Time Format. Sets the system time format to Local or Zulu (UTC) time zones.
     NOTE: The selected time format is common between crewstations, in that selecting a different format in
     one crewstation changes it for both crewstations.
14. System Time Input. Activates the KU for inputting the system time. Each time format may be
    independently modified, and the time that will receive the input is based on the time format selected by VAB
    R2.
     NOTE: The Zulu time is normally based on timing signals received by GPS satellites and should only be
     modified if absolutely necessary
15. System Date Input. Activates the KU for inputting the system date.
     NOTE: The system date is referenced to the Zulu time, and is normally based on timing signals received by
     GPS satellites and should only be modified if absolutely necessary
16. Earth Datum Input. Activates the KU for inputting the geodetic system to be used for navigation. The
    default datum is “47” (WGS-84). A list of available datums is shown on the TSD Abbreviation sub-page.
17. Navigation Mode. Sets the navigation mode to LAND or SEA. During start-up, the selected mode will
    control the method of INU alignment. In flight, the selected mode changes the weighting of the data received
    by the Doppler Radar Velocity Sensor to provide the best navigational accuracy.
     •    LAND. Sets the INU alignment to land-based operations, and Doppler-aided navigation to overland
          flight operations.
     •    SEA. Sets the INU alignment to sea-based operations, and Doppler-aided navigation to overwater flight
          operations.
Video (VID) Page
The VIDEO page allows the crewmembers to view video and symbology from aircraft sensors. Video sources may
be set as independent underlays on each MPD in either crewstation while other MPD pages are displayed.
                                              1. IMAGE sub-page      2. VSEL format




         3. View Aspect



                                                                                         6. Underlay Select


          4. Sharpness



         5. Video Color




                             7. Symbology Contrast   8. Reset Settings    9. Grayscale


1.   IMAGE sub-page. Not implemented.
2.   VSEL format. Displays the VID Video Select format. Displays the selected video underlay in a decluttered
     video/symbology format. The text label under VAB B6 will dynamically change based on the selected video
     underlay and the video source of the underlay selection.
     •    TADS. Displays TADS Weapon symbology and TADS sensor video.
     •    C-FLT. Displays CPG Flight symbology. If the CPG’s NVS Mode switch is set to NORM or FIXED, the
          CPG’s selected NVS sensor video will also be displayed.
     •    P-FLT. Displays Pilot Flight symbology. If the Pilot’s NVS Mode switch is set to NORM or FIXED, the
          Pilot’s selected NVS sensor video will also be displayed.
3.   View Aspect. Sets the video aspect for any video underlay displayed on the MPD.
     •    VIEW – WIDE. Video underlay will be displayed in Wide aspect. All video will be seen but with
          significant blank space above and below the video boundaries.
     •    VIEW – NORM. Video underlay will be displayed in Normal aspect. Some video area will not be seen
          beyond the left and right MPD boundaries.
     •    VIEW – ZOOM. Video underlay will be displayed in Zoom aspect. Enlarges the source video but does
          not increase resolution. Some video area will not be seen beyond the MPD boundaries.
4.   Sharpness. Adjusts the sharpness of the video underlay. Increasing the sharpness improves detection of
     fine details but also increases the intensity of video noise.
5.   Video Color. Sets the color scale of the video underlay.
     •    WHITE. Video underlay is displayed in a grayscale, with brighter shades increasing in white intensity
          and darker shades decreasing in intensity to black.
     •    GREEN. Video underlay is displayed in a greenscale, with brighter shades increasing in green intensity
          and darker shades decreasing in intensity to black.
          This may be used to set the video underlay to a greenscale independently of the symbology overlay.
          This allows the crewmember to retain full MPD brightness and color symbology without setting the
          MPD mode to MONO.
6.   Underlay Select. Selects the video source for display as an underlay on the MPD.
     •    UNDERLAY – TADS. Displays TADS sensor video.
          NOTE: The TADS Weapon symbology crosshair is incorporated as part of the video underlay and will
          be displayed even if the VID page is not set to VSEL format.
     •    UNDERLAY – CPG SIGHT. Displays video from the CPG’s selected sight. If the MPD is not showing
          a video underlay when the CPG displays the VID page, this video underlay option is automatically
          selected.
     •    UNDERLAY – CPG HMD. Displays video from the CPG’s helmet-mounted display.
     •    UNDERLAY – PLT SIGHT. Displays video from the Pilot’s selected sight.
     •    UNDERLAY – PLT HMD. Displays video from the Pilot’s helmet-mounted display. If the MPD is not
          showing a video underlay when the Pilot displays the VID page, this video underlay option is
          automatically selected.
     •    UNDERLAY – NO VIDEO. No video underlay will be displayed on the MPD. VSEL format selection
          (VAB B6) is blanked.
7.   Symbology Contrast. Sets the relative brightness of the video underlay compared to the remainder of the
     symbology displayed on the MPD.
     •    NORM. Displays video using the normal video brightness scale.
     •    BOOST. Displays video using a reduced brightness scale in order to boost the apparent brightness of
          the symbology in contrast to the video underlay.
8.   Reset Settings. Resets the VID page options to their default settings.
               o    View Aspect: NORM
               o    Sharpness: Level 3 of 7
               o    Video Color: WHITE
9.   Grayscale. Displays grayscale calibration images along the top and bottom of the MPD for ensuring all
     shades of the video underlay are easily visible with the current VID page options and MPD brightness/mode
     settings.
Video Select (VSEL) Format
Pressing the VSEL button (VAB T6) displays the VID page in Video Select format. Pressing the VSEL button a
second time returns the VID page to standard format. The Video Select format allows the crewmember to view
the selected video underlay in a decluttered video/symbology format.




          1. View Aspect




           2. Sharpness




1.   View Aspect. Sets the video aspect for any video underlay displayed on the MPD.
     •   VIEW – W. Video underlay will be displayed in Wide aspect. All video will be seen but with significant
         blank space above and below the video boundaries.
     •   VIEW – N. Video underlay will be displayed in Normal aspect. Some video area will not be seen beyond
         the left and right MPD boundaries.
     •   VIEW – Z. Video underlay will be displayed in Zoom aspect. Enlarges the source video but does not
         increase resolution. Some video area will not be seen beyond the MPD boundaries.
2.   Sharpness. Adjusts the sharpness of the video underlay. Increasing the sharpness improves detection of
     fine details but also increases the intensity of video noise.




Video Cassette Recorder (VCR) Page
The VCR page is not implemented.
Data Management System (DMS) Page
The DMS page allows the aircrew to view advisory messages and system faults. Additional DMS sub-pages may
be accessed from this page for diagnostic and maintenance functions.
                       1. FAULT sub-page   2. IBIT sub-page   3. SHUT DOWN sub-page      4. VERS sub-page




          5. DTU sub-page                                                                              6. UTIL sub-page




     7. ADVISORIES Column                                                                              8. FAULTS Column




                                                                       9. WCA sub-page


1.   FAULT sub-page. Not implemented.
2.   IBIT sub-page. Not implemented.
3.   SHUT DOWN sub-page. Displays the DMS Shutdown sub-page.
4.   VERS sub-page. Displays the DMS Version sub-page.
5.   DTU sub-page. Not implemented.
6.   UTIL sub-page. Displays the DMS Utility sub-page.
7.   ADVISORIES Column. Displays current advisory messages.
8.   FAULTS Column. Displays active system faults reported by the System Processor (SP).
9.   WCA sub-page. Displays the DMS Warnings/Cautions/Advisories sub-page.
DMS Shutdown (SHUT DOWN) Sub-page
The SHUT DOWN sub-page is used to ensure critical aircraft systems are properly powered down prior to
removing aircraft power altogether.
The Stabilator Position symbol is displayed on the SHUT DOWN sub-page in the same manner as the FLT page,
to allow the aircrew to determine when the stabilator has been properly zeroized prior to shutting down the
aircraft.




         1. Master Off


         2. FCR Power
                                                                                      5. Stabilator Position
        3. TADS Power


        4. PNVS Power


                                                                                      6. Mode 4 Hold


                                                                                      7. Modem Mode




                                             8. DTU Mode    9. WCA sub-page


1.   Master Off. Commands the FCR (if installed), TADS, and PNVS to shut down, and switches the DTU and
     modem to STBY mode.
2.   FCR Power. Enables/disables the FCR system components. Not shown if the FCR is not installed.
3.   TADS Power. Enables/disables the TADS system components.
4.   PNVS Power. Enables/disables the PNVS system components.
5.   Stabilator Position. Displays the position of the stabilator when the stabilator is in Manual mode; the
     symbol is not shown when the stabilator is in Automatic mode. The position is shown graphically on an arc
     from 10° trailing edge up to -35° trailing edge down, with a small tick mark at 0°.
6.   Mode 4 Hold. Prevents Mode 4 IFF codes from being zeroized following aircraft shutdown. (N/I)
7.   Modem Mode. Toggles the modem between standby (STBY) and operational (OPER) mode.
8.   DTU Mode. Toggles DTU between standby (STBY) and operational (OPER) mode. (N/I)
9.   WCA sub-page. Displays the DMS Warnings/Cautions/Advisories sub-page.
DMS Version (VERS) Sub-page
The Versions sub-page displays the current software versions within the various aircraft avionics systems.




            1. Software
         Versions Columns




                                                   2. Subsystems Select


1.   Software Versions Columns. Displays the Line Replaceable Units (LRU) relevant to the selected
     subsystems category along the bottom of the page.
     •    LRU. Displays the applicable LRU component.
     •    1. Displays the software version of the corresponding LRU component.
     •    2. Displays the software version of redundant LRU components, if applicable.
2.   Subsystems Selection. Sets the avionics subsystems category for viewing relevant LRU software.
     •    SUBSYSTEMS – ACFT/COMM. Displays the software versions of environmental, electrical, and
          communication systems.
     •    SUBSYSTEMS – WPN/SIGHT. Displays the software versions of weapon and sensor systems.
     •    SUBSYSTEMS – PROC/DMS. Displays the software versions of the aircraft processors.
     •    SUBSYSTEMS – NAV/ASE. Displays the software versions of the Flight Management Computer (FMC)
          and the air data and defensive systems.
DMS Utility (UTIL) Sub-page
The Utility sub-page allows the aircrew to configure basic aircraft settings and access diagnostic functions. Most
functions on this page are not implemented.




     1. BORESIGHT sub-page


            2. DP Selection                                                                             5. Time Format

            3. WP Selection                                                                             6. Time Input


         4. HIADC Selection                                                                             7. Date Input


                                                                                                        8. Tail Number Input


                                                                                                        9. DMS Autopage




                         10. FTEST sub-page   11. TEST sub-page   12. ECS sub-page   13. WCA sub-page

1.   BORESIGHT sub-page. Not implemented.
2.   DP Select. Allows maintenance personnel to select the Display Processor mode of operation. Inhibited when
     in the air (not weight on wheels). (N/I)
3.   WP Select. Allows maintenance personnel to select the Weapon Processor mode of operation. Inhibited
     when in the air (not weight on wheels). (N/I)
4.   HIADC Select. Allows maintenance personnel to select the Airspeed and Direction Sensor (AADS) mode of
     operation within the High Integrated Air Data Computer (HIADC). Inhibited when in the air (not weight on
     wheels) or if the ENG POWER levers are not set to OFF. (N/I)
5.   Time Format. Toggles the time format between LOCAL or ZULU (UTC) time.
6.   System Time. Activates the KU for inputting the current Local or Zulu (UTC) time.
7.   System Date. Activates the KU for inputting the current date (UTC).
8.   Input Tail Number. Activates the KU for inputting the aircraft’s registration number. This number is used
     when interfacing with diagnostic and maintenance equipment.
9.   DMS Autopage (CPG only). Enables/disables autopaging by the Data Management System. This option
     is only displayed within the CPG crewstation. DMS Autopaging cannot be disabled in the Pilot crewstation.
     (See MPD Auto-paging for more information.)
10. FTEST sub-page. Not implemented.
11. TEST sub-page. Not implemented.
12. ECS sub-page. Not implemented.
13. WCA sub-page. Displays the DMS Warnings/Cautions/Advisories sub-page.


DMS Warning/Caution/Advisory (WCA) Sub-page
The Warning/Caution/Advisory sub-page displays a list of all current and previous Warnings, Cautions and
Advisories that have occurred since the aircraft was powered on. Warnings are displayed in Red, Cautions are
displayed in Yellow, and Advisories are displayed in Green.
(See Enhanced Up-Front Display for more information.)




       1. Unacknowledged
         WCA Messages


         2. Acknowledged
          WCA Messages




                                      3. Paging Buttons   4. Reset WCA History


1.   Unacknowledged WCA Messages. WCA messages that have occurred (or re-occurred) since the WCA
     history has been reset (VAB B4) are displayed in inverse video. This allows a crewmember to review
     messages that may have been displayed on the EUFD very briefly or intermittently but were not seen prior
     to their removal.
2.   Acknowledged WCA Messages. WCA messages that have been acknowledged by resetting the WCA
     history (VAB B4) are displayed in normal video.
3.   Paging Buttons. If the WCA history exceeds 30 messages (up to a maximum of 128), additional pages will
     be available for selection using paging buttons (VAB B2 and B3). If the WCA history is less than 30, the
     paging buttons will not be displayed.
4.   Reset. Resets the WCA history and sets all messages currently displayed in inverse video to normal video.
FLIGHT MANAGEMENT COMPUTER (FMC)
The AH-64D incorporates a Flight Management Computer (FMC) that can electronically command movement to
the flight control servo-actuators for reduced pilot workload and accurate weapons delivery. The FMC also
provides stabilator scheduling based on collective position and longitudinal calibrated airspeed; and Back-Up
Control System (BUCS) functionality in case of jams or severances within the cockpit flight controls.




The FMC’s three primary functions regarding aircraft control are Stability
Augmentation, Command Augmentation, and Hold mode functionality. The Stability
and Command Augmentation Systems (collectively referred to as “SCAS”) are always
active within the FMC channels, however each FMC channel may be individually
enabled/disabled via the Aircraft Utility (UTIL) page. Alternatively, all FMC channels
may be disabled immediately using the FMC Release “pinkie” button on the Cyclic Grip
in either crewstation.
The cyclic, collective, and pedals in each cockpit utilize a collection of sensors called
Linear Variable Differential Transducers (LVDT) to measure the position and
movement of each flight control axis and relay these movements to the FMC. These
movements are used by the FMC to process SCAS commands to the flight controls
during normal operations, or to provide full “fly-by-wire” flight control functions during
an emergency when in BUCS mode.                                                              FMC Release Button

Each FMC channel corresponds to an individual hydromechanical servo-actuator that manipulates the main or tail
rotor swashplate assemblies; and each of these servo-actuators includes an electronically commanded hydraulic
valve. This valve can be commanded by the FMC to initiate movement of the servo-actuator control linkage to
the swashplate independently of, or in conjunction with, direct mechanical inputs from the flight controls within
the crewstations. The component within each servo-actuator that initiates these control movements is referred
to as the “SAS sleeve”, and each possesses a limited range of motion to provide SCAS and hold mode functionality
(±10% authority in all axes except the pitch axis, which is +20% forward and -10% aft authority).
The FMC commands the flight control servo-actuators based on the following:
     •    Flight control inputs as reported through the Linear Variable Differential Transducers (LVDT)
     •    Aircraft rate information from the EGI’s
     •    Helicopter Air Data System (HADS)
     •    Radar altimeter
     •    Pitot and static port pressure sensors
The FMC can only command movement to the servo-actuators via the SAS sleeves through the Primary hydraulic
system. Therefore, if the Primary hydraulic system fails or loses pressure, the aircraft can still be flown using the
Utility hydraulic system, but without the stability and augmentation the FMC provides; nor will hold modes or
BUCS be available.
When flying from the cockpit, the Controls Indicator may be displayed by pressing [RCtrl]+[Enter] to view a
visual representation of the flight control positions and their behavior, as commanded by the FMC. (See the DCS
Fundamentals chapter for more information.)


Stability Augmentation System
The Stability Augmentation System (SAS) function of the FMC provides a stable aircraft for reduced pilot workload
and increased weapons delivery accuracy. SAS is active in each FMC control axis that is enabled via the Utility
(UTIL) page any time the force trim release on the Cyclic Grip is not pressed. SAS inputs are limited by the
authority of the SAS sleeves within each flight control servo-actuator (±10% authority in all axes except the pitch
axis, which is +20% forward and -10% aft authority).
When necessary, the FMC commands movement of the SAS sleeves within the applicable flight control servo-
actuator(s) to provide the following:
     •    Yaw rate damping <40 knots ground speed. When accelerating, yaw rate damping will be present until
          ground speed is ≥40 knots. When decelerating from ground speeds ≥40 knots, yaw rate damping
          won’t return until ground speed is <30 knots.
     •    Turn coordination ≥40 knots ground speed. When decelerating from ground speeds ≥40 knots, turn
          coordination will be present until ground speed is <30 knots. When accelerating, turn coordination
          won’t return until ground speed is ≥40 knots.
     •    Lateral (roll) and Longitudinal (pitch) rate damping at all speeds.
     •    Atmospheric upset damping.
Rate damping minimizes attitude oscillations within the respective pitch, roll and yaw axes, but will not prevent
attitude drift from the force trimmed positions of the flight controls. Atmospheric upset damping reduces the
effect of atmospheric disturbances (such as turbulence) from affecting the aircraft's flight path.
The EGI inertial measurements provide airframe movements/rates to the FMC, which compares the EGI data to
the flight control LVDTs. If there are no changes in the flight control positions, the FMC commands the respective
servo-actuator SAS sleeves to counter the un-commanded movements.
Command Augmentation System
The Command Augmentation System (CAS) function of the FMC provides an immediate and uniform aircraft
response at all longitudinal airspeeds. CAS is active in each FMC control axis that is enabled via the Utility (UTIL)
page. CAS input limitations are the same as SAS (±10% authority in all axes except the pitch axis, which is +20%
forward and -10% aft authority).
When a control input is made, the FMC detects the flight control movement in the respective LVDT axis (or axes)
and will command movement of the SAS sleeve within the applicable flight control servo-actuator(s). This provides
a “power steering” response to remove the lag effect of mechanical inputs into the flight control servo-actuators.
At lower longitudinal airspeeds, the amount of CAS input is proportionally increased to ensure the aircraft handling
remains consistent with flight at higher airspeeds.
CAS is disabled in the FMC Yaw channel when the aircraft is on the ground (determined by the weight-on-wheels
or “squat” switch). This prevents over-steering during ground taxi.


                                                       High Airspeed
                     Same input magnitude




                                                                                       Additional input from CAS


                                                        Low Airspeed




                               Command Augmentation at different airspeeds
Force Trim & “Breakout” Values
The Cyclic Grip includes the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch. When this                    R Force Trim Release
4-way switch is pressed to the forward R (Release) position, the force
trim magnetic brakes on the cyclic and pedals are released. This
                                                                                                          AL Altitude Hold
position is analogous to pressing the “force trim interrupt” button in    AT Attitude Hold
other helicopters. The force trim release in the AH-64D serves three
purposes in flight:
                                                                                       D Disengage Hold Modes
     •    Disengages the magnetic brakes of the force trim system
          on the cyclic and pedals.
     •    Temporarily disengages any active hold modes that are
          currently engaged in the pitch, roll, and yaw axes and
          (while pressed) allows the SAS sleeves to re-center within
          the respective servo-actuators.
     •    Sets new reference values of pitch, roll, heading, sideslip,
          velocity, or position; depending on what Attitude Hold             Force Trim/Hold Mode Switch
          modes/sub-modes are active at any given time.
When the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch is pressed to the left AT position, Attitude Hold is enabled, and will enter
one of three sub-modes based on current ground speed (see Attitude Hold for more information). A subsequent
press to the left AT position will disable the Attitude Hold.
When the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch is pressed to the right AL position, Altitude Hold is enabled (if within
vertical speed parameters), and will enter one of two sub-modes based on current ground speed and altitude
above ground level (see Altitude Hold for more information). A subsequent press to the left AT position will disable
the Attitude Hold.
When the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch is pressed to the aft D position, Attitude Hold and Altitude Hold modes
will be disabled.
Any time the force trim release is pressed, Attitude Hold (if enabled) and Heading Hold (always enabled) will be
temporarily disengaged. When the force trim release is no longer pressed, these hold modes will attempt to re-
engage and “capture” new reference values to hold, based on the sub-mode within which they are operating.
Even if the force trim release is not pressed, a “breakout” value within each flight control axis of the cyclic and
pedals allows the pilot to “fly through” the hold modes. These breakout values do not disable the hold modes
altogether but will temporarily disengage their function, and the SAS sleeves in the corresponding flight control
servo-actuators will no longer hold the commanded reference value(s) until the conditions for hold mode re-
engagement are met.


Hold Modes
The hold modes are designed to provide limited hands-off flight and decrease pilot workload. Like the SAS and
CAS functions of the FMC, the hold modes utilize the same SAS sleeves within the servo-actuators to affect the
aircraft flight controls. As such, they are subject to the same limited control authorities (±10% in roll, yaw and
collective; +20% and -10% in pitch) and are not autopilot functions.
To best utilize the FMC hold mode functionality, the pilot should first fly the aircraft to a stable, force-trimmed
state. Once the aircraft is set at the desired flight condition, engage the desired hold mode(s).
Although there are only two Hold mode selections that can be made by the pilot (enabling/disabling the Attitude
Hold or the Altitude Hold), the Hold modes themselves include multiple sub-modes within each flight control axis
that are contextually selected by the FMC based on the specific flight conditions within which the aircraft is being
operated. As a whole, this can be considered a “task”-based approach to sub-mode selection, in which the FMC
selects the best sub-modes in the applicable flight control axes to achieve the level of flight control assistance
requested by the pilot. This is distinct from manual selection of hold sub-modes, which would require additional
interaction by the pilot to manage the hold modes themselves as flight conditions changed, counter to the original
purpose of reducing pilot workload.
Each sub-mode within the corresponding flight control axis is mutually exclusive, meaning that only one sub-
mode can be active within a flight control axis at any given time. The applicable hold sub-modes within each FMC
axis are shown below.
Attitude (AT) Hold sub-modes             Heading Hold sub-modes                   Altitude Hold (AL) sub-modes
Pitch and Roll axes.                     Yaw axis only.                           Collective axis only.
•    Attitude Hold                       •    Heading Hold                        •     Barometric Altitude Hold
•    Velocity Hold                       •    Turn Coordination                   •     Radar Altitude Hold
•    Position Hold                            (SAS function)
Heading Hold is distinct in that it is always active and cannot be enabled/disabled independently of the yaw axis
itself. In addition, Turn Coordination, although it is a SAS function and not a hold sub-mode, is always enabled
along with Heading Hold, and will be referenced in the following sections. However, like the sub-modes in the
other axes, Heading Hold and Turn Coordination are mutually exclusive and are automatically selected by the
FMC based on flight conditions.
With regard to sub-mode selection, the pilot should not adjust the flight conditions to force the FMC to utilize one
hold mode over the other. Rather, the pilot should understand the unique flight control requirements that exist
under various flight conditions which lead to the FMC’s logic in selecting the most appropriate sub-mode that
should be utilized at any given time. The pilot only needs to enable hold mode assistance using the Force
Trim/Hold Mode switch, and the appropriate hold sub-mode will assist the pilot in performing the current task,
provided the force trim is not being depressed and the flight controls are within their respective breakout values.
As an example of this concept, the Attitude Hold will enter one of its three sub-modes based on the ground speed
of the aircraft.
•    If the aircraft is ≤5 knots ground speed, the FMC will select Position Hold. The FMC will attempt to hold a
     hover over a fixed position on the ground since such a flight condition would most likely only exist if the
     pilot was attempting to do so.
•    If the aircraft is >5 knots but <40 knots ground speed, the FMC will select Velocity Hold sub-mode. In this
     instance, the FMC will attempt to maintain the current velocity and direction across the surface since such
     a flight condition would most likely only exist if the pilot was attempting to perform low-speed flight at a
     constant speed and direction (possibly even sideways or backwards) between battle positions or when
     maneuvering near obstacles at low altitude.
     As a helicopter’s attitude directly affects its velocity and direction, maintaining a constant attitude will result
     in a constant velocity and direction; however, when operating at speeds below 40 knots the main rotor wash
     and flight direction may produce different airflow effects across different portions of the airframe, which
     may be exacerbated by local surface winds. As a result of these influences and flight maneuver requirements,
     the FMC uses the velocity and direction as its reference instead of simply the pitch/bank attitude.
•    If the aircraft is ≥40 knots ground speed, the FMC will select Attitude Hold sub-mode. When performing
     flight above 40 knots, the pilot is most likely performing forward “cruise” flight since sideways flight with
     excessive sideslip at such speeds would be quite hazardous for safe aircraft operation. As such, the FMC will
     attempt to maintain the pitch and roll attitudes to maintain the cruise flight condition.
     If in a turn, the FMC will maintain the current bank angle to continue the turn. If the bank angle is <3°, the
     FMC assumes the pilot intends to maintain level flight and will auto-level the aircraft to 0° bank angle. The
     pitch angle will also be maintained by the FMC, which in turn will maintain the aircraft velocity since a
     helicopter’s pitch attitude directly affects its velocity in forward flight, but is not subject to the same airflow
     disturbances when compared to low speeds.
When Attitude Hold is enabled, a box will be placed around the airspeed indicator in the HDU Flight symbology
and on the FLT page; and the “ATTITUDE HOLD” advisory will be displayed on the EUFD.




     Attitude Hold Indicator                                                          Altitude Hold Indicator




When Altitude Hold is enabled, a “home plate” box will be placed around the VSI indicator in the HDU Flight
symbology and on the FLT page; and either the “RAD ALT HOLD” or the “BAR ALT HOLD” advisory will be
displayed on the EUFD, depending on what Altitude Hold sub-mode is entered.



                                        Hold Mode Advisories




Any time the Attitude Hold or Altitude Hold are disabled using the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch, the hold mode
indicators within the HMD symbology and on the FLT page will flash and an audio tone will alert the crew that a
hold mode has been deactivated.
Heading Hold & Turn Coordination Sub-modes
The FMC Yaw channel operates within two SAS sub-modes: Yaw Damping and Turn Coordination. Either of these
sub-modes are enabled any time FMC Yaw channel is turned on, depending on the measured ground speed of
the aircraft. In addition, the FMC Yaw channel may also operate in a Heading Hold mode. None of these modes
may be disabled; however, condition-based logic will determine within which sub-mode the Yaw channel is
operating, and whether that sub-mode is engaged or disengaged from affecting the flight control servo-actuators
at any given time.
The primary condition that determines which sub-mode is enabled is the helicopter’s ground speed, and in
addition whether Attitude Hold is enabled. If the ground speed is <40 knots, Heading Hold or Yaw Damping sub-
mode is enabled. If the ground speed is ≥40 knots, Turn Coordination is enabled. If the ground speed is ≥40
knots and Attitude Hold is enabled, the sub-mode may switch between Heading Hold and Turn Coordination,
based on criteria described below.
The “breakout values” within the Yaw channel become incrementally larger with forward speed. The purpose
behind this is to desensitize the pedals to prevent disengaging the Heading Hold during cruise flight.
Heading Hold
Heading Hold assists the pilot in maintaining the magnetic heading reference. If the force trim release is pressed,
Heading Hold is disengaged and the FMC Yaw channel will only provide command augmentation. When the pilot
stops pressing the force trim release and the parameters for Heading Hold engagement are met, the FMC will
update the Heading Hold reference to the current magnetic heading and engage Heading Hold.
If Attitude Hold is disabled, Heading Hold will engage when all of the following conditions are true:
     •    One second has elapsed since Heading Hold was disengaged
     •    The helicopter is off the weight-on-wheels (“squat”) switch
     •    Ground speed <40 knots
     •    Pedal displacement ≤3% in yaw axis from the force trim reference position
     •    Force trim release is not pressed
     •    Yaw rate <3° per second




                    Ground Speed <40 knots


                   5 kt                     30 kt      40 kt




              ≤3% pedal displacement                   Force trim not pressed          Yaw rate <3° per second
              from force trim position

                              Heading Hold engagement (Attitude Hold disabled)
If Attitude Hold is enabled in Position or Velocity sub-modes, Heading Hold will engage when all of the
following conditions are true:

     •    Pedal displacement ≤3% in yaw axis from the force trim reference position in Position Hold sub-mode
          or ≤6% in yaw axis from the force trim reference position in Velocity Hold sub-mode
     •    Force trim release is not pressed
     •    Yaw rate <3° per second




              ≤3% pedal displacement                  Force trim not pressed           Yaw rate <3° per second
              from force trim position

                               Heading Hold engagement (Position Hold enabled)




              ≤6% pedal displacement                   Force trim not pressed          Yaw rate <3° per second
              from force trim position

                               Heading Hold engagement (Velocity Hold enabled)

Heading Hold will engage under certain conditions if Attitude Hold is enabled and in Attitude Hold sub-mode, but
this logic is inter-woven along with Turn Coordination and is described below.
Turn Coordination Sub-mode
Turn Coordination sub-mode assists the pilot in maintaining the sideslip angle, and is a function of roll attitude,
airspeed, and sideslip. Sideslip angle is a derived quantity based on inertial velocity as opposed to air data. This
method of determining sideslip angle provides more stable and reliable sideslip information than can be obtained
from an air data sensor. If the force trim release switch is pressed, Turn Coordination is disengaged, and the
FMC Yaw channel will only provide command augmentation and rate damping. When the pilot stops pressing the
force trim release switch, the FMC will update the Turn Coordination sideslip angle reference to the current trim
ball position.
If Attitude Hold is disabled, Turn Coordination will engage when all of the following conditions are true:
     •    Ground speed ≥40 knots
     •    Pedal displacement ≤9% in yaw axis from the force trim reference position
     •    Force trim is not pressed




                                                                        Ground Speed ≥40 knots


                    5 kt                         30 kt          40 kt




                              ≤9% pedal displacement from                        Force trim not pressed
                                  force trim position

                           Turn Coordination engagement (Attitude Hold disabled)

If Attitude Hold is enabled with ground speed ≥40 knots, Turn Coordination will switch to Heading Hold when
all of the following conditions are true:
     •    Pedal displacement ≤9% in yaw axis from the force trim reference position
     •    Cyclic displacement ≤2.25% in roll axis from the force trim position
     •    Roll (bank) angle is ≤3° from level attitude
     •    Force trim is not pressed




    ≤9% pedal displacement from                   ≤2.25% roll from          Force trim not pressed        Roll angle ≤3° from level
        force trim position                      force trim position

                  Turn Coordination switches to Heading Hold (Attitude Hold enabled)
If Attitude Hold is enabled with ground speed ≥40 knots, Heading Hold will revert to Turn Coordination if any
of the following conditions are true:
     •     Pedal displacement >9% in yaw axis from the force trim reference position
     •     Cyclic displacement >2.25% in roll axis from the force trim position
     •     Roll (bank) angle is >7° from level attitude
     •     Force Trim is pressed




                                            or                              or                          or


    >9% pedal displacement from                    >2.25% roll from                Force trim pressed             Roll angle >7° from level
        force trim position                       force trim position

                     Heading Hold reverts to Turn Coordination (Attitude Hold enabled)



Attitude Hold & Position/Velocity Hold Sub-modes
The FMC Pitch and Roll channels operate with Attitude Hold and two additional sub-modes: Position Hold and
Velocity Hold. Only one of these three sub-modes can be activated at any given time, only when the Attitude
Hold is activated using the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch when pressed to the Left/AT position, and only when
the FMC Pitch and Roll channels are turned on. Condition-based logic will determine which sub-mode the
Pitch/Roll channels are using, and whether that sub-mode is engaged or disengaged from affecting the flight
control servo-actuators at any given time.
The condition that determines which Attitude Hold sub-mode the Pitch/Roll channels operate within is the
helicopter’s ground speed. If the ground speed is ≤5 knots, Position Hold sub-mode is activated. If the ground
speed is >5 knots but <40 knots, Velocity Hold sub-mode is activated. If ground speed is ≥40 knots, Attitude
Hold sub-mode will be activated.




                                  Position Hold
                                                      Velocity Hold                               Attitude Hold

                                     5 kt                               30 kt       40 kt
   Attitude Hold enabled                                                        Ground Speed

                                                  Attitude Hold Sub-modes

Attitude Hold may be activated while still on the ground, however it will not engage in any sub-mode until the
helicopter is off the weight-on-wheels (“squat”) switch.
Position Hold Sub-mode
When Position Hold sub-mode is engaged, the FMC will use velocities provided by the EGI to approximate and
maintain its position. If the pilot presses the force trim, or displaces the cyclic beyond the breakout values in
pitch or roll (2.5% in the pitch axis or 2.25% in the roll axis) without pressing the force trim, Position Hold will
disengage and the SAS will revert to rate damping only. Once the cyclic is returned within the breakout values
and the force trim is no longer pressed, the aircraft’s current position will be captured as the new reference
position, Position Hold will re-engage, and the FMC will command SAS sleeve inputs into the Pitch and Roll servo-
actuators to maintain the aircraft over the reference position.
To re-position the helicopter and set a new position reference, the pilot should press and hold the force trim
release switch, translate the helicopter to the desired location, and then stop pressing the force trim release
switch when a stable hover has been established. Pressing the force trim release switch is not necessary if the
cyclic position exceeds the breakout values, however pressing and holding the force trim will allow the SAS
sleeves to center themselves within their respective axes, ensuring maximum authority in each direction when
Position Hold is re-engaged. If the pilot accelerates the aircraft above 5 knots ground speed and then returns the
cyclic within the breakout values and stops pressing the force trim, Velocity Hold sub-mode will be entered.
Since Position Hold is only engaged when ground speed is ≤5 knots while the force trim release switch is not
pressed, Heading Hold will also be active in the FMC Yaw axis while operating in this sub-mode. However, if the
pedals are displaced ≥3% from the force trim reference position, Heading Hold will disengage and will only re-
engage given the conditions listed in the Heading Hold & Turn Coordination Sub-modes description.
Velocity Hold Sub-mode
When Velocity Hold sub-mode is engaged, the FMC will use inertial velocities provided by the EGI to maintain a
2-dimensional velocity and in the horizontal plane. If the pilot presses the force trim, or displaces the cyclic
beyond the breakout values in pitch or roll (2.5% in the pitch axis or 2.25% in the roll axis) without pressing the
force trim, Velocity Hold will disengage and the SAS will revert to rate damping only. Once the cyclic is returned
within the breakout values and the force trim is no longer pressed, the aircraft’s current velocity and vector will
be captured as the new reference velocity, Velocity Hold will re-engage, and the FMC will command SAS sleeve
inputs into the Pitch and Roll servo-actuators to maintain the current velocity and relative direction over the
ground.
To establish a new velocity and/or vector reference, the pilot should press and hold the force trim release switch,
adjust the flight controls to attain the desired velocity and vector, and then stop pressing the force trim release
switch when a stable flight condition has been established. Pressing the force trim release switch is not necessary
if the cyclic position exceeds the breakout values, however pressing and holding the force trim will allow the SAS
sleeves to center themselves within their respective axes, ensuring maximum authority in each direction when
Velocity Hold is re-engaged. If the pilot accelerates the aircraft to 40 knots ground speed or greater and then
returns the cyclic within the breakout values and stops pressing the force trim, Attitude Hold sub-mode will be
entered. If the pilot decelerates the aircraft to 5 knots ground speed or less and then returns the cyclic within
the breakout values and stops pressing the force trim, Position Hold sub-mode will be entered.
Since Velocity Hold is only engaged when ground speed is >5 knots and <40 knots while the force trim release
switch is not pressed, Heading Hold will also be active in the FMC Yaw axis while operating in this sub-mode.
However, if pedals are displaced ≥6% from the force trim reference position, Heading Hold will disengage and
will only re-engage given the conditions listed in the Heading Hold & Turn Coordination Sub-modes description.
Attitude Hold
When Attitude Hold sub-mode is engaged, the FMC will use rates and attitudes provided by the EGI to maintain
a pitch and roll attitude. If the pilot presses the force trim, or displaces the cyclic beyond the breakout values in
pitch or roll (2.5% in the pitch axis or 2.25% in the roll axis) without pressing the force trim, Attitude Hold will
disengage and the SAS will revert to rate damping only. However, unlike Position or Velocity Hold submodes,
Attitude Hold will only disengage in the respective axis in which a breakout value has been exceeded.
As an example, if the pilot displaces the cyclic >2.25% in the Roll axis only, the FMC will disengage Attitude Hold
in the Roll servo-actuator only, but still provide SAS rate damping functions for that actuator. The FMC will
continue to maintain the referenced pitch attitude by commanding movement to the SAS sleeve within the Pitch
servo-actuator. Once the cyclic is returned within the breakout values, the aircraft’s current pitch and/or roll
attitude will be captured as the new reference attitude, Attitude Hold will re-engage in the respective axis, and
the FMC will command SAS sleeve inputs into the Pitch and Roll servo-actuators to maintain the current pitch and
roll attitude. However, if the roll reference is <3° from a level roll attitude, the bank angle will be commanded to
0° and the aircraft will auto-level.
This axis-specific breakout logic allows a pilot to adjust the airspeed or bank angle without disengaging the other
axis being commanded by the FMC in Attitude Hold sub-mode, or by pressing the force trim. This can be
convenient for flying an orbit or navigating a route at cruise speeds.
To establish a new attitude reference, the pilot should press and hold the force trim release switch, adjust the
flight controls to attain the desired attitude, and then stop pressing the force trim release switch when a stable
flight condition has been established. Pressing the force trim release switch is not necessary if the cyclic position
exceeds the breakout values, however pressing and holding the force trim will allow the SAS sleeves to center
themselves within their respective axes, ensuring maximum authority in each direction when Attitude Hold is re-
engaged.
If the ground speed decreases below 40 knots but remains above 30 knots, and the pilot does not displace the
cyclic beyond its breakout values nor press the force trim, Attitude Hold will be maintained and will not enter
Velocity Hold sub-mode.




                                                                                  Ground Speed ≥40 knots

                                                  Velocity Hold                       Attitude Hold

   Force trim not pressed             5 kt                        30 kt   40 kt


                            Attitude Hold Sub-mode maintained if force trim is not pressed

However, if the pilot displaces the cyclic beyond its breakout values and then returns the cyclic within the breakout
values while still below 40 knots ground speed, Velocity Hold sub-mode will be entered. Likewise, if the ground
speed decreases below 40 knots but above 30 knots and the pilot presses the force trim prior to accelerating
back to 40 knots ground speed or greater, Velocity Hold will be entered.




                                                                                  Ground Speed ≥40 knots

                                                  Velocity Hold                       Attitude Hold

  Force trim pressed/released         5 kt                        30 kt   40 kt


                       Velocity Hold Sub-mode entered if force trim is pressed <40 knots
If the ground speed decreases below 30 knots ground speed, Velocity Hold will be entered regardless of
whether the pilot has displaced the cyclic beyond its breakout values or pressed the force trim.




                                                                                      Ground Speed ≥40 knots

                                                      Velocity Hold                       Attitude Hold

  Force trim pressed/released             5 kt                        30 kt   40 kt


                                     Velocity Hold Sub-mode entered <30 knots

Heading Hold or Turn Coordination will also be active in the FMC Yaw axis while operating in Attitude Hold sub-
mode, subject to the logic described in the Heading Hold & Turn Coordination Sub-modes description.
Attitude Hold will engage when all the following conditions are true:
     •     The helicopter is off the weight-on-wheels (“squat”) switch
     •     Cyclic displacement ≤2.25% in roll and ≤2.5% in pitch from the force trim reference position
     •     Roll attitude <±60° and Pitch attitude <±30°
     •     Pitch and Roll rates <5° per second (Attitude Hold sub-mode only)
     •     Force trim is not pressed




                                                       Roll angle ±60°                      Pitch angle ±30°

            ≤2.25% roll and ≤2.5% pitch
              from force trim position




               Roll rate <5° per second               Pitch rate <5° per second           Force trim not pressed
          (Attitude Hold sub-mode only)           (Attitude Hold sub-mode only)


                                                 Attitude Hold Engagement
Altitude Hold Modes
The FMC Collective channel operates within two hold sub-modes: Radar Altitude Hold and
Barometric Altitude Hold. Only one of these sub-modes can be engaged at any given time,
and only when the Altitude Hold is activated using the Force Trim/Hold Mode switch when
pressed to the Right/AL position, and only when the FMC Collective channel is turned on.
Condition-based logic will determine which sub-mode the Collective channel is using, and
whether that sub-mode is engaged or disengaged from affecting the flight control servo-
actuators at any given time.
The conditions that primarily determine which Altitude Hold sub-mode the Collective channel
operates within is the helicopter’s ground speed and the radar altimeter. If the ground speed      Altitude Hold
is <40 knots and the radar altitude is ≤1,428 feet AGL, Radar Altitude Hold sub-mode will             enabled
be activated. If the ground speed is ≥ 40 knots or the radar altitude is >1,428 feet AGL,
Barometric Altitude Hold sub-mode is activated. Additional logic governing the activation or de-activation of these
sub-modes are listed below.
Radar Altitude Hold Sub-Mode
Radar Altitude Hold is not a terrain following mode. It provides distance from the ground directly below the
aircraft and does not provide any approaching terrain variation information.
Radar Altitude Hold may only be engaged when all of the following conditions are true:
     •     Ground speed <40 knots
     •     Altitude is ≤1,428 feet above ground level (AGL)
     •     Vertical velocity is ≤100 feet per minute
     •     The radar altimeter is powered on and operational




                      Ground Speed <40 knots


                      5 kt                  30 kt       40 kt




         Altitude ≤1,428 ft AGL               Vertical Velocity ≤100 fpm                  Radar Altimeter On

                                      Radar Altitude Hold Engagement
Radar Altitude Hold is automatically disengaged when any of the following conditions are true:
     •     Pilot displaces the collective >4% from the reference position (collective position at the time Radar
           Altitude Hold mode is activated)
     •     Either engine torque (TQ) >100%
     •     Either engine Turbine Gas Temperature (TGT) >867° C
     •     Rotor speed (NR) is <97% or >104%
     •     The radar altimeter is turned off or has failed




                                                                                             or   °C
                                                           TQ

                                                           Engine 1 or 2 Torque >100%             Engine 1 or 2 TGT >867 °C


                                                    or

             >4% collective displacement
               from reference position                                                       or
                                                                                                            !
                                                         RPM
                                                                 NR <97% or >104%                  Radar Altimeter Off/Failed


                                            Radar Altitude Hold Disengagement

Barometric Altitude Hold Sub-Mode
Barometric Altitude Hold can only be activated when both of the following conditions are true:
     •     If conditions for Radar Altitude Hold sub-mode activation cannot be met
     •     Vertical velocity is within the limits below as determined by aircraft ground speed:
                o     If ground speed is <40 knots, vertical velocity is ≤200 feet per minute
                o     From 40 to 160 knots ground speed, the vertical velocity rate limit increases linearly from
                      ±200 feet per minute at 40 knots to ±400 feet per minute at 160 knots. (Example: at 100
                      knots ground speed, the vertical velocity rate limit must be ≤300 feet per minute)

                                                           ±200 fpm           ±300 fpm                 ±400 fpm




    Vertical Velocity Within Limits
                                             5 kt        40 kt                      100 kt               160 kt            200 kt

                                           Barometric Altitude Hold Engagement
Barometric Altitude Hold is automatically disengaged when any of the following conditions are true:

     •    Pilot displaces the collective >4% from the reference position (collective position at the time Radar
          Altitude Hold mode is activated)
     •    Either engine torque (TQ) >100%
     •    Either engine Turbine Gas Temperature (TGT) >867° C
     •    Rotor speed (NR) is <97% or >104%




                                                                               or
                                                  TQ

                                                  Engine 1 or 2 Torque >100%


                                           or
                                                                                    RPM
                                                                                       NR <97% or >104%
           >4% collective displacement
             from reference position
                                                  °C                           or


                                                   Engine 1 or 2 TGT >867 °C


                                     Barometric Altitude Hold Disengagement
Flight Control Advisories
Since the SAS sleeve within each servo-actuator possesses a limited authority to affect the flight controls (±10%
authority in all axes except the pitch axis, which is +20% forward and -10% aft authority), if a hold mode is
engaged and the SAS sleeve has reached the limit of its authority, the SAS sleeve is described as “saturated”. If
the saturation condition persists, the FMC’s ability to maintain the reference values of pitch, roll, heading, sideslip,
velocity, or position will be degraded. Any time one or more servo-actuator has become saturated, a brief Flight
Control audio tone will be heard and an advisory will be displayed on the EUFD to alert the crew.




                                          SAS Saturation Advisory




The Flight Control audio tone will sound with an associated EUFD advisory when the criteria listed below is met
for each respective sub-mode:
•    If in Attitude Hold sub-mode, the SAS SATURATED advisory will be presented to the crew after 90 seconds
     of continuous saturation within the Pitch, Roll or Collective axes or 10 seconds of continuous saturation
     within the Yaw axis.
•    If in Velocity Hold sub-mode, the SAS SATURATED advisory will be presented to the crew after 2 seconds
     of continuous saturation within the Pitch, Roll or Collective axes or 7 seconds of continuous saturation within
     the Yaw axis.
•    If in Position Hold sub-mode, the SAS SATURATED advisory will be presented to the crew after 1 second of
     continuous saturation within the Pitch, Roll or Collective axes or 5 seconds of continuous saturation within
     the Yaw axis.
•    If in Position Hold sub-mode, the HOVER DRIFT advisory will be presented to the crew if the aircraft drifts
     greater than 48 feet (one rotor diameter) from the reference position.
•    If in Barometric Altitude Hold, the ALTITUDE DRIFT advisory will be presented to the crew if the aircraft
     drifts greater than ±100 feet from the reference altitude.
•    If in Radar Altitude Hold, the ALTITUDE DRIFT advisory will be presented to the crew if the aircraft drifts
     greater than ±5 feet from the reference altitude at 10 feet, increasing to ±100 feet at 1,400 feet altitude.
When the pilot presses the force trim release (which also interrupts any hold modes that are enabled in the FMC
Pitch, Roll and/or Yaw channels), the SAS sleeves within the Pitch, Roll, and Yaw servo-actuators will return to
center within 3 to 5 seconds. While the SAS sleeve is moving to center, it will continue to provide command
augmentation to ensure an immediate and uniform flight control response.
During sideward flight or hovering flight with high crosswinds without the force trim pressed, a SAS SATURATED
advisory and Flight Control audio tone may be presented to the crew. Under these conditions, the relative wind
from sideward flight or high crosswinds will apply force to the vertical tail, creating a weathervane effect in which
the nose will turn into the wind. The FMC will attempt to compensate for this weathervane effect while in Heading
Hold sub-mode, which may result in saturation of the SAS sleeve within the Yaw servo-actuator.
PROCEDURES




    PROCEDURES
It is recommended that the Flight Management Computer (FMC) section within the AH-64D chapter is reviewed
prior to reading through the various flight maneuvers within this chapter.
Throughout this chapter, attitude references within the maneuver descriptions will be based on the assumption
that the pitch ladder has remained un-biased. (see MPD Flight (FLT) page for more information.)
When describing cockpit controls or specific tasks performed in each crewstation, the following symbols will be
used to denote each crewstation or cockpit control effects between the crewstations.
     ©
     PLT    Denotes a task that is performed by the Pilot.
      ©
     CPG    Denotes a task that is performed by the Copilot/Gunner.
      ©
PLT / CPG   Denotes a task that may be performed by either crewmember.
      ©
PLT & CPG   Denotes a task that is performed by both crewmembers.
     ©      Denotes a cockpit control, option, or setting that is “common” between crewstations. A change
            performed in one crewstation will affect both crewstations. Any item that does not have this symbol is
            “independent” between crewstations.
 “Pilot”    Denotes the crewmember occupying the aft crewstation.
 “pilot”    Denotes the crewmember manipulating the aircraft flight controls in the conduct of performing a
            specific flight maneuver.
AIRCRAFT START
The AH-64 was designed to be operated from a “field environment” away from established ground support
infrastructure or airfield facilities. Although it is equipped with external power and pneumatic air receptacles,
allowing it to be supported by Aviation Ground Power Units (AGPU) or other ground support equipment, the
primary method of starting the aircraft is via its integrated GTCP36-155 Auxiliary Power Unit (the same gas
turbine engine that powers the AGPU).




Once the APU is up to operating speed, the APU drive shaft mechanically engages the main transmission’s
accessory gearbox, which in turn powers the primary and utility hydraulic pumps and both AC generators. This
pressurizes the flight control servo-actuators and enables AC electrical power to be delivered to some aircraft
systems, including both Transformer Rectifier Units (TRU) which converts AC power to DC power. Once DC power
is supplied to the remainder of the electrical busses, all aircraft systems may be configured as necessary, and the
aircraft battery will be charged.


Prior to Starting APU
After an external preflight inspection and walk-around has been performed by the aircrew to ensure the aircraft
is flightworthy and all gear and equipment is properly secured within the storage bays, the aircrew enters their
respective crewstations. The seat harness restraints are secured and the crewmembers secure intercom cables
and electrical connectors that supply power to the IHU helmet-tracking sensors.
If not already performed during the preflight inspection, the aircrew inspects their crewstation to ensure all
switches and knobs are set appropriately prior to enabling electrical power and starting the APU.


Interior Checks (Pilot crewstation)          PLT

1.   Canopy door – Set as desired (open or intermediate position).
Check the following on the Left Console:
2.   EXT LT/INTR LT panel – Set NAV lights in                                 8             12
     accordance with local procedures, ANTI-COL to
     OFF, and interior lighting knobs as desired.                        9    9
                                                                                                 13

3.   Power levers – OFF.                                                               11


4.   ENG START switches – OFF.                                           10
                                                                 7
                                                                                  14
5.   RTR BRK switch – OFF.
                                                                                  15
                                                                     6                       1
6.   NVS MODE switch – OFF.
                                                         5                             16
Check the following on the Keyboard Unit:
                                                         4       3
7.   KU brightness knob – As desired.

Check the following on the Instrument Panel:                 2

8.   EUFD brightness knob – As desired.
9.   MPD brightness and Mode knobs – As desired.
10. PARK BRAKE – Brakes set, PARK BRAKE handle is pulled outward.
11. Standby flight instruments – Check:
     •    Standby Attitude Indicator – Caged.

Check the following on the CMWS Control Panel:
12. CMWS Control Indicator PWR knob – OFF.
13. CMWS Control Panel – Set Switches as follows:
     •    ARM/SAFE switch – SAFE.
     •    CMWS/NAV switch – As appropriate.
     •    BYPASS/AUTO switch – As appropriate.
     •    JETTISON guarded switch – Down (cover closed).

Check the following on the Right Console:
14. COMM panel audio volume knobs – As desired.
15. COMM panel ICS switch and SENS knob – As desired.
16. Helmet Display Unit (HDU) – As desired.


Interior Checks (Copilot/Gunner crewstation)            CPG

1.   Canopy door – Set as desired (open or intermediate position).

Check the following on the Left Console:
2.   INTR LT panel – As desired.
3.   NVS MODE switch – OFF.
4.   Power levers – OFF.                                                                                         6
                                                                                            8

Check the following on the Keyboard Unit:                                      7                       7

5.   KU brightness knob – As desired.
                                                                                                       9
                                                                                                                 1
                                                                           5
                                                                                                       10
Check the following on the Instrument Panel:
                                                                                                            11
6.   EUFD brightness knob – As desired.
                                                                       4
7.   MPD brightness and Mode knobs – As desired.                                                            12
                                                                       3

Check the following on the TEDAC handgrips:                        2

8.   TEDAC Right Handgrip LT switch – OFF.

Check the following on the Right Console:
9.   COMM panel audio volume knobs – As desired.
10. COMM panel ICS switch and SENS knob – As desired.
11. PROCESSOR SELECT switch – AUTO.
12. Helmet Display Unit (HDU) – As desired.


Battery Checks
Once the interior checks are complete, perform the following:
1.   PLT   MSTR IGN switch – BATT (or EXT PWR if external power is to be used).
2.   PLT   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
3.   PLT & CPG   ICS system – Check to verify communications between crewstations.
4.   PLT & CPG   INTR LT PRESS-TO-TEST button – Press and hold; verify all signal lights illuminate.
5.   PLT / CPG   MSTR WARN, MSTR CAUT, and EUFD – Check for any malfunction indications.
6.   PLT   TEST switch held to position 1 – Both crewmembers check the following:
     •     “MSTR WARN” light – Flashing.
     •     ENG 1 FIRE, APU FIRE, and ENG 2 FIRE buttons – “FIRE” lights are illuminated.
     •     EUFD – “AFT DECK FIRE” warning message is displayed.
     •     Audio Warnings – “ENG 1 FIRE”, “APU FIRE”, “ENG 2 FIRE” and “AFT DECK FIRE” voice warning
           messages are heard in sequence.
7.   CPG   TEST switch held to position 2 – Both crewmembers check the following:
     •     “MSTR WARN” light – Flashing.
     •     ENG 1 FIRE, APU FIRE, and ENG 2 FIRE buttons – “FIRE” lights are illuminated.
     •     PRI and RES buttons – “DISCH” lights are illuminated.
     •     EUFD – “AFT DECK FIRE” warning message is displayed.
     •     Audio Warnings – “ENG 1 FIRE”, “APU FIRE”, “ENG 2 FIRE” and “AFT DECK FIRE” voice warning
           messages are heard in sequence.
APU Start
When the APU button is pressed, a nitrogen pre-charge will force hydraulic fluid from the accumulator cylinder
to discharge through the APU starter, allowing the APU compressor to spool up to sufficient speed for combustion.
Once the APU has reached a sufficient speed for the gas generator to become self-sustaining, the APU starter
will disengage.
The APU start sequence is fully automatic and requires no additional action by the crew.
1.     PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU start sequence.

2.     PLT   EUFD advisory column – Verify “APU ON” message is displayed.

3.     PLT   MSTR IGN switch – BATT (if external power was used prior to APU start).


After Starting APU
Once the APU has been started and the MPDs have initialized, perform the following:
1.    PLT & CPG   Canopy door – Close.
2.    PLT / CPG   DTU page – Select MASTER LOAD to upload DTC data to the aircraft systems. (N/I)
3.    PLT & CPG   Aircraft systems – Initialize and configure remaining options as appropriate for mission.


Initialize Aircraft Systems
After a Master Load has been completed on the DTU page, remaining options within each cockpit are configured
for the mission. This process is commonly referred to as a “DMS sweep”. A DMS sweep may be conducted in
accordance with crewmember preferences, but it is important to be consistent and coordinate with the other
crewmember to ensure any settings that are common between crewstations are agreed upon and the start-up
process is conducted in an efficient manner. (© Denotes “common” options or settings)
     ASE page
       AUTOPAGE Threshold
       © RLWR Power
       © RLWR VOICE Mode
       © CHAFF MODE
       © CHAFF Program

     TSD page
      SHOW Options (NAV/ATK)
      THRT SHOW Options
      COORD SHOW Options (NAV/ATK)
      © TIME Format
      © SYSTEM TIME>
      © RTE Options                                                                 COM page
      MAP Options                                                                      ©   VHF PRI/STBY frequency/network
      © INST Options (if necessary)                                                    ©   UHF PRI/STBY frequency/network
                                                                                       ©   FM1 PRI/STBY frequency/network
     WPN page                                                                          ©   FM2 PRI/STBY frequency/network

       GRAYSCALE (IHADSS BRT/CON)
       BORESIGHT (IHADSS)                                                           UTIL page
       © CHAN Settings (Channels 1-4)                                                  © ANTI-ICE MODE (AUTO/MANUAL)
       © CODE Settings (LRFD/LST)                                                      © ANTI-ICE Settings (Manual mode)
       © LRFD Mode (FIRST/LAST)
       GUN Settings (BURST/MODE)
                                        FLT page           FUEL page          PERF page
       RKT Settings (INVENTORY/QTY)
       MSL Settings (TYPE/MODE/TRAJ)     © HI>              © CHECK MINUTES    ©   PERF Modes
       © MSL Channels (PRI/ALT)          © LO>                                 ©   PA> (MAX/PLAN)
       ACQ Setting                       © ALT> or PRES>                       ©   FAT> (MAX/PLAN)
       MANRNG>                           UNIT Options                          ©   GWT> (MAX/PLAN)
An example DMS sweep is shown as follows (settings that are common between crewstations will be annotated
by a © symbol):
1.   PLT & CPG   M (Menu) button – Press.
2.   PLT & CPG   ASE (VAB L3) – Select.
     •     AUTOPAGE (VAB R1) – Set as desired.
     •     UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
               o    © RLWR Power (VAB R4) – Press.
               o    © RLWR VOICE (VAB R5) – Set as desired.
               o    © CHAFF MODE (VAB L1) – Set as desired.
               o    © CHAFF Program (VAB L2-L5) – Set as desired.
3.   PLT & CPG   TSD Button – Press.
     •     SHOW (VAB T3) – Select and configure NAV SHOW options.
              o    PHASE (VAB B2) – Select ATK and configure ATK phase SHOW options.
              o    THRT SHOW (VAB T5) – Select and configure THRT SHOW options.
              o    COORD SHOW (VAB T6) – Select and configure ATK phase COORD SHOW options.
              o    PHASE (VAB B2) – Select NAV and configure NAV phase COORD SHOW options.
              o    SHOW (VAB T3) – Deselect.
     •     UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
               o    © TIME (VAB R2) – Set Zulu/Local as desired.
               o    © SYSTEM TIME> (VAB R3) – Update Local time if necessary.
               o    UTIL (VAB T6) – Deselect.
     •     Scale (VAB R1 & R2) – Set as desired.
     •     CTR (VAB R3) – Set as desired.
     •     RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
               o    © RTM (VAB B6) – Select desired Route.
               o    © DIR (VAB L5) – Set to desired point, if necessary.
               o    RTE (VAB B5) – Deselect.
     •     MAP (VAB B4) – Select.
               o   TYPE (VAB L2) – Set as desired.
               o   COLOR BAND (VAB L4) – Set as desired.
               o   GRID (VAB T5) – Set as desired.
               o   ORIENT (VAB R5) – Set as desired.
               o   MAP (VAB B4) – Deselect.
     •     INST VAB (L1) – Select if the ADF is intended to be utilized for navigation.
               o    UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
               o    © ADF (VAB B6) – Turn on ADF, if necessary.
               o    © Configure ADF as desired.
               o    UTIL (VAB T6) – Deselect.
               o    INST (VAB L1) – Deselect.

4.   PLT   WPN Button – Press.
     •     GRAYSCALE (VAB L6) – Select.
     •     IHADSS BRT and CON knobs – Optimize HDU video (see Video Panel).
     •     GRAYSCALE (VAB L6) – Deselect.
     •     SYM knob - As desired (see Video Panel).
     CPG   WPN Button – Press.
     •     UTIL (VAB T6) – Press.
     •     TADS (VAB L4) – Press.
     •     LASER (VAB L6) – Press.
     •     Sight Select switch – HMD (see TEDAC Right Handgrip).
     •     GRAYSCALE (VAB L6) – Select.
     •     TDU BRT and CON rocker switches – Optimize HDU video (see TEDAC Display Unit).
     •     GRAYSCALE (VAB L6) – Deselect.
     •     TDU SYM rocker switch - As desired (see TEDAC Display Unit).

     PLT & CPG   BORESIGHT (VAB B5) – Select and perform IHADSS boresight procedure. (see IHADSS Boresight)
     •     BORESIGHT (VAB B5) – Deselect.
     •     GUN (VAB B2) – Select.
               o   BURST LIMIT (VAB L1- L5) – Select.
               o   MODE (VAB R2) – Select.
     •     MSL (VAB B3) – Select.
               o    CODE (VAB T4) – Select.
               o    © SET (VAB T2) – Select LRFD and set as appropriate.
               o    © SET (VAB T2) – Select LST and set as appropriate.
               o    © CHAN (VAB T1) – Select missile channels 1-4, ensure a channel matches the LRFD code.
               o    CHAN (VAB T1) – Deselect.
               o    © PRI (VAB L1) – Select channel that matches the LRFD.
               o    © ALT (VAB L2) – Select channel that matches the LST, or as appropriate.
     •     RKT (VAB B5) – Select.
               o    INVENTORY (VAB L1-L5) – Select.
               o    QTY (VAB R1) – Select.
               o    RKT (VAB B5) – Deselect.
     •     ACQ (VAB R6) – Set as desired (CPG must select SLAVE for cueing within the HMD Flight Symbology).
     •     MANRNG> (VAB B6) – Set as desired or enter ‘A’ for Auto-Range.
5.   PLT & CPG   A/C Button – Press.
     •     FLT (VAB   T2) – Select.
                o     SET VAB (B6) – Select.
                o     © HI> (VAB T1) – Set as desired.
                o     © LO> (VAB T3) – Set as desired.
                o     UNIT (VAB T4) – Set as desired.
                o     © ALT> (VAB T5) – Set airfield elevation if known.
                      or
                 o    © PRES> (VAB T6) – Set altimeter if known.
                 o    UNIT VAB (B2) – Set as desired.
                 o    SET (VAB B6) – Deselect.
     •     FUEL (VAB T3) – Select.
               o    CHECK (VAB B6) – Select.
               o    © MINUTES (VAB R2-R4) – Select as desired.
               o    CHECK (VAB B6) – Deselect.
     •     PERF (VAB T4) – Select.
               o    © PERF MODE – MAX (VAB B3) – Select.
               o    © PA> (VAB L1) – Set as desired.
               o    © FAT> (VAB L2) – Set as desired.
               o    © GWT> (VAB L3) – Set as desired.
               o    © PERF MODE – PLAN (VAB B4) – Select.
               o    © PA> (VAB L1) – Set as desired.
               o    © FAT> (VAB L2) – Set as desired.
               o    © GWT> (VAB L3) – Set as desired.
               o    © PERF MODE – CUR (VAB B2) – Select.
     •     UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
               o    © ANTI-ICE – SYSTEM (VAB R1) – Set as desired.
               o    © ANTI-ICE (VAB R3-R6) – Set as desired (only if SYSTEM is set to MANUAL).
6.   PLT / CPG   COM Button – Press.
     •     Presets (VAB L1-L5, R1-R5) – Select and tune as desired.
                o    RADIO (VAB T1-T5) – Select.
                o    TUNE (VAB B2) – Select as desired.
                o    TUNE Radio – SC (VAB B6) – Select.
           or
     •     MAN (VAB B2) – Select and tune as desired.
               o   © VHF FREQ> (VAB L1) – Set as desired.
               o   © UHF FREQ> (VAB L2) – Set as desired.
               o   © FM1 FREQ> (VAB L3) – Set as desired.
               o   © FM2 FREQ> VAB (L4) – Set as desired.
7.   PLT   CMWS Power/Set knob – ON.

     CPG   TDU Display knob – DAY or NT, as appropriate.
     •     Sight Select switch – TADS (see TEDAC Right Handgrip).
     •     TDU G/S button – Press (see TEDAC Display Unit).
     •     TDU BRT and CON rocker switches – Optimize TDU video.
     •     TDU TAD button – Press.
     •     TDU SYM rocker switch - As desired.
     •     Sight Select switch – HMD.
Engine Start
Prior to starting the engines, perform the following:
1.    PLT & CPG   NVS Mode switch – As desired.                                       6   11

2.    PLT   Standby Attitude Indicator – Uncage.
                                                                            6   10
3.    PLT & CPG   Area around helicopter – Clear.                                                   2

4.     PLT RTR BRK switch – OFF (or LOCK if
      performing a Rotor Lock start).                           7

5.     PLT EXT LT ANTI-COL – WHT for day, or RED                    1
      for night.
                                                            4
                                                                9
During normal operations, Engine 1 is started first,
                                                           12
followed by Engine 2. The APU must remain in
operation until the engine POWER levers are set to          6   7
FLY and the NR has stabilized at 101%, otherwise the
AC generators will drop offline and the aircraft will
                                                           5
lose primary electrical power.
6.    PLT   First engine – Start as follows:
      NOTE: During the start, if any of the following conditions are observed, abort the start by moving the
      corresponding POWER lever to OFF:
            o     It appears the TGT will exceed 851°C prior to NG reaching the idle speed of 63%.
            o     No increase of TGT, NP, or ENG OIL PSI within 45 seconds after moving the POWER lever to IDLE.
            o     The ENG 1/2 START advisory is removed from the EUFD prior to the NG reaching 52%.
      •     ENG START switch – START; observe “ENG 1 START” or “ENG 2 START” advisory displayed on the
            EUFD and the START box displayed on the ENG page.
      •     POWER lever – IDLE, at first indication of NG increase and if TGT is less than 80° C.
      •     Cockpit indications – Monitor.
            o     Engine TGT
            o     Engine NG
            o     Engine OIL PSI
            o     EUFD Advisory column
7.    PLT   Second Engine – Repeat the steps above after first engine start sequence is complete.
8.    PLT   RTR BRK switch – OFF.
      NOTE: Prior to advancing the POWER levers to FLY, confirm the ENGINE OIL PSI indications for both engines
      are less than 70 PSI. If performing operations in cold weather, confirm the NGB TEMP °C indications are
      above 20° C. (see ENG Systems sub-page for more information.)
9.     PLT POWER levers – Advance both POWER levers smoothly to FLY; ensure the TORQUE % indications for
      both engines increase simultaneously.
10.   PLT   NP and NR – Verify 101%.
11.   PLT   MSTR WARN, MSTR CAUT, and EUFD – Monitor for any malfunction indications.
12.   PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU shutdown sequence.
TAXI & BEFORE TAKEOFF
The AH-64 may perform hover taxi (<25 feet and <20 knots) or air taxi (<100 feet and/or >20 knots) operations
like any other helicopter, but ground taxi is typically used when feasible. Ground taxi allows the aircraft to be re-
positioned away from other aircraft and ground support equipment using a lower power setting, which minimizes
the rotor wash effects on the aircraft surroundings. This prevents foreign object damage to other aircraft, blowing
dust/snow, and allows ground personnel to continue operations on the flight line with minimal disturbance.




The AH-64 uses a free-rotating tail wheel to facilitate taxi maneuvers on the flight line, which can be selectively
locked to the rear position by either crewmember. Steering control is provided by tail rotor thrust, controlled by
the anti-torque pedals within the cockpit. As such, it is advisable that the aircrew keep the tail wheel locked until
aircraft movement has been initiated and the aircraft is clear of personnel and equipment. This allows the
crewmember on the controls to better ascertain the appropriate pedal positions that are required to prevent the
tail from adversely swinging to either side after the tail wheel is unlocked.


Before Taxi
Prior to initiating ground taxi, perform the following:
1.   PLT / CPG   Chocks removed – Verify with ground personnel.
2.   PLT / CPG   Bleed Air – On (UTIL page).
3.   PLT / CPG   ANTI-ICE – As required (UTIL page).
4.    PLT EXT LT panel – Verify NAV lights are set in accordance with local procedures, ANTI-COL – WHT for day
     or RED for night, FORM knob set as appropriate.
5.   PLT & CPG   Searchlight – As required.
6.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – Release by applying wheel brake pressure; ensure PARK BRAKE handle is inward.
Ground Taxi
NVS mode or the searchlight may be used to assist with ground taxi under low-light conditions,                    1
                                                                                                          2
or a combination of both. Ground taxi is typically performed in the following manner:
1.   Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward).
2.   Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.   With the cyclic in the neutral position, increase the collective to 27-30%.
     NOTE: Additional collective (30-35%) may be necessary to initiate ground taxi movement
     when the aircraft is at a high gross weight and/or at a location with a high density altitude.
4.   Apply forward cyclic to begin taxi movement. Use left/right pedal inputs as necessary to
     maintain heading and left/right cyclic inputs to maintain a level fuselage attitude. Ensure the aircraft is clear
     of personnel and equipment before unlocking the tail wheel. The force trim may be held throughout this
     maneuver as desired, or it may be released and pressed intermittently as necessary.
     NOTE: The Horizon Line within the HDU Flight symbology may be used as a reference for a level fuselage
     attitude. The Skid/Slip Indicator should not be used as a reference as it will not indicate a level fuselage
     attitude while the aircraft is performing a turn.
5.   Prior to initiating a turn when ground taxiing, ensure the tail wheel is unlocked
     (“UNLOCK” light is illuminated on the TAIL WHEEL button). Either crewmember
     may unlock the tail wheel, but as a common practice the crewmember on the             5
     controls will command tail wheel lock/unlock using the Tail Wheel Lock/Unlock
     button on the Collective Flight Grip.
6.   Apply pedal in the intended direction of the turn while applying cyclic input in the same direction to maintain
     a level fuselage attitude. Apply left/right pedal inputs using an alternating sequence of “pressure/counter-
     pressure” on the pedals to maintain a constant and controlled rate of turn.
7.   Prior to stopping the ground taxi or lifting off the ground, ensure the tail wheel is locked (“UNLOCK” light is
     not illuminated on the TAIL WHEEL button). Once the tail wheel is locked, apply aft cyclic to decelerate the
     aircraft. When the aircraft has stopped, set the cyclic into the center position prior to lowering the collective.
     The wheel brakes may also be used to assist with stopping the aircraft.
     NOTE: The “TAIL WHEEL LOCK SEL” and “TAIL WHEEL UNLK SEL”
     advisories on the EUFD indicate the commanded state of the tail wheel
     locking actuator as selected by the aircrew, but do not reflect whether the
     tail wheel is physically locked.
     Only the “UNLOCK” light on the TAIL WHEEL button indicates whether the
     tail wheel is physically locked (“UNLOCK” light will extinguish when locked).




                                  Tail wheel locking actuator cannot
                               physically lock until aligned with tail wheel

                                                   Tail wheel lock indication
During ground taxi, perform the following:
1.   PLT & CPG   Wheel brakes – Check in each crew station by applying a slight amount of pressure against the toe
     brakes.
2.   PLT / CPG   ENG page – Check; ensure NP and NR 101%, all indications green.
3.   PLT / CPG   FLT page – Check; update altimeter if necessary.
4.    PLT   Pilot standby instruments – Check; update altimeter if necessary.


Before Takeoff
Perform the following prior to lifting up to a hover or initiating takeoff from the ground:
1.   PLT & CPG   Weapons systems – Check the following:
     •      A/S button – “SAFE” light is illuminated. (see Armament Panel for more information.)
     •      GND ORIDE button – Off; “ON” light is not illuminated. (see Armament Panel for more information.)
     •      Weapons not actioned – Verify. (see HMD High Action Display for more information.)
2.   PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
3.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – As desired (Ensure released unless operating on uneven or sloped terrain).
4.   PLT & CPG   POWER levers – Ensure both POWER levers are set to FLY.
5.   PLT / CPG   Systems – Check as follows:
     •      FUEL page – Verify options set as appropriate.
                 o    XFER – AUTO.
                 o    BOOST – OFF.
                                                                                         5
                 o    XFEED – NORM.
     •      Fuel quantity – Check; verify sufficient fuel                       5             5
                                                                     1
            is onboard the aircraft for the mission.                                                5

     •      EUFD – Check; clear of Warnings and
            Cautions.                                                               3

     •      Engine and flight instruments – Check.            2

                 o    NP/NR 101%, all indications
                      green.
                 o    Update altimeter as required on
                                                               4
                      FLT SET page and Pilot’s Standby
                      Altimeter.
     •      ASE – As required.
     •      Avionics – As desired (COM/TSD pages).
                 o    Transponder – NORM; verify correct modes are enabled and codes are set for the mission.
                 o    Communications – As appropriate; verify on EUFD.
                 o    Navigation – As appropriate; ensure desired Route or Direct destination is selected.
6.    PLT   Hover Power Check – Perform. (see Hover Power Check in the next section for more information.)
HOVERING FLIGHT
As a helicopter with a typical operational gross weight between 7.5 to 9.5 tons (7,000 to 8,800 kilograms), a
hovering AH-64D can generate enough rotor wash to cause un-secured items to be tossed into the air at best,
or cause damage to other nearby aircraft at worst. As such, AH-64D aircrews will typically ground taxi to a safe
area before lifting off the ground into a hover or performing a takeoff. If this is not possible, aircrews will
immediately reposition their aircraft to a safe area away from equipment or personnel to minimize the time spent
hovering in any area within which they may incur injury to personnel or damage to other aircraft.




It is important to understand that when raising the collective, the torque effect from the counter-clockwise
rotation of the main rotor will cause the fuselage to spin to the right. This is countered by applying left pedal,
which subsequently results in the aircraft drifting to the right from the combined forces of the main rotor torque
and the tail rotor thrust. This in turn is countered by applying left cyclic to hover with a slight left bank.

                                                           Main rotor torque                       Lateral component
                                                                                                   of main rotor thrust



                                                                               Tail rotor thrust




Main rotor rotation     Main rotor torque                  Tail rotor thrust




                          Control inputs to counter forces acting on the aircraft
Performing a Hover
NVS mode or the searchlight may be used to assist with hovering under low-light conditions, or
                                                                                                                     2       1
a combination of both. Initiating a stationary hover from the ground is typically performed in the
following manner:
1.   Select Hover symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Aft). Bob-Up symbology mode
     may also be utilized if desired.
2.   Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.   With the cyclic in the neutral position, increase the collective while simultaneously applying
     left pedal input to counter the torque from the main rotor. Left pedal input will cause the
     aircraft to roll slightly to the right due to the thrust of the tail rotor. A slight left cyclic input
     should be made to counter the tail rotor thrust and keep the fuselage level.
     NOTE: As the aircraft becomes light on the wheels (approximately 20% below the torque required to hover
     in ground effect; HOVER Q – REQUIRED IGE), the force trim may be released if desired to allow Heading
     Hold to engage as the aircraft comes off the “squat” switch (no longer weight-on-wheels).
4.   As the aircraft is about to leave the surface, a slight drift in heading may be discerned if the amount of anti-
     torque pedal input is not correctly balanced against the torque of the main rotor. If the heading begins to
     drift to the right, tail rotor thrust is insufficient to counter the torque of the main rotor and additional left
     pedal must be applied. If the heading begins to drift to the left, tail rotor thrust is excessive and left pedal
     input should be reduced slightly.
5.   As the aircraft comes off the surface, apply a slight amount of left cyclic to counter translating tendency.
     Adjust the cyclic as required to maintain the position of the helicopter over the surface. Adjust the collective
     as required to maintain altitude over the surface. Adjust the pedals as required to maintain heading.
     NOTE: The combined forces of the main rotor torque and the tail rotor thrust create a sideways translating
     tendency to the right. As a result, the aircraft will normally hover left side low, depending on the additional
     effects of any crosswinds.
                                                                         Bob-Up box displays original position




                     Slight left bank to counter                              Aircraft will drift to the right
                 5                                                        5
                        translating tendency                                   with translating tendency




                                                                                                             Ground Effect



                                    Performing a Hover, In Ground Effect (IGE)
Hover Power Check
Prior to any mission, or after refueling/rearming operations (if feasible), aircrews perform a hover power check
to evaluate their aircraft’s measured hover performance compared to the calculated performance on the MPD
Performance (PERF) page or their pre-mission performance planning.
A hover power check is performed under the following conditions:
       •      Aircraft is in a stationary hover in the vicinity of the takeoff area.
       •      Aircraft heading is aligned with the intended direction of takeoff.
       •      Aircraft altitude is 5 feet AGL.
The aircrew evaluates the following factors during the
hover power check to validate the aircraft performance                Current GWT is used to calculate
                                                                         REQUIRED torque values
and whether any aspect of their mission may be
impacted:
                                                                                                        2
       •      Flight control responsiveness and positions                         1
              required to maintain the hover. Abnormal
              control positions may indicate an aircraft
              center-of-gravity (CG) that is out-of-limits.                       3
                                                                                                        4
       •      A comparison of HOVER Q values on the PERF
              page between the REQUIRED IGE and the
              INDICATED torque values, and whether the
              data matches the pre-mission performance
              planning. This is used to validate whether the
              PERF page is supplying accurate performance
              calculations for use during the mission.
                                                                      MAX GWT DE is used to calculate
       •      HOVER Q values are used to determine                      GO-NO/GO torque values
              whether the assessed aircraft performance will
              negatively impact any aspect of the mission.
       •      Sufficient fuel is onboard the aircraft for the mission.



           GWT: 16,990 lbs                                                                                    GWT: 18,620 lbs
   2       TORQUE: 88%                                                                                        TORQUE: 100%
                                        Out of Ground-Effect (OGE)
                                                        80 feet

                                                                         If the aircraft is hovering at 5 feet with a torque value
                                                                             equal to the calculated “GO-NO/GO OGE” torque
                                                                          value, the torque required to hover at 80 feet will be
                                                                                                   100%.

                      HOVER Q – REQUIRED                                               HOVER Q – GO-NO/GO




     GWT: 16,990 lbs                                                    GWT: 21,580 lbs                       GWT: 18,620 lbs
   1 TORQUE: 70%                                                      3 TORQUE: 100%                          TORQUE: 80%     4
                                           In Ground-Effect (IGE)
                                                       5 feet


                                          HOVER Q Performance Calculations
TAKEOFF
Several different types of takeoff maneuvers may be performed, depending on the nature of the takeoff area,
obstacles or terrain beyond the takeoff area, and the power margins available. When possible, the crew should
perform a takeoff that ensures the maximum amount of excess power is available for contingencies while
maintaining a safe distance from any potential hazards to the aircraft on climb out, such as vertical hazards or
structures. The four types of takeoffs that may be performed in Visual Meteorological Conditions (VMC), and their
applications for use, are listed below.




VMC Takeoff. A VMC Takeoff is the most common type of takeoff and can be initiated from the ground or when
already established in a stationary hover. This type of takeoff is used when a sufficient power margin (≥10% TQ)
is available between the torque required to hover in ground effect (HOVER Q – REQUIRED IGE) and the maximum
dual-engine torque available (MAX Q – DE) that does not exceed the dual-engine transmission limit (100% TQ).
VMC Level Acceleration Takeoff. A VMC Level Acceleration Takeoff is considered the safest type of takeoff
but requires a sufficient area that is free of obstacles to permit such a maneuver to be performed. It is preferred
that a sufficient power margin (≥10% TQ) is available to perform this maneuver; but unlike the VMC Takeoff, it
is not necessarily required, depending on the takeoff environment and necessity. The advantage this maneuver
provides is remaining outside the “height-velocity avoid” region until a safe single-engine airspeed can be
attained, in case of an engine failure.
VMC Minimum Power Takeoff. A VMC Minimum Power Takeoff is performed when there is insufficient power
margin (<10% TQ) available between the torque required to hover in ground effect (HOVER Q – REQUIRED IGE)
and the maximum dual-engine torque available (MAX Q – DE) that does not exceed the dual-engine transmission
limit (100% TQ). In such a scenario when the aircraft is hovering near its maximum dual-engine torque available
or its dual-engine transmission limit, this takeoff maneuver is performed. This type of takeoff is used when a
combination of environmental conditions and/or weapon and fuel requirements are negatively impacting the
aircraft’s performance capabilities, but the surface within the takeoff area is unsuitable for a Rolling Takeoff.
Rolling Takeoff. A Rolling Takeoff is performed as the preferred alternative to the VMC Minimum Power Takeoff
when conditions permit. In such a scenario when the aircraft is hovering near its maximum dual-engine torque
available (MAX Q – DE) or its dual-engine transmission limit (100% TQ), and a suitable takeoff area such as a
runway, a road, or other improved surface is available, this takeoff maneuver is performed.
VMC Takeoff
A VMC Takeoff may be performed from the ground or from a stationary hover. When performing                          1
                                                                                                             2
the maneuver from the ground, the maneuver is typically performed in the following manner:
1.   Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward).
2.   Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.   With the cyclic in the neutral position, increase the collective until the aircraft becomes light
     on the wheels while applying left pedal to counter the torque and maintain heading.
     Continue increasing the collective to approximately 10% above the torque required to hover
     in ground effect (HOVER Q – REQUIRED IGE).
     NOTE: A minimum climb rate of 500 feet per minute (FPM) is typically desired. However, depending on the
     nature of the takeoff area, additional torque may be necessary to achieve a higher rate of ascent and a
     steeper climb angle in order to clear obstacles. The Flight Path Vector (FPV) may be used to judge whether
     the aircraft will clear obstacles within the path of the aircraft. (See IHADSS Flight Symbology for more
     information.)
4.   As the aircraft leaves the ground, apply forward cyclic to obtain a “90-knot” pitch attitude, which corresponds
     with the Horizon Line bisecting the LOS Reticle within the HDU Flight symbology or the Horizon Line bisecting
     the Waterline symbol on the MPD FLT page. Use forward/aft cyclic inputs as necessary to maintain this level
     pitch attitude as the aircraft accelerates through effective translational lift (ETL). The force trim should be
     held throughout this maneuver if able, but it may be released and pressed intermittently as necessary.
     Use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the desired ground track and left/right pedal inputs to maintain the
     takeoff heading until the aircraft has ascended through 50 feet AGL or is clear of all obstacles within the
     takeoff area.
     Once the aircraft has climbed above 50 feet AGL and is clear of obstacles, adjust the pedals to place the
     aircraft “in trim” (“Trim ball” centered on the Skid/Slip Indicator).




                                    4                                              4   90-knot attitude: 0° Pitch




                                                                                            5°

                                                                                   3   Hover attitude: +5° Pitch
                                3                    Ground Effect


                                        VMC Takeoff (from the ground)

When performing a VMC Takeoff from a hover, each step is performed in the same manner as departing from
the ground, except the 90-knot attitude may be achieved at the initiation of the maneuver rather than as the
aircraft leaves the ground.
VMC Level Acceleration Takeoff
A VMC Level Acceleration Takeoff may be performed from the ground or from a stationary hover.                           1
When performing the maneuver from the ground, the maneuver is typically performed in the                         2

following manner:
1.    Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward).
2.    Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.    With the cyclic in the neutral position, increase the collective until the aircraft becomes light
      on the wheels while applying left pedal to counter the torque and maintain heading.
      Continue increasing the collective to approximately 10% above the torque required to hover
      in ground effect (HOVER Q – REQUIRED IGE).
      NOTE: Depending on the length of the takeoff area, additional power may be necessary to accelerate and
      achieve the desired climb airspeed within a shorter distance in order to clear obstacles.
4.    As the aircraft leaves the ground, apply forward cyclic to maintain the aircraft in ground effect with a level
      VSI. Use forward/aft cyclic inputs as necessary to maintain the VSI at 0 feet per minute (FPM) as the aircraft
      accelerates through minimum safe single-engine airspeed (VSSE). The force trim should be held throughout
      this maneuver if able, but it may be released and pressed intermittently as necessary.
      Use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the desired ground track and left/right pedal inputs to maintain the
      takeoff heading.
5.    As the aircraft accelerates beyond minimum safe single-engine airspeed (VSSE), adjust the cyclic to obtain
      the required pitch attitude for the desired climb airspeed.
      Once the aircraft has climbed above 50 feet AGL and is clear of obstacles, adjust the pedals to place the
      aircraft “in trim” (“Trim ball” centered on the Skid/Slip Indicator).




             5°                                                4   Level VSI

     3 Hover attitude: +5° Pitch                                                       5   90-knot attitude: 0° Pitch




                                                                                   5




                                             4


                                   3                                                                    Ground Effect


                              VMC Level Acceleration Takeoff (from the ground)

When performing a VMC Level Acceleration Takeoff from a hover, each step is performed in the same manner as
departing from the ground, except the accelerative attitude may be achieved at the initiation of the maneuver
rather than as the aircraft leaves the ground.
VMC Minimum Power Takeoff
A VMC Minimum Power Takeoff may be performed from the ground but is typically performed                               1
from a stationary hover after verifying the aircraft has sufficient power to hover in ground effect.           2
When performing the maneuver from a hover, the maneuver is typically performed in the
following manner:
1.   Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward).
2.   Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.   From a stationary hover, slowly apply forward cyclic to initiate a level acceleration across
     the surface while remaining in ground effect. Increase the collective as necessary, not to
     exceed the maximum dual-engine torque available (MAX Q – DE) or the dual-engine
     transmission limit (100% TQ), whichever is less.
     NOTE: If a hover in ground effect (IGE) at 5 feet AGL can be maintained without exceeding the maximum
     dual-engine torque available or the dual-engine transmission limit, a VMC Minimum Power Takeoff can be
     performed. When training this maneuver, IGE hover power is maintained throughout the maneuver.
     However, during operational missions, any remaining power margin should be utilized without exceeding
     the maximum dual-engine torque available or the dual-engine transmission limit.
4.   As the aircraft accelerates through effective translational lift (ETL) and the rotor system becomes more
     efficient at producing lift, the aircraft will begin to ascend. Use forward/aft cyclic inputs as necessary to
     maintain the VSI at 0 feet per minute (FPM) and remain within ground effect. The force trim should be held
     throughout this maneuver if able, but it may be released and pressed intermittently as necessary.
     Use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the desired ground track and left/right pedal inputs to maintain the
     takeoff heading until the aircraft has ascended through 50 feet AGL or is clear of all obstacles within the
     takeoff area.
5.   As the aircraft accelerates beyond minimum safe single-engine airspeed (VSSE), adjust the cyclic to obtain
     the required pitch attitude for the desired climb airspeed.
     Once the aircraft has climbed above 50 feet AGL and is clear of obstacles, adjust the pedals to place the
     aircraft “in trim” (“Trim ball” centered on the Skid/Slip Indicator).




              5°

     3   Hover attitude: +5° Pitch           4   Slow accelerative attitude          5   90-knot attitude: 0° Pitch




                                                                                 5




                                3        4

                                                                                                      Ground Effect


                                        VMC Minimum Power Takeoff
Rolling Takeoff
A Rolling Takeoff is performed when the aircraft’s power margin is insufficient (<10% below maximum dual-
engine torque; MAX Q – DE) to perform a normal takeoff and a suitable takeoff area such as a runway, a road,
or other improved surface is available. The maneuver is typically performed in the following manner:
1.       Manually set the stabilator angle to 0° (Stabilator Control Switch on the                                         2
         Collective Flight Grip), as indicated on the ENG Systems sub-page.                                1        3


2.       Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward).
3.       Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
4.       With the cyclic in the neutral position, increase the collective to 30-35%.
5.       Apply forward cyclic to begin the takeoff roll while progressively increasing
         collective to approximately 3-5% below the maximum dual maximum dual-
         engine torque available (MAX Q – DE). As the tail comes off the surface, use
         forward/aft cyclic inputs to achieve and maintain a level, 90-knot attitude.
         NOTE: When training this maneuver, increase the collective to 10% below the torque required to hover in
         ground effect (HOVER Q – REQUIRED IGE) to simulate a limited-power condition.
         Apply left pedal to counter the torque and then left/right pedal inputs as necessary to maintain heading.
         Use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the ground track across the takeoff surface. The force trim should be
         held throughout this maneuver if able, but it may be released and pressed intermittently as necessary.
6.       As the aircraft accelerates and the rotor system becomes more efficient at producing lift, the aircraft will
         become light on the wheels. Use forward/aft cyclic inputs as necessary to maintain the level, 90-knot attitude
         until the aircraft lifts off the surface. After liftoff, use forward/aft cyclic inputs to remain within ground effect
         with the VSI at 0 feet per minute (FPM) as the aircraft continues to accelerate.
         Once the aircraft has lifted off the surface, adjust the pedals to place the aircraft “in trim” (“Trim ball”
         centered on the Skid/Slip Indicator) while using left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the desired ground track
         within the takeoff area.
7.       As the aircraft accelerates beyond minimum safe single-engine airspeed (VSSE), adjust the cyclic to obtain
         the required pitch attitude for the desired climb airspeed and reset the stabilator to Automatic mode.




     5     Level, 90-knot attitude               6 Level VSI after liftoff to             7     90-knot attitude after
             to start takeoff roll                 remain in ground effect                    accelerating beyond VSSE




                                                                                      7
                                            6
            5

                                                                                                           Ground Effect


                                                      Rolling Takeoff
LANDING
Several different types of landing maneuvers may be performed, depending on the nature of the landing area,
obstacles near the landing area, and the power margins available. When possible, the crew should perform an
approach that ensures the maximum amount of excess power is available for performing a go-around while
maintaining a safe distance from any potential hazards to the aircraft, such as vertical hazards or structures.




VMC Approach. A VMC Approach is normally performed when sufficient power margins allow for normal
approach angles and deceleration prior to arriving over the intended point of touchdown. Variations in the
execution of the VMC Approach are based on the nature of the landing area, obstacles around the landing area,
and the whether the aircraft has the power margins to hover out of ground effect (OGE).
Roll-on Landing. A Roll-on Landing may be performed when insufficient power exists to perform a normal VMC
Approach. In such a scenario when the aircraft hover performance is calculated to be near its maximum dual-
engine torque available (MAX Q – DE) or its dual-engine transmission limit (100% TQ), and a suitable landing
area such as a runway, a road, or other improved surface is available, this landing maneuver is performed.


Before Landing
Prior to landing, perform the following:
1.   PLT & CPG   Weapons systems – Check the following:
     •     A/S button – “SAFE” light is illuminated. (see Armament Panel for more information.)
     •     GND ORIDE button – Off; “ON” light is not illuminated. (see Armament Panel for more information.)
     •     Weapons not actioned – Verify. (see HMD High Action Display for more information.)
2.   PLT / CPG   ASE – As required.
3.   PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
4.   PLT   PARK BRAKE – Ensure brakes are released, PARK BRAKE handle is inward.
VMC Approach
A VMC Approach may be performed to the ground or to a stationary hover. When performing the maneuver to
the ground, the maneuver is typically performed in the following manner:
1.     Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward) and place the LOS                                   1
       Reticle on the intended point of touchdown. (see IHADSS Flight Symbology for more                               2

       information.)
2.     Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.     When the desired approach angle is intercepted (whether on final or while still in a base
       turn toward the landing area), decrease the collective so that the Flight Path Vector (FPV)
       is aligned with the intended point of touchdown when on the final approach course. Apply
       aft cyclic to initiate a deceleration at a rate appropriate for the remaining distance to
       touchdown. Adjust the pedals to maintain the aircraft “in trim”. (“Trim ball” centered on the
       Skid/Slip Indicator).
       NOTE: Steep approach angles should only be utilized if adequate power is available to maintain a slow rate
       of descent, or if the aircraft performance is such that a hover out of ground effect (OGE) may be performed.
4.     Use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the desired ground track. Use forward/aft cyclic inputs to progressively
       decelerate so that the Velocity Vector arrives at the center of the LOS Reticle as the aircraft arrives at the
       intended point of touchdown, effectively reaching zero forward velocity as the aircraft touches down.
5.     As the aircraft descends below 50 feet AGL or below the obstacles surrounding the landing area, adjust the
       pedals to align the aircraft with the landing direction.
6.     Once the aircraft touches down, lower the collective to 27-30% torque and adjust the cyclic to eliminate any
       remaining velocity. Once the aircraft is stationary, neutralize the cyclic and fully lower the collective.

                                                                                                Deceleration below ETL as
                                                                                           5
                                                                                               ground effect is encountered




              Flight Path Vector on
      3
          intended point of touchdown

                                                  Velocity Vector shrinks with a           Go-arounds should be initiated prior to
                                              4
                                                    progressive deceleration               decelerating below ETL or descending
                                                                                           below obstacles near the landing area
                     3


                                              4

     Approach angles that are
     too shallow may lead to                                                 5
      impact with obstacles
                                                                                   Ground Effect
                                                                                                          6


                                          VMC Approach (to the ground)

When performing a VMC Approach to a hover, each step is performed in the same manner as an approach to the
ground, except the forward velocity and vertical speed are reduced to zero prior to contact with the ground. A
VMC Approach may be terminated to a hover in ground effect (IGE) or out of ground effect (OGE), but the aircraft
performance must be adequately calculated when terminating to an OGE hover to avoid settling with power.
Roll-on Landing
A Roll-on Landing is performed when the aircraft’s power margin is insufficient to perform a normal approach
and a suitable landing area such as a runway, a road, or other improved surface is available. The maneuver is
typically performed in the following manner:
1.       Select Transition symbology mode (Symbology Select switch – Forward) and place the LOS                                      1
         Reticle on the intended point of touchdown. (see IHADSS Flight Symbology for more                                2

         information.)
2.       Press and hold the force trim (Force Trim/Hold Mode switch – Forward).
3.       When the desired approach angle is intercepted (whether on final or while still in a base
         turn toward the landing area), decrease the collective so that the Flight Path Vector (FPV)
         is aligned with the intended point of touchdown when on the final approach course. Apply
         aft cyclic to initiate a deceleration at a rate appropriate for the remaining distance to
         touchdown. Adjust the pedals to maintain the aircraft “in trim”. (“Trim ball” centered on the
         Skid/Slip Indicator).
4.       Use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the desired ground track and left/right pedal inputs to maintain the
         aircraft “in trim”. Adjust the cyclic throughout the approach to progressively decelerate so that the aircraft
         remains above ETL (24 knots) until 10-20 feet AGL over the landing area.
         NOTE: If performing an approach under single-engine power, do not decelerate below Velocity Safe Single
         Engine (VSSE) until 10-20 feet AGL over the landing area. (see PERF page for more information.)
5.       As the aircraft descends below 50 feet AGL or below the obstacles surrounding the landing area, adjust the
         pedals to align the aircraft with the landing direction.
6.       If possible, adjust the attitude to ensure the aircraft touches down on all three wheels at once to avoid
         excessive loads on the tail wheel. After touchdown, use left/right cyclic inputs to maintain the ground track
         across the landing surface and left/right pedal inputs to maintain heading.
7.       Lower the collective to a minimum of 30% torque (60% torque if under single-engine power) and apply aft
         cyclic to aerodynamically decelerate, and/or apply wheel brakes. Once the aircraft is stationary, neutralize
         the cyclic and fully lower the collective.




              Flight Path Vector on                Velocity Vector shrinks with             Airspeed maintained above ETL
     3                                         4                                        5
          intended point of touchdown               a progressive deceleration              (or VSSE) until 10-20 feet AGL


                                                                              Go-arounds should be initiated prior to decelerating
                                                                              below ETL (or VSSE if under single-engine power) or
                   3                                                           descending below obstacles near the landing area


                                               5

                                        Ground Effect
                                                                      6                                                         7


                                                        Roll-on Landing
AIRCRAFT SHUTDOWN
Just as with departing from its parking location and taxiing to the takeoff area, the AH-64 may perform hover
taxi (<25 feet and <20 knots) or air taxi (<100 feet and/or >20 knots) to transition back to the parking area
after landing, but ground taxi is typically used when feasible.




Once clear of the active runway or designated arrival/departure area, the transponder is typically set to standby
and the exterior lights are set in accordance with local regulations and procedures. As the aircraft is arriving to
the designated parking location and in the intended parking heading, it is necessary to straighten the aircraft’s
direction of travel for a short distance to allow the free-rotating tail wheel to align with the locking actuator. Once
the tail wheel has been successfully locked (indicated by the “UNLOCK” light on the TAIL WHEEL button
extinguishing), the aircraft can be brought to a stop. (see Ground Taxi for more information.)
The aircraft may be aerodynamically braked using aft cyclic input with 27-30% torque applied, or the wheel
brakes may be used in either crewstation. After coming to a halt, the Pilot should set the wheel brakes using the
PARK BRAKE handle. (see Parking Brake Handle for more information.)


After Landing Check
After landing, perform the following:
1.    PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Unlock as necessary for ground taxi.
2.    PLT   EXT LT – Set exterior lighting in accordance with local procedures.
3.    PLT / CPG   Avionics – As desired (COM page).
     •      Transponder – STBY.
     •      Communications – As appropriate; verify on EUFD.
Aircraft Shutdown
Once stationary in the designated parking location, perform the following:
1.    PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU start sequence.

2.    PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
3.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – Brakes set; PARK BRAKE handle is pulled outward.
Prior to retarding the POWER levers to IDLE, verify the “APU ON” advisory message is displayed on the EUFD.
4.     PLT POWER levers – Retard both POWER levers to IDLE; press EUFD Stopwatch button to start a timer for
      a 2-minute engine cooldown. (see Enhanced Up-Front Display (EUFD) for more information.)
5.    PLT   Standby Attitude Indicator – Cage.
6.     PLT CMWS Power/Test knob – OFF. (see
      Common Missile Warning System for more                                                     10

      information.)                                                                                        11

7.    PLT & CPG   NVS Mode switch – OFF.
                                                                                             9
8.    PLT   ACM switch – OFF.
9.    CPG ACM button – Disable ACM. (see TEDAC
      Display Unit for more information.)
10.   CPG   TDU Display knob – OFF.
                                                                           2    7
11.   PLT / CPGDMS SHUT DOWN page – MASTER
                                                                           18
      OFF. (see DMS Shutdown page for more                                 2
      information.)
12.    PLT POWER levers – OFF after 2 minutes have
      elapsed on EUFD stopwatch.
                                                                                                                6
13.   PLT  RTR BRK switch – BRK after NR has
      decreased below 50%.                                                              14            11
                                                                                                            5
14.   PLT  Stabilator – Manually set the stabilator
                                                                                    8
      angle to 0° (Stabilator Control Switch on the                                     3
      Collective Flight Grip), as indicated on the ENG
      Systems sub-page.
                                                                  2        7
15.   PLT   Searchlight – STOW.
                                                             13
16.    PLT RTR BRK switch – OFF after main rotor has
                                                             20       4        14
      stopped.
                                                             1        12       15
17.   PLT   EXT LT – All exterior lighting to OFF.
18.   PLT & CPG   INTR LT – All interior lighting to OFF.
                                                            17    18
19.   PLT APU button – Press and release to initiate
      APU shutdown sequence.
20.   PLT   MSTR IGN – OFF.
NAVIGATION




    NAVIGATION
NAVIGATION
The AH-64D primarily navigates by utilizing a pair of Embedded GPS/Inertial Navigation Units (EGI) aided by a
Doppler velocity radar and a database of stored points. After the APU is started and generator power is applied
to the aircraft, both EGI’s will automatically begin their alignment process. Aircrew intervention is normally not
required aside from verifying the EGI’s alignment status and velocity indications prior to engine start.
Unless updated with a new position via the DTC, the EGI alignment process uses the aircraft’s previous position
and heading stored in the aircraft memory from when it was last shut down. This stored position, aided by GPS
position signals, shortens the alignment process considerably, allowing an AH-64D to takeoff within minutes if
necessary.



                                 Pitot Probe (both sides)              Air Data Sensor (both sides)            GPS Antenna




                                                                                         ADF Antenna




                    Static Port (both sides)         Radar Altimeter          Doppler Radar            Radar Altimeter
                                                     Receive Antenna          Velocity Sensor         Transmit Antenna




                                                    Navigational Sensors

While in flight, the AH-64D receives continuous position updates from GPS satellites to maintain INU position
confidence and aid in precision navigation. As an emergency back-up during operations in low-visibility conditions,
the AH-64D is equipped with an AN/ARN-149 Automatic Direction Finder.
The AH-64D uses true airspeed calculations derived from the pitot probe mounted on the leading edge of the left
wing and the static ports on each side of the airframe. These, along with the air data sensors, aid in more precise
ballistic calculations during weapons delivery and are the primary source of air mass data to the Flight
Management Computer (FMC).
A set of backup instruments are installed within the Pilot’s crewstation that provide indicated airspeed and
barometric altitude from the second pitot probe mounted on the leading edge of the right wing and each static
port. A standby attitude indicator and a backup magnetic compass is also installed within the Pilot’s crewstation.
POINTS
The AH-64D’s navigational database consists of 149 unique point files that can be uploaded from a removable
Data Transfer Cartridge (DTC), with an additional 6 non-loadable point files within the aircraft memory. These
point files serve as geographical coordinates of waypoints for navigation and routing, hazards to flight that should
be avoided, control measures that are used for battlefield coordination and maneuvers, locations of friendly and
enemy forces, and known or suspected locations of hostile air defenses.




Point files within the navigational database are stored in one of three partitions, depending on their type. Points
within these partitions may be uploaded from the DTC; and may be added, edited, or deleted from the cockpit.

                                         General Control Measures
             Waypoints                   Friendly Control Measures                    Targets
              Hazards                     Enemy Control Measures                      Threats               Terrain



                                           Point Database Partitions

•    Waypoints/Hazards (WPTHZ) partition. Points for depicting navigation waypoints and hazards.
•    Control Measures (CTRLM) partition. Points for depicting friendly and enemy units, airfields, and other
     graphical control measures for controlling team movements and coordinating with other friendly forces
     during a mission.
•    Targets/Threats (TGT/THRT) partition. Points for depicting targets and threats, along with
     corresponding detection/engagement rings.
•    Targets/Threats (TGT/THRT) extended partition. Points for storing additional TSD file locations, such
     as the Pilot and CPG Terrain (TRN) points. The Pilot’s TRN point is indexed as T55 and the CPG’s TRN point
     is indexed as T56.
The Target/Threats extended partition only resides within the aircraft memory and cannot be edited by the DTC.
Point Files
Each point file contains five elements of information, which includes the file location within the database, the
three-dimensional location of the point, the symbol that is displayed on the TSD at the point’s location, and up
to three unique alphanumeric characters that may be associated with the point, such as a name or designation.
•    Point Index (W##, H##, C##, T##). Each point is indexed within the partition it resides, and the index
     itself is used to reference the point when performing tasks such as reviewing the points information, setting
     the point as an acquisition source, adding the point to a route, panning the TSD to its location, etc.
          o    Waypoints. All points of the Waypoint type are indexed within the WPTHZ partition with a leading
               “W” followed by two digits between 1 and 50 (e.g. “W01”), which are shared with Hazards.
          o    Hazards. All points of the Hazard type are indexed within the WPTHZ partition with a leading “H”
               followed by two digits between 1 and 50 (e.g. “H01”), which are shared with Waypoints.
          o    Control Measures. All points of the Control Measure type are indexed within the CTRLM partition
               with a leading “C” followed by two digits between 51 and 99 (e.g. “C51”).
          o    Targets/Threats. All points of the Targets/Threats type are indexed within the TGT/THRT
               partition with a leading “T” followed by two digits between 1 and 50 (e.g. “T01”). Targets/Threats
               occupy points 100-149 within the database, but are renamed to T01-T50 for presentation to the
               crew.
     The first 25 points within the WPTHZ and TGT/THRT partitions that are loaded by the DTC are considered
     “safe sets” and cannot be overridden using the STO functions on the TSD Point sub-page or by the CPG
     using the STORE/UPDT switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip. However, Waypoints, Hazards, or
     Targets/Threats within the “safe sets” may be manually deleted from the cockpit. Once a point is deleted
     from a “safe set”, the point may be overridden at any time in the flight unless the original point is re-loaded
     from the DTC.
•    Identifier (IDENT). A point’s identifier determines the symbol which is displayed at the point’s location on
     the TSD. 140 different symbols may be chosen, which are identified within the point file using a 1- or 2-digit
     alphanumeric code.
     Most identifiers are only valid when used with a specific point type. As an example, the Communications
     Checkpoint identifier of “CC” will only be accepted if the point type was set to Waypoint. However, several
     identifiers are used by multiple point types and will contextually display different symbols based on which
     point type was set prior to adding the point. As an example, if the point type was set to Control Measure
     and “BP” was entered as the identifier, a Battle Position symbol would be displayed; whereas if the point
     type was set to Target/Threat, a Blowpipe threat symbol would be displayed.
•    Free Text (FREE). A point’s free text may contain up to 3 alphanumeric characters that may be added to
     the point for additional context as to the nature of the location. If no free text is entered, the free text will
     simply repeat the point index (e.g. “W01”).
•    Coordinates (UTM LAT/LONG). A point’s coordinates is saved in both the MGRS and Latitude/Longitude
     coordinate systems. When a new point is added, or an existing point’s coordinates is edited, the point may
     be entered in either MGRS 8-digit format or Latitude/Longitude “Degrees, Minutes, Decimals” format
     (DD°MM.MM DDD°MM.MM), but the coordinates will automatically be converted to the opposite format
     when the coordinates are saved into the point file.
•    Altitude above mean sea level (ALTITUDE). A point’s altitude is saved in feet, based on the altitude
     above mean sea level (MSL).
     Digital Terrain Elevation Data (DTED) is typically loaded into the aircraft navigational database. When a new
     point is added, the altitude will always default to the terrain elevation based on the coordinates already
     saved within the point file. However, a different altitude may be entered if desired, which will place the point
     above (or below) the actual terrain elevation. This may be useful when inputting a route in which the points
     are desired to be displayed at specific altitudes, such as GPS approach waypoints or illumination rockets.
Choosing a Point Identifier
When adding a point during mission planning or while in the aircraft, there are many different types of point
symbols that may be selected from the list of 140 abbreviated identifier codes. Choosing the appropriate identifier
may be affected by several factors, such as the purpose of the point, the database partition the point will be
saved within, whether the point will be stored within a “safe set”, or whether the point displays its free text
directly on TSD alongside its symbol.
•    Purpose. Choosing a point symbol based on the purpose of the point itself is useful in providing an
     immediate context to the crewmembers when viewing the TSD. For example, using a Landing Zone symbol
     in place of a generic Waypoint symbol allows the crew to immediately recognize what type of location that
     point represents when viewing the TSD with a quick glance.
•    Partition. At times, choosing a point symbol may be predicated on whether a specific partition still contains
     empty point files that are available for use. As an example, entering enemy unit locations as Targets during
     pre-mission planning may quickly fill the TGT/THRT partition, leaving few empty point files available during
     the mission to store target locations observed within the TADS. Alternatively, many enemy locations may be
     stored as enemy control measure symbols.
•    Safe Set. Only the first 25 points in the WPTHZ and TGT/THRT partitions contain a “safe set” that is
     protected from accidental overwriting within the cockpit. As such, it may be desired to place certain
     waypoints within either of these safe set locations to preserve their data during the mission. As an example,
     it may be desired to load anticipated enemy air defense locations into the first 25 points within the TGT/THRT
     partition to ensure their locations are not overwritten when the CPG stores targets via the TADS. Another
     example may be placing any significant hazards (like towers or wires) that are expected to be encountered
     during low-level night operations may be loaded into the first 25 points within the WPTHZ partition.
•    Free Text. Most types of control measures will display the 3-character free text alongside their point symbol
     in lieu of their point index. Under some circumstances, it may be preferable to utilize these types of points
     if it is desired to leverage the free text itself in describing the nature of the location, even if the icon itself
     doesn’t correlate with the terrain or situation.
     In the example to the right, LZ “Falcon” is
     marked by a Landing Zone point on the left, and
     a Ground Light point on the right. A Landing
     Zone point will not display its free text of “FAL”
     directly on the TSD, but it can be viewed by
     entering the TSD Point sub-page and then
     selecting the point using the cursor to review its
     information. On the other hand, the Ground
     Light point displays its free text “FAL” directly
     on the TSD, but it may not be known by the                         Landing Zone (Left) and
     crew that this point represents an LZ location                Ground Light (Right) point symbols
     unless briefed as such.
     In this situation, it is a question of what the location means versus how it is labeled. This question of context
     should be taken into consideration when planning a mission in which other players may not be aware of the
     intent behind which points are being used for specific purposes.
Waypoints/Hazards (WPTHZ)
The Waypoints/Hazards partition includes graphics for depicting generic waypoints, communications checkpoints,
start and release points of routes, and hazards such as towers or wires. Some of the more commonly used
Waypoints/Hazards are shown below.




               Waypoint            Start Point      Release Point      Tower <1000’         Wires, Power

                                     Examples of Waypoint/Hazard Symbols


When a WPTHZ point file is set to an identifier that corresponds with a hazard, the point file is presented to the
crew as “H##” rather than “W##”, even though the point files are within the same partition.

It is important to note that hazards are always perpendicular to the flight path of the aircraft on the TSD and do
not depict the actual direction of the hazard, but its general location only. This is especially important to remember
regarding linear hazards such as wires.

Control Measures (CTRLM)
Control measures include graphics for depicting friendly and enemy units, Forward Arming and Refueling Points
(FARPS), battle positions, and others. Some of the more commonly used Control Measures are shown below.




    Airfield     Battle Position     Checkpoint     Ground Light       Friendly Infantry           Enemy Armor

                                     Examples of Control Measure Symbols


Targets/Threats (TGT/THRT)
Targets/Threats include symbols for depicting the location of targets found during the conduct of a mission or
for depicting the location of known or templated air defense systems.




                   Target Point       2S6         SA-8         SA-15      ZSU-23-4         Radar

                                       Examples of Target/Threat Symbols


When a point is entered as an air defense threat, rings depicting the detection and/or engagement ranges of the
corresponding air defense system may be displayed on the TSD. The display of threat rings may be
enabled/disabled on the TSD Threat Show (THRT SHOW) sub-page.

A complete list of point types and their symbols can be found on the TSD Abbreviation (ABR) sub-page or in
Appendix C of this manual.
TSD Point (POINT) Sub-page
The POINT sub-page allows either crewmember to add additional point files to the navigational database, edit or
delete existing point files from the navigational database, or transmit points to other flight members.
Other Tactical Situation Display functions and sub-pages are desribed in the AH-64D chapter.




                                                                                                                      7. ABR sub-page
             1. Review Point


          2. Add Point format
                                                                                                                      8. Reviewed Point
         3. Edit Point format


       4. Delete Point format


        5. Store Point format


     6. Transmit Point format
                                                                                                                      9. Review Status Window




1.      Review Point. Activates the KU for inputting a point file for review. Alternatively, a point may selected for
        review directly from the TSD by using the MPD cursor.
2.      Add Point format. Displays the ADD format for creating new point files.
3.      Edit Point format. Displays the EDIT format for editing existing point files.
4.      Delete Point format. Displays the DEL format for deleting existing point files.
5.      Store Point format. Displays the STO format for storing new point files using the CPG’s HMD or TADS
        lines-of-sight, or storing new point files at the current position of the ownship.
6.      Transmit Point format. Displays the XMIT format for transmitting existing point files to other AH-64D’s
        via the datalink modem (DL).
7.      ABR sub-page. Displays the TSD Abbreviation sub-page.
8.      Reviewed Point. The text of the point that is selected for review will be highlighted in inverse video format.
9.      Review Status Window. Displays information regarding the reviewed point.
                                Identification   Free Text   Estimated Time Enroute       Estimated Time of Arrival

              Point Index
                                                                                                               Distance to Point (KM)
             Earth Datum
                                                                                                               Distance to Point (NM)
             Datum Code
                                                                                                               Bearing to Point
                            Latitude/Longitude Coordinates   MGRS Coordinates         Altitude (MSL)
•   Point Index. The database partition and location within which the point resides.

•   Identification. The one- or two-character abbreviation of the point, which determines its specific
    symbol and color.

•   Free Text. The one-, two-, or three-character text that may be added to the point for additional
    context as to the nature of the location.

•   Estimated Time Enroute (ETE). The estimated elapsed time to travel to the point, based on the
    distance to the point from the ownship’s current position and the ownship’s current ground speed.

•   Estimated Time of Arrival (ETA). The estimated time of arrival at the point, based on the current
    system time and the estimated time enroute (ETE). The ETA time format (Local or Zulu) is based on
    the system time format selected on the TSD Utility page.

•   Earth Datum. The geodetic system used to determine the point’s location on the Earth.

•   Datum Code. The one- or two-character abbreviated code of the point’s Earth datum.

•   Distance to Point (KM). The distance from the ownship position to the point’s location, in kilometers.

•   Distance to Point (NM). The distance from the ownship position to the point’s location, in nautical
    miles.

•   Bearing to Point. The magnetic heading from the ownship position to the point’s location.

•   MGRS Coordinates. The location of the point, in Military Grid Reference System 8-digit grid format.

•   Latitude/Longitude Coordinates. The location of the point, in Latitude/Longitude Degrees,
    Minutes, Minute-Decimals format (DD°MM.MM DDD°MM.MM).

•   Altitude. The altitude of the point above mean sea level (MSL).
TSD Abbreviation (ABR) Sub-page
The ABR sub-page is used as an in-cockpit reference for either crewmember to review the abbreviated codes
(IDENT) that identify the specific point types when interacting with the point database, or adding a new point
through the TSD Point sub-page.
The ABR sub-page may also be accessed from the TSD Utility sub-page, as shown below.




             1. Point Type


            2. Point Name


     3. Point Identification




                                          4. Paging Controls

1.   Point Type. Denotes the type of all points listed below. The Point Type headers, followed by Earth Datum
     headers, are listed in the following sequence on the subsequent ABR sub-pages.
     •     WAYPOINTS                                             •    CLARK 1880              CL0
     •     HAZARDS                                               •    CLARK 1866              CL6
     •     GENERAL CTRLM                                         •    EVEREST SABAH           EVB
     •     FRIENDLY CTLRM                                        •    EVEREST 1830            EVE
     •     ENEMY CTRLM                                           •    INTERNATIONAL1924       INT
     •     PREPLANNED TGT/THRT                                   •    MODIFIED AIRY           MAI
     •     AIRY               AIR                                •    EVEREST 1948            MEV
     •     AUSTRALIAN NATL    AUS                                •    WORLD GEO SYS 72        W72
     •     BESSEL 1841        BES                                •    WORLD GEO SYS 84        W84

2.   Point Name. Denotes the name of the point.
3.   Point Identification. Denotes the abbreviated identification code of the point. This may be input via the
     Keyboard Unit (KU) when adding a new point to the TSD.
4.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of abbreviated identification codes.
Adding a Point
Points may be added to the TSD while the POINT sub-page is displayed in ADD format. A new point may be
added by manually entering point file data via the Keyboard Unit (KU) or by “dropping” a new point directly onto
the TSD via the MPD cursor.


POINT Add (ADD) format
Pressing the ADD button (VAB L2) displays the POINT sub-page in Add format. Pressing the ADD button a second
time returns the POINT sub-page to the original format.




                                                                                               7. ABR sub-page
                1. Add Point



      2. Waypoint Point Type


        3. Hazard Point Type


          4. Control Measure
              Point Type


            5. Target/Threat
               Point Type


      6. Next Point File Entry




1.   Add Point. Activates the KU for inputting new point file data. The first data element that may be input is
     the identifier. (See Adding a Point using the Keyboard Unit for more information.)
2.   Waypoint (WP) Point Type. Selects the WPTHZ partition for point entry and enables Waypoint-specific
     identifiers only: CC, LZ, PP, RP, SP, and WP. The selected point type will default to this selection when the
     POINT page is set to ADD format while the TSD Phase is set to NAV. (See Appendix C for a complete list of
     Waypoint identifiers.)
3.   Hazard (HZ) Point Type. Selects the WPTHZ partition for point entry and enables Hazard-specific
     identifiers only: TO, TU, WL, and WS. (See Appendix C for a complete list of Hazard identifiers.)
4.   Control Measure (CM) Point Type. Selects the CTRLM partition for point entry and enables Control
     Measure-specific identifiers only. (See Appendix C for a complete list of Control Measure identifiers.)
5.   Target/Threat Point (TG) Type. Selects the TGT/THRT partition for point entry and enables
     Target/Threat-specific identifiers only. The selected point type will default to this selection when the POINT
     page is set to ADD format while the TSD Phase is set to ATK. (See Appendix C for a complete list of
     Target/Threat identifiers.)
6.   Next Point File Entry. Displays the point file index that will be occupied by the next point that is entered.
7.   ABR sub-page. Displays the TSD Abbreviation sub-page.
Adding a Point using MPD Cursor
A new point may be added to the TSD quickly by selecting the desired point type (VAB L3-L6) and then “dropping”
the point onto the TSD at the desired location. However, if the “cursor drop” method is used to add a point, only
the point type may be selected and no further point file data may be entered. The default points that are dropped
at the cursor location are shown below, based on the selected point type.

     •    Waypoint (WP)

     •    Tower Under 1000’ (TU)
                                                   3. ADD (VAB L2)
     •    Checkpoint (CP)

     •    Target Point (TG)

When these points are “dropped”, the free text                     5. MPD Cursor Slew
will default to the point index within the
database (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”, “T04”
etc.). The coordinates will be entered based                       4. Point Type
on the cursor location and the altitude of the                      (VAB L3-L6)

point will be entered based on the terrain
elevation data for that location on that map.
To quickly add a point using the “cursor drop”
method, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
                                                  1. TSD Fixed Action Button             2. POINT (VAB B6)
4.   Point Type (VAB L3-L6) – Select WP,
     HZ, CM, or TG as desired.
5.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Slew to
     desired location on TSD.

                     Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                                   6. MPD Cursor Enter




6.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Press.
Adding a Point using Keyboard Unit (KU)
A new point may be added by manually entering point file data via the Keyboard Unit (KU). This method allows
the crewmember to input each element of the point file sequentially.
To add a point using the KU, perform the
following:                                                           4. ABR (VAB T3)

1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                   6. IDENT> (VAB L1)
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.   ABR (VAB T4) – Select, as required.
5.   Point Type (VAB L3-L6) – Select WP, HZ,                      3. ADD (VAB L2)
     CM, or TG as desired.
6.   IDENT> (VAB L1) – Select.
                                                                   5. Point Type
Once IDENT> (VAB L1) is pressed, the KU                             (VAB L3-L6)
scratchpad display will activate with “IDENT:”
as the display prompt. The elements of the
new point file may then be entered, with the
ENTER button on the KU commanding the KU
to accept the current entry and progress to the
next display prompt in the sequence.
If an entry is invalid and cannot be accepted
by the KU, the scratchpad display will flash.
Any button on the KU may then be pressed to
                                                  1. TSD Fixed Action Button           2. POINT (VAB B6)
acknowledge the invalid entry condition, after
which a different data entry may be input.
IDENT:
7.   Input identifier data, and press ENTER on the KU.


FREE:
8.   Input free text data, and press ENTER on the KU.


UTM LAT/LONG:
The KU scratchpad will initialize to the UTM LAT/LONG:
prompt by displaying the current MGRS coordinates of
the ownship. The cursor is automatically placed at the
first digit of the “easting” numerals (shown at right).
9.   Input location data using any of the following methods:
     •    Input MGRS coordinates in an 8-digit format
          as a continuous string without spaces and
          press ENTER on the KU (e.g., 38T KM 5644
          8074 would be input as “38TKM56448074”).
          If a different grid zone designator and/or square identifier is to be entered, the KU arrow keys should
          be used to place the cursor over the first character to be overwritten, and then the remainder of the
          coordinate data may be typed over.
     •    Press CLR and input Latitude/Longitude
          coordinates in Degrees-Minutes-Decimals
          format as a continuous string without spaces,
          decimals, or special characters and press
          ENTER on the KU (e.g., N42°14.45’
          E°042°02.88’ would be input as “N421445E0420288”)
     •    Press CLR and input the name of an existing
          point file to copy its coordinates into the new
          point file and press ENTER on the KU (e.g.,
          “W11”, “H05”, “C51”, “T04”, etc).
     •    Use the MPD Cursor Controller/Enter to slew the MPD cursor to the desired location on TSD and then
          press Cursor-Enter.
ALTITUDE:
The KU scratchpad will initialize to the ALTITUDE: prompt by displaying the digital terrain elevation data at the
coordinates that was just entered within the new point file. The cursor is automatically placed at the first digit.
10. Input altitude data using either of the following methods:
     •    Accept the default terrain elevation by pressing ENTER on the KU.
     •    Input a different altitude value in feet above
          mean sea level (MSL) by typing over the
          existing data and press ENTER on the KU.


After the altitude data has been accepted, the
new point file will be saved within the
navigational database and automatically
selected for review on the POINT sub-page.




                                                                 New point file selected
                                                                 for review after entry
Editing a Point
Points may be edited while the POINT sub-page is displayed in EDIT format. Existing point files may receive
changes to their free text, coordinates, or altitude data elements; however the point file identifier may not be
changed.


POINT Edit (EDIT) format
Pressing the EDIT button (VAB L3) displays the POINT sub-page in Edit format. Pressing the EDIT button a
second time returns the POINT sub-page to the original format.




            1. Edit Point



                                                                                              2. Reviewed Point




                                                                                               3. Review Status Window




1.   Edit Point. Activates the KU for editing point file data of the point selected for review. The first data element
     that may be edited is the free text. (See Editing a Point using the Keyboard Unit for more information.)
2.   Reviewed Point. The text of the point that is selected for review will be highlighted in inverse video format.
3.   Review Status Window. Displays information regarding the reviewed point.
Editing a Point using Keyboard Unit (KU)
An existing point can only be edited by manually entering point file data via the Keyboard Unit (KU). This method
requires the crewmember to review each element of the point file sequentially and, if necessary, input new data
using the KU when the respective prompt is displayed on the KU scratchpad.
To edit a point using the KU, perform the
following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                   3. POINT> (VAB L1)
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     point index of the point to be edited into
     the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”,
     “T04”, etc).
     or
3.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select
     the point to be edited on TSD.                4. EDIT (VAB L3)



                      Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                  1. TSD Fixed Action Button           2. POINT (VAB B6)




4.   EDIT (VAB L3) – Select.                       5. FREE> (VAB L1)

5.   FREE> (VAB L1) – Select.
Once FREE> (VAB L1) is pressed, the KU
scratchpad display will activate with “FREE:”
as the display prompt. The elements of the
point file may then be edited, with the ENTER
button on the KU commanding the KU to
accept the current entry and progress to the
next display prompt in the sequence.
If an entry is invalid and cannot be accepted
by the KU, the scratchpad display will flash.
Any button on the KU may then be pressed to
acknowledge the invalid entry condition, after
which a different data entry may be input.
FREE:
6.   If the existing free text is desired, simply press
     ENTER to accept the existing data.
     If different free text data is desired, the new free
     text may be input by typing over the existing data
     and then press ENTER on the KU.
UTM LAT/LONG:
The KU scratchpad will initialize to the UTM LAT/LONG:
prompt with the cursor automatically placed at the first
digit of the “easting” numerals (shown at right).
7.   If the existing location is desired, simply press
     ENTER to accept the existing data.
     If different location data is desired, the new location data may be input using any of the following methods:
     •    Input MGRS coordinates in an 8-digit format
          as a continuous string without spaces and
          press ENTER on the KU (e.g., 38T KM 5644
          8074 would be input as “38TKM56448074”).
          If a different grid zone designator and/or square identifier is to be entered, the KU arrow keys should
          be used to place the cursor over the first character to be overwritten, and then the remainder of the
          coordinate data may be typed over.
     •    Press CLR and input Latitude/Longitude
          coordinates in Degrees-Minutes-Decimals
          format as a continuous string without spaces,
          decimals, or special characters and press
          ENTER on the KU (e.g., N42°14.45’
          E°042°02.88’ would be input as “N421445E0420288”)
     •    Press CLR and input the name of an existing
          point file to copy its coordinates into the new
          point file and press ENTER on the KU (e.g.,
          “W11”, “H05”, “C51”, “T04”, etc).
     •    Use the MPD Cursor Controller/Enter to slew the MPD cursor to the desired location on TSD and then
          press Cursor-Enter.
ALTITUDE:
The KU scratchpad will initialize to the ALTITUDE: prompt with the cursor automatically placed at the first digit.
8.   If the existing altitude is desired, simply press ENTER to accept the existing data.
     If different altitude data is desired, input a different
     altitude value in feet above mean sea level (MSL)
     by typing over the existing data and press ENTER
     on the KU.
After the altitude data has been accepted, the
changes to the point file will be reflected
within the navigational database and may be
reviewed within the Review Status Window on
the POINT sub-page.
In the image shown to the right, the free text
was modified from the default data of “W01”
to “SPT”, with the existing location and
altitude data accepted without changes.


                                                 Edited point file data shown
                                                  in Review Status Window
Deleting a Point
Points may be deleted while the POINT sub-page is displayed in DEL format. A confirmation must be received by
the crewmember to delete the point from the navigational database.


POINT Delete (DEL) format
Pressing the DEL button (VAB L4) displays the POINT sub-page in Delete format and replaces the DEL button
with a two-button Grouped button confirmation option. Pressing the NO button (VAB L4) will abort the deletion
process and return the POINT sub-page to the original format.




              1. Review Point



                                                                                               4. Reviewed Point

     2. Confirm Point Deletion


       3. Abort Point Deletion




                                                                                               5. Review Status Window




1.      Review Point. Activates the KU for inputting a point file for review. Alternatively, a point may selected for
        review directly from the TSD by using the MPD cursor. (See Deleting a Point for more information.)
2.      Confirm Point Deletion. Deletes the point that is selected for review.
3.      Abort Point Deletion. Aborts the deletion process and returns the POINT sub-page to the original format.
4.      Reviewed Point. The text of the point that is selected for review will be highlighted in inverse video format.
5.      Review Status Window. Displays information regarding the reviewed point.
Deleting a Point
To delete an existing point, perform the
following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                3. POINT> (VAB L1)
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     point index of the point to be deleted
     into the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”,
     “T04”, etc).
     or
3.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select
     the point to be deleted on TSD.
                                                4. DEL (VAB L4)
                     Cursor Controller/Enter




                                               1. TSD Fixed Action Button   2. POINT (VAB B6)




4.   DEL (VAB L4) – Select.
5.   YES (VAB L3) – Select to confirm
     deletion.
                                                5. YES (VAB L3)
     or
5.   NO (VAB L4) – Select to abort deletion.




                                                 5. NO (VAB L4)
Storing a Point
Waypoints or Target Points may be selectively stored to the TSD while the POINT sub-page is displayed in STO
format. A new point may be stored using either a “flyover” store or a “CPG Sight” store.
When the POINT sub-page is displayed in STO format, the Review Status window will display the information
that will be entered into the next point file if the NOW button (VAB L1) is pressed or, in the case of the CPG, if
the STORE/UPDT button on the TEDAC Left Handgrip is momentarily set to the STO position. This includes the
next empty point file index of the selected type, and the aircraft’s current position and altitude.


POINT Store (STO) format
Pressing the STO button (VAB L5) displays the POINT sub-page in Store format. Pressing the STO button a second
time returns the POINT sub-page to the original format.




               1. Store Now




               2. Point Type
                                                                                              3. Review Status Window


     3. Next Point File Entry




1.     Store Now. Stores a new point at the current coordinates of the ownship. (See Storing a Point using Fly-
       over for more information.)
2.     Point Type. Toggles the point type of the next point to be stored.
       •      WP. The next point to be stored will be entered as a Waypoint (WP). The point type will default to this
              selection when the POINT page is set to STO format while the TSD Phase is set to NAV.
       •      TG. The next point to be stored will be entered as a Target Point (TG). The point type will default to
              this selection when the POINT page is set to STO format while the TSD Phase is set to ATK.
3.     Next Point File Entry. Displays the point file index that will be occupied by the next point that is stored.
4.     Review Status Window. Displays the coordinates that will be entered into the next point file if the NOW
       button (VAB L1) is pressed. When a point is stored using NOW (VAB L1), the point’s free text is
       automatically entered as “FLY”. When a point is stored using the CPG HMD or TADS, the point’s free text
       is automatically entered as “HMD” or “TAD” respectively.
Storing a Point using Fly-over
A new point may be stored to the TSD using the current aircraft position in a “fly-over” method, and may be
performed by either crewmember.
To store a point at the current aircraft position,
perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
4.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as
     desired.                                         5. NOW (VAB L1)

5.   NOW (VAB L1) - Select.
                                                      3. STO (VAB L5)
After storing the point, the TSD will return to
the main format of the POINT sub-page, and
display the fly-over point’s information in the
Review Status window.



                                                      4. TYPE (VAB L6)




                                                     1. TSD Fixed Action Button          2. POINT (VAB B6)




                                                                          Stored Point
Storing a Point using CPG Sight (HMD)
A new point may be stored to the TSD using the CPG HMD line-of-sight. Although a manual range may be used
if necessary, an automatic range will typically provide greater precision when operating over relatively flat terrain.
To store a point at the CPG’s HMD line-of-sight
using an Automatic range, perform the
following:
1.   Sight Select switch – HMD.
2.   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
3.   MANRNG (VAB B6) – Select, enter “A”
     on the KU, and press ENTER.                                                        Stored Point


4.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
5.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.                        6. STO (VAB L5)

6.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
7.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as
     desired.
8.   Position the HMD LOS Reticle over the
     desired location.
                                                     7. TYPE (VAB L6)
9.   STORE/UPDT switch – STO.



                                                    4. TSD Fixed Action Button             5. POINT (VAB B6)




         9. STORE/
        UPDT Switch




                                                                                                       Stored Point Index




                                                           Storing a point using the HMD line-of-sight
Storing a Point using CPG Sight (TADS)
A new point may be stored to the TSD using the TADS line-of-sight. Although an automatic or manual range may
be used if necessary, a laser range will provide the best precision when storing a point using the TADS.
NOTE: The CPG may store a Target Point (TG) at the TADS line-of-sight and current range source any time the
TADS is the selected sight and the STORE/UPDT switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip is momentarily set to the
STO position. The TSD is not required to be displayed and set to the STO sub-page to perform this action.
Although this method allows targets to be
stored more quickly by excluding steps 3
through 6 below, the option to store a
Waypoint (WP) in lieu of a Target Point (TG)
will not be available if the POINT sub-page
STO format is not utilized.
To store a point at the CPG TADS line-of-sight
using a laser range, perform the following:
                                                                               Stored Point
1.   NVS Mode switch – OFF, if applicable.
2.   Sight Select switch – TADS.                  6. STO (VAB L5)

3.   Sight Manual Tracker – Position the
     TADS LOS Reticle over the desired
     location.
4.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
5.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
                                                  7. TYPE (VAB L6)
6.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
7.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as
     desired.
8.   ARM/SAFE button – ARM.                      4. TSD Fixed Action Button          5. POINT (VAB B6)

9.   LRFD trigger – 1 detent for ranging.
                      st


10. STORE/UPDT switch – STO.




        10. STORE/
        UPDT Switch




                                                                                              Stored Point Index




                                                       Storing a point using the TADS line-of-sight
ROUTES
The AH-64D navigational database can store 10 unique routes, each consisting of up to 100 point entries. Route
sequences may consist of any combination of Waypoints/Hazards and Control Measures, but may not include any
points from the Targets/Threats partition. However, “direct” routes may be plotted from the aircraft’s current
position to any point file within the database at any time, to include Targets/Threats.




Routes typically consist of a Start Point (SP) and end with a Release Point (RP). When planning a mission, it is
useful to have multiple ingress and egress routes to and from the objective area. A route should not be considered
a flight plan, but rather an avenue to reach the objective area, reposition to different sectors of the battlefield,
or a method to control multiple flights of aircraft. As such, most route points are not required to be directly
overflown.
In the example below, a basic route is shown on the TSD that includes a Start Point, a Communications
Checkpoint, a standard Waypoint, a Release Point, and a solid green line linking each point within the route.




                                          Route Structure and Format

If a TSD is not displayed on either MPD within the crewstation, the EUFD will display “WAYPOINT APPROACH” in
the advisory column to alert the crewmember of an impending turn to the next route point. This advisory will
display when the estimated time enroute (ETE) to that route point is 60 seconds at the current ground speed.
When passing the route point, even if the aircraft does not directly overfly it, the next route point is automatically
set as the new destination and “WAYPOINT PASSAGE” is displayed on the EUFD for 90 seconds.
TSD Route (RTE) Sub-page
The RTE sub-page is used to review information regarding the current route and its points, plot a direct route to
a different point in the route or any point outside of the current route sequence, or edit the current route by
adding or deleting points from the route sequence. Routes themselves may be selected or deleted entirely from
the TSD Route Menu sub-page.
NOTE: If a point is deleted from a route sequence, it is not removed from the navigational database. Point files
may only be deleted from the database using the TSD Point sub-page.
By default, the current route is only displayed on the TSD page when set to NAV phase, or any time the RTE sub-
page is displayed. However, the current route may be enabled for display on the TSD in the ATK phase if desired.
(See TSD Show sub-page for more information.)




        1. Aircraft Heading                                                                 7. Reviewed Point


             2. Route Line
                                                                                            8. Route Scroll


       3. Add Point format



                                                                                            9. Route Points Window
     4. Delete Point format


     5. Direct Route format


                                                                                            8. Route Scroll

     6. Command Heading                                                                     10. Review Status Window


                                                                                            11. RTM sub-page




1.     Aircraft Heading. Displays a digital readout of the aircraft’s current magnetic heading in 1° increments.
2.     Route Line. Displays the current route as a solid green line.
       When a direct route is created to any point file, the direct route will be displayed as a full intensity green
       line and the route line will be displayed as a partial intensity green line

3.     Add Point format. Displays the ADD format for adding points to the current route.
4.     Delete Point format. Displays the DEL format for removing points from the current route.
5.     Direct Route format. Displays the DIR format for creating a direct route to an existing point file.
6.     Command Heading. Indicates the magnetic heading to the point selected for navigation.
7.     Reviewed Point. The text of the point that is selected for review will be highlighted in inverse video format.
8.     Route Scroll. Scrolls the Route Points window forward through route sequence when VAB R1 is pressed,
       or backward through the route sequence when VAB R6 is pressed.
9.   Route Points Window. Displays the point files within the current route sequence and permits selection of
     the points for review, navigation, editing of the current route. The points window may be scrolled forward
     or backwards through the route sequence using the Route Scroll buttons (VAB R1/R6).
            •      Each point file within the Route Points window is displayed as a 4-character sequence, with the
                   first two characters representing the point file’s identifier code, and the last two characters
                   representing the point file’s numerical index within its database partition. In the example to the
                   left, the point file is W04 within the WPTHZ partition, which is identified as a Release Point.
            •      When a point file within the Route Points window is selected for review, the point’s label within
                   the Route Points window is outlined within a box.
            •      When a point file within the Route Points window is selected as the navigation destination, the
                   point’s label within the Route Points window is underlined.
10. Review Status Window. Displays information regarding the reviewed route point.
                        Identification   Free Text   Estimated Time Enroute   Estimated Time of Arrival

         Point Index
                                                                                                   Distance to Point (KM)

                                                                                                   Distance to Point (NM)



     •    Point Index. The database partition and location within which the point resides.

     •    Identification. The one- or two-character abbreviation of the point, which determines its specific
          symbol and color.

     •    Free Text. The one-, two-, or three-character text that may be added to the point for additional
          context as to the nature of the location.

     •    Estimated Time Enroute (ETE). The estimated elapsed time to travel to the next point within the
          route sequence, and each subsequent route leg, until arrival at the reviewed point within the route
          sequence, based on the current ground speed.

          When a direct route is created to any point file, the ETE will be calculated based on the straight-line
          distance from the ownship position to the reviewed point and the current ground speed.

     •    Estimated Time of Arrival (ETA). The estimated time of arrival at the reviewed point, based on the
          current system time and the estimated time enroute (ETE). The ETA time format (Local or Zulu) is
          based on the system time format selected on the TSD Utility sub-page.

          When a direct route is created to any point file, the ETA will be calculated based on the straight-line
          distance from the ownship position to the reviewed point and the current ground speed.

     •    Distance to Point (KM). The combined distance, in kilometers, from the ownship position to the next
          point within the route sequence, and each subsequent route leg, until arrival at the reviewed point.

          When a direct route is created to any point file, the distance will be calculated as a straight-line distance
          from the ownship position to the reviewed point.

     •    Distance to Point (NM). The combined distance, in nautical miles, from the ownship position to the
          next point within the route sequence, and each subsequent route leg, until arrival at the reviewed
          point.

          When a direct route is created to any point file, the distance will be calculated as a straight-line distance
          from the ownship position to the reviewed point.

11. RTM sub-page. Displays the TSD Route Menu sub-page.
TSD Route Menu (RTM) Sub-page
The RTM sub-page is used to select a different route sequence for navigation, reverse the current route sequence,
or delete all point files from any of the stored route sequences.
                                                  1. Route Select




           2. Current Route
                                                                                           4. Route Name


                                                                                           5. Route Sequence
                                                                                            Status Windows




     3. Route Select Mode
                                                                                            6. Reverse Route Sequence




                                             7. Paging Controls


1.     Route Select. Selects a route sequence for navigation or for deletion, depending on the Route Select Mode
       that has been selected at (VAB L4/L5).
2.     Current Route. Indicates the route sequence that is being used for navigation.
3.     Route Select Mode. Determines the function of the Route Select buttons (VAB T1-T5).
       •       NEW. The Command Heading, Navigation Fly-To Cue, and Waypoint Status windows will switch
               navigation to the first point within the selected route sequence, and any direct route lines will be
               removed from the TSD.
       •       DELETE. All point files are removed from the route sequence that is subsequently selected. The route
               name will remain and cannot be changed from within the cockpit.
4.     Route Name. Displays the 5-character name of the corresponding route sequence.
5.     Route Sequence Status windows. Displays the first six point files within the route sequence, in order of
       navigation.
6.     Reverse Route Sequence. Inverts the route sequence so that the route may be flown in the reverse
       direction. Each point file will automatically sequence to the next in reverse order as the route is flown. The
       Route Sequence Status windows will update accordingly to reflect the sequence.
7.     Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back between the first and second pages of route sequences.
Creating a Route using the Mission Editor
When using the Mission Editor, waypoints placed on the map from the Helicopter Group’s Route tab will auto-
populate into the DCS: AH-64D as the default TSD route sequence, Route “ALPHA”. Each waypoint following the
initial Helicopter Group position (waypoint 0) will be displayed as a Waypoint (WP) on the TSD, as part of Route
“ALPHA”, and numbered in accordance with their sequence within the Mission Editor.
NOTE: It is currently only possible to generate one route in the Mission Editor. The remaining nine routes on the
Route Menu (RTM) sub-page will be empty of any points. However, points may be added to the remaining routes
from the cockpit, if desired, after the mission starts.




                     Initial position of Helicopter Group




                                                             WP02 in Route “ALPHA”




                                                                                                WP03 in Route “ALPHA”
      WP01 in Route “ALPHA”




                                       Mission Editor – Helicopter Group Route

Point files within the AH-64D’s navigational database are input and displayed in three dimensions, therefore it
may be advisable to set the altitude of all waypoints within the Mission Editor to the minimum value, which
corresponds with ground level; especially if intended to mark a specific location or landmark. However, under
certain circumstances it may be useful to place them at altitudes above ground, depending on how they are
intended to be utilized during the mission. This may be useful to mark locations over the battlefield for illumination
rockets or to build 3-dimensional instrument approaches during low-visibility conditions.
Creating a Route using the Route (RTE) sub-page
When creating a new route, an empty route should be selected on the TSD Route Menu sub-page. After an empty
route has been selected, it may be necessary pan the TSD to the first point to be added to the route, and any
subsequent points, if not currently located within the viewable TSD footprint. Alternatively, if the point file indexes
of the points are known, they may be manually input using the Keyboard Unit (KU).
NOTE: Routes may only be created or
modified using existing points within the
navigational database, which cannot be added
from the TSD Route sub-page. (See TSD Point           4. POINT> (VAB L1)
sub-page for more information).
To add points to a new route, perform the
following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                                                 4. MPD Cursor
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
                                                      3. ADD (VAB L2)
3.   ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     point index of the point to be added into
     the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”, etc).
     or                                                                                                        5. Route Point
                                                                                                              “END” (VAB R5)
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the
     point to be added on TSD.

                       Cursor Controller/Enter

                                                    1. TSD Fixed Action Button              2. RTE (VAB B5)




5.   Route Point (VAB R5) – Select the button
     adjacent to the route “END” identifier to
     place the point at the start of the route.
     The route “END” identifier will move to
     the following position within the route
     sequence.
6.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     point index of the next point to be added
     into the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”,                                                          7. Route Scroll
     etc).                                         6. POINT> (VAB L1)                                    (VAB R1)

     or
6.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the
     next point to be added on TSD.
                                                                                   8. Route Points
7.   The Route Scroll buttons (VAB R1/R6)                                           (VAB R2-R5)
     may be used as necessary to advance up
     (or down) within the route sequence.
8.   Route Point (VAB R2-R5) – Select the
     button adjacent to the route “END”
     identifier to place the next point at the
     end of the route.
                                                       Route line re-drawn after
                                                         each point is added          6. MPD Cursor
     The route “END” identifier will move to
     the following position within the route
                                                                                                      7. Route Scroll
     sequence. Repeat steps 6 and 7 as                                                                   (VAB R6)
     necessary until all points are added to the
     route sequence as intended.
     As each point is added, the route line will
     be re-drawn as appropriate.
     NOTE: If it is desired to insert any points into an existing route, or to remove points from the route, see
     Editing a Route on the following pages.
Creating a Direct Route using the Route (RTE) sub-page
Any point within the navigational database may be used to create a direct route, to include Target/Threat points.
When a direct route is created, a solid green line will be plotted from the ownship’s present position to the point,
and the route sequence will be displayed in partial intensity.
NOTE: If the point that is selected for creation
of a direct route is within the current route
sequence, upon arrival at the point the direct
route will be removed, the route sequence will        4. POINT> (VAB L1)
return to full intensity, and the route will
sequence through the remainder of the
subsequent route points.
To create a direct route to a point, perform the
following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                                    4. MPD Cursor
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   DIR (VAB L5) – Select.
4.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     point index for creating a direct route into
                                                      3. DIR (VAB L5)
     the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”, etc).
     or
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the
     point desired for creating a direct route.

                       Cursor Controller/Enter       1. TSD Fixed Action Button       2. RTE (VAB B5)




                                                                                                        4. Route Scroll
                                                                                                           (VAB R1)




                                                                                      5. Route Points
                                                                                       (VAB R2-R5)



     or, if the point is part of the current route
4.   Route Scroll (VAB R1/R6) – Select, as
     necessary.
                                                                  Direct Route Line
5.   Route Points (VAB R2-R5) – Select the
     button that corresponds with the point
     desired for creating a direct route.
                                                                                                        4. Route Scroll
                                                                                                           (VAB R6)
Editing a Route using the Route (RTE) sub-page
To remove a point from the current route,
perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.                                                                      4. Route Scroll
                                                                                                              (VAB R1)
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   DEL (VAB L4) – Select.
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the
     point to be removed on TSD.                                                         5. Route Points
                                                  3. DEL (VAB L4)
                                                                                          (VAB R2-R5)

                     Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                                    4. MPD Cursor


                                                                                                           4. Route Scroll
                                                                                                              (VAB R6)




                                                 1. TSD Fixed Action Button              2. RTE (VAB B5)
     or
4.   Route Scroll (VAB R1/R6) – Select, as
     necessary.
5.   Route Points (VAB R2-R5) – Select the
     button that corresponds with the point to
     be removed.

                                                                               Route line re-drawn
                                                                              after point is removed
To insert a point into the current route,
perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                  4. POINT> (VAB L1)
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     point index of the point to be inserted
     into the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”,
     etc).                                        3. ADD (VAB L2)

     or
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the
     point to be inserted on TSD.
                                                                    4. MPD Cursor
                     Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                 1. TSD Fixed Action Button               2. RTE (VAB B5)




                                                                                                             5. Route Points
                                                                                                              (VAB R2-R5)
5.   Route Points (VAB R2-R5) – Select the
     button that corresponds with the desired
     location within the route to which the                                         Route line re-drawn to
     point will be inserted.                                                        include inserted point

                        NOTE: When a point
                        is inserted into a
                        position within the
                        route sequence that
                        is not the END, the
                        point that is located
                        at    that   position
                        within the route
                        sequence will move
                        to the subsequent
                        position above it. All
                        other points that
                        follow will move to
                        subsequent positions
                        accordingly.
Selecting a Route using the Route Menu (RTM) sub-page
The route marked as CURRENT on the RTM sub-page is the route sequence currently being utilized for the
purpose of navigation.
To select a new route for navigation, perform
the following:                                                                                        6. Route Select
                                                                                                       (VAB T1-T5)
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   RTM (VAB B6) – Select.
4.   NEW (VAB L4) – Verify boxed.
5.   Paging Controls (VAB B2/B3) – Select as     4. NEW (VAB L4)
     necessary to view the available route
     sequences.
6.   Route Select (VAB T1-T5) – Select the
     desired route sequence.
7.   REVERSE ROUTE (VAB R5) – Select as
     necessary, depending on the direction                                   5. Paging Controls         7. REVERSE
     the route is intended to be flown.                                         (VAB B2/B3)           ROUTE (VAB R5)




                                                1. TSD Fixed Action Button     2. RTE (VAB B5)    3. RTM (VAB B6)
Deleting a Route using the Route Menu (RTM) sub-page
All point files within a route sequence may be deleted on the RTM sub-page, however the name of the route
sequence itself will remain.
To select a route for deletion, perform the
following:                                                                                           6. Route Select
                                                                                                      (VAB T1-T5)
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   RTM (VAB B6) – Select.
4.   DEL (VAB L5) – Select
5.   Paging Controls (VAB B2/B3) – Select as
     necessary to view the available route
     sequences.
6.   Route Select (VAB T1-T5) – Select the
     route sequence that is intended for
     deletion.
7.   YES (VAB L4) – Select to confirm           4. DEL (VAB L5)             5. Paging Controls
     deletion.                                                                 (VAB B2/B3)

     or
7.   NO (VAB L5) – Select to abort deletion.


                                               1. TSD Fixed Action Button     2. RTE (VAB B5)    3. RTM (VAB B6)




                                                 7. YES (VAB L4)




                                                 7. NO (VAB L5)
RADIO NAVIGATION
IN LOW-VISIBILITY CONDITIONS
Although the AH-64D was not designed to perform flight within Instrument Meteorological Conditions (IMC), it
can perform limited navigation under such conditions with on-board equipment. This equipment primarily includes
the AN/ARN-149 Automatic Direction Finder (ADF) receiver, the Instruments (INST) sub-page of the TSD, along
with the associated navigation symbology on the Flight (FLT) page and in the IHADSS Flight symbology.




The AN/ARN-49 ADF is a radio navigation receiver with a directional antenna that can determine a coarse azimuth
to an AM radio signal within the frequency range of 100.0 to 2199.5 kHz. Audio from AM radio signals received
within this frequency range may also be monitored by the crew using the ADF audio channel of the ICS system.
The ADF receiver is controlled through the TSD Instruments (INST) sub-page on the TSD. The INST sub-page
format enables the crew to determine relative bearings from known Non-Directional Beacon (NDB) stations; and
integrates the radio navigation equipment with the existing functionality of the TSD moving map, routes, points
database, waypoint status, winds, and endurance data.
(See the TSD Instruments sub-page for more information.)
Setting the Color Band Shading to “A/C” on the TSD Map sub-page may aid in maintaining clearance above terrain
and obstacles when operating in low-visibility conditions.
NOTE: The Common Missile Warning System (CMWS) utilizes the ADF audio channel of the ICS to provide missile
threat warnings to the crew. To monitor the ADF receiver audio, the CMWS/NAV switch must be set to the NAV
position on the CMWS Control Panel, which is located in the Pilot crewstation.
TSD Instruments (INST) Sub-page
The INST sub-page of the Tactical Situation Display is a sub-page optimized for radio navigation and includes
controls for the AN/ARN-149 Automatic Direction Finder (ADF).
Any time the INST sub-page is displayed, the Horizontal Situation Indicator (HSI) will be displayed around the
Ownship, regardless of whether the crewmember has enabled the HSI for display on the TSD SHOW sub-page.
NOTE: If the ARN-149 ADF receiver is not powered on the INST Utility sub-page, the following items will not be
displayed on the INST sub-page.
     •       ADF    Frequency (VAB L3)                            •    ADF Tone (VAB R4)
     •       Last   ADF Frequency (VAB L5)                        •    ADF Identification (VAB R5)
     •       ADF    Status Window                                 •    ADF Test (VAB R6)
     •       ADF    Bearing Pointer
All remaining functions of the Tactical Situation Display (TSD) page that are not described below are described
in the Multi-Purpose Display (MPD) section of the AH-64D chapter.


     1. Stopwatch Controls

                                                                                          3. UTIL sub-page
         2. Stopwatch Timer

                                                                                          4. ADF Status Window
             6. Selected
           Heading Indicator
                                                                                          5. ADF Bearing Pointer
         7. Selected Heading


           8. ADF Frequency


                                                                                          10. ADF Tone


     9. Last ADF Frequency                                                                11. ADF Identification


                                                                                          12. ADF Test


                                                                                            13. Reverse
                                                                                          Heading Indicator




1.   Stopwatch Controls. Controls the stopwatch timer within the crewstation.
     •       START/STOP. Starts or pauses the stopwatch timer. When the stopwatch timer is running, the START
             label will be replaced with the STOP label. When the stopwatch timer has been paused or reset, the
             STOP label will be replaced with the START label.
     •       RESET. Stops and resets the stopwatch timer to 0:00:00.
2.   Stopwatch Timer. Displays the elapsed time in H:MM:SS format, from 0:00:00 to a maximum of 9:59:59.
     NOTE: The stopwatch timer in each crewstation is independent of the other. Starting, stopping, or resetting
     the stopwatch timer in one crewstation will have no effect on the stopwatch timer in the other crewstation.
3.   UTIL sub-page. Displays the INST Utility sub-page.
4.   ADF Status Window. Displays the tuned ADF Preset ID, ADF frequency, and morse code equivalent of the
     Preset ID for identifying the NDB station via the ADF audio channel. If the ADF is manually tuned to a
     frequency in lieu of an ADF Preset, only the ADF frequency will be displayed.
     When the ADF is tuned to an emergency frequency (500 or 2182 kHz), the ADF status window will display
     EMER and the morse code equivalent of “S-O-S”.
5.   ADF Bearing Pointer. Indicates the bearing toward the AM radio signal as measured by the ADF receiver.
6.   Selected Heading Indicator. Indicates the Selected Heading value input via the KU.
7.   Selected Heading. Activates the KU for inputting a magnetic heading. After entry, the Selected Heading
     Indicator will be displayed at this heading around the HSI. Valid frequency headings are 001˚ to 360˚ in 1-
     degree increments.
8.   ADF Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a frequency. After entry, the ADF receiver will be tuned to
     this frequency. Valid frequency range is 100.0-2199.5 kHz in 0.1 kHz increments.
9.   Last ADF Frequency. Tunes the ADF to the previous radio frequency. Subsequent presses of this button
     will toggle between the current and previous frequencies.
10. ADF Tone. Not implemented.
11. ADF Identification. Not implemented.
12. ADF Test. Performs a test of the ADF receiver. When pressed, the ADF Bearing Pointer will momentarily
    shift 90° clockwise before returning to the original bearing. A faulty system circuit could cause the ADF
    Bearing Pointer to shift to a value other than 90° clockwise.
     NOTE: The rate at which the ADF Bearing Indicator returns to the original bearing direction indicates the
     relative strength of the AM signal being received. The faster the return, the stronger the signal.
13. Reverse Heading Indicator. Indicates the reverse heading from the Selected Heading input via the KU.
Any time the ARN-49 ADF is set to ADF mode on the INST Utility sub-page and is receiving a signal over the
corresponding frequency, the ADF Bearing Indicator (resembling an inverted “lollipop”) will be displayed along
the Heading Tape on the FLT page and in the IHADSS Flight symbology.




                                                            ADF Bearing Indicator

                                  ADF Bearing Indicator




                                            ADF Bearing Indicator
TSD Instruments, Utility (UTIL) Sub-page
The INST Utility sub-page includes controls for powering the AN/ARN-49 ADF receiver, tuning the ADF to a preset
NDB station, or editing any of the ten preset NDB stations.
NOTE: If the ARN-149 ADF receiver is not powered at VAB B6, the remaining items on the INST Utility sub-page
will not be displayed.


                                                                                               1. ADF Preset Tune




                                                                                               2. ADF Mode




     3. ADF Presets 1↓5                                                                        3. ADF Presets 6↓10




                                                                                               7. ADF Receiver Power


                          4. ADF Emergency Tune   5. ADF Preset ID   6. ADF Preset Frequency


1.   ADF Preset Tune. Tunes the ADF receiver to the selected ADF Preset.
2.   ADF Mode. Toggles the ADF receiver between Automatic Direction Finder (ADF) and Antenna (ANT) modes.
     •    ADF. Displays the ADF Bearing Pointer for indicating the measured bearing to the received AM radio
          signal and supplies received radio audio to the ADF audio channel.
     •    ANT. Supplies received radio audio to the ADF audio channel but does not display the ADF Bearing
          Pointer.
3.   ADF Presets. Selects the corresponding ADF Preset for tuning or editing.
4.   ADF Emergency Tune. Tunes the ADF receiver to an international distress frequency.
     •    500. Tunes the ADF receiver to 500.0 kHz.
     •    2182. Tunes the ADF receiver to 2182.0 kHz.
5.   ADF Preset ID. Activates the KU for inputting a new 3-character identifier for the selected ADF Preset.
6.   ADF Preset Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a new frequency for the selected ADF Preset. Valid
     frequency range is 100.0-2199.5 kHz in 0.1 kHz increments.
7.   ADF Receiver Power. Enables/disables the AN/ARN-49 ADF receiver.
Tuning the ADF to an NDB Frequency
The ADF receiver may be tuned to a manual frequency on the INST sub-page or to a preset frequency on the
INST UTIL sub-page. After powering the ADF receiver (VAB B6) on the INST UTIL sub-page, additional options
are presented to the crew on both sub-pages which include ADF presets and emergency frequencies for tuning.
To tune the ADF to a manual or preset
frequency, perform the following:                                            3. UTIL (VAB T6)

1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                2. INST (VAB L1)
2.   INST (VAB L1) – Select.
3.   FREQ> (VAB L3) – Select and input the
     manual frequency using the KU.
     or
3.   UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
4.   Preset (VAB L2-L6, R2-R6) – Select as
     desired.                                   3. FREQ> (VAB L3)

5.   TUNE (VAB T5) – Select.




                                               1. TSD Fixed Action Button




                                                                      5. TUNE (VAB T5)




                                                4. Presets (VAB L2-L6)                          4. Presets (VAB R2-R6)
Editing an ADF Preset
An existing ADF preset may be edited by entering a different 3-character identifier or radio frequency via the
Keyboard Unit (KU). The ADF status window will automatically display the morse code that should be expected
to be heard over the NDB station based on the 3-character identifier of the tuned preset.
To edit an ADF preset using the KU, perform
the following:                                                                  3. UTIL (VAB T6)

1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
                                                  2. INST (VAB L1)
2.   INST (VAB L1) – Select.
3.   UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
4.   Preset (VAB L2-L6, R2-R6) – Select as
     desired.
5.   ID> (VAB B4) – Select and input the
     desired 3-character identifier.
6.   FREQ> (VAB B5) – Select and input the
     desired frequency.




                                                 1. TSD Fixed Action Button




                                                  4. Presets (VAB L2-L6)                            4. Presets (VAB R2-R6)




                                                                              5. ID> (VAB B4)   6. FREQ> (VAB B5)
RADIO
COMMUNICATIONS




RADIO COMMUNICATIONS
RADIO COMMUNICATIONS
The AH-64D’s communications systems are fully integrated into the avionics, allowing either crewmember to
interact with and use any radio onboard the aircraft through the EUFD and MPD controls.



                   ARC-186(V) VHF /
                 ARC-201D FM1 Antenna


                         ARC-220 HF Antenna




                           ARC-164(V) UHF Antenna   ARC-201D FM2 Antenna




                                        Radio Communications Equipment

The ARC-186(V) VHF radio provides two-way line-of-sight communications over VHF-AM frequencies and is
normally used for communicating with Air Traffic Control (ATC). The radio is not capable of secure
communications. Its antenna is located on the top of the cambered fin.
The ARC-164(V) UHF radio provides two-way line-of-sight communications over UHF-AM frequencies and is
normally used for communicating with ATC, other aircraft, or ground forces. The radio contains an additional
receiver tuned to the GUARD frequency of 243.0 MHz, the ability to communicate on HAVE QUICK frequency-
hopping nets, and can be connected to a KY-58 module for secure communications. Its antenna is located on the
underside of the tail boom, aft of the navigational sponson containing the Doppler velocity and radar altimeter
antennas.
Two ARC-201D SINCGARS (Single Channel Ground and Airborne Radio System) radio sets provide two-way line-
of-sight communications over VHF-FM frequencies and are normally used for communicating with ground forces
and other AH-64 team members. Both radios have embedded secure communications capability and can
communicate on frequency-hopping nets. The FM1 radio shares the tail-mounted whip antenna with the VHF
radio, and the FM2 antenna is located on the underside of the tail boom, forward of the navigational sponson.
The FM1 radio is paired with an Improved FM (IFM) amplifier which can vary the output power of the radio.
The ARC-220 HF radio provides two-way, non-line-of-sight (NLOS) and over-the-horizon (OTH) communications
over shortwave frequencies. The radio has an embedded modem for sending and receiving data transmissions,
can operate using frequency-hopping nets, and can be connected to a KY-100 module for secure communications
capability. The ARC-220 is also capable of communications using Automatic Link Establishment (ALE) multi-
channel nets to decrease crew workload and increase communications reliability. The HF radio utilizes a near-
vertical incidence skywave (NVIS) type antenna which runs along the right side of the tail boom and is paired
with a dedicated amplifier which can vary the output power of the radio.
Communications Architecture
The operation of the AH-64D’s communications system is designed for use in combat, in which the expected
nature of the mission involves the employment of teams, platoons, or entire companies of AH-64D’s against
conventional ground forces. The architecture of the communications system integrates voice and data networks
into a single interface and is optimized for pre-planned operations; but remains sufficiently flexible to respond to
a rapidly evolving battlefield or last-minute changes in the mission.


                                                                           AWACS
                                                                           “OVRLD”
                                                            VHF: 148.975
                                                            UHF: 322.800

                        DARKHRSE
                         “DRKHR”
         VHF: 138.925                                                                                DARKHRSE
         UHF: 285.250                                                                                 “DRKHR”
          FM: 41.150                                                                  VHF: 138.925
                                                                                      UHF: 285.250
                                                                                       FM: 41.150

                                                                                                            RED TM
                                                                                                            “REDTM”
                                                                                                                                    SENAKI
                                            RED TM                                                                   VHF: 132.000   “KOLKI”
                COMMAND                         “REDTM”                                                              UHF: 362.000
    UHF: 248.950    “SBR-X”                                                                                           FM: 40.600
     FM: 31.250                                                                                                        HF: 4.3000
      HF: 12.0858

                                                  FIRES
                                                  “FIRES”
                                   FM: 38.225
                                   FM: 44:025




The architecture of the AH-64D communications interface                              Communications Preset            COM page (Preset format)
primarily revolves around the use of “presets”. Up to 10 presets
may be accessed on the COM page at any given time. Unlike                                  Unit ID    PRESET EDIT sub-page
singular preset frequencies that may be selected from a physical
                                                                                           Callsign   PRESET EDIT sub-page
radio control panel, each preset within the AH-64D includes:
                                                                                           Frequencies    PRESET EDIT sub-page
•      Details regarding the unit, echelon, or organization the
       preset pertains to.                                                                Network Members        NET sub-page

•      A list of frequencies that may be utilized for voice and data                      Modem Settings        MODEM sub-page
       transmission, to include the primary frequency and radio
       that are intended to be used during the mission.                               Communications Preset Architecture
•      A list of flight members that may send/receive data through the datalink network associated with that preset.
•      Modem settings used when sending/receiving data over the datalink network associated with that preset.
When one of the ten presets are selected on the main COM page, the COM page is displayed in Preset format,
which presents information pertinent to that preset, such as the unit ID, callsign, and frequencies, and allows
that preset to be tuned (which will also configure the datalink according to the network and modem settings).
If desired, the crewmember may edit details or frequencies of the preset itself by accessing the PRESET EDIT
sub-page. Additionally, the network members of the preset may be edited on the NET sub-page, and the modem
settings on the MODEM sub-page. (See the Datalink chapter for more information regarding datalink network
and modem settings.)
Communications Controls
The aircrew interacts with and controls the communications equipment using a combination of the Multi-Purpose
Displays (MPD), the Enhanced Upfront Display (EUFD), and the Communications Panel located within each
cockpit. (See the COM page for more information regarding MPD controls.)


EUFD Controls
The Enhanced Up-Front Display (EUFD) provides the aircrew with a consolidated location for viewing the current
configuration and datalink settings of each radio, and the transponder.




    Radio Transmit                                                                              Radio Tuning
     Select Rocker                                                                             Control Buttons




                                  Radio Status Area      Transponder Status Area


If generator power is lost, crewmembers may still use any radio using the EUFD while operating on battery power,
to include tuning preset frequencies.
(See Enhanced Up-Front Display (EUFD) for more information.)


Communications Panel Controls
The Communications panel controls
the volume of the intercom and radios.
The panel can also be used to toggle
                                             Radio Volume/
the squelch of an individual radio or       Monitor Controls
change the ICS mode of operation.
(See Communications Panel for more            Radio Squelch
information.)                                   Controls




                                          Intercom Controls




                                               Transponder
                                              IDENT button
Communications (COM) Page
The Communications page presents an overview of the aircraft’s communications system. The COM page displays
10 presets that may be assigned to a radio for voice/data communications, the aircraft’s current datalink
configuration, and the transponder state. The COM page also includes access to additional MPD pages for
configuring specific radio equipment, manually tuning a radio frequency for voice-only communications, and
sending/receiving text messages and mission files over the datalink.
See the Datalink chapter for more information regarding the Datalink (DL) page, Originator ID (ORIG ID) sub-
page, and Message (MSG) sub-pages.
                                1. DL page     2. XPNDR page    3. UHF page   4. FM page    5. HF page




           6. DAY Select                                                                                   7. Ownship
                                                                                                         Status Window




     8. Radio Presets 1↓5                                                                                8. Radio Presets 6↓10




          9. PRESET DIR                                                                                  10. Transponder Master
             sub-page




                                                                                                         14. Message sub-pages



                            11. MAN sub-page     12. Fallback Mode   13. ORIG ID sub-page


1.   DL page. Displays the Datalink (DL) page. (N/I)
2.   XPNDR page. Displays the Transponder (XPNDR) page. (N/I)
3.   UHF page. Displays the UHF radio page. (N/I)
4.   FM page. Displays the FM radio page. (N/I)
5.   HF page. Displays the HF radio page. (N/I)
6.   DAY Select. Not implemented.
7.   Ownship Status Window. Displays the aircraft’s current network configuration for datalink operations.
8.   Radio Presets. Displays the Preset format with additional options for editing or tuning the selected preset.
     Each preset entry is labeled using the preset’s Unit ID and the selected modem protocol, if any.
     If any radios have been tuned to the preset, the corresponding radio(s) will be identified in the second line
     of text directly below the preset entry. If more than three radios have been tuned to the same preset, the
     VHF, UHF, FM1, FM2, and HF radios will be truncated as V, U, 1, 2, and H, respectively.
9.   PRESET DIR sub-page. Not implemented.
10. Transponder Master. Sets the transponder to Normal (NORM) operation or Standby (STBY).
11. Fallback Mode. Not implemented.
12. MAN sub-page. Displays the Manual (MAN) sub-page.
13. ORIG ID sub-page. Displays the Originator ID (ORIG ID) sub-page.
14. Message sub-pages. Displays the corresponding sub-pages for sending or receiving messages via the
    datalink.
Tuning a Radio to a Preset
When a preset is selected, the COM page displays information about the preset, options along the top of the
page for tuning the preset to a radio net, and options along the bottom of the page for editing the preset itself.


COM Preset Format
Selecting a preset displays the COM page in Preset format with a box around the preset selection. Selecting the
same preset a second time de-selects the preset and returns the COM page to its original format.
                                                     1. Radio Tuning




                                                                                                    2. Preset
                                                                                                 Status Window




         3. Primary Frequency




                                                    4. NET sub-page    5. PRESET EDIT sub-page

1.   RADIO Tuning. Displays preset tuning options for any of the aircraft’s radios.
     •     RADIO – VHF. Displays VHF tuning options.
     •     RADIO – UHF. Displays UHF tuning options.
     •     RADIO – FM1. Displays FM1 tuning options.
     •     RADIO – FM2. Displays FM2 tuning options.
     •     RADIO – HF. Displays HF tuning options.
2.   Preset Status Window. Displays the preset’s unit ID, callsign, frequency list, primary frequency, and
     modem protocol, if any.
3.   Primary Frequency. The preset’s primary frequency and corresponding radio is highlighted in white.
4.   NET sub-page. Displays the Network (NET) sub-page. (See the Datalink chapter for more information.)
5.   PRESET EDIT sub-page. Displays the Preset Edit (PRESET EDIT) sub-page.
COM Preset Format – Tuning Options
Selecting a radio when the COM page is in Preset format will display additional options for how the preset is
assigned to the corresponding radio. Selecting the same radio a second time de-selects the radio, removes the
additional options, and restores the MAN, NET, and PRESET EDIT sub-page options.




                                          1. TUNE Mode     2. TUNE Select


1.   TUNE Mode. Selects the radio tuning mode that will be used when a preset is assigned to the selected
     radio.
     •    PRI. The selected preset will be assigned to the primary slot of the selected radio.
          When a preset is assigned to a radio in the primary slot, the corresponding radio will be tuned to the
          preset. The preset or manual frequency that is already in the primary slot will be transferred to the
          standby slot, and the preset or manual frequency that is already in the standby slot will be removed.
     •    STBY. The selected preset will be assigned to the standby slot of the selected radio.
          When a preset is assigned to a radio in the standby slot, the preset or manual frequency that is already
          in the standby slot will be replaced by the selected preset.
2.   TUNE Select. Displays tuning options for the selected preset and selected radio.
     •    TUNE – FH. Not implemented.
     •    TUNE – FH/M. Not implemented.
     •    TUNE – SC. Assigns the single-channel (i.e., single frequency) radio net displayed within the Preset
          Status window to the selected radio, in accordance with the selected Tune mode.
Tuning a Radio to a Preset using an MPD
When a preset is selected from the COM page, tuning options will be sequentially presented for the crewmember
to choose which radio to assign the preset, whether the preset is assigned to the primary or standby slots on the
EUFD, and which type of radio net is assigned to the radio.
To assign a preset to a radio using an MPD,
perform the following:                                                                                   3. RADIO
                                                                                                        (VAB T1-T5)
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   Preset (VAB L1-L5, R1-R5) – Select as
     desired.
3.   RADIO (VAB T1-T5) – Select as desired.
4.   TUNE Mode (VAB B2) – Set as PRI or
     STBY as desired.
5.   TUNE Select (VAB B6) – Select SC.
After the radio is tuned as selected, the TUNE
Select options will collapse and a different
radio may be selected (VAB T1-T5) to tune
from the same preset.                                                           2. Preset
                                                                            (VAB L1-L5, R1-R5)




                                                             4. TUNE Mode     5. TUNE Select     1. COM Fixed Action Button




Tuning a Radio to a Preset using the EUFD
Pressing the EUFD Preset button displays the Preset list for the selected radio along the right side of the EUFD.
While this menu is displayed, the WCA rocker is used to scroll up and down within the preset list. Once a preset
has been selected with the arrow, pressing the Enter button will assign the selected preset to the primary slot of
the corresponding radio, which will then be tun ed to the preset frequency.
To assign a preset to a radio using the EUFD, perform the following:
1.   EUFD Preset button – Press to
     display the preset list
2.   RTS rocker switch – Select
     radio to tune.                                                                                      Preset Button

3.   WCA rocker switch – Select
     preset frequency from preset
     list.
                                                                                                         Enter Button
4.   EUFD Enter button – Press.
The EUFD Preset function can be useful to tune a radio without changing an MPD to the COM page. The Preset
function on EUFD is limited to tuning single-channel frequencies only and cannot be used to tune frequency-
hopping nets.
Editing a Preset
Any preset may be edited from within the cockpit by either crewmember. The preset may be modified in how it
is presented on the MPD’s and EUFD, which frequencies are tuned when the preset is assigned to a radio, or the
composition of the network and modem settings when the preset is utilized for datalink functions.


COM Preset Edit (PRESET EDIT) Sub-Page
The PRESET EDIT sub-page allows the aircrew to modify any data associated with the selected preset. The
datalink network and modem settings associated with the preset may be modified from the NET and MODEM
sub-pages respectively. (See the Datalink chapter for more information.)
UNIT Edit Options
The UNIT options allow the crewmember to edit how the preset itself is presented on the MPD’s and EUFD.
                                                  1. EDIT Option Select




                                                                                                2. Preset
                                                                                             Status Window



         3. Preset Unit ID


         4. Preset Callsign




            5. Primary
         Frequency Select




1.   EDIT Option Select. Displays options for editing other data fields within the displayed preset.
2.   Preset Status Window. Displays the preset’s unit ID, callsign, frequency list, primary frequency, and
     modem protocol, if any. Data fields that may be changed using the current Edit options are shown in full-
     intensity. Data fields that may be changed from another Edit option are shown in partial-intensity.
3.   Preset Unit ID. Activates the KU for inputting a Unit ID for the preset. The Unit ID determines how the
     preset is displayed on the COM page and EUFD Preset list. Up to 8 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
4.   Preset Callsign. Activates the KU for inputting a Callsign for the preset. The Callsign determines how the
     preset is displayed on the EUFD when assigned to a radio. Up to 5 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
5.   Primary Frequency Select. Displays options for designating a primary frequency and radio for the preset.
     When assigned as Primary, the corresponding entries on the COM Preset format are displayed in white to
     highlight the intended radio and net with which the preset is intended to be utilized. The primary designation
     does not affect the function of any radio equipment or how the preset is assigned to a specific radio.
V/UHF Edit Options
The V/UHF edit options allow the crewmember to edit the VHF and UHF radio configurations when the preset is
assigned to the ARC-186(V) or ARC-164(V) radios, respectively.




         6. VHF Frequency



                                                                                           7. UHF Settings




6.   VHF Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a VHF-AM frequency for the preset. Valid frequency entries
     are between 116.000 and 151.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
7.   UHF Settings. Displays settings for configuring UHF radio nets for the preset.
     •    MODE. Toggles the UHF radio between unsecure (PLAIN) and secure (CIPHER) communications. (N/I)
     •    CNV. Displays options for secure radio communications. (N/I)
     •    HQ NET>. Activates the KU for inputting a Have Quick net for the preset. (N/I)
     •    FREQ>. Activates the KU for inputting a single-channel UHF-AM frequency for the preset. Valid
          frequency entries are between 225.000 and 399.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
FM Edit Options
The FM edit options allow the crewmember to edit the FM1 or FM2 radio configurations when the preset is
assigned to either of the ARC-201D radios.




           8. FM1 Settings                                                             9. FM2 Settings




         10. FM Data Swap




8.   FM1 Settings. Displays settings for configuring FM1 radio nets for the preset.
     •    MODE. Toggles the FM1 radio between unsecure (PLAIN) and secure (CIPHER) communications. (N/I)
     •    CNV. Displays options for secure radio communications. (N/I)
     •    HOPSET. Displays options for frequency-hopping radio communications. (N/I)
     •    FREQ>. Activates the KU for inputting a single-channel VHF-FM frequency for the preset. Valid
          frequency entries are between 30.000 and 87.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
9.   FM2 Settings. Displays settings for configuring FM2 radio nets for the preset.
     •    MODE. Toggles the FM2 radio between unsecure (PLAIN) and secure (CIPHER) communications. (N/I)
     •    CNV. Displays options for secure radio communications. (N/I)
     •    HOPSET. Displays options for frequency-hopping radio communications. (N/I)
     •    FREQ>. Activates the KU for inputting a single-channel VHF-FM frequency for the preset. Valid
          frequency entries are between 30.000 and 87.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
10. FM Data Swap. Swaps the FM radio options between the FM1 and FM2 configurations.
HF Edit Options
The HF edit options allow the crewmember to edit the HF radio configuration when the preset is assigned to the
ARC-220 radio.




   11. HF CRYPTO Settings                                                                15. HF RECV Settings



     12. HF Preset Channel
                                                                                         16. HF XMIT Settings
           13. HF ALE Net


             14. HF ECCM
                 Net




11. HF CRYPTO Settings. Displays settings for configuring the HF radio for secure radio communications.
     •    MODE. Toggles the HF radio between unsecure (PLAIN) and secure (CIPHER) communications. (N/I)
     •    CNV. Displays options for secure radio communications. (N/I)
12. HF Preset Channel. Activates the KU for inputting a preset HF channel for the preset. (N/I)
13. HF ALE Net. Activates the KU for inputting an HF ALE net for the preset. (N/I)
14. HF ECCM Net. Activates the KU for inputting an ECCM net for the preset. (N/I)
15. HF RECV Settings. Displays settings for configuring single-channel HF radio reception for the preset.
     •    HF Receive Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a single-channel HF frequency for the preset.
          Valid frequency entries are between 2.0000 and 29.9999 MHz, in 0.0001 MHz increments.
     •    HF Receive Emission Mode. Not implemented.
16. HF XMIT Settings. Displays settings for configuring single-channel HF radio transmissions for the preset.
     •    HF Transmit Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a single-channel HF frequency for the preset.
          Valid frequency entries are between 2.0000 and 29.9999 MHz, in 0.0001 MHz increments.
     •    HF Transmit Emission Mode. Not implemented.
Manually Tuning a Radio
If necessary, the radios may be manually tuned to a frequency that is not included within a programmed preset.
However, manually tuning a radio will also remove any datalink capability through that radio. When a radio is
manually tuned, the Callsign list on the EUFD will display “MAN” to the right of the corresponding frequency.
When a manual frequency is entered, it is always assigned in the primary slot of the corresponding radio, which
will be immediately tuned to the frequency. The preset that is already in the primary slot will be transferred to
the standby slot. This allows any unplanned radio communications over the manual frequency to occur
immediately, which may be time critical due to a change in mission or rapid changes on the battlefield; but also
allows the aircrew to just as easily return to the previous preset (and datalink network) prior to the radio being
manually tuned.


COM Manual (MAN) Sub-Page
The MAN sub-page allows either crewmember to tune a radio frequency that is not included within a programmed
preset or to rapidly tune the VHF or UHF radios to international GUARD frequencies.
                                               1. GUARD Tune      2. SOI sub-pages




         3. VHF Frequency
                                                                                                    7. HF RECV Settings
         4. UHF Frequency


         5. FM1 Frequency
                                                                                                    8. HF XMIT Settings
         6. FM2 Frequency




                            9. VHF Receiver   10. VHF Tone     11. UHF Receiver      12. UHF Tone
                               Bandwidth                          Bandwidth


1.   GUARD Tune. Immediately tunes the VHF or UHF radios to a GUARD frequency.
     •      VHF. Sets the current VHF frequency to the standby frequency slot and tunes the primary VHF
            frequency to 121.500 MHz.
     •      UHF. Sets the current UHF frequency to the standby frequency slot and tunes the primary UHF
            frequency to 243.000 MHz.
2.   SOI sub-pages. Not implemented.
3.   VHF Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a VHF-AM frequency. If the entry is valid, the current VHF
     frequency will be set to the standby frequency slot and the frequency entered on the KU will be tuned to
     the primary VHF frequency slot.
     Valid frequency entries are between 108.000 and 151.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments. Frequencies
     between 108.000 and 115.975 MHz are limited to receive-only.
4.   UHF Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a UHF-AM frequency. If the entry is valid, the current UHF
     frequency will be set to the standby frequency slot and the frequency entered on the KU will be tuned to
     the primary UHF frequency slot.
     Valid frequency entries are between 225.000 and 399.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
5.   FM1 Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a VHF-FM frequency. If the entry is valid, the current FM1
     frequency will be set to the standby frequency slot and the frequency entered on the KU will be tuned to
     the primary FM1 frequency slot.
     Valid frequency entries are between 30.000 and 87.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
6.   FM2 Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a VHF-FM frequency. If the entry is valid, the current FM2
     frequency will be set to the standby frequency slot and the frequency entered on the KU will be tuned to
     the primary FM2 frequency slot.
     Valid frequency entries are between 30.000 and 87.975 MHz in 0.025 MHz increments.
7.   HF RECV Settings. Manually sets the HF receive frequency and emission mode.
     •   HF Receive Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting an HF frequency. If the entry is valid, the
         current HF frequency will be set to the standby frequency slot and the frequency entered on the KU
         will be tuned to the primary HF frequency slot.
         Valid frequency entries are between 2.0000 and 29.9999 MHz, in 0.0001 MHz increments.
     •   HF Receive Emission Mode. Not implemented.
8.   HF XMIT Settings. Manually sets the HF transmit frequency and emission mode.
     •   HF Transmit Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting an HF transmission frequency. If the entry is
         valid, the current HF transmit frequency will be set to the standby frequency slot and the frequency
         entered on the KU will be tuned to the primary HF frequency slot.
         Valid frequency entries are between 2.0000 and 29.9999 MHz, in 0.0001 MHz increments.
     •   HF Transmit Emission Mode. Not implemented.
9.   VHF Receiver Bandwidth. Not implemented.
10. VHF Tone. When pressed, the VHF audio channel will emit a solid tone for maintenance testing.
11. UHF Receiver Bandwidth. Not implemented.
12. UHF Tone. When pressed, the UHF audio channel will emit a solid tone for maintenance testing.
Manually Tuning a Radio Frequency
To manually tune a VHF frequency, perform
the following:                                                             3. FREQ>
                                                                        (VAB L1-L4, R1)
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   VHF> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
     frequency.

To manually tune a UHF frequency, perform
the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   UHF> (VAB L2) – Select and input the                                                 4. FREQ> (VAB R3)
     frequency.

To manually tune an FM frequency, perform
the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
                                                             2. MAN (VAB B2)               1. COM Fixed Action Button
3.   FM1> (VAB L3) – Select and input the
     frequency.
     or
3.   FM2> (VAB L4) – Select and input the frequency.

To manually tune an HF frequency, perform the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   HF RECV – FREQ> (VAB R1) – Select and input the receive frequency.
4.   HF XMIT – FREQ> (VAB R3) – Select and input the transmit frequency.
RADIO HAND CONTROLS
Either crewmember may transmit over any radio, using either the PTT/RTS switch on the cyclic grip or the left
floor-mounted foot switch.


Cyclic & Collective Controls
The Pilot and Copilot/Gunner Cyclic Grips include identical controls for radio
selection and transmission.
Pressing the switch to the left transmits over the crewmember’s selected
radio. Pressing the switch to the right transmits over the ICS between the
two crewstations (and ground crews). Depressing the PTT/RTS switch
inward advances the EUFD Radio Transmit Select Indicator for the
crewstation to the next radio in sequence.
                                                                                     Push-To-Talk/Radio
                                                                                    Transmit Select Switch




Foot Controls
The Pilot and Copilot/Gunner crewstations include floor-mounted foot switches for radio and ICS transmission.
Pressing the left floor switch transmits over the crewmember’s selected radio. Pressing the right floor switch
transmits over the ICS between the two crewstations (and ground crews).



                     Radio Push-To-Talk                                     ICS Push-To-Talk
                      CPG Floor Switch                                      CPG Floor Switch




                       Radio Push-To-Talk                                        ICS Push-To-Talk
                        Pilot Floor Switch                                       Pilot Floor Switch
TACTICAL EMPLOYMENT




TACTICAL EMPLOYMENT
ATTACK HELICOPTERS IN COMBAT
The most basic description of an attack helicopter is a rotary-winged aircraft that is specifically equipped with
weapons and munitions to destroy targets on the battlefield. For attack helicopters that are designed to engage
medium and heavy armor units, a common euphemism to describe such helicopters is a “flying tank”. While this
may convey the relative lethality these attack helicopters possess when compared to a main battle tank, it often
lends itself to a misconception that attack helicopters are bulletproof or can withstand enormous amounts of
punishment while continuing to engage enemy forces.




                  FLYING TANK                                                FLYING TANK




Although most attack helicopters are armored or reinforced against various calibers of weapons fire, such
protection is only in the most critical areas of the airframe. Extra armor equates to additional weight, which
hinders performance of the aircraft itself, as well as reducing the amount of fuel or weapons the helicopter can
carry to the fight. Because of this limitation, armored protection is prioritized for the most critical components (to
include the aircrew), with system redundancy and crashworthiness making up the remainder of the aircraft
resistance to hostile fire.
Such redundancy and crashworthiness are implemented to ensure crew survival and recovery of the airframe to
friendly locations for repairs. While “fighting to the death” as shown in the movies may seem worthwhile to
achieve immediate mission results, in reality it hinders the long-term strategic objectives of a military conflict. An
attack helicopter, by its nature as an airborne weapons system, can
achieve something that similarly armed ground vehicles cannot:
mobility and speed across any terrain or obstacle. This speed and
the ability to traverse any terrain by simply flying above it means an
attack helicopter can more easily attack targets behind enemy lines,
engage targets that are beyond the reach of friendly artillery,
perform reconnaissance and screening operations in areas that
ground vehicles cannot, and more rapidly respond to changes on the
battlefield in real-time.
Attack helicopters can be employed independently of ground forces
to shape the battlefield ahead of friendly ground offensives.
Alternatively, they may be employed in conjunction with ground
forces to mass fires against the enemy at decisive points in a battle;
or used as close-in security to protect friendly ground forces from
hostile attack. Depending on which country or branch of service an
attack helicopter originates, such units are employed as either Close
Air Support (CAS) aircraft or as “maneuver units” (much in the same
manner infantry or armor units are employed in conventional                           YAH-64A (US Army)
maneuver warfare).
                          AH-64D flying over Fort Irwin, CA (US Army photo by SGT Charles Probst)


In the CAS role, one key difference between attack helicopters and most fixed-wing attack aircraft is the economy
of firepower. Fixed-wing attack aircraft may be able to physically carry a much greater payload of munitions as
far as pure tonnage is concerned, but purpose-built attack helicopters are often equipped with a greater number
of smaller munitions that are accurate and highly effective against various types of ground vehicles.
                                                              In addition, most attack helicopters are also equipped
                                                              with machine guns or medium-caliber automatic
                                                              cannons coupled with highly accurate fire control
                                                              systems that can engage or suppress ground forces at
                                                              close ranges, as well as unguided rocket systems for
                                                              large area suppression. Most modern attack helicopters
                                                              are quite capable of employing all of these weapon
                                                              systems against multiple targets within a short time
                                                              span, without the time needed by fixed-wing attack
                                                              aircraft to reorient between attack runs against
                                                              successive targets. This persistence of fire allows attack
                                                              helicopters to maintain pressure on enemy forces in a
                                                              manner that cannot be matched by fixed-wing aircraft.



                   YAH-64A (US Army)
Mobility, Standoff, and Planning
                                                        The primary advantage of a helicopter on the battlefield
                                                        when compared to their ground vehicle counterparts is
                                                        their ability to cover distances across any terrain within a
                                                        short amount of time. This battlefield mobility allows
                                                        helicopters to rapidly move troops and equipment to the
                                                        rear of enemy echelons, rapidly resupply or reinforce
                                                        dispersed units, evacuate wounded soldiers to receive
                                                        medical treatment, respond to enemy attacks on flanks of
                                                        friendly units, respond to calls for fire support along the
                                                        front line, or exploit targets of opportunity beyond the
                                                        front line.
As discussed above, helicopters are still quite vulnerable to enemy weapons fire. When hovering or flying at low-
speed, helicopters are vulnerable to engagement by ATGM’s or even a tank’s main gun. The primary method for
attack helicopters to mitigate such threat weapons is standoff. Whenever possible, an attack helicopter aircrew
should always choose a battle position that places the enemy within the maximum effective range of their
weapons, while remaining outside the maximum effective range of the enemy’s. When standoff cannot be
maintained due to changes on the battlefield, the aircrew can utilize the attack helicopter’s mobility to rapidly re-
position the attack helicopter to regain and maintain that standoff for as long as possible. This maximizes the
attack helicopter’s lethality against the enemy, while minimizing the enemy’s ability to engage it.
A key part in maintaining standoff from enemy forces, especially in situations where enemy positions are not well
known, is planning. Even before climbing into the cockpit, air routes, terrain, suspected/known enemy positions,
enemy weapon systems, and even the weather, should all be evaluated to understand how each factor will affect
the aircrew’s ability to maintain standoff or remain masked behind terrain from the enemy. However, even with
a thorough plan, discretion should be taken when moving within hostile territory. Blindly bounding from one
position to the next without performing reconnaissance of the route to that next position, and any potential fields
of observation or fire, is a good way to be surprised by a missile or stream of tracers directed at your aircraft.


                                                                            Tree lines and terrain features can hide enemy
                                                                             units just as easily as it can your helicopter,
                                                                                potentially resulting in a lethal surprise




                           Enemy units may be lurking around the next tree line

It is very possible that an attack helicopter aircrew can get themselves pinned down by hostile ground forces. If
the aircrew rushes from one terrain feature to the next without verifying the security of their next position or the
route to get there, the aircrew may be unable to go forward, they may be unable to go back, and if they climb
above the terrain, they may be engaged by air defenses. In this instance, the aircrew may need to risk the
success of their mission by expending significant quantities of munitions to fight their way out.
      Alternative route to cover/concealment
       if hostile fire is received while moving
                to next battle position




                                                                                     Scanning area around next battle
                                                                                     position for possible enemy units




                            Recon next battle position with alternative sources of cover

Weapons discipline is another practice that is important. Despite its firepower, an attack helicopter only has a
limited amount of munitions onboard to achieve the mission. These weapons should be used in a manner that
achieves the maximum effect on the battlefield whenever possible. Destroying every enemy that is detected while
enroute to the objective may feel satisfying, but running out of munitions prior to achieving the mission
objective(s) will remove that satisfaction quickly. Attack helicopters, by nature of their mobility and standoff, have
the advantage of being more selective about what engagements they choose to commit to, from where they may
engage their targets, and what targets they bypass and report to higher echelons.
Even when the primary objective is spotted, tactical patience should be exercised to fully develop the situation
and determine what else may be in the area. Prior to pulling the trigger, scanning the area for other enemy
positions nearby is important to ensure survival of the attack helicopter team. If the team has enough weapons
to spare, it may be wise to sanitize the immediate area of any threats (such as air defense units) prior to engaging
the primary targets.
Masking/Un-Masking and Terrain Flight
During armed conflicts in theaters which contain large numbers of air defenses, low-level tactics are the best
advantage that attack helicopters can employ. Although fixed-wing aircraft can use high speeds to minimize the
time spent inside the engagement zone of an air defense unit, helicopters must use terrain and other forms of
cover to limit their exposure to attain a reasonable level of survivability. The level of exposure and time spent
outside of cover and concealment should be primarily dependent on threat reaction time, but also may be
predicated on the time needed to perform sensor scans of an area or employ a weapon against a target. These
two factors – time needed by the enemy to detect/engage you versus time needed by you to detect/engage the
enemy – should constantly be weighed against the other throughout the mission as the tactical situation evolves.
When used in a conflict against armor supported by air defenses, attack helicopters such as the AH-64 are often
maneuvered akin to an infantryman or a sniper, rather than a conventional aircraft. When attack helicopters
utilize terrain and other forms of cover and concealment to remain hidden from enemy observation, this is known
as “masking”. When moving between battle positions near enemy units, attack helicopters bound from one battle
position to the next to minimize exposure to enemy fire (much in the same manner an infantryman bounds from
cover to cover) in an effort to remain undetected for as long as possible until they are ready to attack.
To perform sensor scans of the battlefield or engage enemy targets with their weapon systems, attack helicopters
must “un-mask” from behind cover. Depending on the nature of the cover/concealment, attack helicopters may
un-mask vertically or laterally to expose their sensors or weapon systems. When an attack is initiated, the enemy
should be engaged within the shortest amount of time possible before re-masking and relocating to a different
battle position. Weapons fire reveals the attack helicopter’s presence to the enemy, just as a sniper reveals his
position by firing on the enemy.


                                   Vertical “un-masking”

          Lateral “un-masking”




                                       Un-masking from behind cover

The most advantageous factor attack helicopters can use for their protection is terrain. Mother Earth will always
provide the best protection from enemy observation and weapons fire, just assuredly as it protects the
infantryman. However, low-altitude flight can be quite demanding on an aircrew, especially at night or in low-
visibility conditions. As such, the speed that helicopters can attain when operating at low altitudes is dependent
on the nature of the terrain, the tactical situation, the time of day, enemy air defenses, and how much power
margin is available to the aircrew.
Conversely, in a threat environment where air defenses are low and the most prevalent threat to helicopters is
small arms fire such as rifles or machine guns, it may be advantageous to maintain a higher altitude outside the
engagement ranges of such weapons. This will improve the range at which aircrews can detect the enemy, as
well as placing less demand on an aircrew when compared to flying at low altitude, allowing them to focus on
engaging the enemy.
AH-64 TACTICAL EMPLOYMENT
Pre-mission planning is the most important part of any successful combat mission. Just as in the case with other
military aircraft, factors such as terrain and threat locations should be considered when planning mission routes,
altitudes, and weapon loads. Routes and altitudes should be selected to maximize survivability and reduce the
probability of detection by threat weapon systems.
Routes, pre-planned targets, enemy threats, and other graphical control measures can be displayed on the AH-
64D’s Tactical Situation Display (TSD) along with information from the aircraft’s sensors to enhance situational
awareness and provide an overview of the surroundings. The TSD can further enhance situational awareness of
potential threat blind spots by using Color Bands (enabled from the TSD Map sub-page and TSD Threat Show
sub-page) and selecting an appropriate map type and scale. Configuring the SHOW options on the TSD is
important in ensuring critical information is present on the TSD for crews to reference during each phase of the
mission.
Upon departure from the airfield, assembly area, or FARP, or when approaching the Forward Edge of Battle Area
(FEBA), aircrews should conduct pre-combat checks and ensure the aircraft is ready to respond to enemy contact.
Accordingly, the AH-64D team should adjust their formation and flight patterns to those which are best suited for
the tactical situation, terrain, and airspeeds they intend to fly.


Team Maneuvering
The basic building block of any U.S. Army attack helicopter unit is an Air Weapons Team (AWT or simply “team”)
of two AH-64’s under the control of an Air Mission Commander (AMC), which is typically the most experienced
Pilot-in-Command (PC) within the flight. The AMC is responsible for ensuring the success of the team’s mission
and is the overall weapons release authority for the team.
Maneuverability is the primary consideration for the AWT. The lead aircraft (“Lead”) should strive to maneuver
in a predictable manner for the wingman (“Wing” or “Trail”); and the wingman should strive to position their
aircraft in such a way to never inhibit the lead aircraft’s ability to maneuver while always being ready to provide
suppressive fire in support of Lead, if needed. Distance between aircraft can vary based on terrain, proximity to
the ground, illumination/visibility, and expected or known enemy threats; but distances may range from 3 to 5
rotor discs to a kilometer or more. Distances are typically greater when over open terrain, whereas distances
between aircraft will be less when operating in restrictive terrain.
  Lead


                     Wing




                                                  Wing




                                                                                                   Wing




                                             Formation Distances
Combat Cruise is the standard formation for AWT employment. It is preferable at very low altitudes and provides
the most flexibility of the flight while reducing predictability. Combat Cruise provides an area to the rear of the
lead aircraft, along their aft hemisphere, for wingmen to maneuver. The trail aircraft positions their aircraft in
such a way to provide fire support for the lead aircraft if unexpected enemy units are encountered. Combat Cruise
Left/Right “pins” the wingmen to one side of the lead aircraft during situations in which maneuvers to the
opposite side are not feasible, possibly due to terrain.
                                                        Lead




                                                                                Wing




                                                  Combat Cruise

Combat Spread maximizes forward firepower with overlapping sensor fields-of-view and weapons fields-of-fire,
at the expense of ease of maneuverability and team flexibility. The trail aircraft sets their position abeam of the
lead aircraft at the 3 o’clock or 9 o’clock positions. Combat Spread requires a high degree of scanning and
coordination between the Pilot’s in each aircraft, particularly at night due to the field-of-view limitations of Night
Vision Systems (NVS). Distance between aircraft should be based on maneuver room, visibility, terrain, and
expected enemy contact.
                                                                                                  +10°




                Lead                                                               Wing




                                                                                                  -10°

                                                 Combat Spread
Terrain Flight Modes
The purpose of terrain flight and the associated modes of terrain flight is to deny or delay enemy forces the ability
to detect, track, and engage the aircraft. Terrain flight requires constant visual scanning to see and avoid
obstacles, particularly at night. The most important rule when conducting terrain flight is to never “out-fly” the
capabilities of the sensor being used for flight, nor the capabilities of the aircrew to respond to low-level hazards.
If weather and ambient lighting conditions restrict or reduce visibility, the aircrew should decrease their airspeed.
Continuous operations in a single terrain flight mode is typically unlikely, as terrain and vegetation will vary
throughout the Area of Operations (AO). Crews can expect to transition into and out of each mode as a natural
part of performing terrain flight operations. The modes of terrain flight are defined below:

•    Low-level. Low-level flight is conducted at a constant altitude and airspeed, typically between 80 to 200
     feet above the highest obstacle (AHO). Under these conditions, it will most likely be advantageous to use a
     “Traveling” movement technique (constant altitude and airspeed) to rapidly transit from one place to
     another, however this method provides the least amount of security for unexpected enemy encounters.

•    Contour. Contour flight is conducted at low altitude conforming to the contours of the earth, typically
     between 25 to 80 feet AHO. It is characterized by varying airspeeds and altitude, which will be dictated by
     the terrain itself and obstacles. Under these conditions, it will most likely be advantageous to use a “Traveling
     Overwatch” movement technique (varying altitudes and airspeeds) and utilize Combat Cruise as the
     formation pattern in which the trail aircraft is positioned to respond to enemy contact.

•    Nap-Of-the-Earth (NOE). NOE flight is conducted at low airspeeds and altitudes as close to the earth’s
     surface as vegetation and obstacles permit, usually between the surface and 25 feet AHO. Under these
     conditions, it will most likely be advantageous to use a “Bounding Overwatch” movement technique, where
     one aircraft maintains position and provides cover while the other aircraft moves to the next position. Care
     should be taken to avoid bounding beyond the range of the weapon systems of the aircraft providing cover.

                      Low-level: 80-200 feet AHO




                     Contour: 25-80 feet AHO




                   Nap-Of-the Earth: <25 feet AHO



                                               Terrain Flight Modes
Weapon Delivery Techniques
The three techniques for weapons delivery from an attack helicopter are defined below:

•    Hover Fire. Hover fire is typically conducted at speeds less than effective translational lift (ETL, roughly 16-
     24 knots airspeed) and may be conducted from a stationary hover or a hover with movement; such as
     laterally un-masking.

•    Running Fire. Running fire is typically conducted at speeds greater than ETL. Forward airspeed adds
     stability to the helicopter and increases the accuracy of unguided weapon systems, particularly rockets.

•    Diving Fire. Diving fire is an engagement conducted in a diving profile, typically between -10° to -30° pitch
     attitudes. Airspeed and altitude will be determined by the expected threat level from enemy defenses and
     desired weapons effects, with a steeper dive providing a smaller “beaten zone” and improved accuracy.
     However, a steep dive will also require more altitude for recovery. Diving fire may be performed following a
     climb from low altitudes (a “bump” from behind cover), or from level flight at high altitudes.


                                           Diving Fire




                                   Running Fire >ETL




    Hover Fire <ETL




                                                                                               “Beaten Zone”


                                        Weapon Delivery Techniques
SIGHTS AND SENSORS
The AH-64D uses a wide range of sensors to detect, acquire, and engage targets on the battlefield. These sensors
range from the basic “Mark 1 eyeball” to an advanced fire control radar, and each sensor is integrated into the
aircraft’s Data Management System to enhance situational awareness and facilitate rapid engagement of enemy
forces during day or night.



                                                   TADS
                       FCR                                                     CPG
               Pilot                                                           HMD
               HMD




                                         AH-64D Sights and Sensors

Although the AH-64D is equipped with a multitude of sensors for various purposes (such as the radar altimeter
or Doppler radar velocity sensor that aid in flight operations and navigation), sensors such as the optical cameras
in the nose turret or the mast-mounted fire control radar perform targeting against enemy locations and
equipment. These sensors are grouped within specific sensor arrays called “sights”, which generate targeting
solutions for employment of aircraft weapon systems.
Four sights are available to the AH-64D crew, but only one sight may be used within a crewstation at any given
time. These sights are the Pilot’s Helmet-Mounted Display (HMD), the Copilot’s HMD, the Target Acquisition
Designation Sight (TADS), and the Fire Control Radar (FCR). Each of these sights includes multiple sensors that
may be used individually or cooperatively to employ the weapon system selected by the crewmember; and each
has its own advantages and disadvantages when deciding how and when to engage the enemy.
Each sight and its corresponding sensors are shown below.
HMD (Pilot and CPG)                  TADS (CPG only)                           FCR (Pilot or CPG)
Helmet-Mounted Display               Target Acquisition Designation Sight      Fire Control Radar
•    Visual Crewmember               •    FLIR Forward-Looking Infrared        •     FCR Fire Control Radar
     eyesight                        •    DTV Daytime Television               •     RFI Radar Frequency
•    NVS Night Vision System         •    LRFD Laser Rangefinder/                    Interferometer
     (PNVS or TADS)                       Designator
•    NVG Night Vision Goggles*       •    LST Laser Spot Tracker
* Night vision goggles may aid either crewmember in detecting weapons fire or IR pointers on the battlefield,
but they are not intended to be used for direct targeting when using HMD as a sight. They may be used to direct
the TADS to an area for subsequent targeting or observation. (See Night Vision Goggles for more information.)
Helmet-Mounted Display (HMD)
The HMD may be used to rapidly direct weapons toward enemy locations at close range. When selected as the
crewmember’s sight, weapon solutions are generated for the crewmember’s actioned weapon based on the
crewmember’s helmet position and their current range source.
NVS mode may be used in conjunction with the HMD to augment the crew’s ability to engage targets at night.
(See the Helmet-Mounted Display chapter for more information.)


Target Acquisition Designation Sight (TADS)
The TADS uses a combination of electro-optical sensors in both the visible and infrared spectrums to detect and
target enemy forces at long range or perform reconnaissance during day or night. When selected as the
Copilot/Gunner’s sight, weapon solutions are generated for the CPG’s actioned weapon based on the TADS turret
position and the CPG’s current range source.
(See the Target Acquisition Designation Sight chapter for more information.)


Fire Control Radar (FCR)
The FCR mast-mounted assembly consists of an active radar antenna to rapidly scan large areas of the battlefield
(or the airspace above it). When selected as the crewmember’s sight, weapon solutions are generated for the
crewmember’s actioned weapon based on the location of the Next-To-Shoot (NTS) target on the FCR page.


Sight Selection Logic
Sight selection logic is outlined below.
•    Both crewmembers may select their respective HMD as their sight at any time since each crewmember’s
     helmet position is tracked independently of the other; but they cannot select the opposite crewmember’s
     HMD as their sight.
•    Only the CPG may select TADS as a sight, however either crewmember may utilize TADS as their selected
     NVS sensor. (See Night Vision System for more information.)
•    Either crewmember may select FCR as their sight, however only one crewmember may do so at any given
     time. If the CPG’s selected sight is FCR and the Pilot selects FCR, the CPG’s sight will automatically be set
     to HMD. If the Pilot’s selected sight is FCR and the CPG selects FCR, the Pilot’s sight will automatically be
     set to HMD.
ACQUISITION (ACQ) SOURCES
Acquisition sources increase aircrew efficiency in orienting their sights to locations on the battlefield, whether it
be to slave a sight to a target detected or tracked by another sensor onboard the aircraft (to include visual
detection by either crewmember), or to slave their sight to a set of three-dimensional coordinates. The purpose
of the acquisition source is to automate or reduce the need to manually search and acquire a target with the
selected sight; acquisition sources do not directly affect the weapon aiming solution for any weapon system.




                                             RFI
       TGT/THRT                Enemy CTRLM
                                                             FXD
                                                                                                          WPTHZ
                                                                    TADS         FCR
                                                                                             SKR
                                               TRN
                                                                           PHS


                                                                                               Friendly CTRLM
                                                     GHS




                                           General CTRLM


                                    Acquisition sources on the battlefield

In the case of the TADS or FCR, these sights will physically slew to the location of the acquisition source selected
within the crewstation. In the case of the HMD, the crewmember will receive cueing indications within their
helmet symbology of which direction they must direct their head to acquire the selected acquisition source (in
lieu of a robotic arm physically grabbing their head and forcibly turning it in the correct direction). As several
examples, the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) could select the Pilot’s helmet as the acquisition source to slave the TADS
turret to a target that the Pilot is looking at, the Pilot could select TADS as the acquisition source to monitor the
direction the CPG is aiming the TADS, or either crewmember could select a target point stored within the database
to slave their sight to that 3-dimensional location.
Each crewmember may select an acquisition (ACQ) source from the following list:
•    PHS – Pilot Helmet Sight                        •     FXD – Fixed forward (0° in azimuth/-4.9° elevation)
•    GHS – Gunner Helmet Sight                       •     TADS – Target Acquisition Designation Sight
•    SKR – Tracking missile seeker                   •     W##, H##, C##, T## – Waypoint, Hazard, Control
•    RFI – Radar Frequency Interferometer                  Measure, or Target/Threat
•    FCR – Fire Control Radar                        •     TRN – Cursor-selected terrain location on the TSD

As is the case with sight selections, choosing the best acquisition source in any given situation is key to reducing
the time needed to search, acquire, and engage enemy targets. In most circumstances, the most important
factors in choosing the correct acquisition source is proper coordination and communication between
crewmembers; so that each crewmember is aware of how the other is using their selected sight, and whether a
target should be handed off from one crewmember to the other for engagement by the appropriate sight/weapon
combination.
ACQ Selection Logic
In most cases, any of the available sights (HMD, TADS, or FCR) may serve as an acquisition source for another
sight. However, a crewmember cannot select an acquisition source that is already selected as the sight within
the same crewstation. For example, the CPG cannot simultaneously select TADS as a sight and an acquisition
source, because the TADS cannot be slaved to itself (the TADS is already looking where it is currently looking).
As such, some acquisition sources will be contextually removed from the acquisition selection menu if already
selected as the crewmember’s sight (e.g., “TADS” will be removed from the CPG’s acquisition selection menu if
the CPG has selected TADS as a sight).
•    If the Pilot’s selected sight is HMD, PHS will be removed from the Pilot’s ACQ selection menu.
•    If the Pilot’s selected sight is FCR, FCR will be removed from the Pilot’s ACQ selection menu.
•    If the CPG’s selected sight is HMD, GHS will be removed from the CPG’s ACQ selection menu.
•    If the CPG’s selected sight is TADS, TADS will be removed from the CPG’s ACQ selection menu.
•    If the CPG’s selected sight is FCR, FCR will be removed from the CPG’s ACQ selection menu.
•    If the FCR mast-mounted assembly is not installed, FCR and RFI will not be available within either
     crewmember’s ACQ selection menu.
•    If the TADS is being used as an NVS sensor, TADS will be removed from the ACQ selection menu within the
     same crewstation in which it is being used. (See Night Vision System for more information.)
Acquisition sources may be selected from the WPN or TSD pages by opening the ACQ selection menu (VAB R6).
Acquisition sources that are available for selection will be displayed, with the current ACQ selection boxed.




                                     Acquisition (ACQ) Selection Menu

In many instances, an acquisition source may be available for selection, but the acquisition may be invalid and
cannot provide cueing to a crewmember’s sight. When this occurs, the acquisition source will be displayed in
white and annotated with a “?”. As an example, if a crewmember has not created a Terrain point on their TSD,
TRN will be displayed within the ACQ selection menu but will be invalid until the crewmember creates a Terrain
point.
ACQ Slave Logic
Once an acquisition source is selected within the CPG crewstation, the CPG’s sight must be “slaved” to it. The
CPG may selectively enable (“slaved”) or disable (“de-slaved”) the Slave function using the SLAVE button located
on the TEDAC Right Handgrip.
•    If the CPG selects a different sight, SLAVE is automatically disabled.
•    If the CPG selects a different acquisition source, SLAVE is automatically disabled.
The Pilot does not have an option to selectively enable/disable the Slave function. The Pilot’s sight is always
“slaved” to the Pilot’s acquisition source.
•    If the Pilot’s selected sight is FCR, the FCR will be slaved to the Pilot’s ACQ at all times.
•    The Pilot may selectively remove ACQ cueing from the HMD Flight symbology. (See WPN Utility sub-page
     for more information.)
In the case of setting the acquisition source to a point within the database (Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure,
or Target/Threat) or to a cursor-selected terrain location on the TSD (Terrain point), this action will also set that
crewmember’s range source to a Navigation range when SLAVE is subsequently enabled.
•    If the CPG’s acquisition source is set to a Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, Target/Threat, or Terrain
     point, the slant range to that point will be entered as a Navigation range when the SLAVE button is pressed
     on the TEDAC Right Handgrip.
•    If the Pilot’s acquisition source is set to a Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, Target/Threat, or Terrain
     point, the slant range to that point will be entered as a Navigation range immediately upon selection from
     the ACQ selection menu.
Typically, during training flights outside of a combat area, each crewmember selects the opposite crewmember’s
helmet (GHS/PHS) as their acquisition source to facilitate traffic and obstacle advisories.
During combat, it may be useful for the CPG to be slaved to GHS to remain “heads out” while searching for
targets, and then de-slaving when a target or point of interest is acquired. The Pilot may often use TADS as the
acquisition source to maintain situational awareness of where the TADS is oriented. This is particularly useful for
the Pilot since it provides the Cued LOS Dot within the HMD Field-Of-Regard (FOR), which assists the Pilot in
monitoring the position of the TADS turret so that he or she may maneuver the aircraft to avoid the turret slew
limits.
NIGHT VISION GOGGLES (NVG)
The AN/AVS-6 Aviator Night Vision Imaging System (ANVIS) provides aircrews with a high-fidelity, binocular, 40°
field-of-view under extreme low-light conditions. The AVS-6 NVG’s amplify light in the visible and near-infrared
spectrum to enable aircrews to operate at NOE altitudes near terrain and other natural or man-made obstacles,
under all but the darkest, moonless nights.




The HDU physically interferes with the proper wear of NVG’s (and can incur misalignments within the HDU
symbology when viewed through the NVG’s) and may not be used simultaneously. If the NVG’s are enabled, the
HDU will be rotated away from the crewmember’s face prior to the NVG’s being lowered into view. The IHADSS
will continue to track the helmet position and aircraft sensors may be cued to the crewmember’s approximate
line-of-sight, but NVG’s should not be used as a means of targeting due to the lack of precise aiming symbology.
HELMET-MOUNTED
DISPLAY (HMD)




  HELMET-MOUNTED
    DISPLAY (HMD)
HELMET-MOUNTED DISPLAY (HMD)
The Helmet-Mounted Display is part of the Integrated Helmet And Display Sighting System (IHADSS) which allows
either crewmember to employ aircraft weapons, cue other aircraft sensors to specific locations, or even direct
the opposite crewmember to locations seen outside the cockpit.




Unlike many helmet cueing systems that were post-production modifications to fixed-wing combat aircraft, the
AH-64’s helmet sight was designed from the beginning to function as both the primary display for flight
information and as an independent but integrated targeting system.
The overall IHADSS consists of several subcomponents that must be defined.
•    IHU.    Integrated     Helmet     Unit; the
     crewmember’s flight helmet with integrated
     helmet position tracking sensors.
•    HDU. Helmet Display Unit; the physical
     device that is clipped to the crewmember’s
     IHU that projects symbology and video onto
     a combiner lens in front of the right eye.
•    HMD. Helmet-Mounted Display; the method
     of sighting through aiming symbology
     projected onto the HDU combiner lens for
     generating weapon solutions.
•    IHADSS. Integrated Helmet And Display
     Sighting System; the entire system that
     tracks the position of each crewmember’s
     IHU, generates symbology for display on the
     HDU, and processes weapon solutions based
     on sighting through the HMD.                                       HMD Sighting
HMD Activation
Both crewmembers’ individual Helmet Display Units (HDU)
receive symbology and video data from the aircraft Display
Processors (DP); however the CPG’s HDU also requires the
TADS to be powered in order to function. As such, the HDU’s
in each cockpit are automatically initialized when the APU is
powered on. If the TADS is powered off from the CPG’s WPN
Utility sub-page (shown at right), or from either crewstation
on the DMS Shutdown sub-page, the CPG’s HDU will blank
completely.
The IHADSS can be selectively powered on or off from either
crewstation by pressing VAB L1 on the WPN Utility sub-page,
but disabling this system will affect the HDU’s in both
crewstations. When the IHADSS is disabled, helmet-tracking
in both crewstations is disabled and symbology displayed
within the HDU’s will be lost, although sensor video may still
be present.




Integrated Helmet Unit (IHU) & Helmet Display Unit (HDU)
The Integrated Helmet Unit uses a
combination of infrared tracking sensors
integrated into the helmet itself and Sensor      Integrated Helmet Unit (IHU)
Surveying Units (SSU) mounted within the
crewstation to determine the helmet
                                                  IHU tracking sensors
position in azimuth and elevation.                    (both sides)

The helmet position is processed by the
aircraft  electronics,  which     updates
                                                  HDU Combiner Lens
symbology projected into the Helmet
Display Unit in real-time. If the
crewmember’s selected sight is HMD, the           Helmet Display Unit (HDU)
aircraft electronics calculates weapon
solutions for the crewmember’s current
weapon based on the selected range
source along the HMD line-of-sight.
During initialization of aircraft systems prior
to takeoff, each crewmember performs a
boresight of their IHU after mounting the
HDU to their helmet.
(See IHADSS Boresight on the following page for more information.)
IHADSS Boresight
During aircraft start-up, the helmet within each crewstation must be boresighted to provide the IHADSS with
accurate azimuth and elevation position data of each crewmember’s helmet. Until a successful boresight has been
performed, the Sight Status field of the High Action Display will alternate between displaying “IHADSS” and “B/S
REQUIRED” status messages, and the Cueing Dots will flash around the HMD LOS Reticle. (See HMD High Action
Display for more information.)
The IHADSS boresight procedure is performed by accessing the BORESIGHT sub-page by pressing VAB L5 on the
WPN page. After entering the BORESIGHT sub-page, the crewmember selects IHADSS (VAB L4) to enable the
IHADSS boresight logic and activate the Boresight Reticle Unit (BRU) mounted on top of the instrument panel
(below, left). When IHADSS is pressed and the text is boxed, B/S NOW is displayed at VAB L6 and the MPD cursor
is automatically positioned over the option (below, right).




                                                          2. IHADSS (VAB L4)




                                                                                  MPD cursor is automatically
                                                                                positioned over B/S NOW option
  1. BORESIGHT (VAB L5)

                                                          3. B/S NOW (VAB L6)




If desired, REMOVE MESSAGE (VAB R3) may be pressed to remove the “IHADSS B/S REQUIRED” message from
the Sight Status field of the High Action Display.
When the IHADSS boresight logic is enabled, a bullseye pattern is displayed within the BRU, the brightness of
which is controlled by the PRIMARY lighting knob on the EXTLT/INTR LT panel on the Pilot’s Left Console, or the
INTR LT panel on the CPG’s Left Console.




                          Pilot (Left) and CPG (Right) PRIMARY lighting knobs
After the BRU has been activated and is adjusted to the appropriate brightness, the position and orientation of
the helmet should be adjusted so that the bullseye pattern is centered within the BRU and the LOS Reticle is
aligned with the center of the bullseye, as shown below. If necessary, Transition or Cruise symbology modes
should be selected to ensure the Horizon Line is level with the cockpit frame.




                                          Bullseye pattern is     LOS Reticle is positioned
                                       centered within the BRU   over BRU bullseye pattern




                                                                                        Horizon Line is level with
                                                                                       the physical cockpit frame


      B/S NOW (VAB L6) is pressed
     to enter the boresight position




When the HMD LOS Reticle and the BRU bullseye pattern are properly aligned, the B/S NOW is commanded by
pressing VAB L6 or by using the MPD Cursor-Enter option on the Collective Mission Grip (or the TEDAC Left
Handgrip in the CPG crewstation). If the boresight position is accepted, the bullseye pattern within the BRU will
extinguish, the B/S NOW option (VAB L6) will be removed, and IHADSS (VAB L4) on the BORESIGHT sub-page
will be un-boxed.
The IHADSS boresight process may be aborted at any time by re-selecting IHADSS (VAB L4), which will remove
the B/S NOW option and extinguish the bullseye pattern within the BRU.
HMD HIGH ACTION DISPLAY
If the crewmember’s selected sight is HMD, Flight symbology is displayed on the crewmember’s HDU; and
specifically in the case of the Copilot/Gunner (CPG), HMD Weapon symbology is displayed on the CPG’s TDU.
The pertinent targeting- and weapon-related symbology when using HMD as the selected sight is the Line-Of-
Sight (LOS) Reticle, LOS Reticle Cueing Dots, and the High Action Display (HAD) data fields shown below.




 1. Line-Of-Sight Reticle                                                                         2. Cueing Dots



            3. Weapon
           Inhibit Status



           4. Range/                                                                               7. Weapon
          Range Source                                                                            Control Status



             5. Sight                                                                             8. Acquisition
           Select Status                                                                          Select Status



         6. Sight Status                                                                          9. Weapon Status



                            10. Field-of-View Box   11. Field-of-Regard Box   12. Cued LOS Dot


1.   Line-Of-Sight Reticle. Indicates the HMD line-of-sight (LOS). When the crewmember’s selected sight is
     HMD, the LOS Reticle is used as an aiming crosshair for weapons employment and laser designation.
     The LOS Reticle flashes when the selected sight’s LOS is invalid or has reached its slew limit.
2.   Cueing Dots. Indicates the quadrant direction of the selected acquisition source to “cue” the crewmember’s
     helmet position to the location of the Cued LOS Reticle. The dots are removed when the Cued LOS Reticle
     is with 4° of that quadrant relative to the LOS Reticle.
     All four dots flash when the “IHADSS B/S REQUIRED” message is present within the Sight Status field of the
     High Action Display, indicating the crewmember needs to boresight their IHADSS.
3.   Weapon Inhibit Status. Displays any pertinent safety or performance inhibits that may affect weapons
     employment, based on the currently actioned weapon within the crewstation.
4.   Range Source/Range. Displays the range source in use and the current range in tenths of kilometers, or
     meters if the range source is the LRFD.
     •      Default range. Default range is selected upon initial aircraft power-on, or any time the crewmember’s
            current range source is no longer valid. The Default range for the Pilot is 1.5 km, and 3.0 km for the
            CPG (displayed as “1.5” and “3.0” respectively).
     •    Manual range. Manual range may be selected and modified on the WPN page and may be set in 1-
          meter increments between 100 and 50,000 meters (displayed as “M0.1” to “M50.0”).
     •    Automatic range. Auto range may be selected on the WPN page and provides dynamic range
          calculations between 0.1 km and 50 km (displayed as “A0.1” to “A50.0”).
     •    Navigation range. Navigation range is automatically entered as the range source any time the
          crewmember’s sight is slaved to an acquisition source that has been set to a stored point within the
          navigational database. A Nav range is dynamically updated to reflect the current slant range between
          the aircraft and the point set as the acquisition source, between 0.1 km and 32 km (displayed as “N0.1”
          to “N32.0”).
     •    Radar range. Radar range is automatically entered as the range source any time the crewmember’s
          selected sight is set to FCR. A radar range is dynamically updated to reflect the current slant range
          between the aircraft and the Next-To-Shoot FCR target, between 0.1 km and 9.9 km (displayed as
          “R0.1” to “R9.9”).
     •    Laser range. Laser range is automatically entered as the range source any time the CPG fires the
          LRFD. The laser range is displayed in 1-meter increments between 500 and 9,999 meters (displayed
          as 500 to 9999). An asterisk (‫ )٭‬is displayed to the left of the laser range any time the LRFD is firing
          and processing a stable laser return from the object or surface within the TADS Line-of-Sight Reticle.
5.   Sight Select Status. Indicates the sight currently selected within the crewstation.
     •    P-HMD. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology when the Pilot’s selected sight is HMD.
     •    P-FCR. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology when the Pilot’s selected sight is FCR.
     •    C-HMD. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology when the CPG’s selected sight is HMD.
     •    C-FCR. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology when the CPG’s selected sight is FCR.
     •    TADS. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology when the CPG’s selected sight is TADS.
6.   Sight Status. Displays status messages regarding the currently selected sight within the crewstation and
     the employment of laser-guided AGM-114 missiles when launched in a Remote Fire mode.
7.   Weapon Control Status. Indicates the opposite crewmember’s actioned weapon system. If the Weapon
     Control Status field is blank, no weapon system is actioned by the opposite crewmember.
     •    PGUN. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology to indicate the Pilot’s actioned weapon is the gun.
     •    PRKT. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology to indicate the Pilot’s actioned weapon is rockets.
     •    PMSL. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology to indicate the Pilot’s actioned weapon is missiles.
     •    CGUN. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology to indicate the CPG’s actioned weapon is the gun.
     •    CRKT. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology to indicate the CPG’s actioned weapon is the rockets.
     •    CMSL. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology to indicate the CPG’s actioned weapon is the missiles.
     •    COOP. Displayed in both crewmember’s symbology to indicate both crewmembers’ actioned weapon
          is rockets, in Cooperative mode.
8.   Acquisition Select Status. Indicates the acquisition source currently selected within the crewstation.
     •    PHS. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the
          Pilot’s Helmet Sight.
     •    GHS. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the
          Copilot/Gunner’s Helmet Sight.
     •    SKR. If the next-to-shoot AGM-114 is tracking a laser designation or target in LOBL mode when slave
          is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the missile seeker.
     •    FCR. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location of the Next-To-Shoot
          (NTS) target detected by the Fire Control Radar. This option is only displayed if the FCR mast-mounted
          assembly is installed and the FCR is powered.
     •    FXD. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to a fixed forward direction along
          the Armament Datum Line (ADL, 0° in azimuth/-4.9° in elevation).
     •    W##, H##, C##, T##. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location
          of the Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point set as the acquisition source within
          the crewstation, and the range source will switch to a Navigation range equal to the slant range
          between the aircraft and the selected point. ## indicates the specific point number to which the
          Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point has been stored.
     •    TRN. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location of the terrain location
          cursor-selected on the TSD within the crewstation, and the range source will switch to a Navigation
          range equal to the slant range between the aircraft and the Terrain point.
9.   Weapon Status. Displays status messages regarding the currently actioned weapon within the crewstation.
10. Field-Of-Regard (FOV) Box. The FOV box indicates the relative position of the crewmember’s helmet
    line-of-sight within the larger Field-of-Regard box. The FOV box represents a 30° x 40° field of view and is
    driven by the crewmember’s helmet orientiation as detected by helmet sensors within each resepective
    cockpit.
11. Field-Of-Regard (FOR) Box. The FOR box indicates azimuth limits for the crewmember’s Night Vision
    System (NVS) sensor turret. The format of the FOR box is determined by the NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS)
    assigned to that crewstation. Tick marks around the edges of the PNVS FOR box mark 0° in azimuth and
    elevation. Tick marks around the edges of the TADS FOR box mark 0° and ±90° in azimuth, and 0° elevation.
                                                                   -90°               +90°




            +20°                                                                                  +30°
                                                        0°


             -45°                                                                                  -60°



                      -90°         0°          +90°            -120°          0°         +120°


                                PNVS Format (Left) & TADS Format (Right)

12. Cued Line-Of-Sight Dot. Indicates the relative location of the selected acquisition source within the Field-
    of-Regard box.
HMD Sight Status Messages
The following status messages pertain to the use of the HMD as the selected sight within the crewstation and
when using the PNVS or TADS as an NVS (Night Vision System) sensor during operations at night.

 SIGHT STATUS       CONDITION                          CORRECTIVE ACTION
                    A boresight of the IHADSS has
   IHADSS B/S       not been performed within the      Perform IHADSS boresight procedures or select
    REQUIRED        crewstation following              REMOVE MESSAGE on WPN Boresight sub-page.
                    initialization of the IHADSS.
                                                       The IHADSS line-of-sight for the affected crewstation
                    The IHADSS has failed within       is set to fixed forward.
  IHADSS FAIL
                    the corresponding crewstation.
                                                       The HMD should not be used for weapon employment.

                    The IHADSS line-of-sight is no     The IHADSS is frozen at the last position that was
   IHADSS LOS       longer valid due to a failure of   detected as valid.
     INVALID        an IHADSS component or the         If using NVS for piloting under low-visibility conditions
                    IHADSS being powered off.          or darkness, set NVS mode to FIXED.
                    The NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS
                    FLIR) that has been assigned to    Adjust the helmet position to within the slew limits of
     LIMITS
                    the crewstation encountered a      the assigned NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS).
                    slew limitation.
                    NVS has been enabled and set
   NVS FIXED                                           None required.
                    to FIXED mode.
                    The NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS       If using NVS for piloting under night conditions,
    NVS FAIL        FLIR) that has been assigned to    transfer flight controls to opposite crewmember and
                    the crewstation has failed.        switch to night vision goggles.
                    NVS has been enabled and set
   NVS NORM                                            None required.
                    to NORM mode.
HMD ACQUISITION AND RANGING
Detecting, acquiring, and engaging targets with the HMD is fairly straightforward, in that the HMD simply needs
to be pointed toward the target to generate an appropriate weapon solution. Unlike the TADS, the HMD does not
include additional targeting modes to assist the crewmember in stabilizing their HMD line-of-sight onto a target
position. As such, when using HMD as the selected sight, the aircraft electronics do not provide the same levels
of ballistic compensation as compared to using the TADS. Ballistic compensation for aircraft movement or lead
angle compensation for target movement is not provided; however ballistic compensation for range is provided,
subject to the crewmember’s selected range source.
When operating at night, using Night Vision
System (NVS) in NORM mode allo ws either
crewmember to utilize their respective FLIR
system to detect and acquire targets, even those
that may otherwise be obscured by the cockpit                                     PNVS
structure or canopy frames. However, it is                                  Field-Of-Regard
important to understand each sensor (PNVS and
TADS) is subject to different slew values.
(See Night Vision System for more information.)
The format of the Field-Of-Regard (FOR) Box
displayed within the HMD High Action Display is             TADS                                       TADS
indicative of not only the slew limitations of the    Field-Of-Regard                            Field-Of-Regard
currently assigned NVS sensor, but which sensor
is assigned to the crewstation. If the LOS Reticle
has exceeded the slew limitations of the NVS
sensor currently assigned to the crewstation,
even if the NVS mode is set to OFF, the HMD LOS
Reticle will flash and LIMITS will be displayed
within the Sight Status field of the High Action
Display.




Acquisition Sources
The use of acquisition sources can reduce the time necessary to bring the HMD onto an intended target. When
a target is detected using another sensor onboard the aircraft (to include visual detection by either crewmember),
setting that sensor as the acquisition source and enabling the SLAVE function increases the efficiency of target
acquisition within the HMD field-of-view.
However, since the HMD line-of-sight is solely directed by the crewmember’s helmet position, “cueing” indications
are displayed within the HMD symbology. When a valid acquisition source is selected, cueing dots will appear
around the HMD LOS Reticle to cue the crewmember’s head position to the corresponding direction of where the
acquisition source is located.
HMD cueing is enabled within a crewstation any time the HMD is the selected sight and SLAVE is enabled. Within
the CPG crewstation, SLAVE is toggled from the TEDAC Right Handgrip. However, since the Pilot crewstation does
not have an option to selectively enable SLAVE, SLAVE is permanently enabled for the Pilot. The Pilot does have
an option to disable the display of cueing dots within the HMD symbology from the WPN Utility sub-page.
Acquisition sources also reduce the amount of verbal communications and coordination of sensors that must
occur between the crewmembers, which also increases combat efficiency. By replacing the verbal description of
a target (or threat) using a verbose “description, direction, distance” with a concise “sight to source” command,
target handovers between crewstations may become near instantaneous with a proficient aircrew. In addition,
cueing the opposite crewmember’s helmet line-of-sight directly to the location of the acquisition source reduces
the effects of inaccurate range estimations and removes the need for verbal descriptions of the intended target,
obstacles or hazards to flight, or visual reference points.
An example of an inefficient obstacle handover during flight operations at night is shown below:
“Tower obstacle at 11 o’clock, approximately 2 kilometers, on our flight route along the right side of the valley.”
The Pilot must look toward the approximate direction, visually trace their projected flight path along the right
side of the valley and then locate the obstacle amongst any background clutter seen within the NVS FLIR video.
Examples of efficient handovers of obstacles or hazards utilizing HMD cueing to an acquisition source (such as
the opposite crewmember’s helmet sight) are shown below:
“Tower obstacle in 2 kilometers, my line-of-sight.”
“Aircraft, my line-of-sight, on the horizon, come right to avoid.”
In either case, the crewmember simply follows the cueing within their HMD symbology until the Cued LOS Reticle
becomes visible, at which point they can see the precise location that is being referenced by the other
crewmember’s helmet sight, removing most of any ambiguity that exists.
Acquisition sources that will cue the HMD to a specific azimuth and elevation relative to the aircraft nose are
listed below.
•    PHS. Pilot Helmet Sight; cues the HMD to the line-of-sight of the Pilot’s helmet. May be used to direct the
     CPG’s HMD line-of-sight to the location designated by the Pilot’s HMD LOS Reticle.
•    GHS. Gunner Helmet Sight; cues the HMD to the line-of-sight of the Copilot/Gunner’s helmet. May be used
     to direct the Pilot’s HMD line-of-sight to the location designated by the CPG’s HMD LOS Reticle.
•    SKR. Seeker; cues the HMD to the line-of-sight of the next-to-shoot AGM-114 missile seeker. May be used
     to direct the crewmember’s HMD line-of-sight to the target location that is currently being tracked by the
     next-to-shoot AGM-114 missile, possibly to confirm target identification prior to weapons release.
•    FXD. Fixed forward; cues the HMD to align with the Armament Datum Line (ADL) at 0° in azimuth and -
     4.9° in elevation.
•    TADS. Target Acquisition Designation Sight; cues the HMD to the line-of-sight of the TADS turret. May be
     used to monitor the TADS sensor position for situational awareness or coordinating weapon engagements.
Acquisition sources that will cue the HMD to a 3-dimensional location relative to the ownship position are listed
below.
•    FCR. Fire Control Radar; cues the HMD to the location of the next-to-shoot target designated on the FCR
     page. May be used to direct the crewmember’s HMD line-of-sight to the location of the designated target
     for situational awareness or to engage the designated target while using HMD as the sight.
•    W##, H##, C##, T##. Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point; cues the HMD to
     the coordinates of the selected point within the navigation database. May be used to direct the
     crewmember’s HMD line-of-sight to a pre-planned, stored, or transmitted location for reconnaissance, visual
     identification, weapons engagement, or re-acquisition if line-of-sight was lost.
•    TRN. Terrain point; cues the HMD to the coordinates of the selected terrain point within the navigation
     database. May be used to direct the crewmember’s HMD line-of-sight to a cursor-selected location on the
     TSD that is not associated with an existing Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point for
     reconnaissance, visual identification, or weapons engagement.
Range Sources
Once a target has been visually acquired by the crewmember, the next and perhaps most critical step in ensuring
a successful weapon engagement is determining an appropriate range source for the engagement. As the HMD
line-of-sight can only determine a target’s relative azimuth and elevation with respect to the aircraft’s attitude,
measuring the range to the target along the HMD line-of-sight provides the third dimension needed to determine
the target’s 3-dimensional position relative to the ownship.
Among the three sights (HMD, TADS, and FCR) that may be employed by the AH-64D aircrew for targeting, the
HMD is roughly comparable to the TADS with regards to the available methods of ranging that may be employed.
When a method of ranging is employed, this is called a “range source”, and is displayed within the High Action
Display in both Flight Symbology and Weapon Symbology.
The range sources that are available to either crewmember when using the HMD as the selected sight are shown
below, from the most accurate to the least accurate.
•    Laser range (COOP mode). Laser range is automatically entered as the range source any time the CPG
     fires the TADS LRFD to measure the slant range between the ownship and the target using reflected laser
     energy. Laser range is only displayed in the Pilot’s HMD when employing rockets in a Cooperative mode.
•    Navigation range. Navigation range is automatically entered as the range source any time the HMD is
     cued to a Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, Target/Threat, or a Terrain point. The slant range between
     the ownship and the corresponding point’s navigational coordinates are calculated and is subject to the
     position confidence of the aircraft.
•    Automatic range. Automatic range is selected from the WPN page by pressing MANRNG> (VAB B6) and
     entering “A” on the Keyboard Unit (KU) in place of a numerical value. Auto-range is determined by the radar
     altitude of the aircraft over the ground and the elevation “look-down” angle of the HMD line-of-sight.
•    Manual range. Manual range is selected from the WPN page by pressing MANRNG> (VAB B6) and entering
     a numeric value on the Keyboard Unit.
•    Default range. Default range is selected upon initial aircraft power-on, or any time the crewmember’s
     current range source is no longer valid.
NOTE: When transitioning from using the TADS as the selected sight to using the HMD, it is possible for the
Copilot/Gunner (CPG) to retain a static laser range as the range source. When the gun is actioned while the HMD
is the selected sight, the range source will automatically revert to the Manual range within the crewstation.
However, if intending to employ rockets using the HMD, a different range source should be considered that is
appropriate for the given situation.
When determining which range source to utilize when the HMD is the selected sight, the common deciding factor
will be whether the engagement is “deliberate” or “hasty” in nature. When conducting a deliberate engagement,
the crew will typically have time to reliably calculate and/or store the target location, determine a reasonably
accurate range from the intended weapon release point to the target, and employ a weapon system while the
target is directly in front of the aircraft in optimal release parameters. In such situations, a dynamic range source
such as a Navigation range to the target location or (when employing unguided rockets) Cooperative TADS laser
ranging will provide a more accurate targeting solution. Automatic range is another dynamic range source that
may be used but may not always be appropriate depending on the terrain the aircraft is operating over, or the
resulting oscillations in calculated range caused by rapid head and/or aircraft movements.
In many situations in which a crewmember is using the HMD as the selected sight to engage a close-range target
in a hasty manner, a static range source such as Manual range is typically more appropriate since it allows the
crewmember to rapidly adjust rounds onto the target without needing to change the acquisition source to employ
a Nav range; nor is it subject to the errors with Auto-ranging when operating over un-even terrain or when the
crewmember is rapidly moving his/her head. A Manual range is not dynamic and represents a fixed point in space
to which weapon solutions are calculated. As such, the HMD elevation relative to the target will need to be
manually adjusted to account for rounds that impact prior to or beyond the target (also referred to as landing
“short” or “long”).
Navigation Range
Navigation range is calculated by simply measuring the slant range between the ownship position and the
coordinates of a point stored within the navigational database. Although a Nav range is more accurate than using
Auto-ranging or Man-ranging, in that it is dynamically updated with aircraft movement and does not rely on flat
terrain as is the case with Automatic range, Nav range may be somewhat inflexible when using the HMD as the
selected sight for targeting.
Any time the acquisition source is set to a Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, Target/Threat, or Terrain point,
the slant range to the corresponding point is entered as a Nav range (the SLAVE button must be pressed to
update the HMD range source to a Nav range in the CPG crewstation). When employing weapons while using the
HMD as the selected sight, a Navigation range is only preferred if the intended target is within close proximity to
the coordinates of the point being referenced by the Nav range, or if employing area effect weapons against the
general area surrounding the point.
In the figure below, the intended target is at a range to the ownship that is substantially closer than the point
being referenced (T01) for the Nav range. In such a situation, rockets would impact beyond the target due to
the equivalent slant range being applied along the HMD line-of-sight, placing the weapon solution beyond the
target and below the surface plane. The HMD LOS Reticle would need to be displaced below the target within
the HMD field-of-view to adjust the weapon solution in such a manner so that the weapon trajectory would
intersect with the target location.




                                                                                        Weapons impact
                                                                                       beyond the target




                                                                                 HMD LOS


                                            Slant range of     Slant range of         Navigation range of
                                            3.7 km to T01     3.1 km to target      3.7 km along HMD LOS




                                       Navigation Range (ACQ set to T01)

The most common use cases for employing a Nav range are when the Pilot is employing unguided rockets with
variable time delay fuzes independently of the CPG. Rocket types such as the M255A1 or M261 are dependent
on an accurate range to target for their warheads to be effective. Unless fired in Cooperative mode with the CPG’s
TADS supplying an accurate laser range, the most accurate range source that can be used by the Pilot to achieve
the desired warhead effects is a Nav range.
Automatic Range
Automatic range is calculated using trigonometric ratios of right triangles, where the HMD look-down angle
relative to the vertical axis between the aircraft and the surface below it is the acute angle; and the altitude
above ground level (as measured by the radar altimeter) is the adjacent edge of the right triangle.
Using these two variables, along with an assumption the target is at an elevation equal to the that of the surface
directly below the aircraft along a lateral axis that represents the opposite edge of the right triangle, the
hypotenuse is calculated to determine the slant range to target. This calculation is performed continuously based
on the HMD line-of-sight elevation and the radar altitude of the aircraft.




                                                       Acute
                                                       Angle
                                                                                                             HMD LOS
                            Vertical axis
                                            Adjacent




     Adjacent edge                                     Acute angle calculated by subtracting
    calculated using                                   the HMD elevation position, which is
     radar altimeter                                   based on the ADL attitude relative to
     measurements                                      the horizon as measured by the EGI
                                                90°




                         Radar
                       Altimeter
                                                               Automatic Range (flat terrain)

As the HMD line-of-sight (LOS) approaches the horizon and the look-down angles become quite shallow, the
Auto-range calculations will become increasingly less precise due to the trigonometric ratios becoming quite large
which is exacerbated if the aircraft is operating at very low altitudes over the surface.




                         HMD line-of-sight just below the                                      HMD line-of-sight adjusted slightly
                       horizon with an Auto-range of 0.7 km                                    up with an Auto-range of 50.0 km
Automatic range relies upon a functioning radar altimeter and will only be usable when the aircraft’s altitude
above ground level (AGL) is less than 1,428 feet (the maximum altitude that is capable of being measured by the
radar altimeter).
It is important to note that the accuracy of Automatic range is predicated on the assumption that the target is at
the same elevation as the surface directly below the aircraft. As this may not always be the case, using Auto-
range for weapon engagements should only be performed in areas with minimal terrain relief, such as open
plains, non-mountainous deserts, large plateaus, or basins. Auto-range should not be used when operating over
mountains, rolling hills, or complex urban areas.




                                                                                                      HMD LOS

                                                   Acute
                                                   Angle
                        Vertical axis
                                        Adjacent




                                            90°
                                                               Acute angle remains the same for a given
                                                                 HMD elevation relative to the horizon
                      Radar
                    Altimeter                                  Radar altimeter measurements over
                                                                uneven terrain elevation results in
                                                                  inaccurate weapon solutions




                                                    Automatic Range (elevation difference)

In situations where the terrain directly below the aircraft is at a significantly higher elevation than that of the
intended target, it should be expected that any weapon solution generated using Auto-range will result in
unguided, ballistic munitions such as rockets or gun rounds landing short of the target location. Likewise, in
situations where the terrain directly below the aircraft is at a significantly lower elevation than that of the intended
target, it should be expected that rockets or gun rounds will land long beyond the target location.
Manual/Default Range
Manual range is the most inaccurate form of ranging when using the HMD. However, it is the most flexible ranging
option when needing to engage targets in a hasty manner, and as a result is typically the preferred range source.
When a manual range value is entered, the weapon solution will continue to update based on the HMD line-of-
sight (LOS), but the range value will be to a fixed point in space along the LOS at the range entered on the WPN
page.




                                                                                                 Target at slant range
                                                                                                    of 3000 meters


                                                                                      HMD LOS




                              HMD LOS position in        Fixed range of 2000      Weapons impact
                             azimuth and elevation      meters along HMD LOS     short of the target




                                                 Manual/Default Range

A Man-range is analogous to zeroing a rifle at a specific distance, and manually compensating for bullet drop by
manually elevating the weapon sight higher or lower depending on the estimated range to the target relative to
the range to which the rifle was zeroed.
•    If the intended target is estimated to be at a range greater than the manual range value, the HMD LOS
     Reticle must be aimed above the target to compensate for the additional bullet (or rocket) drop.
•    If the intended target is estimated to be at a range less than the manual range value, the HMD LOS Reticle
     must be aimed below the target to compensate for the reduced bullet (or rocket) drop.
                                                                          Munitions landing long require a
                                                                         manual correction by lowering the
                                                                        HMD LOS or entering a lower manual
                                                                                    range value

                                Munitions landing short require a
                               manual correction by raising the HMD                     1500 m
                              LOS or entering a higher manual range                                      1762 m
                                                                                                                         2000 m
                                               value

                                             Manual range corrections

NOTE: Default ranges for the Pilot and CPG are 1,500 and 3,000 meters respectively (displayed as “1.5” and
“3.0”), but are essentially the same as using a corresponding manual range (displayed as “M1.5” and “M3.0”).
HMD HAND CONTROLS
Either crewmember may use their respective Helmet Mounted Displays for targeting and engagement of enemy
targets independently of the other crewstation. In addition, the CPG may use the HMD for storing points through
the TSD Point sub-page. Night Vision System (NVS) controls are shown as PNVS (or TADS in NVS mode) would
be required to employ the HMD as a sight during operations at night, although NVS mode in itself is not a sight.


Cyclic & Collective Controls
Either crewmember may select HMD as his or her sight on the Collective Mission Grip, with additional controls for
selecting Flight symbology modes on the cyclic and NVS sensor controls on the Collective Flight Grip.




                       Sight Select
                                                                                                    Symbology Select




                                      NVS Select                   FLIR Polarity Toggle




TEDAC Controls
When the CPG is not using the flight controls, TEDAC controls may be used in conjunction with the HMD to avoid
interfering with the Pilot’s operation of the cyclic and collective.


                                                                                          Sight Select

                                                                                                         FLIR Polarity
                                          FLIR Gain Adjust                                                  Toggle




                                          FLIR Level Adjust                                               Sight Slave
                                                                                                            Toggle

  Store Target
      Point




                                  Automatic Contrast Mode Toggle    Filter Cycle
TARGET ACQUISITION
DESIGNATION SIGHT
(TADS)




  TARGET ACQUISITION
DESIGNATION SIGHT (TADS)
AN/ASQ-170 MODERNIZED TARGET
ACQUISITION DESIGNATION SIGHT
The AN/ASQ-170 TADS was originally designed by Martin Marietta and was selected to provide the primary
sighting and sensor system for the AH-64A, and remained in use by the AH-64D during the early years of its
service. The subsequent upgrade to the M-TADS standard by Lockheed Martin includes targeting enhancements
that increase the range and resolution that the AH-64D can detect and engage targets.




The Direct View Optics (DVO) sensor was subsequently removed during later development of the AH-64D,
although the corresponding aperture within the sensor turret itself remains.


TADS Activation
The TADS is automatically initialized when the APU is
powered on. If necessary, the TADS can be selectively
powered on or off from the CPG station by pressing VAB L4
on the WPN Utility sub-page (shown at right), or from either
crewstation on the DMS Shutdown sub-page.
Although the TADS is automatically initialized on APU power,
the laser rangefinder/designator (LRFD) requires manual
activation by pressing VAB L6. The FLIR camera may be
independently powered on or off by pressing VAB L5, and
the TADS turret may be stowed by pressing VAB R4.
Forward-Looking Infrared (FLIR)
The FLIR camera enables the AH-64 to detect, identify and engage enemy targets in any lighting conditions.
Although primarily used during night operations, the FLIR is equally capable during daylight hours. The
Modernized-TADS (MTADS) upgrade replaced the legacy FLIR sensor with a modern FLIR with improved
resolution and range.
The TADS FLIR camera includes three optical fields-of-view (Wide, Medium, and Narrow) with incrementally
increased magnification. A fourth field-of-view (Zoom) is available that electronically enlarges the Narrow field-
of-view by 50%. The Zoom field-of-view (FOV) does not provide increased resolution but does facilitate better
aiming precision of the laser rangefinder/designator (LRFD) at longer ranges.


Daytime Television (DTV)
The DTV is a monochromatic (black and white) television camera that enables the AH-64 to engage targets at
long-range during daylight hours only. Although the DTV only includes two optical fields-of-view (Wide and
Narrow) and is less versatile than the FLIR camera, the magnification levels of the DTV surpass those of the FLIR,
allowing the DTV to identify and designate targets at a further distance than what is possible with the FLIR. Like
the FLIR, the DTV includes an additional Zoom field-of-view that electronically enlarges the Narrow field-of-view
by 50%.


Laser Rangefinder/Designator (LRFD)
The LRFD uses focused laser energy to precisely measure range to target locations, and employs crew-selectable
pulsed repetition frequencies (PRF) to designate targets for laser-guided munitions, such as the AGM-114 missile.
Laser returns from the TADS LRFD are processed between a minimum range of 500 meters to a maximum range
of 9,999 meters. In addition to providing ranging data for ballistics computations, continuous laser designations
may be used to employ lead-angle compensation when engaging moving targets with the 30mm Area Weapon
System (AWS) or unguided rockets in Cooperative rocket mode.
The LRFD may be employed in range-finding mode by pulling the LRFD trigger on the TEDAC Right Handgrip to
the 1st detent, or in ranging and designation mode by pulling the LRFD trigger to the 2nd detent.
(See the WPN Code and WPN Frequency sub-pages in the Weapon Employment chapter for more information
regarding setting the LRFD laser code.)


Laser Spot Tracker (LST)
The LST may be employed to detect other laser designations within a tactical environment when using known
PRF codes. Like the LRFD, the specific laser PRF code the LST will scan for is crew-selectable from the cockpit at
any time during the mission, and may be used as an efficient method for handing over target locations to the
AH-64 from ground-based designators or other aircraft, such as the AH-64’s own team members.
(See TADS Targeting Modes for more information regarding LST operation. See the WPN Code and WPN
Frequency sub-pages in the Weapon Employment chapter for more information regarding setting the LST laser
code.)


Sight Stabilization and Slew Rate Damping
The TADS electronics provide automatic sight stabilization to compensate for aircraft angular rates. In addition,
angular slew rates of the TADS turret itself are dampened based on the currently selected optical/electronic field-
of-view to enhance precision targeting. As the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) incrementally steps through each successive
field-of-view from Wide to Zoom, the angular rate gains from Sight Manual Tracker (MAN TRK) inputs are
incrementally reduced to compensate for the higher magnification levels of TADS video.
Target State Estimator (TSE)
Although the Target State Estimator calculations are performed by the AH-64D’s targeting systems and is not
technically part of the TADS itself, the TSE is a key element when the TADS is being used to employ unguided,
ballistic munitions against moving targets on the battlefield.
The TSE utilizes linear velocities and attitude rates from the aircraft EGI’s, TADS turret position and angular slew
rates, and laser range data to calculate and separate true target velocities from the aircraft velocities and rates.
Once the true target velocity is calculated, the TSE can determine the appropriate lead-angle compensation for
the selected weapon system. This automatic lead angle compensation requires the Copilot/Gunner to simply
maintain the TADS line-of-sight on the target and perform a continuous laser designation to accurately employ
the Area Weapon System or provide accurate rocket steering for the Pilot when in Cooperative rocket mode.
                                                                                    Aircraft
                                                                                 Angular Rates

        TSE calculates target velocity
                                                                      Aircraft
                                                                      Attitude                    TADS
                                                                                     TADS        Position
                                                                                     Rates




                  TSE applies lead angle compensation




                             Target State Estimator (TSE) Lead Angle Compensation

When the laser ceases designation, the Target State Estimator will enter a “laser memory” mode for 14 seconds.
During this period, the mean rate of change of laser ranging measurements that existed prior to the termination
of laser designation will be dynamically maintained to allow the TSE to continue providing lead angle
compensation. All other variables such as linear velocities and angular rates will continue to be utilized by the
TSE in real-time to calculate the true target velocity.
After the 14 seconds has elapsed, the laser range value will become static until the LRFD is fired once again or a
different range source is utilized. Any time a dynamic laser range is not available, whether the 1 st detent of the
LRFD trigger is used or 14 seconds has elapsed since the 2nd detent of the LRFD trigger was used, or if any other
range source is utilized, TSE calculations will not be performed and lead angle compensation will be unavailable.
However, regardless of whether the TSE is providing lead angle compensation or not, ballistic compensation will
always be provided for factors such as range to target and aircraft movement when the TADS is being used as
the selected sight.
TADS WEAPON SYMBOLOGY
If the Copilot/Gunner’s selected sight is TADS, TADS sensor video is displayed on the CPG’s HDU and TDU,
overlaid with TADS Weapon symbology. Weapon symbology includes several symbology elements that are
common with HMD Flight symbology, such as the HMD High Action Display.
                                  1. Heading Tape      2. Aircraft Heading     3. Lubber Line




          4. CPG Line-Of-                                                                          5. Alternate
           Sight Bearing                                                                          Sensor Bearing


             6. Sensor                                                                            7. Field-Of-View
            Select Status                                                                             Brackets


8. Line-Of-Sight Reticle                                                                          9. Laser Firing Indicator


                                                                                                  11. Weapon
     10. LMC Indicator                                                                            Inhibit Status


     12. True Airspeed                                                                            13. Radar Altitude


            14. Range/                                                                             15. Weapon
           Range Source                                                                           Control Status


             16. Sight                                                                            17. Acquisition
            Select Status                                                                          Select Status


       18. Sight Status                                                                           19. Weapon Status



                             20. Field-of-View Box   21. Field-of-Regard Box   22. Cued LOS Dot


1.    Heading Tape. Displays a 180° hemisphere of magnetic headings. Major tick marks are displayed in 30°
      increments and marked by a cardinal direction or heading in the tens value. Minor tick marks are displayed
      in 10° increments.
2.    Aircraft Heading. Displays a digital readout of the aircraft’s current magnetic heading in 1° increments,
      superimposed over the Heading Tape.
3.    Lubber Line. The Lubber Line is aligned to the centerline of the aircraft and serves as a reference for the
      aircraft heading.
4.    CPG Line-of-Sight Bearing. Displays the bearing of the Copilot/Gunner’s selected sight on the Heading
      Tape when the CPG’s selected sight is HMD or TADS.
5.    Alternate Sensor Bearing. Displays the bearing of the Pilot’s helmet sight on the Heading Tape when the
      Pilot’s selected sight is set to HMD.
6.    Sensor Select Status. Indicates the selected TADS sensor when the CPG’s selected sight is TADS.
      •       FLIR. The Forward-Looking Infrared camera is selected as the current TADS sensor.
      •       DTV. The Daytime Television camera is selected as the current TADS sensor.
7.   Field-Of-View Brackets. Indicates the relative area that can be seen by the currently selected TADS
     sensor if the next narrower field-of-view is selected. If Zoom FOV is selected, no further fields-of-view are
     available and the Field-Of-View Brackets are removed from the TADS video.
8.   Line-Of-Sight Reticle. Indicates the TADS sensor line-of-sight (LOS). When the CPG’s selected sight is
     TADS, the LOS Reticle is used as an aiming crosshair for weapons employment and laser designation.
     The LOS Reticle flashes when the selected sight’s LOS is invalid or has reached its slew limit.
9.   Laser Firing Indicator. Displayed continuously any time the Laser Rangefinder/Designator (LRFD) is firing.
10. LMC (Linear Motion Compensation) Indicator. Displayed when Linear Motion Compensation is
    enabled.
11. Weapon Inhibit Status. Displays any pertinent safety or performance inhibits that may affect weapons
    employment, based on the currently actioned weapon within the crewstation.
     If the CPG stores a Waypoint or Target point by placing the STORE/UPDT switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip
     to the STO position, “W##” or “T##” (respectively) will be displayed in the Weapon Inhibit Status field for
     4 seconds, where ## indicates the specific point number to which the Waypoint or Target location has been
     stored.
12. True Airspeed. Indicates the true airspeed (TAS) of the aircraft in 1 knot increments, from 0 to 210 knots.
13. Radar Altitude. Indicates the radar-detected altitude above ground level from 0 to 1,428 feet. The Radar
    Altitude is displayed in increments of 1 foot from 0 to 50 feet in altitude, and increments of 10 feet between
    50 feet and 1,428 feet in altitude.
     The Radar Altitude is not displayed when the altitude exceeds 1,428 feet above ground level.
14. Range Source/Range. Displays the range source in use and the current range in tenths of kilometers, or
    meters if the range source is the LRFD.
     •    Default range. Default range is selected upon initial aircraft power-on, or any time the crewmember’s
          current range source is no longer valid. The Default range for the Pilot is 1.5 km, and 3.0 km for the
          CPG (displayed as “1.5” and “3.0” respectively).
     •    Manual range. Manual range may be selected and modified on the WPN page and may be set in 1-
          meter increments between 100 and 50,000 meters (displayed as “M0.1” to “M50.0”).
     •    Automatic range. Auto range may be selected on the WPN page and provides dynamic range
          calculations between 0.1 km and 50 km (displayed as “A0.1” to “A50.0”).
     •    Navigation range. Navigation range is automatically entered as the range source any time the
          crewmember’s sight is slaved to an acquisition source that has been set to a stored point within the
          navigational database. A Nav range is dynamically updated to reflect the current slant range between
          the aircraft and the point set as the acquisition source, between 0.1 km and 32 km (displayed as “N0.1”
          to “N32.0”).
     •    Radar range. Radar range is automatically entered as the range source any time the crewmember’s
          selected sight is set to FCR. A radar range is dynamically updated to reflect the current slant range
          between the aircraft and the Next-To-Shoot FCR target, between 0.1 km and 9.9 km (displayed as
          “R0.1” to “R9.9”).
     •    Laser range. Laser range is automatically entered as the range source any time the CPG fires the
          LRFD. The laser range is displayed in 1-meter increments between 500 and 9,999 meters (displayed
          as 500 to 9999). An asterisk (‫ )٭‬is displayed to the left of the laser range any time the LRFD is firing
          and processing a stable laser return from the object or surface within the TADS Line-of-Sight Reticle.
15. Weapon Control Status. Indicates the opposite crewmember’s actioned weapon system. If the Weapon
    Control Status field is blank, no weapon system is actioned by the opposite crewmember.
     •    PGUN. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology to indicate the Pilot’s actioned weapon is the gun.
     •    PRKT. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology to indicate the Pilot’s actioned weapon is rockets.
     •    PMSL. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology to indicate the Pilot’s actioned weapon is missiles.
     •    CGUN. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology to indicate the CPG’s actioned weapon is the gun.
     •    CRKT. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology to indicate the CPG’s actioned weapon is the rockets.
     •    CMSL. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology to indicate the CPG’s actioned weapon is the missiles.
     •    COOP. Displayed in both crewmember’s symbology to indicate both crewmembers’ actioned weapon
          is rockets, in Cooperative mode.
16. Sight Select Status. Indicates the sight currently selected within the crewstation.
     •    P-HMD. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology when the Pilot’s selected sight is HMD.
     •    P-FCR. Displayed in the Pilot’s symbology when the Pilot’s selected sight is FCR.
     •    C-HMD. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology when the CPG’s selected sight is HMD.
     •    C-FCR. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology when the CPG’s selected sight is FCR.
     •    TADS. Displayed in the CPG’s symbology when the CPG’s selected sight is TADS.
17. Acquisition Select Status. Indicates the acquisition source currently selected within the crewstation.
     •    PHS. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the
          Pilot’s Helmet Sight.
     •    GHS. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the
          Copilot/Gunner’s Helmet Sight.
     •    SKR. If the next-to-shoot AGM-114 is tracking a laser designation or target in LOBL mode when slave
          is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the missile seeker.
     •    FCR. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location of the Next-To-Shoot
          (NTS) target detected by the Fire Control Radar. This option is only displayed if the FCR mast-mounted
          assembly is installed and the FCR is powered.
     •    FXD. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to a fixed forward direction along
          the Armament Datum Line (ADL, 0° in azimuth/-4.9° in elevation).
     •    W##, H##, C##, T##. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location
          of the Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point set as the acquisition source within
          the crewstation, and the range source will switch to a Navigation range equal to the slant range
          between the aircraft and the selected point. ## indicates the specific point number to which the
          Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point has been stored.
     •    TRN. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location of the terrain location
          cursor-selected on the TSD within the crewstation, and the range source will switch to a Navigation
          range equal to the slant range between the aircraft and the Terrain point.
18. Sight Status. Displays status messages regarding the currently selected sight within the crewstation and
    the employment of laser-guided AGM-114 missiles when launched in a Remote Fire mode.
19. Weapon Status. Displays status messages regarding the currently actioned weapon within the crewstation.
20. Field-Of-View (FOV) Box. The FOV box indicates the                          -90°              +90°
    relative position of the TADS line-of-sight within the larger
    Field-of-Regard box. The FOV box represents a 30° x 40°
    field of view and is driven by the TADS sensor turret           +30°                                       +30°
    position.
21. Field-Of-Regard (FOR) Box. The FOR box indicates
                                                                    -60°                                       -60°
    azimuth limits for the TADS sensor turret. Tick marks
    around the edges of the TADS FOR box mark 0° and ±90°
    in azimuth, and 0° elevation.                                           -120°         0°         +120°

22. Cued Line-Of-Sight Dot. Indicates the relative location                TADS Field-Of-Regard Format
    of the selected acquisition source within the Field-of-
    Regard box.


TADS Sight Status Messages
The following status messages pertain to the use of the TADS as the selected sight within the crewstation and
when employing AGM-114K SAL missiles in which an offboard source of laser designation is providing terminal
guidance.

 SIGHT STATUS         CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                      The TADS turret has been            CPG should press the SLAVE button to de-slave the
      FIXED
                      slaved to fixed forward (FXD)       TADS turret, if required.
                      The TADS FLIR has been              CPG should power the TADS FLIR on the WPN Utility
     FLIR OFF
                      powered off.                        sub-page, if required for targeting or NVS operations.
                      The TADS has encountered a          Adjust the TADS turret position to within the slew
      LIMITS
                      slew limitation.                    limits to regain the ability to fire the LRFD.
                                                          Set the Priority channel to the same laser code set to
                      The SAL missile channel that        the TADS LRFD to perform an autonomous (self-
                      has been designated as the          lasing) missile engagement.
     REMOTE           Priority channel does not match     Coordinate with an offboard source of laser
                      the laser code set to the TADS      designation to provide terminal guidance for the next
                      LRFD.                               SAL missile. Ensure the source is using a laser code
                                                          that corresponds with that set as the Priority channel.
                      RF missiles have been actioned
                      while the TADS is the selected   Designate the intended target for 3 seconds to
 TARGET DATA?
                      sight, but a target handover has perform a target handover to the next RF missile.
                      not been performed.
TADS TARGETING MODES
The TADS may be utilized with several targeting modes to assist the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) in performing targeting
operations against enemy target locations. Targeting modes consist of Linear Motion Compensation (LMC), Image
Auto-Track (IAT), and Laser Spot Track (LST). These targeting modes reduce the workload of the CPG when
using the TADS but do not directly affect the operation of any weapon system on the aircraft.


Linear Motion Compensation (LMC)
Linear Motion Compensation provides additional stabilization of the TADS to compensate for linear movement of
the aircraft or the target.
When LMC is disabled, the slew rates of the TADS turret are based on raw
input magnitudes received from the force-sensing Sight Manual Tracker
(MAN TRK, also called the “thumb force controller”) on the TEDAC Right
Handgrip. When no force is applied to the Sight Manual Tracker, the
angular slew rates of the TADS turret are dampened in azimuth and
elevation. When thumb force is applied, the TADS turret slew rate will
increase as the force magnitude increases and will correspondingly
decrease as force magnitude decreases.
When LMC is enabled, indicated by the presence of the LMC Indicator
around the TADS Line-Of-Sight Reticle, angular slew rates of the TADS
turret are maintained until modified by CPG input or alternate steering              LMC Indicator
commands by the TADS electronics themselves. When no force is applied
to the Sight Manual Tracker, the angular slew rates of the TADS turret are maintained. When thumb force is
applied, the TADS turret slew rate will increase at a rate corresponding to the force magnitude applied to the
Sight Manual Tracker.
LMC automatically converts angular rates based on the current range value utilized by the TADS to compensate
for motion parallax. As the range increases or decreases, the LMC will automatically adjust the TADS slew rate
to maintain the calculated angular velocity at the corresponding range. As targets that are closer in range will
have a higher angular rate compared to targets further away, the LMC will increase the TADS slew rate to
compensate. In addition, angular rate gains from Sight Manual Tracker input force magnitudes will accordingly
scale based on the current range value.




   Lower angular rates for
                                              41°
     higher range values




                                            Higher angular rates for
                    18°                       lower range values




                             Linear Motion Compensation for Motion Parallax
Image Auto-Track (IAT)
IAT is an automatic tracking mode that allows the TADS to automatically maintain the Line-Of-Sight (LOS) Reticle
on battlefield targets. Unlike the previous generation of TADS in which the IAT tracking logic relied purely on
object contrast amongst its background, the digital tracking logic within the M-TADS uses the scene content
within the video source to lock onto distinct features.
Additionally, the digital IAT will automatically enter an inertial track and “coast” in the event weapons fire, smoke,
obscurance, or explosions on the battlefield interfere with its ability to maintain track. This inertial track logic
prevents the M-TADS from locking on to an unintended target or nearby object when a break lock occurs, which
was characteristic of previous versions of TADS that functioned purely on contrast tracking.
When the IAT/OFS switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip is momentarily set to the IAT position, an track is initiated
on the target underneath the TADS LOS Reticle. When this occurs, a set of four brackets, called the Primary Track
Gates, are placed around the tracked object, a Track Number is placed below the tracking gates, and the total
number of tracks is updated in the top right corner of the TADS symbology.

                                                                                                     3. Total Number
                                                                                                         of Tracks




     1. Image Auto Track
     Primary Track Gates




                                                                                                     4. Track Number




     2. Image Auto Track
          Aim Point




1.     Image Auto Track Primary Track Gates. Indicates the primary tracked target. When the TADS LOS
       reticle is within the boundaries of the Primary Track Gates, the gates are bolded.
2.     Image Auto Track Aim Point. Displayed within the Primary Track Gates to indicate the precise location
       the IAT will maintain the TADS LOS Reticle after the track is established and when returning the LOS Reticle
       from an offset position.
3.     Track Number. Indicates the assigned track number for the primary tracked target.
4.     Total Number of Tracks. Indicates the total number of tracked targets, out of a maximum of 3. (See
       Multi-Target Tracker for more information.)
Once a new primary track is established, the TADS will automatically maintain the LOS Reticle over the IAT Aim
Point until a slew is commanded. If the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) inputs a slew using the Sight Manual Tracker, the
TADS LOS is released from automatic slewing and may be manually slewed until the TADS is commanded to
return to the primary track using the OFS position of the IAT/OFS switch.
The specific functionality of the IAT/OFS switch will vary depending on whether the TADS
                                                                                               S Short press (<0.5 sec)
LOS Reticle is within the boundaries of the Primary Track Gates, signified by the gates
themselves becoming bolded. Additionally, the commanded function when set to the               L Long press (>0.5 sec)
OFS position is dependent on the duration of the press.
When the LOS Reticle is within the boundaries of the Primary Track Gates, the following commands apply:
•    IAT position will update the Aim
     Point location within the Primary       S Update Aim Point Location
     Track Gates to the current
     centroid of the TADS LOS Reticle.
•    OFS position for less than 0.5
     seconds will delete the primary
     track.
                                               S Delete Primary Track
•    OFS position for greater than 0.5
                                                L Delete All Tracks
     seconds will delete all tracks.
                                                                                TADS LOS Reticle inside
                                                                                 Primary Track Gates


When the LOS Reticle is outside the boundaries of the Primary Track Gates, the following commands apply:
•    IAT position will establish a
     new primary track and initiate         S Establish new Primary
     automatic slew for target                  Track
     tracking.
•    OFS position for less than 0.5
     seconds will return the TADS
     LOS Reticle to the primary
     track’s Aim Point and initiate      S Return TADS LOS to Primary Track
     automatic slew for target           L Delete All Tracks
     tracking. A subsequent press
     to the OFS position prior to                                             TADS LOS Reticle outside
     arriving within the Primary                                                Primary Track Gates
     Track Gates will revert to
     manual tracking.
•    OFS position for greater than 0.5 seconds will delete all tracks.
Additional details regarding the Image Auto-Track are shown below.
•    Target tracking is only performed in one TADS sensor at a time. If a track is established while the selected
     TADS sensor is set to FLIR, the track will continue to be tracked within the FLIR camera, even if the CPG
     selects DTV using the Sensor Select switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip, and vice versa.
•    Once a primary track has been established, the TADS turret may only be slewed to the extent that the
     primary track can be maintained within the current optical field-of-view of the TADS sensor within which the
     automatic tracking is being performed.
•    Target tracking is limited to objects that occupy between 0.75% to 50% of the tracking sensor’s field-of-
     view. If the object being tracked is too small or too large within the current optical field-of-view, a track
     cannot be established, and an existing track will switch to inertial tracking.
Due to the combination of these factors, FLIR is better suited for maintaining multiple tracks due to its wider
field-of-view, especially for tracks that are widely spaced on the battlefield, or for retaining the primary track
within the field-of-view when a significant offset slew is desired. However, the DTV is better suited for maintaining
tracks at longer range due to its higher magnification levels.
Multi-Target Tracker (MTT)
The M-TADS digital tracker is capable of maintaining an image auto-track on up to three separate targets, a
single primary track and two secondary tracks. When being used in this manner, the tracking and slew logic and
the IAT/OFS switch functions remain the same but are only referenced to primary track.

                                                                                                  3. Total Number
                                                                                                      of Tracks




                                                                                                   2. Secondary Track
                                                                                                   Flag/Track Number
     1. Primary Track
    Gates/Track Number




1.      Primary Track Gates/Track Number. Indicates the primary tracked target and track number.
2.      Secondary Track Flag/Track Number. Indicates the secondary tracked target(s) and track number(s).
3.      Total Number of Tracks. Indicates the total number of tracked targets, out of a maximum of 3.
Any time a new track is established, the new track is designated as the primary track, and the existing primary
track is demoted to a secondary track. An existing secondary track may be promoted back to primary track at
any time using one of two methods.
•       Manually slew the LOS Reticle over the desired track and momentarily press the IAT/OFS switch to the IAT
        position. This will promote the secondary track under the LOS Reticle to primary track, update the Aim Point
        of the new primary track, and automatic slewing will be performed until another secondary track is promoted
        or the Copilot/Gunner inputs a slew using the Sight Manual Tracker. (See TEDAC Left Handgrip for more
        information.)
•       Set the MTT Promote switch to the + or – positions to promote the secondary tracks to primary track in a
        cyclic pattern. When a secondary track is promoted to the primary track using the MTT Promote switch,
        the TADS LOS Reticle will be slewed to the Aim Point of the new primary track and automatic slewing will
        be performed until another secondary track is promoted or the Copilot/Gunner inputs a slew using the
        Sight Manual Tracker. (See TEDAC Right Handgrip for more information.)
Inertial Tracking
In the event weapons fire, smoke, obscurance, or explosions on the battlefield interfere with the automatic
tracking of the primary or secondary tracks, the track will enter an inertial tracking sub-mode. In this mode, the
track will “coast” along its previous path for a short period before the track is dropped altogether. If the track is
reacquired while in inertial track, automatic tracking will resume.




                    Target is obscured and                                    Inertial tracking continues to
                  switches to inertial tracking                             “coast” until the track is dropped




                                                                     Tank has stopped
                                                                      behind building




                            Inertial Gates (Left) and Low Confidence Gates (Right)

•    If the primary track has switched to inertial tracking, the Primary
     Track Gates will be replaced by the Inertial Gates. After 5 seconds
     of inertial tracking, the Inertial Gates will be replaced by the Low
     Confidence Gates.
•    If a secondary track has switched to inertial tracking, the
     Secondary Track Flag will become dashed to indicate inertial
     tracking. After 5 seconds of inertial tracking, the Secondary Track
     Flag will become dotted to indicate low confidence.
•    If the track is not reacquired within 10 seconds of inertial
     tracking, the track will be dropped and “TRK # DROP” will be
     displayed in the Weapon Inhibit Status field, where # is the                        Inertial Track Flag
     number of the track that has been dropped.
If the primary or secondary tracks are forced outside the TADS field-
of-view, the Primary Track Gates and/or Secondary Track Flags are
replaced by bars along the edge of the video to indicate the location of
the tracks relative to the TADS field-of-view.
•    When a track has been forced outside the TADS field-of-view, a
     solid bar will be displayed along the edge of the TADS video with
     the associated track number.
•    After 5 seconds of inertial tracking, the bar will become dashed to
     indicate low confidence.                                                     Inertial Track Bars and Low
                                                                                        Confidence Bars
•    A bracket will be displayed next to the bar to indicate which track
     is the primary track.
Laser Spot Track (LST)
The LST may be configured to search for and track pulsed laser designations using standard PRF codes
independently of the ownship’s LRFD code. The Laser Spot Tracker is enabled using the LT switch on the TEDAC
Right Handgrip. When set to the A position, the LST is enabled and set to automatic mode. When set to the M
position, the LST is enabled and set to manual mode. When set to the O position, the LST is disabled.
NOTE: The TADS laser rangefinder/designator (LRFD) cannot be fired while the LST is enabled.
When the LST is employed, the Multi-Target Tracker will continue to perform automatic tracking of the primary
and secondary tracks if the respective tracks remain within the optical field-of-view of the TADS sensor. However,
if the tracks are forced outside the TADS field-of-view while LST operations are being performed, the tracks will
enter inertial track, and may eventually be dropped.


Automatic Mode
When the LST is enabled in the automatic mode, the TADS will enter a continuous, 4-bar azimuth/elevation scan
pattern until a laser designation matching the PRF code assigned to the LST is detected, or the LST is disabled.
Once a matching laser designation is detected, the TADS will slew to and track the laser designation. If the laser
designation is lost, the TADS will resume the 4-bar scan.
NOTE: It is advisable that the LST be disabled prior to instructing the designating platform to cease lasing. If the
laser designation is lost before the LST is disabled, the TADS turret will resume the 4-bar scan pattern.
In addition, when slaving the TADS to an acquisition source, the LST should be disabled prior to disabling the
SLAVE function to ensure the TADS is not inadvertently slewed from the intended location by the 4-bar scan in
automatic mode, or if a matching laser designation is detected in automatic or manual mode.

 +5° Elevation                                                                                        +5° Elevation



  0° Elevation                                                                                         0° Elevation



  -5° Elevation                                                                                       -5° Elevation




-15° Elevation                                                                                       -15° Elevation




-25° Elevation                                                                                       -25° Elevation
         -30° Azimuth                                0° Azimuth                                +30° Azimuth

                                      LST 4-bar Automatic Scan Pattern



Manual Mode
When the LST is enabled in the manual mode, the Copilot/Gunner retains manual slew control of the TADS turret
until a laser designation matching the PRF code assigned to the LST is detected. Once a matching laser
designation is detected, the TADS will slew to and track the laser designation. If the laser designation is lost,
manual slew control of the TADS turret is restored.
TADS ACQUISITION AND RANGING
In similar fashion to using the HMD as the selected sight, detecting, acquiring, and engaging targets with the
TADS is fairly straightforward, in that the TADS simply needs to be directed toward and stabilized on the target
to generate an appropriate weapon solution. TADS targeting modes such as LMC and IAT assist the
Copilot/Gunner (CPG) in target tracking, and the LST assists the CPG in acquiring an offboard laser designation,
but autonomously and efficiently acquiring targets using the TADS and performing an accurate ranging of the
target location is critical in achieving a successful target engagement.
Generally speaking, TADS sensors and fields-of-view (FOV) are best used in                       Zoom
the following manner.                                                                             FOV

•    Initial detection of targets on the battlefield: FLIR Wide/Medium FOV.                     Narrow
                                                                                                 FOV
•    Individual target acquisition: FLIR Wide/Medium FOV or DTV Wide FOV.
•    Target identification: FLIR Narrow FOV or DTV Narrow FOV.
•    Target tracking: FLIR Narrow/Zoom FOV; DTV Narrow/Zoom FOV.
As with most tactical situations, many variables may determine the ideal sensor               Medium FOV
and field-of-view. Factors such as target size, range to target, time of day, and
movement of the aircraft or target will play significant roles in determining
which sensor or field-of-view should be. For example, a company of tanks will
be much easier to detect and acquire in Wide FOV, whereas a squad of infantry
at the same range may not be detected until Narrow FOV is utilized. In addition,               Wide FOV
the reduced slew rates and narrow fields-of-view of Narrow or Zoom FOV levels
may make them unsuitable for engaging targets at close range, depending on
whether the intended targets (or the aircraft) are moving at a high angular
velocity.
If a target is lost or inadvertently exits the TADS field-of-view, it is normally
wise to “back out” to the previous field-of-view to re-acquire the target within
the center of the TADS video, stabilize the TADS movement as necessary, and
then “step in” to the next field-of-view to resume tracking as desired.
It is important to note that the Zoom FOV setting is simply an electronic
magnification of the video received from the TADS sensors and will not provide
an increase in target resolution or detail. However, the larger video image may
aid in precision tracking against long-range targets in which precise placement
of the TADS laser beam is critical in accurate ranging or designation of the
target.


Acquisition Sources
The use of acquisition sources can reduce the time necessary to bring the TADS onto an intended target. When
a target is detected using another sensor onboard the aircraft (to include visual detection by either crewmember),
setting that sensor as the acquisition source and enabling the SLAVE function increases the efficiency of target
acquisition within the TADS.
Acquisition sources also reduce the amount of verbal communications and coordination of sensors that must
occur between the crewmembers, which also increases combat efficiency. By replacing the verbal description of
a target (or threat) using a verbose “description, direction, distance” with a concise “sight to source” command,
target handovers between crewstations may become near instantaneous with a proficient aircrew. In addition,
slaving the selected sight directly to the location of the acquisition source reduces the effects of inaccurate range
estimations and removes the need for verbal descriptions of the intended target, or visual reference points to aid
in locating the correct target amongst many.
An example of an inefficient target handover from the Pilot’s HMD to the CPG’s TADS is shown below:
“Gunner, target tank at 11 o’clock, approximately 4 kilometers, dug-in along the north-south running treeline.”
The CPG must manually slew the TADS to the approximate direction, visually identify the correct treeline along
that general direction (assuming the Pilot’s range estimate was accurate) and then locate the correct tank in that
vicinity.
Examples of efficient target handovers utilizing acquisition sources are shown below:
“Gunner, target, Pilot helmet sight. Tank in the treeline.”
“Gunner, target, FCR. Tracked vehicle, range 4.6.”
In either case, the CPG simply selects the announced source of target information as the acquisition source and
enables SLAVE, slewing the TADS line-of-sight directly to the location of the intended target, removing most of
any targeting ambiguity that exists.
Acquisition sources that will command the TADS to a specific azimuth and elevation relative to the aircraft nose
are listed below.
•    PHS. Pilot Helmet Sight; commands the TADS to the line-of-sight of the Pilot’s helmet. May be used to direct
     the TADS to the location designated by the Pilot’s HMD LOS Reticle.
•    GHS. Gunner Helmet Sight; commands the TADS to the line-of-sight of the Copilot/Gunner’s helmet. May
     be used to direct the TADS to the location designated by his/her own HMD LOS Reticle.
•    SKR. Seeker; commands the TADS to the line-of-sight of the next-to-shoot AGM-114 missile seeker. May
     be used to direct the TADS to the target location that is currently being tracked by the next-to-shoot AGM-
     114 missile, possibly to confirm target identification prior to weapons release.
•    FXD. Fixed forward; commands the TADS to align with the Armament Datum Line (ADL) at 0° in azimuth
     and -4.9° in elevation.
Acquisition sources that will command the TADS to a 3-dimensional location relative to the ownship position are
listed below.
•    FCR. Fire Control Radar; commands the TADS to the location of the next-to-shoot target designated on the
     FCR page. May be used to direct the TADS to the location of the designated target to perform visual
     identification prior to weapons release, or to engage the designated target while using TADS as the sight.
•    W##, H##, C##, T##. Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point; commands the TADS
     to the coordinates of the selected point within the navigation database. May be used to direct the TADS to
     a pre-planned, stored, or transmitted location for reconnaissance, visual identification, weapons
     engagement, or re-acquisition if line-of-sight was lost.
•    TRN. Terrain point; commands the TADS to the coordinates of the selected terrain point within the
     navigation database. May be used to direct the TADS to a cursor-selected location on the TSD that is not
     associated with an existing Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point for reconnaissance,
     visual identification, or weapons engagement.
Range Sources
Once a target has been successfully acquired and is being tracked within the TADS field-of-view, the next and
perhaps most critical step in ensuring a successful weapon engagement is determining an accurate range to the
intended target. As the TADS line-of-sight can only determine a target’s relative azimuth and elevation with
respect to the aircraft’s attitude, measuring the range to the target along the TADS line-of-sight provides the
third dimension needed to determine the target’s 3-dimensional position relative to the ownship.
Among the three sights (HMD, TADS, and FCR) that may be employed by the AH-64D aircrew for targeting, the
TADS facilitates the most options when determining what method of ranging may be employed. When a method
of ranging is employed, this is called a “range source”, and is displayed within the High Action Display in both
Flight Symbology and Weapon Symbology.
The range sources that are available to the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) when using the TADS as the selected sight are
shown below, from the most accurate to the least accurate.
•    Laser range. Laser range is automatically entered as the range source any time the CPG fires the TADS
     LRFD to measure the slant range between the ownship and the target using reflected laser energy.
•    Navigation range. Navigation range is automatically entered as the range source any time the TADS is
     slaved to a Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, Target/Threat, or a Terrain point. The slant range between
     the ownship and the corresponding point’s navigational coordinates are calculated and is subject to the
     position confidence of the aircraft.
•    Automatic range. Automatic range is selected from the WPN page by pressing MANRNG> (VAB B6) and
     entering “A” on the Keyboard Unit (KU) in place of a numerical value. Auto-range is determined by the radar
     altitude of the aircraft over the ground and the elevation “look-down” angle of the TADS turret.
•    Manual range. Manual range is selected from the WPN page by pressing MANRNG> (VAB B6) and entering
     a numeric value on the Keyboard Unit.
•    Default range. Default range is selected upon initial aircraft power-on, or any time the crewmember’s
     current range source is no longer valid.
When manually tracking a target while utilizing Linear Motion Compensation (LMC), it is best to use a dynamic
range source to minimize “range jumps”, which increases the CPG’s workload in maintaining the TADS crosshairs
on the intended target. As LMC will automatically convert TADS angular rates based on the current range value
to compensate for motion parallax, the greater the difference between the previous range value and the next will
cause a greater jump in TADS slew rates.
Dynamic range sources include a laser range when a continuous laser designation is employed (2nd detent of the
laser trigger), a navigation range to a point stored in the vicinity of the target, or an automatic range when
operating over relatively flat terrain. As these range sources may not always be practical depending on the specific
tactical situation or the terrain over which the aircrew is operating, the range source that is best suited for the
situation should be chosen to reduce the CPG workload during targeting operations.
Static range sources include a laser range when a single range-finding pulse is employed (1st detent of the laser
trigger), a manual range entered on the WPN page, or the default range which is displayed upon initial power-
up of the aircraft or if the current range source is rendered invalid. Such range sources are not dynamic and
represent fixed points in space to which weapon solutions are calculated. As such, the TADS elevation relative to
the target will need to be manually adjusted to account for rounds that impact prior to or beyond the target (also
referred to as landing “short” or “long”).
Laser Range
The TADS laser rangefinder/designator (LRFD) provides the most precise range source available when using the
TADS as the selected sight. Based on the TADS line-of-sight (LOS) and the slant range measured by the LRFD, a
weapon solution is generated based on the selected weapon system (gun or rockets) and, in the specific case of
the rockets, the selected warhead type.
If the aircraft and/or the target is moving, a continuous laser designation using the 2nd detent of the laser trigger
should be employed. This will continuously update the precise slant range to the target and will also engage the
Target State Estimator in calculating lead angle compensation against targets that are moving across the
battlefield.




                                                                                                         TADS LOS




                                           TADS turret position in               Slant range to target
                                           azimuth and elevation




                                    Laser Range (2nd detent designation)

It is important to note that lasing accuracy is more critical when employed by attack helicopters due to the shallow
targeting angles compared to fixed-wing strike aircraft. Laser designations should be focused precisely onto the
target to prevent the laser beam from impacting the ground prior to the target (laser underspill) or beyond the
target (laser overspill). Due to the greater difference in slant range calculations when such events occur, weapons
accuracy is significantly affected when lasing at shallow angles.




                                           Shallow angle overspill results                Steep angle overspill results
                                             in increased range error                        in reduced range error




                                  Laser overspill during target designation
When the LRFD is fired using the 1st detent of the laser trigger, or 14 seconds has elapsed since the LRFD stopped
firing using the 2nd detent of the laser trigger, the laser range will become “stale”, and will remain at a fixed range
value. When this occurs, the weapon solution will continue to update based on the TADS line-of-sight (LOS), but
the range value will be to a fixed point in space along the LOS and may not represent the true slant range to the
target.




                                                                                                         TADS LOS




                                           TADS turret position in   Slant range to point in    Weapons impact
                                           azimuth and elevation     space along TADS LOS      short of the target




                                             Laser Range (stale range)

If the selected weapon is employed while using a stale laser range, the weapons will likely impact prior to or
beyond the target (also referred to as landing “short” or “long”). If necessary, manual aiming adjustments may
be made by adjusting the TADS LOS higher above the target to correct for rounds landing short, or adjusting the
TADS LOS further below the target to correct for rounds landing long.
Navigation Range
Navigation range is calculated by simply measuring the slant range between the ownship position and the
coordinates of a point stored within the navigational database. Although a Nav range is more accurate than using
Auto-ranging or Man-ranging, in that it is dynamically updated with aircraft movement and does not rely on flat
terrain as is the case with Automatic range, Nav range is not as accurate as using a laser range.
Any time the SLAVE button is pressed when the Copilot/Gunner’s acquisition source is set to a Waypoint, Hazard,
Control Measure, Target/Threat, or Terrain point, the slant range to the corresponding point is entered as a Nav
range. This may be particularly useful when using “indirect fire” techniques, such as firing unguided rockets from
behind cover against a set of coordinates or when employing laser-guided Hellfire missiles in a “Remote Fire”
engagement method. However, when employing weapons against targets within the TADS line-of-sight, a
Navigation range is only preferred if the intended target is within close proximity to the coordinates of the point
being referenced by the Nav range, or if employing area effect weapons against the general area surrounding
the point.
In the figure below, the intended target is at a range to the ownship that is substantially closer than the point
being referenced (T01) for the Nav range. In such a situation, rockets would impact beyond the target due to
the equivalent slant range being applied along the TADS line-of-sight, placing the weapon solution beyond the
target and below the surface plane. The TADS LOS Reticle would need to be displaced below the target within
the TADS field-of-view to adjust the weapon solution in such a manner so that the weapon trajectory would
intersect with the target location.


                                                                                                        Weapons impact
                                                                                                       beyond the target




                                                                                                   TADS LOS

                                                           Slant range of    Slant range of    Navigation range of 6.5 km
                                                           6.5 km to T01    5.1 km to target    meters along TADS LOS




                                     Navigation Range (ACQ set to T01)

Aside from long-range, indirect fire techniques, the most common use cases for employing a Nav range are when
the CPG desires a smooth transition to a laser range source when firing the LRFD while LMC is enabled, or when
the Pilot is employing unguided rockets with variable time delay fuzes independently of the CPG. Rocket types
such as the M255A1 or M261 are dependent on an accurate range to target for their warheads to be effective.
Unless fired in Cooperative mode with the CPG’s TADS supplying an accurate laser range, the most accurate
range source that can be used by the Pilot to achieve the desired warhead effects is a Nav range.
Automatic Range
Automatic range is calculated using trigonometric ratios of right triangles, where the TADS look-down angle
relative to the vertical axis between the aircraft and the surface below it is the acute angle; and the altitude
above ground level (as measured by the radar altimeter) is the adjacent edge of the right triangle.
Using these two variables, along with an assumption the target is at an elevation equal to the that of the surface
directly below the aircraft along a lateral axis that represents the opposite edge of the right triangle, the
hypotenuse is calculated to determine the slant range to target. This calculation is performed continuously based
on the TADS turret elevation and the radar altitude of the aircraft.




                                                                                                                                       TADS LOS




                                                    Acute
                                                    Angle
                         Vertical axis
                                         Adjacent




   Adjacent edge                                    Acute angle calculated by subtracting the
  calculated using                                   TADS turret elevation position, which is
   radar altimeter                                  based on the ADL attitude relative to the
   measurements                                         horizon as measured by the EGI

                                            90°




                       Radar
                     Altimeter
                                                             Automatic Range (flat terrain)

As the TADS line-of-sight (LOS) approaches the horizon and the look-down angles become quite shallow, the
Auto-range calculations will become increasingly less precise due to the trigonometric ratios becoming quite large
which is exacerbated if the aircraft is operating at very low altitudes over the surface.




                       TADS line-of-sight just below the                                        TADS line-of-sight adjusted slightly
                     horizon with an Auto-range of 1.4 km                                       up with an Auto-range of 50.0 km
Automatic range relies upon a functioning radar altimeter and will only be usable when the aircraft’s altitude
above ground level (AGL) is less than 1,428 feet (the maximum altitude that is capable of being measured by the
radar altimeter).
It is important to note that the accuracy of Automatic range is predicated on the assumption that the target is at
the same elevation as the surface directly below the aircraft. As this may not always be the case, using Auto-
range for weapon engagements should only be performed in areas with minimal terrain relief, such as open
plains, non-mountainous deserts, large plateaus, or basins. Auto-range should not be used when operating over
mountains, rolling hills, or complex urban areas.




                                                                                                       TADS LOS




                                                 Acute
                                                 Angle
                      Vertical axis
                                      Adjacent




                                          90°
                                                            Acute angle remains the same for a given
                                                              TADS elevation relative to the horizon

                   Radar
                                                             Radar altimeter measurements over
                 Altimeter
                                                              uneven terrain elevation results in
                                                                inaccurate weapon solutions




                                                  Automatic Range (elevation difference)

In situations where the terrain directly below the aircraft is at a significantly higher elevation than that of the
intended target, it should be expected that any weapon solution generated using Auto-range will result in
unguided, ballistic munitions such as rockets or gun rounds landing short of the target location. Likewise, in
situations where the terrain directly below the aircraft is at a significantly lower elevation than that of the intended
target, it should be expected that rockets or gun rounds will land long beyond the target location.
Manual/Default Range
Manual range is the most inaccurate form of ranging when using the TADS. When a manual range value is
entered, the weapon solution will continue to update based on the TADS line-of-sight (LOS), but the range value
will be to a fixed point in space along the LOS at the range entered on the WPN page.



                                                                                                              Target at slant range
                                                                                                                 of 5100 meters


                                                                                                             TADS LOS




                                           TADS turret position in    Fixed range of 3000         Weapons impact
                                           azimuth and elevation     meters along TADS LOS       short of the target




                                             Manual/Default Range

A Man-range is analogous to zeroing a rifle at a specific distance, and manually compensating for bullet drop by
manually elevating the weapon sight higher or lower depending on the estimated range to the target relative to
the range to which the rifle was zeroed.
•    If the intended target is estimated to be at a range greater than the manual range value, the TADS LOS
     Reticle must be aimed above the target to compensate for the additional bullet (or rocket) drop.
•    If the intended target is estimated to be at a range less than the manual range value, the TADS LOS Reticle
     must be aimed below the target to compensate for the reduced bullet (or rocket) drop.
                                                                         Munitions landing long require a
                                                                        manual correction by lowering the
                                                                       TADS LOS or entering a lower manual
                                                                                   range value

                               Munitions landing short require a
                             manual correction by raising the TADS                     3000 m
                             LOS or entering a higher manual range                                      3581 m
                                                                                                                       4000 m
                                             value

                                            Manual range corrections

NOTE: Default range for the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) is 3,000 meters (displayed as “3.0”), but the Default range
source is essentially the same as using a corresponding manual range (displayed as “M3.0”).
TADS HAND CONTROLS
The Copilot/Gunner is the only crewmember that may use the Target Acquisition Designation Sight for targeting
and engagement of enemy targets.


Cyclic & Collective Controls
The CPG may select TADS as his or her sight on the Collective Mission
Grip, but controls for employing the TADS itself are only located on the
TEDAC.
                                                                                                                                    Sight Select




                                                                                               CPG crewstation only


TEDAC Controls
All TADS controls are located in the CPG cockpit on the TEDAC. TADS use by the Pilot is limited to using it as a
backup NVS sensor.
         Field-Of-View Select                                                                  Laser Spot Tracker
                                                                                                  Mode Select
Image Auto                   Sensor Select
Track/Offset                                                                                                        Sight Select

                                                                                                                                   FLIR Polarity
                                                     FLIR Gain Adjust                                                                 Toggle




                                                     FLIR Level Adjust                                                              Sight Slave
                                                                                                                                      Toggle

   Store Target
       Point                                                                                                                       Sight Manual
                                                     Range Focus Adjust                                                               Tracker


                                                                                                                               LRFD Trigger
                                                                                                                              (opposite side)

                                                                                                                                     MTT Track
                                                                                                                                      Promote



Linear Motion Compensation                                                                   Image Auto Track
   Toggle (opposite side)                    Automatic Contrast Mode Toggle   Filter Cycle     Polarity Select
DATALINK (DL)




    DATALINK (DL)
DATALINK COMMUNICATIONS
The AH-64D utilizes a secure, modem-based datalink (SMDL) to send and receive targeting data, tactical reports,
text messages, and mission files amongst other AH-64D’s within the team. The modem traffic is relayed as
discreet microbursts of data across the helicopters’ radios, which allows multiple datalink networks to be tuned
simultaneously; one network across each radio.




As envisioned for use on the modern battlefield, AH-64D teams are employed as tactical maneuver units in a
combined arms scenario alongside friendly infantry, armor, and artillery echelons. In such scenarios,
communications are not only critical to the success of the mission but are also multi-tiered to coordinate with the
various other air and ground forces operating in the same area of operations. This can impose significant
command and control challenges on unit commanders when coordinating the movements and actions of large
formations of attack helicopters; the challenges of which are exacerbated when performed by aircrews that are
simultaneously operating at extremely low altitudes, especially at night.
These challenges in command and control can be mitigated by employing semi-automated and direct exchanges
of data between AH-64D team members to reduce voice traffic and increase the efficiency of distributing tactical
information. Several tactical report formats are available to AH-64D aircrews in exchanging targeting data, fires
distribution, battle damage assessments, position updates, and status of onboard fuel and munitions. In addition,
individual points or entire mission files may be transmitted across the datalink to synchronize information
displayed on the TSD of each AH-64D as battlefield conditions evolve or as changes in mission occur in real-time.
Datalink messages may be transmitted between AH-64D Team members and Primary members within a datalink
network. Up to 16 aircraft may be present within a network, with 15 network members in each aircraft’s network
list and the 16th aircraft being the ownship.
Team members. Team members receive text messages and mission files. These messages coordinate team
actions and movements and distribute mission updates across the entire team of AH-64D’s on a datalink network.
Primary members. Primary members receive tactical reports, targeting data, fires distribution, and individual
TSD points. These messages coordinate tactical actions of individual companies and platoons of AH-64D’s.
Secure Modem Datalink (SMDL) Network
A datalink network consists of multiple AH-64D network members transmitting and receiving data messages
between each aircraft by assigning unique identification numbers within each data message, one for the message
originator and one for the message subscriber.
When a data message is transmitted across the radio frequency that all network members are tuned, the modems
onboard each aircraft receive the data message and compare the message’s subscriber ID(s) with those that are
assigned to their aircraft. If the subscriber ID within the message matches their ownship ID number, the modem
stores the message within the modem buffer and notifies the crew via advisories on the EUFD. The originator ID
within the message is correlated with the matching ID number of a network member and the corresponding
callsign of the sender is displayed to the crew receiving the message. If the subscriber ID within the message
does not match their ownship ID number, the modem rejects the message without crewmember interaction.




                                                Callsign: DH06
                                                Datalink ID: 1
                                              DATA MESSAGE
                                              Originator ID: 1
                                              Subscriber ID(s): 2, 3



       DH08 crew is notified                  DH09 crew is notified                          DH10 crew receives
        that a message from                    that a message from                           no data message or
      DH06 has been received.                DH06 has been received.                             notification.




         Callsign: DH08                          Callsign: DH09                               Callsign: DH10
         Datalink ID: 2                          Datalink ID: 3                               Datalink ID: 4

                       Datalink network between members of “Darkhorse” company

Each network may consist of 16 network members, containing 15 subscribers in addition to the ownship. Any of
the 15 subscribers may be set as a Team member, a Primary member, or both; however, a maximum of 7
subscribers within each network may be designated as a Primary member. The designation of a subscriber as
Team or Primary determines the type of data messages the member may receive from the ownship.

Team Messages (COM page)                                     Primary Messages (TSD and FCR pages)
Command and control, and mission updates.                    Targeting, fire control, and status reports.
•    TEXT Text messages                                      •         BDA Battle Damage Assessment reports
•    CURRENT MISSION Mission files residing in               •         TGT FCR Target reports
     the aircraft memory                                     •         PP Present Position reports
•    MISSION 1 Mission 1 files residing on the DTC           •         FARM Fuel/Ammo/Rockets/Missiles reports
•    MISSION 2 Mission 2 files residing on the DTC           •         PFZ/NFZ Priority Fire Zones/No Fire Zones
     (Data Transfer Cartridge)                               •         POINT Individual TSD Point transmissions
                                                             •         RFHO FCR RF Target Handover
The designation of network subscribers as Team or Primary members are uniquely defined by each individual
network member, and only affect outgoing data messages from the ownship. For example, the aircrew in DH06
may designate each of the remaining three aircraft as Team members within their cockpit for sending text
messages to the entire flight platoon, but each of the other three aircrews may have designated DH06 as the
sole Team member within each of their respective cockpits for sending text messages back to the flight leader.
Each Preset on the COM page may be configured with independent network and modem settings, to include
unique frequencies, network subscribers, and Team and Primary designations. If a preset has been configured
for network protocols, the network associated with that preset will be designated by a letter indicating the type
of protocol, and a number corresponding with the preset number. Only presets 1 through 8 may be configured
with DATALINK protocol on the MODEM sub-page, which is indicated by an “L” on the COM page and EUFD.
In the example below, Presets 1, 2, and 3 have been configured for DATALINK protocol, and the networks
associated with each preset have been configured with unique lists of network subscribers on the NET sub-page.
Preset 1 includes each aircraft within the entire flight platoon, while Presets 2 and 3 only include subscribers from
each individual Air Weapons Team (AWT) within the flight platoon; Red Team and White Team.

  Unit ID: DARKHRSE
  Call Sign: DRKHR
  Primary Freq: FM1 SC
  Frequency: 41.150         “Darkhorse 06”            “Darkhorse 08”           “Darkhorse 09”           “Darkhorse 10”
  Network: L1                Callsign: DH06            Callsign: DH08           Callsign: DH09           Callsign: DH10




  Unit ID: RED TM
  Call Sign: REDTM
  Primary: FM2 SC
  Frequency: 32.550         “Darkhorse 06”            “Darkhorse 08”
  Network: L2                Callsign: DH06            Callsign: DH08




  Unit ID: WHITE TM
  Call Sign: WHTTM
  Primary Freq: FM2 SC
  Frequency: 37.750          “Darkhorse 09”           “Darkhorse 10”
  Network: L3                 Callsign: DH09           Callsign: DH10


                                  Network configurations for Presets 1, 2, and 3

Since each preset can include a unique network configuration, and a different preset may be tuned to each radio,
it is possible to simultaneously tune different datalink networks for each echelon within the entire flight platoon,
with datalink messages being transmitted across the appropriate frequency for the echelon to which it pertains.
In the example below, each aircrew can communicate and exchange datalink messages with the entire flight
platoon using a common radio frequency and datalink network on the FM1 radio. However, Red Team and White
Team are using their FM2 radios to communicate and exchange datalink messages within their respective AWT’s;
with each AWT utilizing a separate radio frequency and datalink network.
                                                        “Darkhorse”
                                                    FM1 Frequency: 41.150
                                                     Datalink Network: L1




                 Darkhorse 06              Darkhorse 08             Darkhorse 09             Darkhorse 10
                 Callsign: DH06            Callsign: DH08           Callsign: DH09           Callsign: DH10


                               “Red Team”                                       “White Team”
                          FM2 Frequency: 32.550                              FM2 Frequency: 37.750
                           Datalink Network: L2                               Datalink Network: L3

                              Datalink structure across two Air Weapons Teams
                                     (AWT) within a single flight platoon
Datalink Controls
The AH-64D’s datalink modem utilizes the same radio equipment that is used for voice communications to relay
data between other aircraft within the AH-64D team. As such, datalink networks are tuned in the same manner
as tuning a radio to a communications preset. However, unlike voice transmissions, the datalink can only function
when a radio has been tuned to a preset, which allows the modem to send and receive datalink messages across
the network associated with that preset. If a radio is manually tuned to a frequency, datalink messages cannot
be transmitted or received across that radio, even if tuned to the same frequency of an existing datalink network.
(See the Radio Communications chapter for more information regarding the tuning of presets.)


EUFD Controls
The Enhanced Up-Front Display (EUFD) provides the aircrew with a consolidated location for viewing the current
configuration and datalink settings of each radio. The modem can receive datalink messages from the VHF, UHF,
FM1, and FM2 radios simultaneously, but each crewmember may only transmit datalink messages across a single
radio at any given time.
The radio through which each crewmember transmits datalink messages is independent from the radio the
crewmember has selected for voice transmissions. The Datalink Transmit Select rocker is used to select a radio
for datalink transmissions while the Radio Transmit Select rocker is used to select a radio for voice transmissions.
In the example below, the current crewstation is configured to transmit voice over the VHF radio and datalink
over the FM2 radio. The opposite crewstation is configured to transmit voice over the UHF radio and datalink
over the FM1 radio.


                                                         Primary Network List   Standby Network List




    Datalink Transmit
     Select Rocker

                                                                                                        Radio Tuning
                                                                                                       Control Buttons
      Radio Transmit
       Select Rocker


                                     Radio Status Area


The Primary Network List displays which radios are configured to transmit and receive datalink messages, and to
which datalink network the radio has been tuned. In the example above, the modem is monitoring the FM1 radio
for datalink messages from the network associated with Preset 1 and monitoring the FM2 radio for datalink
messages from the network associated with Preset 2.
The Standby Network List displays which datalink networks are associated with the radio presets residing in the
standby slots for each radio. When considering the standby slots of each radio, the number of networks that may
be readily accessible at any given time is as follows:
     •      8 datalink networks (two for each radio) may be loaded into the VHF, UHF, FM1, and FM2 radios.
     •      4 datalink networks (one for each radio) may be tuned and monitored for data communications.
     •      2 datalink networks (one for each crewmember) may be selected to transmit data communications,
            independently of the radios selected by each crewmember for transmitting voice communications.
If generator power is lost, crewmembers may still use the radios and the EUFD interface for voice communications
while operating on battery power, but datalink communications will not be possible.
(See Enhanced Up-Front Display (EUFD) for more information.)
COM Originator Identification (ORIG ID) Sub-Page
The ORIG ID sub-page allows crewmembers to review or modify the ownship’s identification settings for sending
and receiving traffic across the datalink network(s). The ownship’s ID settings may be individually edited from
this page, or they may be replaced all at once using pre-planned network member data accessed through the
Originator Directory (ORIG DIR) sub-page.
                                           1. DL sub-page




          2. Ownship Callsign                                                               3. Datalink Originator ID




          4. Digital ID Select                                                              5. TACFIRE ID Settings




                                                                                              7. Ownship
                                                                                            Status Window
     6. ORIG DIR sub-page




                                                              8. MSG sub-pages


6.    DL sub-page. Displays the Datalink sub-page. (N/I)
7.    Ownship Callsign. Activates the KU for inputting the originator callsign for the ownship. A minimum of 3
      and a maximum of 5 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
      NOTE: The originator callsign is for reference only and will not affect the function of the datalink networks.
8.    Datalink Originator ID. Activates the KU for inputting the originator identification (ID) number which
      identifies the ownship on the datalink network. The alphanumeric character ranges that are valid for entry
      are 0-39 (with no leading zeros), A-Z, 1A-1Z, 2A-2Z, and 3A-3I; for a total of 127 unique network ID
      numbers.
      NOTE: Each network member, to include the ownship, must have a unique ID number. If two or more
      members on the same datalink network are assigned the same identification number, erroneous behavior
      may be observed when using the datalink, or when using functions within the cockpit that are associated
      with the datalink.
9.    Digital ID Select. Selects a page format for configuring digital ID settings for each type of protocol.
      •        DATALINK/TACFIRE. Displays digital ID settings for DATALINK or TACFIRE protocols.
      •        INTERNET. Not implemented.
      •        FIRE SUPPORT. Not implemented.
10. TACFIRE ID Settings. Not implemented.
11. ORIG ID sub-page. Displays the Originator Directory sub-page.
12. Ownship Status Window. Displays the current digital ID settings of the ownship.
13. MSG sub-pages. Displays Message sub-pages for sending or receiving digital messages.
           MSG – REC. Displays the Message Receive sub-page. If no messages are present on the receive list,
           this sub-page option will not be displayed.
     •     MSG – SEND. Displays the Message Send sub-page.


COM Originator Directory (ORIG DIR) Sub-Page
The ORIG DIR sub-page allows crewmembers to set their ownship identification settings to a pre-planned network
member entry. This directory facilitates efficient and rapid configuration of the ownship’s originator ID to
correspond to a pre-planned network identification.
                                                           1. Replace Ownship




     2. Directory Members                                                                2. Directory Members




                                                                                        3. Directory Member
                                                                                           Status Window




                                          4. Paging Controls      5. Search Directory


1.   Replace Ownship. Replaces the ownship’s digital ID settings with those of the directory member that has
     been selected for review.
2.   Directory Members. Selects a directory member for review within the Directory Member status window.
3.   Directory Member Status Window. Displays the callsign and digital ID settings of the selected directory
     member.
4.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of the directory.
5.   Search Directory. Activates the KU for inputting alphanumeric characters to search for a specific member
     within the directory. Displayed members will be filtered accordingly based on the results.
COM Network (NET) Sub-Page
The NET sub-page allows crewmembers to review or modify the callsign and identification settings of each
member within the datalink network of the selected preset. The callsign and subscriber ID settings for each
network member may be manually edited from this page, or they may be replaced altogether using pre-planned
network member data accessed through the Member Directory (MBR DIR) sub-page.
                                   1. SUFFIX sub-page      2. MEMBER EDIT




                 3. Preset                                                                        4. Member
              Status Window                                                                     Status Window




         5. Network Members                                                                     5. Network Members




     6. MBR DIR sub-page                                                                        7. MODEM sub-page



                8. Ownship
              Status Window




                                                9. Paging Controls   10. PRESET EDIT sub-page


1.   SUFFIX sub-page. Not implemented.
2.   MEMBER EDIT. Displays options for editing the digital ID settings of the selected network member.
     •       MEMBER EDIT – DEL. Deletes the network member from the preset.
     •       MEMBER EDIT – TEAM. Designates the network member as a Team member. Any of the 15 members
             within a network may be designated as a Team member.
     •       MEMBER EDIT – PRI. Designates the network member as a Primary member. No more than 7
             members within a network may be designated as a Primary member.
     •       MEMBER EDIT – C/S. Activates the KU for inputting the network callsign of the member. A minimum
             of 3 and a maximum of 5 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
     •       MEMBER EDIT – SUB. Activates the KU for inputting the subscriber identification (ID) number, which
             identifies the member on the datalink network. The alphanumeric character ranges that are valid for
             entry are 0-39 (with no leading zeros), A-Z, 1A-1Z, 2A-2Z, and 3A-3I; for a total of 127 unique network
             ID numbers.
             NOTE: Each network member, to include the ownship, must have a unique ID number. If two or more
             members on the same datalink network are assigned the same identification number, erroneous
             behavior may be observed when using the datalink, or when using functions within the cockpit that are
             associated with the datalink.
3.   Preset Status Window. Displays the unit ID and modem protocol of the preset network, along with the
     callsign of the selected network member.
4.   Member Status Window. Displays the digital ID settings of the selected network member.
5.   Network Members. Selects a network member for review within the Member Status Window.
6.   MBR DIR sub-page. Displays the Member Directory sub-page.
7.   MODEM sub-page. Displays the Modem sub-page.
8.   Ownship Status Window. Displays the digital ID settings of the ownship.
9.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of the network member list.
10. PRESET EDIT sub-page. Displays the Preset Edit sub-page.


COM Member Directory (MBR DIR) Sub-Page
The MBR DIR sub-page allows crewmembers to add new members to the network or replace existing member
entries in the network member list. This directory facilitates efficient and rapid configuration of the network
member list using pre-planned network identification data.
                                                                1. STORE Method




     2. Directory Members                                                                  2. Directory Members




                                                                                          3. Directory Member
                                                                                             Status Window




                                           4. Paging Controls     5. Search Directory


1.   STORE Method. Inserts the selected directory member into the selected datalink network.
     •     STORE – REPLACE. Displays the REPLACE format of the Member Directory sub-page.
     •     STORE – ADD. Adds the selected directory member into the first network entry is that is available. If
           the datalink network already contains 15 network members, this option will be disabled and “barriered”
           unless an existing network member is deleted from the selected datalink network.
2.   Directory Members. Selects a directory member for review within the Directory Member status window.
3.   Directory Member Status Window. Displays the digital ID settings of the selected directory member.
4.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of the directory.
5.   Search Directory. Activates the KU for inputting alphanumeric characters to search for a specific member
     within the directory. Displayed members will be filtered accordingly based on the results.
Member Directory – Replace Format
That Replace format of the Member Directory sub-page allows crewmembers to select an existing network
member within the current datalink network to replace with the selected directory member.




             7. Preset                                                                   8. Directory Member
          Status Window                                                                     Status Window




     9. Network Members                                                                  9. Network Members




6.   Preset Status Window. Displays the unit ID and modem protocol of the preset network, along with the
     callsign of the selected directory member that will replace a selected network member.
7.   Directory Member Status Window. Displays the digital ID settings of the selected directory member
     that will replace a selected network member.
8.   Network Members. Selects an existing network member for replacement by the directory member
     displayed within the Preset Status Window, using the information displayed within the Directory Member
     Status Window.
COM Modem (MODEM) Sub-Page
The MODEM sub-page allows crewmembers to configure the settings the modem will utilize when sending or
receiving data through any radios tuned to the selected preset.




                                                                                             5. Preset
                                                                                          Status Window
         1. Modem Protocol


     2. Modem Automatic
      Acknowledgement


          3. Modem Retries


     4. Modem Baud Rate




                                                     6. NET Sub-page


1.   Modem Protocol. Selects the type of protocol the modem will utilize for the selected preset.
     •      DATALINK. DATALINK-protocol digital messages may be sent using any radio tuned to the selected
            preset. The modem will monitor any radios tuned to the selected preset for incoming digital messages
            compatible with AH-64D-only DATALINK protocols.
     •      TACFIRE. Not implemented.
     •      INTERNET. Not implemented.
     •      FIRE SUPPORT. Not implemented.
     •      NONE. Radios tuned to the selected preset cannot send digital messages. The modem will not monitor
            any radios tuned to the selected preset.
2.   Modem Automatic Acknowledgement. Enables/disables automatic acknowledgements by the modem.
     If a digital message is received, the modem will transmit a discreet acknowledgement to the originator ID
     of the sender that the digital message has been received by the ownship.
     NOTE: When a request for data is transmitted to a network subscriber, an “acknowledgement” from the
     subscriber’s modem only confirms the request for data was received. An acknowledgement does not contain
     the requested data, which is transmitted within a “reply”.
3.   Modem Retries. Selects the number of subsequent attempts the modem should transmit digital messages
     if an acknowledgement of reception is not received from any intended message recipients.
     If an acknowledgement is not received from all intended recipients following the number of selected retries,
     a “XMIT NAK” (No acknowledgement to transmission) advisory message will be displayed on the EUFD,
     indicating which radio through which the modem failed to receive all required acknowledgements. This
     advisory will be removed if the modem successfully receives acknowledgements from all intended recipients
     from a subsequent digital message transmission.
     •    0. The modem will not make additional attempts to transmit a digital message.
     •    1. The modem will make one additional attempt to transmit a digital message to any subscribers that
          did not return an acknowledgement.
     •    2. The modem will make two additional attempts to transmit a digital message to any subscribers that
          did not return an acknowledgement.
4.   Modem Baud Rate. Not implemented.
5.   Preset Status Window. Displays the unit ID, callsign, and modem protocol of the selected preset network.
6.   NET sub-page. Displays the Network sub-page.
Datalink Mission Editor Options
Mission creators may configure the datalink settings for each
aircraft within the Mission Editor. These settings are located
on the Aircraft Additional Properties and Datalinks tabs.        Aircraft Additional
                                                                   Properties tab
Aircraft Additional Properties. Allows the mission creator
to configure any remaining properties that are unique to the
aircraft type.
•    Datalink Originator ID. The originator ID will be how
     the datalink modems of other AH-64D’s within the
     mission will recognize the aircraft when sending or
     receiving datalink messages. The alphanumeric
     character ranges that are valid for entry are 0-39 (with
     no leading zeros), A-Z, 1A-1Z, 2A-2Z, and 3A-3I; for a
     total of 127 unique network ID numbers.
     NOTE: Each network member, to include the ownship,
     must have a unique ID number. If two or more
     members on the same datalink network are assigned
     the same identification number, erroneous behavior
     may be observed when using the datalink, or when
     using functions within the cockpit that are associated
     with the datalink.
•    Ownship Call Sign. This data field will determine how
     the aircraft is annotated within the cockpit of other AH-
     64D’s within the mission when sending or receiving
     datalink messages. A minimum of 3 and a maximum of
     5 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
(See ORIG ID sub-page for more information.)
Datalinks – SETTING tab. Allows the mission creator to                                 Datalinks
configure the details of each preset on the COM page.
•    Unit ID. This data field determines how the preset is
     displayed on the COM page and on the EUFD Preset list.
     Up to 8 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
•    Call Sign. This data field determines how the preset is
     displayed on the EUFD when assigned to a radio. Up to
     5 alphanumeric characters may be entered.
•    Primary Freq. Displays options for designating a
     primary frequency and radio for the preset. The
     corresponding entries on the COM Preset format will be
     displayed in white to highlight the intended radio and
     net with which the preset is intended to be utilized
     during the mission. The primary designation does not
     affect the function of any radio equipment or how the
     preset is assigned to a specific radio.
•    DL Net. When checked, DATALINK protocols will be
     enabled on the MODEM sub-page for the preset.
(See PRESET EDIT sub-page in the Radio Communications
chapter for more information.)
Datalinks – NETWORK tab. Allows the mission creator to
configure the network and modem settings for each preset
on the COM page.                                                                                  Datalinks

•   Preset Buttons (1-10). Selects the corresponding
    preset with which to edit the network and modem
    settings in the table below.
•   Auto Acknowledgement. When checked, automatic
    acknowledgements will be transmitted by the modem
    when a digital message is received across the datalink
    network associated with this preset.
•   No Acknowledgement Retries. Selects the number
    of subsequent attempts the modem should transmit
    digital messages if an acknowledgement of reception is
    not received across the datalink network associated
    with this preset.
•   MBR #. Displays the index of each network member
    associated with this preset. A maximum of 16 members
    may be present within each network. The ownship will
    always occupy the first entry; entries 2-16 will
    correspond with network subscribers.
•   PILOT NAME. Displays the name of each network
    member, which corresponds to how their entries will be
    annotated within the ORIG DIR and MBR DIR sub-
    pages.
•   C/S. Displays the Call Sign of each network member.
•   ID. Displays the subscriber ID of each network
    member.
•   PRI. When checked, the member will be designated as a Primary member within the datalink network
    associated with this preset. A maximum of 8 Primary members may be present within each network, with
    the ownship always included as the first entry.
•   TM. When checked, the member will be designated as a Team member within the datalink network
    associated with this preset. A maximum of 16 Team members may be present within each network, with
    the ownship always included as the first entry.
•   Del. When the red “trash can” icon within this column is selected, the member will be removed from the
    datalink network associated with this preset. The ownship cannot be deleted from the network.
•   Groups Selection/ADD Button. Displays options for selecting other AH-64D BLK.II Helicopter Groups
    within the mission. Only AH-64D BLK.II Helicopter Groups that are of the same coalition and not already
    present within the displayed network will be available for selection.
    When the ADD button is pressed, all AH-64D’s within that Helicopter Group will be added to the member list
    of the displayed network.
•   Units Selection/ADD Button. Displays options for selecting individual AH-64D BLK.II helicopters within
    the mission. Only AH-64D BLK.II helicopters that are of the same coalition and not already present within
    the displayed network will be available for selection.
    When the ADD button is pressed, the AH-64D will be added to the member list of the displayed network.
(See NET and MODEM sub-pages for more information.)
TEAM MESSAGES
Team messages are used to relay and distribute command and control information, mission updates, or
reconnaissance information among networks of AH-64D’s. These message types include individual text messages
and entire mission files. Any time a text message or mission file is transmitted across a datalink network, all
subscribers designated as a Team member within that network will receive them.
Although Team messages themselves cannot be selectively sent to individual aircraft within a datalink network,
the networks themselves may be configured to facilitate this. Team member designations within a network may
be altered from the NET sub-page, or separate datalink networks may be configured with unique Team member
designations.


COM Message Send (MSG SEND) Sub-Page
The Message Send sub-page presents several options for sending text messages or mission files.
                                                                1. TEXT Sub-page




                                                                                            4. CURRENT
       2. Mission 1 Select
                                                                                         MISSION Sub-page

       3. Mission 2 Select




                                                   5. ATHS Sub-page


1.   TEXT sub-page. Displays the Text sub-page.
2.   MISSION 1. Not implemented.
3.   MISSION 2. Not implemented.
4.   CURRENT MISSION sub-page. Displays the Current Mission sub-page.
5.   ATHS sub-page. Not implemented.
Sending Text Messages
Text messages may contain up to 4 lines of text, with each line consisting of no more than 44 alphanumeric
characters (or spaces), for a maximum of 176 characters.


COM MSG-SEND Text (TEXT) Sub-Page
The TEXT sub-page allows aircrews to select a pre-composed text message for transmission across the datalink
network, or manually compose a text message themselves using the Keyboard Unit (KU).
Text Message - MPS Format
Ten text messages may be composed using Mission Planning Systems prior to the mission. These text messages
allow aircrews to rapidly send critical or time-sensitive messages between aircraft without needing to manually
input each message prior to transmission.
                             1. Source Select   2. TEXT MSG Type




                                                                                        4. Message
                                                                                      Preview Window




     3. Message Select                                                                 3. Message Select




                                                                                       5. SEND Button


                                                                                       6. Send Status Window




1.   Source Select. Not implemented.
2.   TEXT MSG Type. Selects a page format for sending pre-composed or manually entered text messages.
     •    TEXT MSG – MPS. Displays up to 10 text messages that have been composed prior to the mission.
     •    TEXT MSG – FREE. Displays options for manually composing a text message using the KU.
3.   Message Select. Selects an MPS Text message for preview.
4.   Message Preview Window. Displays the text message that will be transmitted if the SEND button is
     pressed.
5.   SEND Button. The SEND button is displayed when a MPS Text message is selected for preview, or at least
     one character has been entered into one line of a Free Text message, and the Datalink Transmit Select
     Indicator is set to a radio that has been configured for transmitting digital messages.
     When the SEND button is pressed, the text message will be sent to all network subscribers that are
     designated as Team members.
6.   Send Status Window. Displays the radio and datalink network over which the text message will be
     transmitted.
Text Message - Free Format
Free text messages may be composed in the cockpit using the Keyboard Unit (KU). This allows aircrews to send
text messages regarding unplanned events, contingencies, or reconnaissance information.




          7. Text Entries




                                                   8. Clear Text Entries

7.   Text Entries. Activates the KU for inputting a line of text. Each line of text may contain a maximum of 44
     characters.
8.   Clear Text Entries. Deletes all characters from each line of text.
Sending Mission Files
Mission files may be sent from the aircraft database across the datalink network, which will overwrite the
corresponding mission file when stored in the receiving aircraft. Each mission file may be individually selected for
transmission, or the entire mission database may be selected for transmission.


COM MSG-SEND Current Mission (CURRENT MISSION) Sub-Page
The CURRENT MISSION sub-page transmits mission files from the aircraft memory across the datalink network.
When stored, the mission files onboard the receiving aircraft will be replaced with the received mission file. This
allows commanders or team leaders to synchronize information displayed on the TSD of each AH-64D as changes
in mission occur in real-time. This may also be used to update the TSD database of subsequent teams entering
the battlespace from those already on-station performing reconnaissance or conducting a “battle handover”.
                             1. DL Page       2. XPNDR Page      3. UHF Page          4. FM Page   5. HF Page




             6. Waypoint/
             Hazards File


             7. Areas File                                                                                      11. Laser Codes File


             8. Lines File




     9. Target/Threat File


             10. Control                                                                                        14. SEND Button
            Measures File

                                                                                                                15. Send Status Window




                                          12. Route Format    13. All Mission Files


1.   DL Page. Displays the Datalink page. (N/I)
2.   XPNDR Page. Displays the Transponder page. (N/I)
3.   UHF Page. Displays the UHF Radio page. (N/I)
4.   FM Page. Displays the FM Radio page. (N/I)
5.   HF Page. Displays the HF Radio page. (N/I)
6.   Waypoint/Hazards File. Selects the Waypoint/Hazards file (W01-W50) for transmission.
7.   Areas File. Selects the Areas file for transmission. (N/I)
8.   Lines File. Selects the Lines file for transmission. (N/I)
9.   Target/Threat File. Selects the Target/Threat file (T01-T50) for transmission.
10. Control Measures File. Selects the Control Measures file (C51-C99) for transmission.
11. Laser Codes File. Selects the Laser Codes file (Codes A-R) for transmission.
12. Route Format. Displays the Route format.
13. All Mission Files. Selects all mission files residing within the aircraft memory for transmission. Each mission
    file will be transmitted in rapid succession to each Team member.
14. SEND Button. The SEND button is displayed when a mission file is selected and the Datalink Transmit
    Select Indicator is set to a radio that has been configured for transmitting digital messages.
     When the SEND button is pressed, the selected mission file(s) will be sent to all network subscribers that
     are designated as Team members.
15. Send Status Window. Displays the radio and datalink network over which the mission file will be
    transmitted.
Route Format
The Route format allows each route to be individually selected for transmission, or the entire Route file may be
transmitted.
NOTE: If a route contains any points with different coordinates (or are simply not present) within the receiving
aircraft, the route sequence will appear differently within the receiving aircraft when stored. The corresponding
points within each route should be transmitted to, and stored within, the receiving aircraft before the routes
themselves are transmitted and stored.




         16. Route Select                                                                   16. Route Select




                                                      17. Routes File


16. Route Select. Selects an individual route from within the Routes file for transmission.
17. Routes File. Selects the Routes file (Routes 1-10) for transmission.
Receiving Text Messages & Mission Files
Either crewmember may review, store, or delete any received text message, mission file, or other datalink
message. However, deleting or storing a datalink message will perform the action for both crewstations.
                                  When a text message or mission file has been received through the datalink, the EUFD
                                  will display a “DL MESSAGE” advisory, prompting the aircrew to access the MSG REC
                                  sub-page to review (or store) the received datalink message.


COM Message Receive (MSG REC) Sub-Page
The MSG REC sub-page allows aircrews to view a list containing all datalink messages that have been received.
                             1. Source Select   2. Store File    3. Store LOCATION    4. Delete Message




         5. Message Select                                                                                5. Message Select




                                                       6. Paging Controls   7. ATHS Sub-page


1.   Source Select. Not implemented.
2.   Store File. Stores the selected mission file, TSD point, tactical report, or PF/NF zones.
3.   Store LOCATION. Selects a location for storing the selected mission file, TSD point, or PF/NF zones. This
     option is not available when a tactical report is selected from the message list. (N/I)
     •      LOCATION – CURR. Stores the selected data within the database residing in the aircraft memory.
     •      LOCATION – MSN1. Stores the selected data within the MISSION 1 database residing on the DTC.
     •      LOCATION – MSN2. Stores the selected data within the MISSION 2 database residing on the DTC.
4.   Delete Message. Deletes the selected message.
5.   Message Select. Selects a received message for review, storing, or deletion.
6.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of the message list.
7.   ATHS sub-page. Not implemented.
                                      8. Review Message




8.   Review Message. Displays the Review format when a text message is selected from the message list.
     This option will be displayed in white if the selected text message has not been reviewed by either
     crewmember. Once the text message has been reviewed, the option will be displayed in green.
TSD POINTS
Any point residing within the TSD database may be transmitted across the datalink network. However, unlike
mission files which are transmitted to all Team members within the datalink network, TSD points may only be
transmitted to selected Primary members. This facilitates target handovers between individual aircraft by sending
Target points, it allows team leaders to develop hasty control measures during the mission, and permits a more
limited transfer of TSD points to specific aircraft in lieu of sending an entire file to all Team members.


Transmitting a Point
Points may be transmitted while the POINT sub-page is displayed in XMIT format. By default, no Primary members
are selected to receive a point transmission; each Primary member must be selected as a method of confirming
which subscribers should receive the selected point.


POINT Transmit (XMIT) format
Pressing the XMIT button (VAB L6) displays the POINT sub-page in Transmit format. Pressing the XMIT button a
second time returns the POINT sub-page to the original format.


                                                                                           2. Primary Member Select




         1. Review Point




                                                                                           3. SEND Button


                                                                                          4. Send Status Window




1.   Review Point. Activates the KU for inputting a point file for transmission. Alternatively, a point may be
     selected for review directly from the TSD by using the MPD cursor.
2.   Primary Member Select. Displays a list of Primary members within the selected datalink network that
     may be selected to receive the selected point. Each entry within the list is generated from the Callsigns of
     Primary members as displayed on the NET sub-page, truncated to the last three alphanumeric characters.
     For example, “DH08” is displayed as “H08” within the Primary member list on the TSD page.
     If the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a different datalink network on the EUFD, the Primary
     member list will update to reflect the Primary members within the selected datalink network. If the Datalink
     Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a radio that has not been tuned to a preset with a datalink network,
     or that network contains no Primary members, no callsigns will be displayed within the Primary member list.
3.   SEND Button. The SEND button is displayed when a point is selected, the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator
     is set to a radio that has been configured for transmitting digital messages, and at least one Primary member
     has been selected to receive it.
4.   Send Status Window. Displays the radio and datalink network over which the point will be transmitted.


Transmitting a Point
To transmit a point, ensure the EUFD Datalink
Transmit Select Indicator is set to the datalink
network over which the transmission is
intended, and then perform the following:           4. IDENT> (VAB L1)

11. TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
12. POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
                                                                                 5. Primary Members
                                                                                     (VAB L3-L6)
13. XMIT (VAB L6) – Select.
14. POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the
    point index of the point to be transmitted
    into the KU (e.g., “W11”, “H05”, “C51”,
    “T04”, etc).
                                                    3. XMIT (VAB L6)
     or                                                                            6. SEND (VAB R6)
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select
     the point to be transmitted on TSD.

                      Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                   1. TSD Fixed Action Button           2. POINT (VAB B6)




15. Primary Members (VAB T5, T6, R1-R5) – Select.
16. SEND (VAB R6) – Press.
Once SEND (VAB R6) is pressed, the SEND text label will be displayed in inverse video as the transmission is
performed to each Primary member that is selected to receive the point. When the transmission is complete, the
SEND text label will revert to normal video.
If an acknowledgement of receipt is not received from any Primary member selected to receive the point, a “XMIT
NAK” advisory will be displayed on the EUFD.
Receiving a Point
                            When a point has been received through the datalink, the EUFD will display an advisory
                            indicating the type of point received. The “TGT/THRT” advisory will also be
                            accompanied by an audio ring tone, prompting the aircrew to access the MSG REC sub-
                            page or the TSD Receive List to store the received Target/Threat point.
Any time a datalink message intended for
Primary members is received, the aircrew
within the receiving aircraft may store the
contents of the message by selecting the COM
page and then the MSG REC sub-page, or they
may store it directly from the TSD. A white             2. REC (VAB L2)
“REC” option will be displayed at VAB L2,
which will open the TSD Receive list.

                                       Type of point
                                         received


               Originator   Datalink
                Callsign    Protocol




                                                       1. TSD Fixed Action Button
The Receive list will display the four most
recent datalink messages that have not
already been stored (excluding text messages
and mission files). Each entry will include the
type of data that has been sent within the
message, the originator callsign that sent the
message, and the modem protocol through                 3. Datalink message
                                                            (VAB L2-L5)
which it was received.
In the example on this page, a TGT/THRT
point was received from “DH09” through the
DATALINK protocol, indicated by an “L”.
To store a point within the database, perform
the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   REC (VAB R2) – Select to display the
     Receive list.
3.   Datalink message (VAB L2-L5) – Select.
                                                        3. NONE (VAB L6)
     or
3.   NONE (VAB L6) – Select to close the
     Receive list without storing a message.
TACTICAL REPORTS
Tactical reports may be transmitted between AH-64D’s across the datalink network. These reports streamline and
digitize the distribution of tactical information between AH-64D’s during the mission, which facilitates a more
efficient use of the radios for voice communications.




Crewmembers may send reports to any AH-64D Primary member(s) within the selected datalink network, or they
may send a request for a report, also known as a “query”. In addition, crewmembers may configure the modem
to automatically send reports in response to queries without aircrew interaction; or they may disable this function,
which will require a manual reply to such report queries.
Battle Damage Assessment Report. BDA reports allow crewmembers to send missile engagement data to
their flight leaders, which can then forward that data across other datalink networks to AH-64D commanders.
Target Report. Target reports allow FCR-equipped AH-64D’s to distribute FCR-generated targeting or
reconnaissance data to other AH-64D’s across the datalink network, which can be used to maintain situational
awareness of the battlespace or aid in target acquisition within their own aircraft.
Present Position Report. Present Position reports update the positions of other AH-64D’s on the datalink
network and displays their positions as friendly helicopter symbols on the TSD. These reports may be used to
monitor the movements of each team of AH-64D’s, allowing flight leaders and commanders to synchronize tactical
movements and actions.
Fuel/Ammunition/Rockets/Missiles Report. Also known as FARM, these reports send the current state of
fuel, munitions, and expendable countermeasures remaining onboard, allowing flight leaders and commanders
to monitor the remaining time-on-station, ordnance, and defensive capabilities of the AH-64D’s at any point
during the mission.
All reports may be transmitted, requested, received, or reviewed through the TSD; or stored from the COM MSG
REC sub-page.
TSD Report (RPT) Sub-page
Sending or requesting tactical reports is performed through the RPT sub-page on the TSD. This sub-page allows
crewmembers to send Battle Damage Assessment (BDA) reports, FCR Target (TGT) reports, Present Position (PP)
reports, or report the status of their onboard fuel, munitions, and expendable countermeasures using FARM
reports. This page also allows crewmembers to disable the modem’s automatic replies to queries.




      1. BDA Report format                                                                              7. Status Message Select


      2. TGT Report format


       3. PP Report format


     4. FARM Report format


       5. SIT Report format


     6. SPOT Report format




                     8. Automatic Reply Mode   9. ATHS sub-page   10. ARTY sub-page   11. AF sub-page


1.     BDA Report format. Displays the Battle Damage Assessment Report format.
2.     TGT Report format. Displays the FCR Target Report format.
3.     PP Report format. Displays the Present Position Report format.
4.     FARM Report format. Displays the Fuel/Ammunition/Rockets/Missiles Report format.
5.     SIT Report format. Not implemented.
6.     SPOT Report format. Not implemented.
7.     Status Message Select. Not implemented.
8.     Automatic Reply Mode. Enables/disables the automatic reply function of the datalink modem.
       •     AUTO. The modem will automatically transmit reports in response to queries.
       •     OFF. The aircrew will be notified of incoming queries and will be responsible for sending reports as
             necessary.
9.     ATHS sub-page. Not implemented.
10. ARTY sub-page. Not implemented.
11. AF sub-page. Not implemented.
Selected Report (BDA, TGT, PP, FARM) format
Pressing the BDA (VAB L1), TGT (VAB L2), PP (VAB L3), or FARM (VAB L4) buttons displays the RPT sub-page in
the selected report format. Pressing the corresponding report button a second time returns the RPT sub-page to
the original format.
Battle Damage Assessment (BDA) Report
BDA reports transmit the SHOT file stored within the onboard database, which stores the details of each missile
engagement performed by the ownship. The BDA report can also forward SHOT files that have already been
received from other AH-64D’s via the datalink. SHOT files may be reviewed on the TSD SHOT sub-page.


                                                                                          4. Primary Member Select




         1. SHOT symbols




         2. All SHOT Files


     3. Ownship SHOT File


                                                                                          5. SEND Button


                                                                                          6. Send Status Window




                                      7. Message Type Select


1.    SHOT Symbols. Missile engagement locations are stored to the ownship SHOT file and displayed on the
      TSD and FCR pages as green X symbols. Missile engagement locations received via the datalink are displayed
      as partial-intensity green X symbols on the TSD and FCR pages.
2.    All SHOT Files (ALL). All SHOT file entries will be transmitted within the BDA report, which includes SHOT
      files stored by the ownship and SHOT files received through the datalink from other AH-64D’s.
3.    Ownship SHOT File (OWN). Ownship SHOT file entries will be transmitted within the BDA report. This is
      the default selection.
4.    Primary Member Select. Displays a list of Primary members within the selected datalink network that
      may be selected to receive the report. Each entry within the list is generated from the Callsigns of Primary
      members as displayed on the NET sub-page, truncated to the last three alphanumeric characters. For
      example, “DH08” is displayed as “H08” within the Primary member list on the TSD page.
      If the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a different datalink network on the EUFD, the Primary
      member list will update to reflect the Primary members within the selected datalink network. If the Datalink
      Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a radio that has not been tuned to a preset with a datalink network,
      or that network contains no Primary members, no callsigns will be displayed within the Primary member list.
     When BDA is the selected report type, no members are selected by default. However, if TGT, PP, or FARM
     are the selected report type, all members are selected by default.
5.   SEND Button. The SEND button is displayed when a report is selected, the Datalink Transmit Select
     Indicator is set to a radio that has been configured for transmitting digital messages, and at least one
     Primary member has been selected to receive it.
6.   Send Status Window. Displays the radio and datalink network over which the report will be transmitted.
7.   Message Type Select. Toggles the type of message that will be sent to the selected Primary members.
     This option is not displayed when the RPT sub-page is displayed in TGT format; FCR Target reports may be
     sent, but they cannot be requested.
     •    SEND. A report will be sent to each Primary member that has been selected.
     •    RQST. A query will be sent to each Primary member that has been selected.
Present Position (PP) Report
PP reports transmit the ownship’s present position to other AH-64D’s, which will be displayed as Datalink
Subscriber control measure symbols on the TSD within the receiving aircraft. Each unique present position report
is stored as C93 through C99 within the TSD database, allowing a maximum of 7 present position points to be
displayed at any given time. If a PP report is received from a subscriber ID that corresponds with an existing
point within C93-C99, the coordinate data of the point is updated with the most recent position received. If each
point within C93-C99 is already occupied by present position data, each PP report that is subsequently received
from a unique subscriber ID will overwrite the data stored in C93, then C94, etc. in a cyclic manner.
NOTE: Present Position reports are only transmitted on demand. These points are static in nature and are not
automatically updated as each AH-64D within the datalink network moves across the battlefield.




            8. Present
          Position Points




8.   Present Position Points. Displays the positions of other AH-64D’s within the datalink network. The last
     three alphanumeric characters within the corresponding subscriber’s callsign are entered as the point’s Free
     Text, which allows the crewmembers to identify the positions of other AH-64D’s on the TSD.
Fuel/Ammo/Rockets/Missiles (FARM) Report
FARM reports transmit the fuel state, munitions inventory, and the quantity of expendable countermeasures
remaining onboard the aircraft. The FARM report also includes the present position and MSL altitude (above mean
sea level) of the originating aircraft, and the time at which the data was transmitted. FARM reports may be
reviewed on the TSD FARM sub-page.
Sending Tactical Reports
To send a report, ensure the EUFD Datalink
Transmit Select Indicator is set to the datalink                                 2. RPT (VAB T1)
network over which the transmission is
intended, and then perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RPT (VAB T1) – Select.
3.   Report Type (VAB L1-L4) – Select the
     desired report format.
4.   MSG (VAB B2) – Set to SEND.
5.   Report Options (VAB L4/L5) – Select as
     necessary prior to transmitting a BDA or
     TGT report.
                                                    3. Report Type (VAB L1-L4)
     or
5.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select
     individual FCR targets to be transmitted
     within the TGT report.

                                                                                       4. MSG (VAB B2)
                      Cursor Controller/Enter


                                                   1. TSD Fixed Action Button




                                                                                          6. Primary Members
                                                                                              (VAB L3-L6)

                                                    5. Report Options (VAB L4/L5)
6.   Primary Members (VAB T5, T6, R1-R5) –
     Select.
7.   SEND (VAB R6) – Press.
Once SEND (VAB R6) is pressed, the SEND
                                                                                             7. SEND (VAB R6)
text label will be displayed in inverse video as
the transmission is performed to each Primary
member that is selected to receive the report.
When the transmission is complete, the SEND
text label will revert to normal video.
If an acknowledgement of receipt is not
received from any Primary member selected
to receive the report, a “XMIT NAK” advisory
will be displayed on the EUFD.
Requesting Tactical Reports
To request a report, ensure the EUFD Datalink
Transmit Select Indicator is set to the datalink                                2. RPT (VAB T1)
network over which the transmission is
intended, and then perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RPT (VAB T1) – Select.
3.   Report Type (VAB L1, L3, or L4) – Select
                                                                    3. Report Type (VAB L1, L3, L4)
     the desired report format.
     NOTE: FCR TGT Reports cannot be
     requested.
4.   MSG (VAB B2) – Set to RQST.
5.   Primary Members (VAB T5, T6, R1-R5) –
     Select.
6.   SEND (VAB R6) – Press.
Once SEND (VAB R6) is pressed, the SEND
text label will be displayed in inverse video as
the transmission is performed to each Primary
member that is selected to receive the query.
When the transmission is complete, the SEND
                                                   1. TSD Fixed Action Button
text label will revert to normal video.
If an acknowledgement of receipt is not
received from any Primary member selected
to receive the query, a “XMIT NAK” advisory
will be displayed on the EUFD.



                                                                                         5. Primary Members
                                                                                             (VAB L3-L6)




                                                                                            6. SEND (VAB R6)




                                                                                       4. MSG (VAB B2)
Receiving Tactical Reports
                            When a tactical report has been received through the datalink, the EUFD will display an
                            advisory indicating the type of report received. The “BDA REPORT” advisory will be
                            accompanied by an audio ring tone, prompting the aircrew to access the MSG REC sub-
                            page or the TSD Receive List to store the received report.
Any time a datalink message intended for
Primary members is received, the aircrew
within the receiving aircraft may store the
contents of the message by selecting the COM
page and then the MSG REC sub-page, or they
may store it directly from the TSD. A white               2. REC (VAB L2)
“REC” option will be displayed at VAB L2,
which will open the TSD Receive list.


                                        Type of report
                                           received


               Originator    Datalink
                Callsign     Protocol




                                                         1. TSD Fixed Action Button
The Receive list will display the four most
recent datalink messages that have not
already been stored (excluding text messages
and mission files). Each entry will include the
type of data that has been sent within the
message, the originator callsign that sent the
message, and the modem protocol through                    3. Datalink message
                                                               (VAB L2-L5)
which it was received.
In the example on this page, a BDA report was
received from “DH09” through the DATALINK
protocol, indicated by an “L”.
To store a tactical report within the database,
perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   REC (VAB R2) – Select to display the
     Receive list.
3.   Datalink message (VAB L2-L5) – Select.
                                                           3. NONE (VAB L6)
     or
3.   NONE (VAB L6) – Select to close the
     Receive list without storing a message.
Reviewing Tactical Reports
After receiving BDA and FARM reports, the information contained within the reports is extracted and stored within
the aircraft database. The information from these reports may be reviewed from the TSD COORD sub-page.


TSD Shot (SHOT) Sub-page
The SHOT sub-page displays engagement data for every missile fired from the ownship and any BDA reports
received through the datalink.




            1. Missile
         Engagement Data




            2. DEL Button




                                           3. Paging Controls


1.   Missile Engagement Data. Every AGM-114 missile that is fired will generate a unique missile engagement
     index within the ownship SHOT file.
     •     Shot Index. The index for each ownship missile engagement is numbered 1 through 16. Any SHOT
           files that are extracted from BDA reports received via the datalink will be stored in indexes 17-128,
           allowing a total of 16 missile engagements from 7 other AH-64D’s within the network.
           If the number of missile engagements from the ownship exceeds 16, which may occur after rearming
           at a Forward Arming and Refueling Point (FARP), the 17th missile engagement that is recorded will
           overwrite the data in index 1, the 18th missile engagement will overwrite the data in index 2, and so
           on in a cyclic manner.
           If the number of imported missile engagements extracted from BDA reports exceeds 112, missile
           engagement data will begin overwriting the data in index 17, then 18, and so on in a cyclic manner.
     •     Target Classification. If an RF missile engagement is conducted against an FCR-detected target, the
           corresponding FCR target symbol will be displayed next to the Shot index. If an RF missile engagement
           is conducted using the TADS to generate target data, an “Unknown” (square) target symbol will be
           displayed. All SAL missile engagements will be displayed with an “Unknown” (square) target symbol.
     •    Missile Type. “RF” will be displayed when an AGM-114L missile is employed, or “SAL” when an AGM-
          114K missile is employed.
     •    Time of Engagement. The missile engagement is recorded at the moment that launch is commanded.
     •    Ownship (OWN)/Datalink (DL). “OWN” will be displayed for missile engagements 1-16. “DL” will
          be displayed for missile engagements 17-128 that have been received over the datalink network.
     •    Location of Engagement. The MGRS coordinates of the target, to include the Earth Datum and
          Datum Code, are displayed based on the location of the target handover data when employing an RF
          missile, or the line-of-sight and range source of the selected sight at the moment of launch when
          employing a SAL missile.
2.   DEL button. Pressing the DEL button (VAB L3) replaces the DEL button with a two-button Grouped button
     confirmation option. Pressing the NO button (VAB L3) will abort the deletion process. Pressing the YES
     button (VAB L2) will delete all missile engagement data received over the datalink network.
     Ownship (OWN) missile engagement data cannot be deleted.
3.   Paging Controls. Cycles forward and back through multiple pages of the SHOT file.


TSD Fuel/Ammunition/Rockets/Missiles (FARM) Sub-page
The FARM sub-page displays onboard fuel, munitions, countermeasures, and present position coordinate data of
other AH-64D’s received through the datalink.




                                                               1. TYPE Select


1.   TYPE Select. Selects the type of FARM report data that is displayed.
     •    BASIC. The Basic FARM report format displays the datalink subscriber’s callsign, the time the report
          was received, the total fuel onboard (lbs.), remaining rounds of 30mm ammunition, remaining rockets
          onboard (of any type), and the remaining missiles onboard, separated between RF and SAL variants.
•   MSL. The Missile (MSL) FARM report format displays the datalink subscriber’s callsign, the time the
    report was received, and the remaining missiles onboard, separated between RF, SAL1, SAL2, and
    Other missile variants. Only RF (AGM-114L) and SAL2 (AGM-114K) are simulated within DCS: AH-64D.




•   EXPEN. The Expendables (EXPEN) FARM report format displays the datalink subscriber’s callsign, the
    time the report was received, and the remaining expendable countermeasures onboard, separated
    between Flare, Chaff, and Other. Only flares and chaff are simulated within DCS: AH-64D.
•   PP. The Present Position (PP) FARM report format displays the datalink subscriber’s callsign, the time
    the report was received, the subscriber’s present position in both MGRS and Latitude/Longitude
    coordinate formats, and the subscriber’s altitude in feet above mean sea level (MSL).
BATTLE AREA MANAGEMENT
As attack helicopters, AH-64D’s are capable of engaging large numbers of enemy targets within a short time
span. When massing fires against enemy forces, proper distribution of fire should be used to ensure as many
targets are engaged as possible while maximizing the use of all munitions that are available within the team, all
while avoiding potential fratricide and collateral damage of non-military infrastructure. This is especially crucial
when employing “fire-and-forget” weapons such as the radar-guided AGM-114L missile.




Fire zones facilitate this distribution of firepower across the battlefield by assigning specific geographic zones for
engagement by individual AH-64D’s (Priority Fire Zones; PFZ) and other geographic zones that should not be
engaged (No Fire Zones; NFZ). Priority Fire Zones and No Fire Zones may be transmitted between selected
Primary members across the datalink network, which allows flight leaders and commanders to digitize the
distribution of fires during the mission. These fire zones may be created, deleted, transmitted, or received through
the TSD. In addition, received fire zones may also be stored from the MSG REC sub-page, which is accessed from
the COM page.
When drawing Priority Fire Zones or No Fire Zones, 4-sided zones may be created by either crewmember using
several methods, ranging from simple rectangles to irregular-shaped quadrilaterals. Once drawn, PFZ’s may then
be assigned to any Primary member(s) within the selected datalink network.
Fire zones may also be individually activated or deactivated, which will affect how any FCR-equipped AH-64D’s
prioritize ground targets that are detected within those zones.
•    All FCR targets detected within an activated PFZ will out-prioritize any FCR targets that are outside the PFZ.
•    All FCR targets detected within an activated NFZ will not be prioritized by the FCR, even if those targets are
     also within an overlapping PFZ that is also activated. However, it should be noted that activating an NFZ will
     not prevent any targets within the zone from being engaged; it will only affect the FCR’s target prioritization
     process.
TSD Battle Area Management (BAM) Sub-page
All functions regarding Priority Fire and No Fire Zones are performed through the BAM sub-page on the TSD. This
sub-page allows crewmembers to create or delete fire zones, activate/deactivate fire zones, assign PFZ’s to
specific Primary members, or transmit fire zones to Primary members within the selected datalink network.


Priority Fire (PF) format
The BAM sub-page is displayed in PF format when the fire zone type (VAB L1) is set to PF. This format displays
options and controls for creating, deleting, assigning, or activating Priority Fire Zones.
                                               8. Assign Format



                                                                                               9. Primary Member Select


            1. Priority Fire Zone



     2. Fire Zone TYPE Select


        3. Zone Option Select


     4. Zone Activation Select


             5. Delete PF Zones


      6. Zone Number Select


      7. Draw Method Select                                                                    10. SEND Button


                                                                                               11. Send Status Window




                                                              12. Transmit Both Zone Types

1.      Priority Fire Zone. Displays a geographic area in which weapons fire from the assigned Primary member
        should be concentrated at the appropriate time in battle. Up to 8 PFZ’s may be present on the TSD at any
        given time, with each zone identified with a number 1 through 8.
2.      Fire Zone TYPE Select. Toggles the BAM page between PF and NF formats.
3.      Zone Option Select (OPT). Selects the method of sub-dividing geographic areas between each Priority
        Fire Zone.
        •        AUTO. The geographic area to encompass all PFZ boundaries is selected using the MPD cursor, which
                 is automatically subdivided into individual PFZ’s based on the number of zones selected using VAB L5.
        •        MAN. Each individual PFZ is manually drawn using the MPD cursor, the total number of which is
                 selected using VAB L5.
        •        TRP. Four equally sized PFZ’s are placed on the TSD by the MPD cursor in a Target Reference Point
                 quadrant pattern, with the height and width of each PFZ based on the KM value selected using VAB
                 L5. The MPD cursor will be displayed in TRP format when positioned within the TSD footprint.
4.   Zone Activation Select (ACT). Displays the PFZ activation menu, which allows the crewmember to
     activate any PFZ from the displayed list. When a PFZ has been activated, the border lines of the zone will
     marquee in a continuous pattern. Only one PFZ may be active at any given time.
     NOTE: Activating a PFZ will remove all zone text labels within the boundaries of the zone.
5.   Delete PF Zones (DEL). Deletes all Priority Fire Zones.
6.   Zone Number Select (#Z). Displays the zone number selection menu, which allows the crewmember to
     choose the number of PFZ’s that are drawn when OPT is set to AUTO or MAN.
     When entering the BAM sub-page, this selection will default to the number of Primary members that are
     present within the datalink network selected by the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator, plus one additional
     zone for the ownship (e.g., if there are three Primary members within the selected datalink network, the
     zone number selection will default to “4”).
     If the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is set to a radio that is not tuned to a datalink network, or the
     selected datalink network has no subscribers designated as Primary members, the zone number selection
     will default to 1.
7.   Draw Method Select (DR). Selects the method of drawing Priority Fire Zones using the MPD cursor.
     •    Box (BX). A rectangular-shaped zone will be drawn based on the alignment of the TSD. The first
          Cursor-Enter command using the MPD cursor will establish the first corner, and the second Cursor-
          Enter command will establish the opposing corner.
     •    Line (LN). A custom quadrilateral-shaped zone may be drawn independent of the alignment of the
          TSD. Each Cursor-Enter command using the MPD cursor establishes the next corner of the zone in
          sequence.
8.   Assign format (ASN). Displays the Priority Fire Assign format.
9.   Primary Member Select. Displays a list of Primary members within the selected datalink network that
     may be selected to receive the PF Zone file. Each entry within the list is generated from the Callsigns of
     Primary members as displayed on the NET sub-page, truncated to the last three alphanumeric characters.
     For example, “DH08” is displayed as “H08” within the Primary member list on the TSD page.
     If the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a different datalink network on the EUFD, the Primary
     member list will update to reflect the Primary members within the selected datalink network. If the Datalink
     Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a radio that has not been tuned to a preset with a datalink network,
     or that network contains no Primary members, no callsigns will be displayed within the Primary member list.
10. SEND Button. The SEND button is displayed on the PF format when at least one PFZ is present on the
    TSD, the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is set to a radio that has been configured for transmitting digital
    messages, and at least one Primary member has been selected to receive it.
11. Send Status Window. Displays the radio and datalink network over which the zone(s) will be
    transmitted.
12. Transmit Both Zone Types (XMIT BOTH). The XMIT BOTH button is displayed on the BAM sub-page
    when at least one PFZ and one NFZ is present on the TSD. When selected, pressing the SEND button will
    simultaneously transmit the PF Zone and NF Zone files to the selected Primary member(s).
No Fire (NF) format
The BAM sub-page is displayed in NF format when the fire zone type (VAB L1) is set to NF. This format displays
options and controls for creating, deleting, or activating No Fire Zones.
                                      1. Active Select



                                                                                             8. Primary Member Select


              2. No Fire Zone



     3. Fire Zone TYPE Select


       4. No Fire Zone Select


     5. Zone Activation Select


 6. Delete Selected NF Zone




      7. Draw Method Select                                                                  9. SEND Button


                                                                                             10. Send Status Window




                                                         11. Transmit Both Zone Types


1.     Active Select. No function.
2.     No Fire Zone. Displays a geographic area in which weapons fire is prohibited during the battle. Up to 8
       NFZ’s may be present on the TSD at any given time, with each zone identified with a number 1 through 8.
3.     Fire Zone TYPE Select. Toggles the BAM page between PF and NF formats.
4.     No Fire Zone Select (SEL). Displays the NFZ selection menu, which allows the crewmember to select
       individual No Fire Zones for drawing, deleting, or activating/de-activating the selected zone. Any number of
       NFZ’s may be active at any given time.
5.     Zone Activation Select (ACT). Activates/Deactivates the NFZ selected using VAB L2. When a NFZ has
       been activated, the border lines of the zone will marquee in a continuous pattern.
6.     Delete Selected NF Zone (DEL). Deletes the NFZ selected using VAB L2.
7.     Draw Method Select (DR). Selects the method of drawing No Fire Zones using the MPD cursor.
       •      Box (BX). A rectangular-shaped zone will be drawn based on the alignment of the TSD. The first
              Cursor-Enter command using the MPD cursor will establish the first corner, and the second Cursor-
              Enter command will establish the opposing corner.
       •      Line (LN). A custom quadrilateral-shaped zone may be drawn independent of the alignment of the
              TSD. Each Cursor-Enter command using the MPD cursor establishes the next corner of the zone in
              sequence.
8.   Primary Member Select. Displays a list of Primary members within the selected datalink network that
     may be selected to receive the NF Zone file. Each entry within the list is generated from the Callsigns of
     Primary members as displayed on the NET sub-page, truncated to the last three alphanumeric characters.
     For example, “DH08” is displayed as “H08” within the Primary member list on the TSD page.
     If the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a different datalink network on the EUFD, the Primary
     member list will update to reflect the Primary members within the selected datalink network. If the Datalink
     Transmit Select Indicator is moved to a radio that has not been tuned to a preset with a datalink network,
     or that network contains no Primary members, no callsigns will be displayed within the Primary member list.
9.   SEND Button. The SEND button is displayed on the NF format when at least one NFZ is present on the
     TSD, the Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is set to a radio that has been configured for transmitting digital
     messages, and at least one Primary member has been selected to receive it.
10. Send Status Window. Displays the radio and datalink network over which the zone(s) will be
    transmitted.
11. Transmit Both Zone Types (XMIT BOTH). The XMIT BOTH button is displayed on the BAM sub-page
    when at least one PFZ and one NFZ is present on the TSD. When selected, pressing the SEND button will
    simultaneously transmit the PF Zone and NF Zone files to the selected Primary member(s).
Drawing Fire Zones
Fire zones may be placed on the TSD by either crewmember using several options and draw methods that are
selected from the BAM sub-page. The creation of Priority Fire Zones may be Automatic, Manual, or placed around
a central TRP, but each No Fire Zone must be individually selected and drawn. However, PFZ’s and NFZ’s may
both be drawn using either the Box (BX) or Line (LN) methods.
When using the Line method to draw PFZ’s or NFZ’s, a line will not be accepted if placed in such a way that it
crosses an existing line of the same zone. For example, an hourglass-shaped zone cannot be created.
AUTO PFZ Option. The geographic area to encompass all PFZ boundaries is selected using the MPD cursor,
which is automatically subdivided into individual PFZ’s based on the number of zones selected using VAB L5.
If the Box method is used to
draw the PFZ’s, the MPD
cursor designates the two
opposing corners of the PFZ
area. If the Line method is
used to draw the PFZ’s, the
MPD cursor designates each
corner in sequence, with the
total area sub-divided based
on the vector of the first line
drawn.


MAN PFZ Option. Each individual PFZ is manually drawn using the MPD cursor, the total number of which is
selected using VAB L5.
If the Box method is used to
draw the PFZ’s, the MPD
cursor designates the two
opposing corners of each PFZ.
If the Line method is used to
draw the PFZ’s, the MPD
cursor designates each corner
in sequence. The next zone is
then drawn in the same
manner until all zones are
drawn.


TRP PFZ Option. Four equally sized PFZ’s are placed on the TSD by the MPD cursor in a Target Reference Point
quadrant pattern, with the height and width of each PFZ based on the KM value selected using VAB L5.
The MPD cursor will be displayed in TRP format when
positioned within the TSD footprint. The size of the
MPD cursor’s TRP outline will be dynamically sized
based on the selected TRP size and the current TSD
scale. The MPD cursor designates the center of the
TRP, after which four equally sized square PFZ’s are
created.
Selected NFZ. Each individual NFZ is selected and manually drawn using the MPD cursor.
If the Box method is used to draw the NFZ, the
MPD cursor designates the two opposing corners
of the selected NFZ. If the Line method is used to
draw the NFZ, the MPD cursor designates each
corner in sequence.




Drawing Priority Fire Zones
To draw a Priority Fire Zone on the TSD,
perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   BAM (VAB B3) – Select.                          3. TYPE (VAB L1)


3.   TYPE (VAB L1) – Select PF.                                                       7. MPD Cursor Draw

4.   OPT (VAB L2) – Select AUTO, MAN, or
     TRP as desired.
5.   #Z (VAB L5) – Select desired number of          4. OPT (VAB L2)
     zones if OPT is set to AUTO or MAN.
                                                     5. #Z or KM (VAB L5)
     or
5.   KM (VAB L5) – Select zone size (in
     kilometers) if OPT is set to TRP.
6.   DR (VAB L6) – Select BX or LN as desired.
                                                     6. DR (VAB L6)
7.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Draw each
     zone in sequence as necessary.

                     Cursor Controller/Enter

                                                 1. TSD Fixed Action Button   2. BAM (VAB B3)




If a zone is being drawn while the OPT is set to MAN or AUTO, and the crewmember wishes to undo any previous
cursor actions for the zone being drawn, CLR (VAB B2) may be pressed to remove each previous cursor action in
sequence.
Once the zone(s) are drawn, ASN (VAB T4), ACT (VAB L3), and DEL (VAB L4) will be displayed, allowing the
crewmember to assign or activate PFZ’s, or delete all PFZ’s from the TSD.
Drawing No Fire Zones
To draw a No Fire Zone on the TSD, perform
the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   BAM (VAB B3) – Select.                       3. TYPE (VAB L1)


3.   TYPE (VAB L1) – Select NF.
4.   SEL (VAB L2) – Select.
5.   Select desired NF Zone from expanded
     menu options (VAB T1, T2, L1-L6).            4. SEL (VAB L2)

     NOTE: Drawn NF Zones will be displayed
     in green. NF Zones that have not been
     drawn will be displayed in white.
6.   DR (VAB L6) – Select BX or LN as desired.
7.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Draw the
     zone as necessary.                           6. DR (VAB L6)                          7. MPD Cursor Draw


                     Cursor Controller/Enter




                                                 1. TSD Fixed Action Button   2. BAM (VAB B3)




                                                  8. ACT (VAB L3)
If a zone is being drawn and the crewmember
wishes to undo any previous cursor actions,
CLR (VAB B2) may be pressed to remove each
previous cursor action in sequence.
8.   ACT (VAB L3) – Select to accept and
     activate the NFZ.                            8. ACCEPT (VAB L4)

     or
8.   ACCEPT (VAB L4) – Select to accept but
     not activate the NFZ.
Once the zone is accepted by pressing ACT or
ACCEPT, DEL (VAB L4) will be displayed,
allowing the crewmember to delete the
selected NFZ from the TSD.
Assigning Priority Fire Zones
Each Priority Fire Zone may have up to two Primary members within the selected datalink network assigned;
however, each Primary member may only be assigned to one zone. Once a Primary member is assigned to a PFZ,
the corresponding callsign will be removed from the Assign Primary Member options at VAB T5, T6, and R1-R5
when any other PFZ is selected. Likewise, once the ownship is assigned to a PFZ, OWN will be removed from VAB
B6 when any other PFZ is selected. If the ownship or a Primary member is to be assigned to a different zone, the
PFZ to which they are already assigned must be selected and their callsign subsequently de-selected to remove
the assignment from that zone. This will return their callsign, or the ownship, to the list of Primary members that
may then be assigned to any PFZ.
When the PF Zone file is transmitted to the corresponding Primary members across the datalink, an aircrew’s
assigned PFZ will be annotated with “OWN” within their respective cockpit.


Priority Fire Assign (ASN) format
The BAM sub-page is displayed in ASN format when the Fire Zone TYPE (VAB L1) is set to PF and ASN (VAB T4)
is selected. This format displays options for assigning Priority Fire Zones to Primary members or the ownship.

          1. Priority Fire                                                                 2. Assign Primary
           Zone Select                                                                          Member




                                                               3. Assign Ownship


1.   Priority Fire Zone Select. Selects the corresponding PFZ for assigning the ownship and/or a Primary
     Member. The text label for the currently selected PFZ will be displayed in inverse video. When an assignment
     has been made, the next PFZ will be automatically selected in sequence.
2.   Assign Primary Member. Displays a list of Primary members within the selected datalink network that
     may be assigned to the currently selected PFZ.
3.   Assign Ownship (OWN). Assigns the ownship to the currently selected PFZ.
Sending Fire Zones
Sending fire zones across the datalink is performed through the BAM sub-page of the TSD. Crewmembers may
send Priority Fire Zones, No Fire Zones, or all fire zones to any Primary member(s) within the selected datalink
network. When transmitting the PF Zone file, all PFZ’s will be transmitted from the ownship to the selected
Primary members, which will overwrite all PFZ data on the receiving aircraft’s TSD. Likewise, when transmitting
the NF Zone file, all NFZ’s will be transmitted from the ownship to the selected Primary members, which will
overwrite all NFZ data on the receiving aircraft’s TSD.
When the PF or NF Zone data is overwritten in the receiving aircraft, all PFZ’s and/or NFZ’s will be synced to the
state of the BAM sub-page in the transmitting aircraft at the time the PF Zone or NF Zone files were transmitted,
to include the shape and location of each zone, whether each zone is active or inactive, and the assignments to
each PFZ. This data overwrite ensures that the fires distribution plan is updated across the entire AH-64D team
and that each aircraft shares the same fire zone state.
To transmit fire zones, ensure the EUFD
Datalink Transmit Select Indicator is set to the
datalink network over which the transmission
is intended, and then perform the following:        3. TYPE (VAB L1)

1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   BAM (VAB B3) – Select.                                                            4. Primary Members
                                                                                           (VAB L3-L6)
3.   TYPE (VAB L1) – Select PF or NF, if
     intending to send only one type of zones.
     or
3.   XMIT BOTH (VAB B5) – Select, if
     intending to send both types of zones.
4.   Primary Members (VAB T5, T6, R1-R5) –                                                5. SEND (VAB R6)

     Select.
5.   SEND (VAB R6) – Press.
Once SEND (VAB R6) is pressed, the SEND
text label will be displayed in inverse video as
the transmission is performed to each Primary
member that is selected to receive the
zones(s). When the transmission is complete,
                                                   1. TSD Fixed Action Button   2. BAM (VAB B3)   3. XMIT BOTH (VAB B5)
the SEND text label will revert to normal video.
If an acknowledgement of receipt is not received from any Primary member selected to receive the zone(s), a
“XMIT NAK” advisory will be displayed on the EUFD.
Receiving Fire Zones
                            When fire zones have been received through the datalink, the EUFD will display an
                            advisory indicating the type of zone(s) received. These advisories will be accompanied
                            by an audio ring tone, prompting the aircrew to access the MSG REC sub-page or the
                            TSD Receive List to store the received fire zones.
Any time a datalink message intended for
Primary members is received, the aircrew
within the receiving aircraft may store the
contents of the message by selecting the COM
page and then the MSG REC sub-page, or they
may store it directly from the TSD. A white             2. REC (VAB L2)
“REC” option will be displayed at VAB L2,
which will open the TSD Receive list.




                                        Type of fire
                                       zone received


               Originator   Datalink
                Callsign    Protocol




                                                       1. TSD Fixed Action Button
The Receive list will display the four most
recent datalink messages that have not
already been stored (excluding text messages
and mission files). Each entry will include the
type of data that has been sent within the
message, the originator callsign that sent the
message, and the modem protocol through                 3. Datalink message
                                                            (VAB L2-L5)
which it was received.
In the example on this page, PF and NF Zones
were received from “DH09” through the
DATALINK protocol, indicated by an “L”.
To store fire zones within the database,
perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   REC (VAB R2) – Select to display the
     Receive list.
3.   Datalink message (VAB L2-L5) – Select.
                                                        3. NONE (VAB L6)
     or
3.   NONE (VAB L6) – Select to close the
     Receive list without storing a message.
WEAPONS
EMPLOYMENT




WEAPONS EMPLOYMENT
It is recommended that the Tactical Employment chapter is reviewed prior to reading this chapter. This will
familiarize the reader with the roles that sights and acquisition sources play when employing weapons in a tactical
scenario.
Additionally, the Helmet-Mounted Display (HMD) and Target Acquisition Designation Sight (TADS) chapters should
be reviewed prior to reading through the weapon procedures within this chapter which rely on the corresponding
sights and their associated range sources.
When describing cockpit controls or specific tasks performed in each crewstation, the following symbols will be
used to denote each crewstation or cockpit control effects between the crewstations.
     ©
     PLT    Denotes a task that is performed by the Pilot.
      ©
     CPG    Denotes a task that is performed by the Copilot/Gunner.
      ©
PLT / CPG   Denotes a task that may be performed by either crewmember.
      ©
PLT & CPG   Denotes a task that is performed by both crewmembers.
     ©      Denotes a cockpit control, option, or setting that is “common” between crewstations. A change
            performed in one crewstation will affect both crewstations. Any item that does not have this symbol is
            “independent” between crewstations.
 “Pilot”    Denotes the crewmember occupying the aft crewstation.
 “pilot” Denotes the crewmember manipulating the aircraft flight controls in the conduct of performing a
specific flight maneuver.
WEAPONS EMPLOYMENT
Each weapon system of the AH-64D is fully integrated into the fire control system and automatically managed by
the Weapon Processors (WP). This integration increases the aircrew’s combat effectiveness by allowing each
crewmember to focus on the targeting of enemy positions using their selected sight. The WP’s generate weapon
solutions and command the positions of the gun turret and wing pylons in accordance with the selected
weapon(s), the calculated weapon aiming solution(s), and the specific weapon settings within each cockpit.




When a crewmember intends to employ a weapon system, the weapon is selected, or “actioned”, using the cyclic-
or TEDAC-mounted Weapon Action Switch (WAS); also known as “WASing” (pronounced “Wahz-ing”). When the
crewmember selects the same weapon that is already actioned, the weapon is “de-actioned”; also known as “de-
WASing”.
Neither crewstation has priority control of any weapon system over the other, allowing either crewmember to
action a weapon at any time, taking control away from the opposite crewmember using a “last actioned” logic.
As an exception to this logic, both crewmembers may action the rocket system in a Cooperative (COOP) mode.
The AH-64D’s three weapon systems are the AGM-114 missiles, 2.75-inch unguided rockets, and 30mm gun.
•    Hellfire Modular Missile System (HMMS). The AGM-114 missile is a highly accurate anti-armor
     munition, capable of engaging point targets at long range across a wide variety of battlefield conditions.
     The Hellfire is the primary weapon system of the AH-64D.
•    Aerial Rocket Sub-system (ARS). The 2.75-inch unguided rockets are an aerial rocket bombardment
     system designed for engaging or suppressing area targets at close or long range and is effective against
     groups of vehicles or personnel in the open.
•    Area Weapon System (AWS). The 30mm gun is designed for engaging or suppressing targets at close
     range and is effective against lightly armored vehicles, unarmored vehicles, and personnel.
Both crewmembers may employ separate weapon systems independently and simultaneously, however only one
weapon system may be physically fired at any given time. If a weapon system is in the process of firing or is
already committed to launching a munition, the other weapon system will be inhibited from firing for two seconds
to prevent interference with the other. (See Weapon Inhibits on the following page for more information.)
Weapon Inhibits
If a condition exists that would prevent the safe employment of a weapon system (such as another weapon
system already firing), or a condition that could negatively impact a weapon’s effectiveness under the current
conditions, the Weapons Processors will present a “Weapon Inhibit” message to the crewmember(s) to which the
message pertains. Weapon inhibits are grouped into two categories: Performance Inhibits and Safety Inhibits.

Performance Inhibits
Performance inhibits alert the crewmember(s) that the actioned weapon system cannot perform effectively under
the current flight or sighting conditions. The actioned weapon system will be inhibited from firing if the
crewmember pulls the weapon trigger to the first detent; but these inhibits may be overridden by pulling the
trigger to the second detent.

Safety Inhibits
Safety inhibits alert the crewmember(s) that employment of the actioned weapon system under the current flight
or sighting conditions would present a potential safety hazard to the aircraft and aircrew, or friendly forces in the
vicinity. These inhibits cannot be overridden using the second detent of the weapons trigger.

Performance and safety inhibits that are specific to the Area Weapon System, Aerial Rocket Sub-system, or Hellfire
Modular Missile System are described in their relevant sections.
Weapon Aiming Solution
The fire control system of the AH-64D is highly automated and only requires the crewmembers to perform
accurate sighting against the intended target. Factors such as aircraft speed, altitude above the target, range to
target, winds, or the ballistics of the weapon itself are automatically calculated to produce a weapon aiming
solution.

The EGI supplies the Weapon Processors with aircraft inertial data such as attitude, linear velocities, and angular
rates. The Airspeed And Direction Sensor (AADS) probes mounted to the engine nacelles sense airspeed
magnitude, direction, and free airstream temperature, which is used by the High Integrated Air Data Computer
(HIADC) to compute air mass related data such as relative winds and local air density. The crewmember’s selected
sight is used to determine the targets relative position from the aircraft in azimuth, elevation, and range.

The Weapon Processors use the supplied data along with crewmember’s selected weapon and cockpit settings to
calculate where the actioned weapon must be aimed in order to place rounds on target. This aiming solution
determines the commanded position of the gun turret, the commanded pylon angle of the rocket launchers, and
the vertical and lateral position of the rocket steering cursor within the crewmember(s) sight symbology.




                                                              Azimuth & Elevation

                                              Ballistics of
                                           selected weapon
                                                                    Range            Sight supplies azimuth,
                                                                                    elevation, and range data




                                    Wind




         Helicopter Air Data System
       calculates the state of the local
         air mass around the aircraft
                                                                                              EGI measures aircraft
                                                                                               rates and velocities




                                              Sources of Weapon Solution Data

Crewmember actions that typically increase the accuracy of the weapon aiming solution are ensuring the selected
sight is stabilized on the intended target and ensuring precise ranging data is supplied throughout the
engagement. In addition, the Pilot should strive to maintain a stable attitude as much as possible to assist the
Copilot/Gunner in targeting and to provide a stable weapon platform when munitions are being fired or launched.
Pylon Articulation
Hydraulically-driven articulation mechanisms are integrated into each of the four wing pylons of the AH-64 which
facilitates the swivel of the weapon mounts in the vertical axis. The articulation of each pylon is independently
controlled by the AH-64D’s Weapons Processors, based on the state of the aircraft (in flight or on the ground),
the selected weapon system of either crewmember, the current weapon inventory onboard the pylon, and the
calculated ballistic solution of the weapon itself, if applicable. The operation of the wing pylons is fully automatic
and does not require management by the crewmembers.

As any helicopter’s longitudinal airspeed is a function of its pitch attitude, the articulation of the wing pylons
allows the missile and rocket launchers to be “decoupled” from the pitch attitude of the helicopter. This mostly
eliminates the requirement to adjust the pitch attitude of the helicopter to align the weapon system with the
calculated weapon solution in the vertical axis. This in turn facilitates the employment of these weapons across
a wide range of airspeeds, while performing acceleration/deceleration maneuvers, or from a stationary hover.




                                               Pylon Articulation

However, the articulation range of each pylon is limited to +4° to -15°, relative to the aircraft datum line (ADL).
In the event the calculated weapon solution is beyond the articulation range of the pylon at the current aircraft
attitude, a corresponding weapon inhibit message will be presented to the crewmember within their sight
symbology. Under such circumstances, it may be necessary to adjust the pitch attitude of the aircraft to bring
the weapon solution within the articulation range of the applicable weapon system.




     Rocket Steering Cursor is indicating a
      positive pitch attitude is required to
     raise the pylons high enough to align
        with the weapon aiming solution




     Weapon aiming solution to a                                                           “PYLON LIMIT” displayed in
     target at a range of 7.1 km                                                            Weapon Inhibit data field




This should be expected when employing unguided rockets against targets at long ranges, in which case it is
unlikely the rocket launchers can elevate high enough without performing a positive pitch maneuver with the
aircraft. (See Aerial Rocket Sub-system for more information.)
Weapon employment tips and recommendations
The following points are recommended practices for employing weapons from the DCS: AH-64D. These
recommendations are not all-encompassing, nor do they reflect the best procedure for every situation, but will
typically increase the chances of successful weapon engagements.
•   The settings for each weapon system may be changed by manually selecting the corresponding weapon
    along the bottom row of options on the Weapon (WPN) page. This permits the weapons to be configured
    prior to being actioned by a crewmember. During start-up procedures, it is recommended that these settings
    be configured as appropriate based on the anticipated tactical situation instead of waiting until the weapons
    are actioned for employment; in some circumstances in which enemy contact has already occurred.
•   The MANRNG> value on the WPN page defaults to 1,500 meters for the Pilot and 3,000 meters for the
    Copilot/Gunner (CPG). If the selected sight is set to HMD when the gun is actioned, the crewmember’s range
    source will be automatically set to a Manual range value corresponding with the MANRNG> setting for the
    purposes of hasty engagements against close-range targets (or threats). Therefore, during start-up
    procedures, it is recommended that this value be set between 1000 and 1500 meters to ensure the range
    setting corresponds with a range that will be most practical for HMD gun engagements.
•   Off-axis gun engagements are useful for hasty, close-range shots using the HMD; however, the gun will be
    most accurate when employed in a deliberate manner by placing the target off the nose and using TADS for
    targeting.
•   If intending to use TADS Linear Motion Compensation (LMC), an approximate range measurement of the
    target area will assist the CPG in establishing an appropriate LMC slew rate prior to pulling the laser trigger
    to the 2nd detent for designation, which will minimize large “range jumps” when the laser is fired.
         o    Switch to Automatic ranging by entering “A” as the MANRNG> value on the WPN page. This will
              automatically adjust the range value based on the radar altitude and TADS look-down angle.
                                                               or
         o    Use the 1st detent of the laser trigger to fire a brief ranging pulse to measure the range to the
              target area prior to enabling LMC.
•   If intending to autonomously employ laser-guided missiles (self-designating), ensure the Priority missile
    channel is set to the same laser code as the TADS laser rangefinder/designator (LRFD).
         o    The TADS LRFD laser code is set on the WPN Code sub-page.
         o    The missile channels are set on the WPN Channel sub-page.
         o    The Priority missile channel is selected on the WPN page when set to MSL format.
•   If intending to autonomously employ laser-guided missiles in LOBL mode, ensure TRAJ (VAB R3) is set to
    “DIR” on the WPN page MSL format. This will slave the AGM-114K missile seeker to the TADS line-of-sight
    prior to the LRFD being fired, which will ensure the missile will detect the laser designation.
•   If the TADS LRFD is not firing when the laser trigger is pulled (indicated by the X pattern displayed around
    the TADS LOS Reticle), verify the following within the CPG cockpit:
         o    The selected sight is TADS.
         o    The A/S button on the Armament Panel is set to ARM.
         o    The LT switch on the TEDAC Right Handgrip is set to the center Off position. If the LST is set to
              Automatic or Manual mode, the LRFD is inhibited from firing.
         o    LASER (VAB L6) is powered on the WPN Utility sub-page.
•   When using a laser designator from a helicopter at low altitudes, precision is more critical when lasing at
    shallow angles across the terrain than compared to a fixed-wing aircraft that is lasing from high-altitudes
    with steep look-down angles. When using the TADS LRFD to measure range for the gun or rockets, being
    precise with the laser will result in a more precise weapon aiming solution. When designating for laser-
    guided missiles, it is even more important to ensure the missile actually impacts the target; versus hitting
    the ground nearby or beyond it.
•   GND STOW (VAB R5) may be enabled on the WPN Utility sub-page from either crewstation. This will fix the
    wing pylons to -5° relative to the Aircraft Datum Line (ADL), which will correspond with the Head Tracker
    within the HMD symbology.
         o    This may be used as a “fixed” rocket mode, allowing the pilot to use the Head Tracker as an
              aiming reticle for the rockets. However, ballistic compensation for range will not be provided, so
              the Head Tracker will need to be elevated above the intended target to account for the trajectory
              drop of the rockets as the range to target increases.
         o    When employing laser-guided missiles in a dive, GND STOW may be used to force the missile
              launchers to align with the Head Tracker. This allows the pilot to use the Head Tracker as an
              aiming reticle for the missiles. If the TADS is set as the Pilot’s ACQ, maneuvering the aircraft so
              that the Head Tracker is pointed at the Cued LOS Reticle while the CPG is lasing will ensure the
              missiles can maneuver toward the laser designation after they leave the launcher rail.
•   Performance inhibits may be overridden using the 2nd detent of the weapon trigger; but ensuring that no
    weapon inhibit messages are displayed prior to pulling the trigger increases the chances of the desired
    weapon effects. If tactically feasible, efforts should always be taken to improve the likelihood of a successful
    engagement by correcting the conditions that are resulting in the display of performance inhibits.
•   The AH-64 aircrew consists of two crewmembers. Employing weapons accurately and effectively is just as
    much the responsibility of the Pilot as it is the Copilot/Gunner (CPG). A Pilot that flies haphazardly makes
    the CPG’s job more difficult, and a CPG that doesn’t coordinate with the Pilot prior to releasing munitions is
    needlessly complicating his or her own tasks.
Weapon (WPN) Page
The WPN page presents a top-down overview of the aircraft weapons load along with relevant sight, sensor, and
countermeasure statuses. The WPN page will contextually change format to display additional weapon-specific
settings any time a weapon is actioned within the crewstation or manually selected along the bottom row of
Variable Action Buttons (VAB).
Other key settings that may be accessed from this page include changing the selected acquisition source (ACQ),
selecting a manual or automatic range source, changing the laser codes assigned to the TADS Laser
Rangefinder/Designator and Laser Spot Tracker, or boresighting the IHADSS.
                                1. CHAN sub-page      2. ASE page   3. CODE sub-page        4. COORD sub-page




       6. ARM/SAFE Status                                                                                           5. UTIL sub-page

      7. Sight Select Status                                                                                        8. Acquisition Select Status

        9. LST Code Status                                                                                          10. LRFD Code Status


             11. Gun Status                                                                                         12. Missile Symbol

                                                                                                                    13. Rocket Symbol


 14. Chaff Dispenser Status                                                                                         15. Training Mode


 16. BORESIGHT sub-page                                                                                             18. LRFD Ranging Setting

 17. HMD Grayscale Select                                                                                           19. Acquisition Source




                               20. GUN format      21. MSL format   22. RKT format       23. Manual Range Setting

1.   CHAN sub-page. Displays the WPN Channel sub-page.
2.   ASE page. Displays the Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) page.
3.   CODE sub-page. Displays the WPN Code sub-page.
4.   COORD sub-page. Displays the WPN Coordinates sub-page. (See TSD Coordinate sub-page for more
     information.)
5.   UTIL sub-page. Displays the WPN Utility sub-page.
6.   ARM/SAFE Status. Displays the master armament state.
         •      SAFE. No weapons are actioned. TADS                                  •     SAFE. Actioned weapon(s) and TADS
                LRFD is inhibited from firing.                                             LRFD are inhibited from firing.
         •      ARM. No weapons are actioned. TADS                                   •     ARM. Actioned weapon(s) and TADS
                LRFD may be fired.                                                         LRFD may be fired.
7.   Sight Select Status. Indicates the sight currently selected within the crewstation.
     •       HMD. Displayed when the crewmember’s selected sight is HMD.
     •       TADS. Displayed when the crewmember’s selected sight is TADS (CPG only).
     •       FCR. Displayed when the crewmember’s selected sight is FCR.
8.   Acquisition Select Status. Indicates the acquisition source currently selected within the crewstation.
     •       PHS. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the
             Pilot’s Helmet Sight.
     •       GHS. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the
             Copilot/Gunner’s Helmet Sight.
     •       SKR. If the next-to-shoot AGM-114 is tracking a laser designation or target in LOBL mode when slave
             is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the azimuth and elevation of the missile seeker.
     •       FCR. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location of the Next-To-Shoot
             (NTS) target detected by the Fire Control Radar. This option is only displayed if the FCR mast-mounted
             assembly is installed and the FCR is powered.
     •       FXD. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to a fixed forward direction along
             the Armament Datum Line (ADL, 0° in azimuth/-4.9° in elevation).
     •       W##, H##, C##, T##. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location
             of the Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point set as the acquisition source within
             the crewstation, and the range source will switch to a Navigation range equal to the slant range
             between the aircraft and the selected point. ## indicates the specific point number to which the
             Waypoint, Hazard, Control Measure, or Target/Threat point has been stored.
     •       TRN. When slave is enabled, the currently selected sight will slave to the location of the terrain location
             cursor-selected on the TSD within the crewstation, and the range source will switch to a Navigation
             range equal to the slant range between the aircraft and the Terrain point.
9.   LST Code Status. Displays the laser code that the TADS Laser Spot Tracker will scan for when enabled.
     (See WPN Code sub-page for more information.)
10. LRFD sub-page. Displays the laser code that the TADS Laser Rangefinder/Designator will emit when fired.
    (See WPN Code sub-page for more information.)
11. Gun Status/Symbol. Displays the status of the Area Weapon System and the remaining quantity of
    ammunition onboard. If the gun system is powered off, the gun symbol will be removed from the page.
    (See Area Weapon System for more information.)
12. Missile Symbol/Missile Launcher. Displayed when a missile is loaded onto the corresponding missile
    launcher rail underneath the corresponding wing pylon, the type of missile that is loaded, and the missile’s
    status. If the missile system is powered off, missile and launcher symbols will be removed from the page.
    (See Hellfire Modular Missile System for more information.)
         •      BIT. A built-in-test is            •    SAFE. The missile                   •    ARM. The missile
                being performed to                      launcher is in a SAFE                    launcher is in an
                determine the status                    status. Missiles are                     ARM status. Missile
                of any missiles that                    inhibited from being                     launch is permitted.
                are detected onboard                    launched.
                the launcher.
13. Rocket Launcher Symbol. Displayed when a rocket launcher is loaded underneath the corresponding
    wing pylon, along with the rocket warhead type that is selected within the crewstation. If the rocket
    system is powered off, any rocket launcher symbols will be removed from the page. (See Aerial Rocket
    Sub-system for more information.)
14. Chaff Dispenser Status. Displays the arming state of the chaff dispenser and the remaining quantity of
    individual chaff cartridges.
        •      SAFE. 30 chaff cartridges remain on                     •    ARM. 30 chaff cartridges remain on
               board. Chaff is inhibited from being                         board. Chaff may be dispensed.
               dispensed.
15. Training Mode. Not implemented.
16. BORESIGHT sub-page. Displays the WPN Boresight sub-page. (See IHADSS Boresight for more
    information.)
17. HMD Grayscale Select. Selects a grayscale pattern for display within the HDU. The grayscale pattern is
    used to set the appropriate brightness and contrast levels for the HDU video output.
18. LRFD Ranging Setting. Selects which laser return is utilized by the LRFD when fired using the 1 st detent
    of the LRFD trigger on the TEDAC Right Handgrip. This setting is common between crewstations.
    •       FIRST. The first laser return that is received by the LRFD is utilized for range.
    •       LAST. The last laser return that is received by the LRFD is utilized for range.
19. Acquisition Source (ACQ). Displays the acquisition source selection menu. (See Acquisition Sources in
    the Tactical Employment chapter for more information.)
20. GUN format. Displays the WPN Gun format.
21. MSL format. Displays the WPN Missile format.
22. RKT format. Displays the WPN Rocket format.
23. Manual Range Setting. Activates the KU for inputting a manual or automatic range as the range source
    for that crewstation.
    •       Manual Range. May be entered in 1-meter increments between 100 and 50,000 meters, and then
            pressing ENTER on the KU. If a range value is not entered prior to pressing ENTER on the KU, the
            manual range value already displayed on the WPN page will be entered as the range source.
    •       Automatic Range. May be enabled by entering a value of “A”, and then pressing ENTER on the KU.
WPN Channel (CHAN) Sub-page
The CHAN sub-page allows either crewmember to change the laser code assigned to each of the four missile
channels. When the WPN page is displayed in MSL format and the missile TYPE is set to SAL, any of these four
missile channels may be selected as either the Priority or Alternate channel.
                                             1. Channel Selection




     2. Channel Status                                                                 3. Code Ranges Status




      4. Code Selection                                                                4. Code Selection




                                              4. Code Selection


1.   Channel Selection. Selects the missile channel for laser code assignment.
2.   Channel Status. Displays the missile channel that is currently selected for laser code assignment.
3.   Code Ranges Status. Displays the pulse repetition frequencies that may be entered into any of the 16
     preset laser codes.
4.   Code Selection. Assigns the corresponding laser code to the selected missile channel. The laser code
     currently assigned to the selected missile channel will be boxed.
     Laser codes are assigned using one of 16 presets labeled “A” through “R”, excluding I and O to prevent
     confusion with one and zero respectively.
WPN Code (CODE) Sub-page
The CODE sub-page allows either crewmember to change the laser code assigned to the TADS Laser
Rangfinder/Designator (LRFD) and Laser Spot Tracker (LST).
The FREQ sub-page may also be accessed from this sub-page, permitting either crewmember to modify the
specific pulse repetition frequency (PRF) value used by each laser code.
                             1. CHAN sub-page   2. LRFD/LST Setting    3. FREQ sub-page




     4. LRFD/LST Status                                                                   5. Code Ranges Status




         6. Code Selection                                                                6. Code Selection




                                                   6. Code Selection


1.   CHAN sub-page. Displays the WPN Channel sub-page.
2.   LRFD/LST Setting. Toggles the selected TADS sensor (LRFD or LST) for laser code assignment.
3.   FREQ sub-page. Displays the WPN Frequency sub-page.
4.   LRFD/LST Status. Displays the TADS sensor (LRFD or LST) that is selected for laser code assignment.
     •      LRFD. The TADS LRFD will emit the selected laser code when fired.
     •      LST. The TADS LST will search for an offboard laser designation source that matches the selected laser
            code when set to Automatic or Manual mode. (See Laser Spot Track for more information.)
5.   Code Ranges Status. Displays the pulse repetition frequencies that may be entered into any of the 16
     preset laser codes.
6.   Code Selection. Assigns the corresponding laser code to the selected TADS sensor (LRFD or LST). The
     laser code currently assigned to the selected TADS sensor will be boxed.
     Laser codes are assigned using one of 16 presets labeled “A” through “R”, excluding I and O to prevent
     confusion with one and zero respectively.
WPN Frequency (FREQ) Sub-page
The FREQ sub-page allows either crewmember to modify the specific pulse repetition frequency (PRF) value used
by each laser code using the Keyboard Unit (KU).
                          1. CHAN sub-page




                                                                                      2. Code Ranges Status




     3. Code Frequency                                                               3. Code Frequency




                                             3. Code Frequency


1.   CHAN sub-page. Displays the WPN Channel sub-page.
2.   Code Ranges Status. Displays the pulse repetition frequencies that may be entered into any of the 16
     preset laser codes.
3.   Code Frequency. Activates the KU for inputting a pulse repetition frequency into the corresponding laser
     code.
WPN Utility (UTIL) Sub-page
The UTIL sub-page allows either crewmember to enable/disable power to specific sight, sensor, or weapon
systems, or modify the settings of such systems. The format of this page is contextual depending on which
crewstation is viewing the sub-page, and will only present options that are relevant to that crewstation; although
some options are available in both crewstations.
The LOAD sub-page may also be accessed from this sub-page, permitting either crewmember to modify the
quantity of rounds loaded into the ammunition handling system or change the warhead ballistic values assigned
per rocket launcher zone.
Pilot Crewstation Options
The format of the UTIL sub-page when displayed within the Pilot crewstation is shown below.




         1. IHADSS Power                                                                               4. ACQ Cueing


                                                                                                       5. Launcher Arm




           2. PNVS Power


          3. EOCCM Filter                                                                              6. Pylon Ground Stow
              Power




                    7. Gun System Power   8. Missile System Power   9. Rocket System Power   10. LOAD Sub-page


1.   IHADSS Power. Enables/disables the Integrated Helmet And Display Sighting System. This setting is
     common between crewstations.
2.   PNVS Power. Enables/disables the Pilot Night Vision System. If either crewmember is using the PNVS as
     their NVS sensor, this option will be “barriered” and unavailable for selection.
3.   EOCCM Filter. Selects the electro-optical counter-countermeasure filter setting in use
     by the NVS sensor assigned to the Pilot crewstation, as protection against optical
     countermeasures. (N/I)
     •       FILTER 1. Selects EOCCM Filter 1.
     •       CLEAR. No filter is applied.
     •       FILTER 2. Selects EOCCM Filter 2.
4.   ACQ Cueing. Enables/disables cueing symbology to the Pilot’s acquisition source. When
     disabled, the Cued LOS Reticle and Cueing Dots will be removed from the Pilot’s HMD symbology.
5.   Launcher Arm. Manually commands the external ARM/SAFE switches on all M299
     missile launchers to rotate to the ARM position.
     This command will not permit AGM-114 missiles to be launched if the A/S button on
     the Armament Panel is set to SAFE. However, if the external ARM/SAFE switches on
     the missile launchers themselves are set to SAFE, missiles cannot be launched even
     if the A/S button is set to ARM.
     NOTE: When ground personnel are rearming the aircraft, they will set the external
     ARM/SAFE switches on each M299 missile launcher to the SAFE position.                     Launcher Arm

     Each time the master armament state is toggled from SAFE to ARM via the A/S button, this arming command
     is automatically sent to the missile launchers.
6.   Pylon Ground Stow. Manually commands each wing pylon to the Ground Stow position (-5° relative to
     the Aircraft Datum Line), which corresponds to the position of the Head Tracker. This will ensure the wing
     pylons remain level with the surface when the aircraft is landed and facilitates easier loading of munitions
     by ground personnel.
     NOTE: When the aircraft is weight-on-wheels, the wing pylons are automatically commanded to the Ground
     Stow position. Four seconds after the weight-on-wheels switch detects the aircraft is airborne, the wing
     pylons are automatically commanded to the Flight Stow position (+4° relative to the Aircraft Datum Line).
7.   Gun System Power. Enables/disables the Area Weapon System.
8.   Missile System Power. Enables/disables the Hellfire Modular Missile System.
9.   Rocket System Power. Enables/disables the Aerial Rocket Sub-system.
10. LOAD sub-page. Displays the WPN Load sub-page.
Copilot/Gunner Crewstation Options
The format of the UTIL sub-page when displayed within the Copilot/Gunner crewstation is shown below.




         11. TADS Power                                                                    14. TADS Stow

          12. FLIR Power

         13. Laser Power
11. TADS Power. Enables/disables the Target Acquisition Designation Sight. If either crewmember is using the
    TADS as their NVS sensor, or if the CPG is using the TADS as a sight, this option will be “barriered” and
    unavailable for selection.
12. FLIR Power. Enables/disables the TADS FLIR sensor. If either crewmember is using the TADS as their NVS
    sensor, this option will be “barriered” and unavailable for selection.
     When disabled, a “FLIR OFF” message will be displayed within the Sight Status field of the High Action
     Display when the CPG’s selected sight is TADS.
13. Laser Power. Enables/disables the TADS Laser Rangefinder/Designator (LRFD).
14. TADS Stow. Manually commands the TADS turret to the stow position, rotating the sensor turret 180°
    toward the rear, facing inwards. If either crewmember is using the TADS as their NVS sensor, or if the CPG
    is using the TADS as a sight, this option will be “barriered” and unavailable for selection. If the crewmember
    that is assigned TADS as their NVS sensor sets their NVS Mode switch to the NORM or FIXED positions, this
    option will be automatically de-selected.


WPN Utility, Load (LOAD) Sub-page
The LOAD sub-page is not implemented.
AREA WEAPON SYSTEM (AWS)
The Area Weapon System is designed for engaging or suppressing targets at close range and is effective against
lightly armored vehicles, unarmored vehicles, and personnel. Although the entire M139 AWS also includes the
hydraulically-steered turret, ammunition magazine, and ammo handling system that transports ammunition from
the magazine to the turret, the most noticeable component of the AWS is the M230E1 30mm gun (also called the
“thirty” or simply the “gun”).




The gun may be employed by either crewmember when using the HMD or FCR as the selected sight; or by the
CPG when using the TADS. When employed using the HMD as the selected sight, gun engagements are typically
performed with the intent to engage or suppress close-range threats to the aircraft, in which the speed of placing
“rounds on target” is of greater importance over accuracy and precision. When employed using the TADS as the
selected sight, gun engagements may be performed in a more offensive manner in which accuracy and precision
is desired.
The gun may be used in the normal “flex gun” mode (NORM mode) in which the gun turret is articulated to match
the ballistic solution against the target location as calculated by the Weapon Processors; or in a forward-firing
“fixed gun” mode (FXD mode) in which the gun is fixed to a ballistic solution of 1,575 meters directly in front of
the aircraft, regardless of the selected sight or computed target location.
During major combat operations, the ammunition capacity of the Area Weapon System can hold up to 1,200
rounds if necessary. However, the ammunition magazine may be replaced with an Internal Auxiliary Fuel System
(IAFS), which includes a reduced-size 30mm ammunition magazine but extends the range and endurance of the
aircraft with an additional 100 gallons of fuel. The IAFS reduces the ammunition storage to just 25% of its full
capacity, limiting the total rounds that may be carried to 300.
M230E1 30mm Automatic Gun
The M230 is a single-barrel, automatic chain gun which fires 30x113mm link-less ammunition. The M230 is
designed as an anti-material and anti-personnel weapon, employing a high-explosive dual-purpose (HEDP) round
that is capable of penetrating light armor while simultaneously producing fragmentation effects against
unarmored vehicles or personnel.
As a chain gun, the weapon uses a rotating chain within the receiver assembly to cycle the internal action in
loading the next round for firing and clearing the empty casing from the chamber after firing. This contrasts with
other weapons which use the expanding gases from the round’s explosive charge or the recoil of the round itself
to cycle the internal action. The gun action is powered by an external drive motor which is supplied with aircraft
electrical power.


                                               Elevation Actuator                                     Utility Hydraulic Supply
                                                                                                       to Elevation Actuator

                                                      WSPS Blade

                                                                                                        Flexible Ammunition
                                                                                                        Chute & Carrier Drive



 Flash Suppressor
                      Recoil Dampeners (both sides)




                                          WSPS Deflector Assembly


                                                                       Gun Drive Motor   Chamber Access Door      Gun Cradle


The gun turret itself is steered using hydraulic pressure from the Utility hydraulic system and includes Wire Strike
Protection System (WSPS) components. The WSPS is intended to divert or sever high-tension wires that may be
inadvertently encountered by the aircraft during low-level operations, especially during hours of darkness. The
M230 is intended as a “low-signature weapon”, in which tracer rounds are not utilized and the gun barrel is
equipped with a flash suppressor to reduce visual detection during operations at night.
The M230 has an approximate rate of fire of 625 (±25) rounds per minute, but this may vary slightly between
individual aircraft. Two types of ammunition may be employed, each with identical ballistic characteristics.
                                M789 High-Explosive Dual-Purpose (HEDP). The M789 round uses a shaped
                                charge surrounded by a steel case to provide armor penetration and fragmentation
                                effects.


                                US Army photo by MAJ Enrique Vasquez

                                M788 Training/Practice (TP). The M788 round uses an inert round casing with
                                an aluminum tip to simulate the ballistic characteristics of the M789 during live-fire
                                training and exercises.


                                US Army photo by SGT Sarah Sangster


The M789 and M788 rounds have a relatively low muzzle velocity. As such, they are ill-suited for long-range
precision engagements, with an effective range of approximately 1,500 meters; although the AH-64 fire control
system will calculate a ballistic solution for the M230 out to 4,200 meters.
Gun Articulation Limits
The AWS turret can articulate through a maximum range of ±86° in azimuth and +11°/-60° in elevation.
However, additional limitations are automatically applied to the turret based on specific conditions.
•   If the gun azimuth is within ±10° of the aircraft centerline, the elevation is limited to +9°. This limitation
    does not apply when the gun is de-actioned and the gun is stowed at +11° in elevation.
•   If the aircraft is on the ground (weight-on-wheels), the elevation is limited to -6.45°.




                                               Gun Articulation Limits

•   If the gun is actioned while the missiles are also actioned, and the next-to-launch missile is on an inboard
    launcher rail of an inboard pylon, the gun azimuth will be limited to 52° on the corresponding side of the
    aircraft to prevent the missile from colliding with the gun barrel.
•   If the gun is actioned while the rockets are also actioned, and rocket launchers are installed on the inboard
    pylons, the gun azimuth will be limited to ±60° to either side to prevent the rockets from colliding with the
    gun barrel.

                      Next-to-launch missile




     Azimuth limitation applied                                              Azimuth limitation
       to corresponding side                                                applied to both sides



                      Gun Articulation Limits with Missiles/Rockets on Inboard Pylons
Gun Weapon Inhibits
The following conditions will inhibit the gun from being fired or interrupt the firing of the gun if already in in
progress. Performance inhibits may be overridden by pulling the trigger to the 2 nd detent. Safety inhibits cannot
be overridden.
Performance Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       The required weapon aiming
                                                           If tactically feasible, engage the target at a closer
    BAL LIMIT          solution exceeds the ballistics
                                                           range.
                       processing capability.


Safety Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       A missile launch or a rocket        The gun may be fired 2 seconds after the missile
   ALT LAUNCH
                       salvo is already in progress.       launch or rocket salvo is complete.
                       The gun turret is at an azimuth     Adjust the aircraft heading as necessary to bring the
     AZ LIMIT          limit and cannot reach the          weapon aiming solution within the azimuth limits of
                       weapon aiming solution.             the gun turret.
                       The gun is out of coincidence       Wait for the gun to reach the weapon aiming solution.
  COINCIDENCE          from the weapon aiming              If inhibit message remains, the gun may have
                       solution.                           experienced a failure and should be de-actioned.
                                                         Adjust the aircraft pitch attitude as necessary to bring
                       The gun turret is at an elevation
                                                         the weapon aiming solution within the elevation limits
     EL LIMIT          limit and cannot reach the
                                                         of the gun turret (e.g., pitch the nose up when
                       weapon aiming solution.
                                                         engaging a target at long range).

                       The line-of-sight of the selected   Select a different sight for engagement.
                       sight is invalid or has failed;     If using HMD as the sight and the LOS Reticle is
  LOS INVALID
                       and cannot provide a weapon         flashing, adjust the helmet position to within the slew
                       aiming solution to the gun.         limits of the assigned NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS).
                       The master armament state is
       SAFE            currently set to SAFE; weapons      Set the A/S button on the Armament Panel to ARM.
                       cannot be fired.
WPN Gun (GUN) Format
When the gun is selected for employment within the crewstation, the WPN page will be set to GUN format.




                                                                                               2. Mode Select


         1. Burst Limit Select



                                                                                               3. Gun Status
                                                                                                   Icon


         4. Harmonize Mode




1.   Burst Limit Select. Displays the quantity of 30mm rounds that will be fired each time the weapon trigger
     is pulled and held. When the burst limit is reached, a subsequent trigger pull is required to fire a subsequent
     burst. This setting is independent between crewstations.
     •     10. Gun burst is limited to 10 rounds of ammunition.
     •     20. Gun burst is limited to 20 rounds of ammunition.
     •     50. Gun burst is limited to 50 rounds of ammunition.
     •     100. Gun burst is limited to 100 rounds of ammunition.
     •     ALL. The gun will continuously fire until the ammunition is depleted.
2.   Mode Select. Displays the selected firing mode of the gun. This setting is independent between
     crewstations.
     •     NORM. The gun turret is articulated to match the weapon aiming solution derived from the
           crewmember’s selected sight and range source, as calculated by the Weapon Processors.
     •     FXD. The gun turret is fixed forward to a weapon aiming solution directly in front of the aircraft at a
           range of 1,575 meters, regardless of the selected sight or range source.
3.   Gun Status. Displays the status of the gun and the remaining quantity of ammunition on board the aircraft.
4.   Harmonize Mode (CPG Only). Not implemented.
Gun Weapon Status Messages
The following messages will be displayed in the High Action Display based on current gun status or weapon page
settings when the gun is actioned.

    WEAPON
                    CONDITION
    STATUS
 ROUNDS #### The gun is actioned and the number of remaining rounds onboard is displayed.
    WEAPON?          The weapon trigger has been pulled but no weapon has been actioned.
Gun Engagement using TADS (NORM Mode)
When employing the AWS with the TADS, ballistic compensation for aircraft linear velocities and environmental
factors is automatically calculated. If the target is moving, continuous laser designation via the 2 nd detent of the
laser trigger should be used to incorporate the Target State Estimator (TSE) for lead-angle compensation. TADS
LMC and/or IAT may also be used to assist the CPG in stabilizing the TADS LOS Reticle on the target.
To engage a target from the CPG crewstation while using the TADS as the selected sight:
1.    CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
      Right Handgrip)
2.    CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.         7. BURST LIMIT               8. ARM Status
                                                       (VAB L1-L5)
3.    CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
      appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for                                                              7. MODE (VAB R2)
      acquiring the target.
      •     If the target is visually acquired by
            either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
            or GHS.
      •     If the target is stored as a point
            within the navigational database,
            set ACQ to the corresponding point.                                                         3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)

4.     CPG (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
      and then press again to de-slave when
                                                    2. WPN Fixed Action Button
      the TADS has finished slewing.
5.    CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
      Forward. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
6.    CPG Weapon Status – Verify “ROUNDS
      ####”. (High Action Display)
7.     CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
      (WPN page)
      •     BURST LIMIT (VAB L1-L5) – Select
            as desired.
      •     MODE (VAB R2) – Select NORM.
8.     CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.                                                              10. LMC or IAT
      (Armament Panel)
9.     CPG Range source – Verify or select:
      Laser, Navigation, Auto, or Manual.
      (TADS Acquisition and Ranging)
10.    CPG If the target or aircraft are moving,
      engage TADS targeting modes to
      stabilize the TADS on target.                                                                     3. ACQ Select

      •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and
            employ the Sight Manual Tracker.
      •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT.
                                                      1. Sight Select TADS   9. Range Source      6. Verify “ROUNDS ####”
11.    CPG LRFD Trigger – Pull, if laser ranging
      is desired. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
      •    Target and aircraft are stationary –
           LRFD trigger, 1st detent, may be
           pulled momentarily (ranging).
      •    Target or aircraft are moving –
           LRFD trigger, 2nd detent, should be            11. Fire LRFD
           pulled and held (designation).
12.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •    COINCIDENCE
      •    AZ LIMIT
      •    EL LIMIT                                12. Weapon Inhibits
      •    BAL LIMIT
13.   CPG Weapon Trigger – Pull and hold for
      duration of burst. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
14.   CPG Observe for round impacts – Adjust the TADS LOS Reticle aimpoint and repeat bursts on target as
      necessary until target effects are achieved.
Gun Engagement using HMD (NORM Mode)
When employing the AWS with the HMD, the gun can be used to rapidly suppress close-in threats to the aircraft.
However, unlike the TADS, the HMD does not provide any ballistic compensation for the gun with the exception
of range compensation. Lead angle and other linear velocity compensations must be manually provided by the
crewmember by adjusting the LOS Reticle of the HMD accordingly.
To engage a target from either crewstation while using the HMD as the selected sight:
1.   Sight Select switch – HMD. (Cyclic Grip or
     TEDAC Right Handgrip)
2.   Weapon Action Switch (WAS) – Forward.        5. BURST LIMIT               6. ARM Status
     (Cyclic Grip or TEDAC Left Handgrip)           (VAB L1-L5)

     NOTE: The range source will be
                                                                                                      5. MODE (VAB R2)
     automatically set to Manual range based
     on the WPN page MANRNG> value.
3.   Weapon Status – Verify “ROUNDS
     ####”. (High Action Display)
4.   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
5.   Weapon settings – Verify or select.
     •    BURST LIMIT (VAB L1-L5) – Select
          as desired.
                                                  4. WPN Fixed Action Button
     •    MODE (VAB R2) – Select NORM.
6.   A/S button – Verify ARM is illuminated.
     (Armament Panel)
7.   Range source – Verify or select:
     Navigation, Auto, or Manual. (HMD
     Acquisition and Ranging)
8.   Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify no
     Safety or Performance inhibit messages
     are displayed:
     •    COINCIDENCE
     •    AZ LIMIT
     •    EL LIMIT
     •    BAL LIMIT
9.   Weapon Trigger – Pull and hold for
     duration of burst. (Cyclic Grip or TEDAC
     Left Handgrip)
     NOTE: If the CPG actions the gun from
     the Cyclic Grip, the cyclic weapon trigger
     must be used. If the CPG actions the gun
     from the TEDAC Left Handgrip, the
                                                   8. Weapon Inhibits
     TEDAC weapon trigger must be used.
10. Observe for round impacts – Adjust the
    HMD LOS Reticle aimpoint and repeat
    bursts on target as necessary until target     1. Sight Select HMD   7. Range source   3. Verify “ROUNDS ####”
    effects are achieved.
Gun Engagement using HMD (FXD Mode)
When employing the AWS in Fixed mode, the gun is fixed forward at a ballistic solution of 1,575 meters, requiring
the pilot to maneuver the aircraft to aim the gun at the target. The Fixed Gun Reticle is identical to the Cued LOS
Reticle of the acquisition source (ACQ) and represents the virtual location in front of the aircraft that coincides
with the 1,575-meter ballistic solution.
To engage a target from either crewstation while using the gun in Fixed mode and the HMD as the selected sight:
1.   Sight Select switch – HMD. (Cyclic Grip)
2.   Weapon Action Switch (WAS) – Forward.
     (Cyclic Grip)                                  5. BURST LIMIT              6. ARM Status
                                                      (VAB L1-L5)
3.   Weapon Status – Verify “ROUNDS
     ####”. (High Action Display)
                                                                                                       5. MODE (VAB R2)
4.   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
5.   Weapon settings – Verify or select. (WPN
     page)
     •    BURST LIMIT (VAB L1-L5) – Select
          as desired.
     •    MODE (VAB R2) – Select FXD.
6.   A/S button – Verify ARM is illuminated.
     (Armament Panel)                              4. WPN Fixed Action Button

7.   Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify no
     Safety or Performance inhibit messages
     are displayed:
     •    COINCIDENCE
8.   Maneuver aircraft to adjust the HMD
     Fixed Gun Reticle aimpoint as necessary.
9.   Weapon Trigger – Pull and hold for
     duration of burst. (Cyclic Grip)
10. Observe for round impacts – Maneuver
    aircraft to adjust the HMD Fixed Gun
    Reticle aimpoint and repeat bursts on
    target as necessary until target effects         8. Fixed Gun Reticle
    are achieved.




                                                    7. Weapon Inhibits




                                                     1. Sight Select HMD                    3. Verify “ROUNDS ####”
AERIAL ROCKET SUB-SYSTEM (ARS)
The Aerial Rocket Sub-system is an aerial rocket bombardment system designed for engaging or suppressing
area targets at long range and is effective against groups of vehicles or personnel in the open.




The ARS consists of up to four M261 rocket launchers (also called “rocket pods”), which are capable of firing
2.75-inch unguided rockets of the Hydra-70 rocket family. Each 19-tube pod is “zoned”, which permits the
carriage of up to three different warhead types when a single pair of launchers are used, or up to five different
warhead types when two pairs of launchers are used. Single rocket pods may also be loaded if desired, in the
case of reducing overall gross weight as necessary.
Rockets may be employed “independently” by either crewmember when using the HMD or FCR as the selected
sight; or by both crewmembers in a “cooperative” manner in which the Pilot aligns the aircraft with the ballistic
solution calculated by the CPG’s selected sight (usually the TADS).
When employed using the HMD as the selected sight, rocket engagements are typically performed at speeds
above effective translational lift (ETL), using forward airspeed to increase the stability of the aircraft. These
engagements are performed using weapon delivery techniques known as “running fire” or “diving fire”, which
improves the accuracy of unguided munitions such as rockets. (See Weapon Delivery Techniques for more
information.)
When employed using the TADS or FCR as the selected sight, rocket engagements may be performed using a
third weapon delivery technique known as “hover fire”, in which the aircraft remains stationary while employing
unguided rockets against area targets. These engagements may be used in either a “direct fire” mode, in which
the target location is directly sighted by the TADS when making aiming adjustments; or an “indirect fire” mode,
in which the TADS is slaved to a 3-dimensional target location previously stored using the TADS, detected by the
FCR, received via the datalink, or manually input by the aircrew, and the rockets are launched from behind cover
without having a direct line-of-sight to the target area.
Hydra-70 2.75-inch Unguided Rockets
Unguided rockets have been in use by military helicopters for decades, with the first large-scale use by UH-1 and
AH-1 helicopters during the Vietnam War of the 1960’s and early 1970’s. Although fire control systems in various
military fixed-wing aircraft and helicopters have advanced in accuracy and sophistication, the overall design of
the rockets themselves has remained comparatively simple with few changes.
The most commonly used rocket motor by the U.S. Army during the Vietnam War was the Mk40 FFAR (Folding
Fin Aerial Rocket), itself derived from the World War 2-era “Mighty Mouse” aerial rocket. The Mk40 was a tube-
launched, solid-propellant rocket motor 2.75 inches (70mm) in diameter, with four stabilizing fins that would
deploy once the rocket had been expelled from its launcher. The Mk40 rocket motor could be fitted with a variety
of compatible warheads, including high-explosives, white phosphorus for target marking, or even flechette-
dispensing warheads for anti-personnel.




                                                                                                         Spiral-fluted Nozzle

                                                                                   Spring-loaded Wrap-
                                                                                   around Folding Fins
                                                               Mk66 Rocket Motor



                                 M151 High-Explosive Warhead


    M423 Point-detonating Fuze


The Mk66 rocket motor was later developed and gradually replaced the Mk40 as the principal rocket motor for
Hydra-70 rocket systems in the U.S. military. The Mk66 included a revised “wrap-around folding fin” design and
a more powerful rocket motor with an increased propellant load, allowing it to be employed against targets as
far as 7,500 meters. The rocket propellant is expelled through a spiral-fluted nozzle that generates a spinning
motion to increase the ballistic stability and accuracy of the rocket after launch. Like the previous Mk40 rocket
motors, the Mk66 is compatible with a large number of the same 2.75-inch diameter warheads.
Weapon designations of the Hydra family of rockets are typically denoted by the installed warheads, despite being
composed of three distinct components to include the Mk66 rocket motor, warhead, and fuze. Depending on the
specific warhead that is installed on the rocket, some fuzes are integrated within the warhead itself while others
may be fitted with an external fuze option.
Compatible fuzes are grouped into three categories, based on their method of function. Rocket warheads that
may employ these types of fuzes are listed below within each applicable fuze category.
Point-Detonating Fuze            Variable Delay Fuze                           Fixed Delay Fuze
Initiates upon impact.           Initiates based on target range or            Initiates based on a fixed time
                                 a variable time delay after impact.           delay after launch.
•    M151 High Explosive         •    M151 High Explosive                      •    M257 Illumination
•    M229 High Explosive         •    M229 High Explosive                      •    M258 IR Illumination
•    M274 Training Smoke         •    M255A1 Flechette
•    M156 WP Smoke               •    M261 MP Sub-Munition
                                 •    M264 RP Smoke
M423 Point-Detonating (PD) Fuze. The M423 fuze initiates the warhead charge immediately upon impact
with any solid surface. This fuze is the most commonly used by M151 and M229 high-explosive warheads, but is
also used by the M156 white phosphorus smoke rocket for target marking and by the M274 training rocket.
M433 Resistance Capacitance (RC) Fuze. The M433 is a variable-time delay fuze that uses an electrical
charge delivered by the launching aircraft to set the desired time delay based on the specific cockpit selection.
The fuze is activated upon impact with a solid surface and initiates the warhead charge after a brief delay,
allowing the warhead to penetrate obstructions prior to detonation. This fuze is not commonly used but could be
employed to increase the penetration of high-explosive warheads through dense foliage or defensive fortifications.
M439 Air Burst Fuze. The M439 is a variable-time delay fuze that uses an electrical charge delivered by the
launching aircraft to set the desired time delay based on the specific cockpit selection. The fuze is activated upon
launch and initiates the warhead charge after a delay, allowing the warhead to reach a pre-determined range
along its trajectory prior to detonation or delivery of the warhead contents. This fuze is integrated into the M255A1
Flechette, M261 Multi-Purpose Sub-Munition (MPSM), and M264 red phosphorus smoke rockets.
M442 Cargo Fuze. The M442 is a fixed-time delay fuze that initiates the warhead charge approximately 9
seconds following rocket motor burnout. The combined flight time of the rocket motor burn and the subsequent
fuze delay deploys the warhead contents approximately 3,500 meters from the launch point and is integrated
into the M257 and M278 battlefield illumination rockets.
                                                      M442

                                                                   M439
                                                                                                  M433
                                        M423

                  0.5                                        3.5              Target Range (km)                           7.5

                                                Rocket Fuze Functions



Rocket Launcher Zones
The AH-64 is capable of employing up to five unique rocket warhead types when loaded with four M261 rocket
launchers. Each of the 19 individual rocket tubes of each M261 launcher is equipped with independent firing and
fuzing circuits, which allow the rockets to be selectively fired based on which tube is physically occupied by a
rocket and which warhead “zone” the tube is assigned.
Each zone is permanently allocated to each of the four wing pylons, meaning that zones A and B will only be
assigned to M261 launchers mounted under the outboard wing pylons, and zones C and D will only be assigned
to launchers mounted under the inboard wing pylons. However, zone E will always be assigned to the center
three tubes of any installed launchers.
       Left Outboard                 Left Inboard                         Right Inboard                  Right Outboard




                                 Zone          Zone     Zone         Zone          Zone

                                               Rocket Launcher Zones
Rocket Steering Cursor
The Aerial Rocket Sub-system (ARS) enables accurate delivery of massed fires against area targets and provides
an AH-64 team with a direct and indirect fire capability akin to a light rocket artillery battery. The fire control
system of the AH-64 calculates ballistic trajectories of 2.75-inch unguided rockets out to a range of 7,500 meters,
and at such distances most vehicle-sized targets would be difficult to visually acquire, depending on the nature
of the terrain. If a target could be seen at such a distance, direct aiming devices would be inadequate in providing
the level of aiming precision that would be necessary to ensure unguided munitions, even an area effect weapon
such as unguided rockets, could be delivered in the vicinity of the target. This would preclude the use of direct
sighting methods such as a Continuously Computed Impact Point (CCIP) or any other reticle that would require
adjustments to an aimpoint toward distant target locations.
                                                   The key piece of symbology associated with employing rockets is
                                                   the Rocket Steering Cursor, an I-beam shaped symbol displayed
         LOS Reticle must be aligned within        within the crewmembers’ sight symbology. The Rocket Steering
          the boxed region by turning left
                                                   Cursor is a steering cue which indicates the required position that
                                                   the nose of the aircraft must be placed in azimuth and elevation,
                                                   taking into account the limited articulation range of the pylons.
                                                   When the symbology LOS Reticle is aligned along the “I-beam”
                                                   between the upper and lower limits of the Rocket Steering Cursor,
                   LOS Reticle
                                                   the aircraft is positioned in which the calculated weapon aiming
                                                   solution against the intended target is within the articulation range
Rocket Steering
    Cursor                                         of the wing pylons.
                                                  The Rocket Steering Cursor is longitudinally-scaled and is not a
                                                  virtual symbology element; its displayed location does not
                                                  correspond with a real-world location that is observed “out-the-
window” like the Head Tracker or Flight Path Vector. This removes the limitations of direct sighting against long-
range targets and allows the AH-64 to employ unguided rockets from behind cover when the aircraft may not
have a direct line-of-sight to the target location. This capability facilitates indirect fire against target locations that
have been handed off to the AH-64 aircrew from another platform such as another AH-64 team member, a scout
helicopter, or friendly ground forces.
To aid the aircrew in aligning the rocket launchers with the calculated weapon aiming solution, the weapon pylons
themselves articulate in the vertical axis to account for target range and the pitch attitude of the helicopter at a
given airspeed. The pylons have an articulation range of +4° to -15° relative to the Aircraft Datum Line (ADL),
which represents the longitudinal axis of the fuselage.



                                                                                                              +4°

                                                                                                               0°


                                                                                                               -4.9°
                                                                                             Head Tracker




                                                                                                              -15°



                                              Pylon Articulation Limits

The Head Tracker symbol within the IHADSS Flight symbology is displayed at -4.9° relative to the ADL. In a stable
hover with no winds, or when landed, the Head Tracker will be level with the horizon; and is at an approximate
mid-point between the upper and lower articulation limits of the pylons.
Rocket Steering Cursor Alignment
The Rocket Steering Cursor is longitudinally positioned within the symbology based on the position of the weapon
aiming solution relative to the nose of the aircraft, which is represented by the LOS Reticle. If the Rocket Steering
Cursor is displayed to the left of the LOS Reticle, the heading of the aircraft should be adjusted to the left until
the Rocket Steering Cursor is aligned with the LOS Reticle, and vice versa if the Rocket Steering Cursor is to the
right of the LOS Reticle.
In the example below, the sight’s LOS Reticle has been placed over a group of vehicles approximately 3 kilometers
away. The LOS Reticle is being used to designate the target location and is also being used to represent the nose
of the aircraft as a reference point from which the Rocket Steering Cursor is being displayed. While the Head
Tracker is a virtual symbology element representing the real-world position of the aircraft nose, the Rocket
Steering Cursor is a longitudinally-scaled symbology element that is displayed relative to the LOS Reticle. As a
result, the Rocket Steering Cursor is indicating to the Pilot that the nose of the aircraft must be steered to the
left to align the rocket launchers with the weapon aiming solution.




                                                                                           Rocket launcher elevation
                                                                                           within articulation range of
                                                                                                 the wing pylon


                                                                         Weapon Aiming
                                                                           Solution


                                                                                           Head
                                                               Rocket                     Tracker
                                                              Steering
                                                               Cursor
                                                                             LOS
                                                                            Reticle

                          Rocket Steering Cursor indicates                                 Rockets impact to the right
                         that the nose must be turned left                                  of the target if LOS Reticle
                         to align the rocket launchers with                                is misaligned to the right of
                            the weapon aiming solution                                      the Rocket Steering Cursor



                                Rocket Steering Cursor – Lateral Misalignment

In this scenario, the LOS Reticle is vertically aligned between the upper and lower limits of the Rocket Steering
Cursor, indicating that the weapon aiming solution is within the articulation range of the wing pylons. However,
the LOS Reticle is laterally misaligned to the right from the Rocket Steering Cursor, indicating the rockets will
impact to the right of the intended target. If the rockets were fired under these conditions, they would impact to
the right of the target but would be at the correct range (assuming the ranging data being used by the selected
sight is accurate).
To correct lateral misalignment of the Rocket Steering Cursor, the Pilot should turn in the direction of the Rocket
Steering Cursor until the LOS Reticle is aligned along the vertical axis of the “I-beam”. If in a hover or at low
speeds near hover, the Pilot should use the pedals to yaw the aircraft in the direction of the Rocket Steering
Cursor. If in forward flight, the Pilot should use the cyclic to bank the aircraft in the direction of the Rocket
Steering Cursor while adjusting the pedals to keep the skid/slip indicator (“trim ball”) centered.
In the next example below, the sight’s LOS Reticle has been placed over a group of vehicles approximately 6
kilometers away, and the aircraft nose is correctly aligned with the weapon aiming solution. However, due to the
range between the aircraft and the targets, the weapon aiming solution is beyond the articulation range of the
wing pylons. As a result, the Rocket Steering Cursor is indicating to the Pilot that the nose of the aircraft must
be elevated to align the rocket launchers with the weapon aiming solution.
In addition, the Rocket Steering Cursor itself is dashed to indicate that a weapon inhibit exists, in this case a
performance inhibit, accompanied by the “PYLON LIMIT” inhibit message displayed within the symbology. (See
Rocket Steering Cursor Format on the following page for more information.)


                                                                                              Weapon aiming solution is
                                                                                               beyond the articulation
                                                                                              range of the wing pylons
                                                                       Weapon Aiming
                                                                         Solution
                                                                                              Rocket launcher elevation
                                                                                             is limited by the wing pylon
                                                                                                 upper articulation limit



                                                                                           Rocket
                                                                                          Steering
                                                                                           Cursor

                                                                                Head
                                                                               Tracker       LOS
                                                                                            Reticle


                                                                                                 Rocket Steering Cursor
                                                                                              indicates the nose must be
                            Rockets will impact short of the                                     pitched up to bring the
                          calculated target location if the LOS                                  weapon aiming solution
                          Reticle isn’t aligned within the limits                              into the articulation range
                             of the Rocket Steering Cursor                                          of the wing pylons


                                Rocket Steering Cursor – Vertical Misalignment

In this scenario, the LOS Reticle is laterally aligned with the Rocket Steering Cursor, indicating that the aircraft is
on the correct heading for an accurate rocket delivery. However, the LOS Reticle is vertically misaligned below
the Rocket Steering Cursor. If the rockets were fired under these conditions, their ballistic trajectory would be
insufficient to achieve the required range and would impact the ground prior to reaching the target.
To correct vertical misalignment of the Rocket Steering Cursor, the Pilot should use the cyclic to adjust the pitch
attitude of the aircraft in the direction of the Rocket Steering Cursor until the LOS Reticle is aligned between the
upper and lower limits of the “I-beam”. This technique uses the pitch attitude of the helicopter to augment the
elevation of the rocket launchers and is called “super-elevating”.
If in a hover or at low speeds near hover, the Pilot should use caution when super-elevating the nose near
obstacles as the pitch-up attitude will induce a backwards acceleration. If sufficient maneuver area is available,
it may be advisable to gain some forward speed prior to performing a “super-elevation maneuver” for long-range
rocket delivery. Forward airspeeds also increase airflow over the tail, providing the added benefit of improving
the helicopter’s stability, which will enhance the accuracy of unguided munitions.
Rocket Steering Cursor Format
The Rocket Steering Cursor is displayed in four formats to indicate whether the weapon aiming solution is within
the articulation range of the wing pylons (Valid or Invalid) and the current pylon state (Normal or Ground Stow).
                                     If the weapon aiming solution is within the articulation range of the wing
                                     pylons and no Weapon Inhibit messages are displayed within the High Action
                                     Display, the Rocket Steering Cursor will be displayed as Valid.
                                     If the weapon aiming solution is beyond the articulation range of the wing
  Valid Rocket     Invalid Rocket
 Steering Cursor   Steering Cursor   pylons or any Weapon Inhibit messages are displayed within the High Action
    (NORM)            (NORM)         Display, the Rocket Steering Cursor will be displayed as Invalid.
                                     If Ground Stow (GND STOW) is disabled on the WPN Utility sub-page, enabling
                                     normal articulation functions of the wing pylons, the Rocket Steering Cursor
                                     will be displayed as a continuous “I-beam” symbol.
                                     If Ground Stow (GND STOW) is enabled on the WPN Utility sub-page, disabling
                                     the normal articulation functions of the wing pylons and setting the pylons to
  Valid Rocket     Invalid Rocket
 Steering Cursor   Steering Cursor   -5° relative to the Aircraft Datum Line (coincident with the Head Tracker
  (GND STOW)        (GND STOW)       symbol within the HMD Flight symbology), the Rocket Steering Cursor will be
                                     displayed as a broken “I-beam” symbol.
NOTE: When the Rocket Steering Cursor is displayed in the GND STOW format, the broken “I-beam” symbol will
remain referenced from the LOS Reticle based on the calculated weapon aiming solution.


Rocket Weapon Inhibits
The following conditions will inhibit the rockets from being fired or interrupt the firing of the rockets if already in
in progress. Performance inhibits may be overridden by pulling the trigger to the 2nd detent. Safety inhibits cannot
be overridden.
Performance Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                          CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       The required weapon aiming
                                                           If tactically feasible, engage the target at a closer
    BAL LIMIT          solution exceeds the ballistics
                                                           range.
                       processing capability.
                       The commanded position of the       Adjust the aircraft pitch attitude as necessary to bring
  PYLON LIMIT          rocket launcher(s) exceeds the      the weapon aiming solution within the articulation
   (IN FLIGHT)         pylon articulation limits.          range of the wing pylons (e.g., pitch the nose toward
                       (+4° to -15°).                      the Rocket Steering Cursor).


Safety Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                          CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       Vertical acceleration is <0.5 G;
                       the main rotor blades may           Reduce the severity of the current maneuver to
  ACCEL LIMIT
                       obstruct the trajectory of the      increase the positive G load on the aircraft.
                       rockets when fired.
                       A missile launch is already in      The rockets may be fired 2 seconds after the missile
   ALT LAUNCH
                       progress.                           launch is complete.
             The gun is out of coincidence
             from the weapon aiming                  If tactically feasible, instruct the crewmember that has
GUN OBSTRUCT solution and may obstruct the           actioned the gun to de-action in order to permit the
             trajectory of rockets fired from        firing of rockets.
             the inboard wing pylons.

                 The line-of-sight of the selected   Select a different sight for engagement.
                 sight is invalid or has failed;     If using HMD as the sight and the LOS Reticle is
 LOS INVALID
                 and cannot provide a weapon         flashing, adjust the helmet position to within the slew
                 aiming solution to the gun.         limits of the assigned NVS sensor (PNVS or TADS).

                 Indicates that the pylon position   If inhibit message remains, the corresponding wing
                 is not equal to the commanded       pylons may have experienced a failure.
PYLON ERROR      pylon position or the rocket        A different rocket warhead selection may be made (if
                 launcher positions are              available) on a different set of wing pylons; otherwise
                 unknown.                            the rockets should be de-actioned.
                 The commanded position of the
                                                     Adjust the weapon aiming solution as necessary to
 PYLON LIMIT     rocket launcher(s) exceeds the
                                                     that which may be utilized within the articulation range
 (ON GROUND)     pylon articulation limits.
                                                     of the wing pylons.
                 (+4° to -5°).
                 The master armament state is
     SAFE        currently set to SAFE; weapons      Set the A/S button on the Armament Panel to ARM.
                 cannot be fired.
WPN Rocket (RKT) Format
When rockets are selected for employment within the crewstation, the WPN page will be set to RKT format.




                                                                                             2. Quantity Select




       1. Inventory Select



                                                                                            3. Rocket Status
                                                                                                  Icon




1.   Inventory Select. Displays the available rocket warhead types and the remaining quantity onboard for
     each type. A rocket warhead type may be selected for employment using VAB L1-L5, with the current
     selection boxed. This setting is independent between crewstations unless COOP mode is entered.
     NOTE: All rocket zones that are loaded with the same warhead type are consolidated into a single selection.
2.   Quantity Select. Displays the selected quantity of rockets that will be fired within a salvo. Selection of VAB
     R1 will display the Quantity Select menu that permits a different quantity to be selected. Available options
     are 1, 2, 4, 8, 16, 24 or ALL.
3.   Rocket Status. Indicates a rocket launcher is installed onto the corresponding wing pylon. The launcher
     icon appearance and text label indicate the status and warhead inventory selection of the launcher.
Rocket Weapon Status Messages
The following messages will be displayed in the High Action Display based on current rocket status or weapon
page settings when rockets are actioned.

    WEAPON
                    CONDITION
    STATUS
     LIMITS         The commanded position of the rocket launcher(s) exceeds the pylon articulation limits.
  NO ROCKETS        Rockets are actioned but no rockets are available.
                    Rockets are actioned. Ground stow is enabled on the WPN Utility sub-page and rocket
     RKT G-S
                    launchers are not articulating.
   RKT NORM         Rockets are actioned. Rocket launchers are articulating to the weapon aiming solution.
                    The remaining time of flight (in seconds) for the most recent rocket salvo that has been
  RKT TOF=##
                    fired.
                    Rockets are actioned but a rocket type has not been selected from the INVENTORY on
      TYPE?         the WPN page; or the previous type has been depleted and another rocket type must be
                    selected.
    WEAPON?         The weapon trigger has been pulled but no weapon has been actioned.
Rocket Engagement using TADS (Direct Fire in COOP Mode)
When employing unguided rockets in Cooperative (COOP) mode, the TADS is used by the CPG to calculate the
weapon aiming solution while the Pilot maneuvers the aircraft to align the Rocket Steering Cursor. If the target
is moving, continuous laser designation via the 2nd detent of the laser trigger should be used to incorporate the
Target State Estimator (TSE) for lead-angle compensation. TADS LMC and/or IAT may also be used to assist the
CPG in stabilizing the TADS LOS Reticle on the target.
Cooperative mode can only be entered when the CPG actions rockets on the TEDAC Left Handgrip and the Pilot
actions rockets on the Cyclic Grip.
When COOP mode is entered, the Pilot’s WPN page settings in the RKT format will default to the setting s of the
CPG. However, when in COOP mode, these settings are common between crewstations in that changing the
INVENTORY (VAB L1-L5) or QTY (VAB R1) settings in one crewstation will change them in the other.
To engage a target with Direct Fire rockets in Cooperative mode, using the TADS as the selected sight:
1.     PLT Sight   Select switch      –    HMD.
      (Collective Mission Grip)
2.    CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC         10. INVENTORY               11. ARM Status
      Right Handgrip)                                  (VAB L1-L5)                                       10. QTY (VAB R1)

3.    CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
4.    CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
      appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for
      acquiring the target.
      •     If the target is visually acquired by
            either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
            or GHS.
                                                                                                     4. ACQ Select (VAB R6)
      •     If the target is stored as a point
            within the navigational database,
            set ACQ to the corresponding point.
                                                    3. WPN Fixed Action Button
5.    CPG  (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
      and then press again to de-slave when
      the TADS has finished slewing.
6.     PLT Weapon Action switch (WAS) – Left.
      (Cyclic Grip)
7.     CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) – Left.
      (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
8.    PLT & CPG Weapon Control Status – Verify
      “COOP”. (High Action Display)
9.    PLT & CPG Weapon Status – Verify “RKT
                                                                                  8. Verify “COOP”     9. Verify “RKT NORM”
      NORM”. (High Action Display)
10.   PLT / CPG Weapon settings – Verify or
      select. (WPN page)
      •     © TYPE (VAB L1-L5) – Select as
            desired.
      •     © QTY (VAB R1) – Select as
            desired.
11.    CPG © A/S button – Verified in ARM.
      (Armament Panel)
12.    CPG Range source – Verify or select:
      Laser, Navigation, Auto, or Manual.
      (TADS Acquisition and Ranging)
13.    CPG If the target or aircraft are moving,
                                                      14. Fire LRFD
      engage TADS targeting modes to
      stabilize the TADS on target.
      •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and
            employ the Sight Manual Tracker.
      •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT.
14.   CPG  LRFD Trigger – Pull, if laser ranging
      is desired. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)              17. Weapon Inhibits
      •     Target and aircraft are stationary –
            LRFD trigger, 1st detent, may be
            pulled momentarily (ranging).
      •     Target or aircraft are moving –                                 12. Range Source
            LRFD trigger, 2nd detent, should be
            pulled and held (designation).
15.   CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Rocket Steering Cursor and fire
      – “Match and Shoot.”
16.   PLT  Rocket Steering Cursor – Align with                                           16. Align Rocket Steering
                                                                                           Cursor to LOS Reticle
      the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic
            inputs in the direction of the Rocket
            Steering Cursor while applying
            pedal      inputs     to     maintain
            aerodynamic trim.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
            the direction of the Rocket Steering
            Cursor.
17.   PLT & CPG Weapon Inhibit messages –
                                                     17. Weapon Inhibits
      Verify no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •     ACCEL LIMIT
      •     ALT LAUNCH
      •     GUN OBSTRUCT
      •     PYLON ERROR
      •     BAL LIMIT
      •     PYLON LIMIT
18.   PLT   Weapon Trigger – Pull and hold for duration of salvo. (Cyclic Grip)
19.   CPG   TADS Field-Of-View (FOV) - Decrease by one level. (e.g., switch FLIR from Narrow to Medium FOV)
20.           Observe for rocket impacts – Adjust the TADS LOS Reticle aimpoint and repeat rocket salvo as
      PLT & CPG
      necessary until target effects are achieved.
Rocket Engagement using TADS (Indirect Fire in COOP Mode)
When employing unguided rockets in Cooperative (COOP) mode, the TADS is used by the CPG to calculate the
weapon aiming solution while the Pilot maneuvers the aircraft to align the Rocket Steering Cursor. When
employed in an indirect fire manner in which the target cannot be directly observed by the aircraft sensors, the
TADS is slaved to a point within the navigational database corresponding with the target’s 3-dimensional location.
This point may be stored using the TADS, manually input by the crew, or received from another team member.
Cooperative mode can only be entered when the CPG actions rockets on the TEDAC Left Handgrip and the Pilot
actions rockets on the Cyclic Grip. When COOP mode is entered, the Pilot’s WPN page settings in the RKT format
will default to the settings of the CPG. However, when in COOP mode, these settings are common between
crewstations in that changing the INVENTORY (VAB L1-L5) or QTY (VAB R1) settings in one crewstation will
change them in the other.
To engage a target with Indirect Fire rockets in Cooperative mode, using the TADS as the selected sight:
1.    PLT Sight   Select switch     –    HMD.
     (Collective Mission Grip)
2.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC         10. INVENTORY               11. ARM Status
     Right Handgrip)                                  (VAB L1-L5)                                       10. QTY (VAB R1)

3.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
4.    CPG Determine      the    appropriate
     acquisition source (ACQ) for acquiring
     the target.
     •     COORD (VAB T5) – Select.
     •     Point (VAB L1-L6) – Select; or use
           paging controls to locate target                                                         4. ACQ Select (VAB R6)
           point within the database.
     NOTE: If the target location is not
     already present in the navigational           3. WPN Fixed Action Button
     database, the target point must be
     received via the datalink or manually
     input on the POINT sub-page. (See the
     Datalink chapter or TSD Point sub-page
     for more information.)
5.   CPG   SLAVE button – Press.
6.    PLT Weapon Action switch (WAS) – Left.
     (Cyclic Grip)
7.    CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) – Left.
     (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
                                                                                 8. Verify “COOP”     9. Verify “RKT NORM”
8.   PLT & CPG Weapon Control Status – Verify
     “COOP”. (High Action Display)
9.   PLT & CPG Weapon Status – Verify “RKT
     NORM”. (High Action Display)
10.   PLT / CPG Weapon settings – Verify or
      select. (WPN page)
      •     © TYPE (VAB L1-L5) – Select as
            desired.
      •     © QTY (VAB R1) – Select as
            desired.
11.    CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
      (Armament Panel)
12.    CPG Range source – Verify Navigation.
      (TADS Acquisition and Ranging)
13.   CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Rocket Steering Cursor and fire
      – “Match and Shoot.”
                                                      15. Weapon Inhibits                       4. ACQ Select
14.   PLT  Rocket Steering Cursor – Align with
      the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running Fire – Apply cyclic inputs in
            the direction of the Rocket Steering                  12. Range Source
            Cursor while applying pedal inputs
            to maintain aerodynamic trim.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
            the direction of the Rocket Steering
            Cursor.
15.   PLT & CPG Weapon Inhibit messages –                                            14. Align Rocket Steering
      Verify no Safety or Performance inhibit                                          Cursor to LOS Reticle

      messages are displayed:
      •     ACCEL LIMIT
      •     ALT LAUNCH
      •     GUN OBSTRUCT
      •     PYLON ERROR
      •     BAL LIMIT
      •     PYLON LIMIT
16.    PLT Weapon Trigger – Pull and hold for
      duration of salvo. (Cyclic Grip)
                                                     15. Weapon Inhibits
17.   PLT & CPGIf no observers are able to
      provide a damage assessment after
      rockets are fired, it may be necessary to
      un-mask and observe the target area to
      determine if the desired target effects are
      achieved.
Rocket Engagement using HMD (Direct Fire)
When employing unguided rockets independently from either crewstation, the crewmember uses the HMD to
calculate the weapon aiming solution while maneuvering the aircraft to align the Rocket Steering Cursor. Since
the HMD LOS Reticle designates the target location, the helmet position must be maintained on the target to
provide continuous and accurate steering cues via the Rocket Steering Cursor.
To engage a target with Direct Fire rockets, using the HMD as the selected sight:
1.   Sight Select switch – HMD. (Collective
     Mission Grip)
2.   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.             5. INVENTORY                   6. ARM Status
                                                   (VAB L1-L5)                                             5. QTY (VAB R1)
3.   Weapon Action switch (WAS) – Left.
     (Cyclic Grip)
4.   Weapon Status – Verify “RKT NORM”.
     (High Action Display)
5.   Weapon settings – Verify or select. (WPN
     page)
     •    TYPE (VAB L1-L5) – Select as
          desired.
     •    QTY (VAB R1) – Select as desired.
6.   A/S button – Verified in ARM. (Armament      2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     Panel)
7.   Range source – Verify or select:
     Navigation, Auto, or Manual. (HMD
     Acquisition and Ranging)

8.   HMD LOS Reticle – Designate the target.
9.   Rocket Steering Cursor – Align with the
     HMD LOS Reticle while maintaining the
     HMD LOS Reticle on the target.
     •    Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic
          inputs in the direction of the Rocket
          Steering Cursor while applying             9. Turn toward                                8. Place HMD LOS Reticle
          pedal      inputs     to     maintain   Rocket Steering Cursor                              over target location

          aerodynamic trim.
     •    Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
          the direction of the Rocket Steering
          Cursor.
10. Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify no
    Safety or Performance inhibit messages
    are displayed:
     •    ACCEL LIMIT                             10. Weapon Inhibits
     •    ALT LAUNCH
     •    GUN OBSTRUCT
     •    PYLON ERROR
     •    BAL LIMIT                                1. Sight Select HMD     7. Range source   4. Verify “RKT NORM”
     •    PYLON LIMIT
11. Weapon Trigger – Pull and hold for
    duration of salvo. (Cyclic Grip)
12. Observe for rocket impacts – Adjust the
    HMD LOS Reticle aimpoint and repeat
    rocket salvo as necessary until target
    effects are achieved.
HELLFIRE MODULAR MISSILE SYSTEM
(HMMS)
The Hellfire Modular Missile System is the primary weapon system of the AH-64D, capable of employing any
variant of the AGM-114 Hellfire missile family. The AGM-114 was designed as a highly accurate anti-armor
munition, capable of engaging point targets at long range across a wide variety of battlefield conditions.




The HMMS consists of up to four M299 Hellfire missile launchers (also called “HML’s”), which can carry up to four
AGM-114 missiles of any model. Each individual launcher rail is processed by the aircraft electronics independently
of the others, essentially equipping the AH-64 with up to 16 individual missile stations. Any combination of M299
missile launchers may be used in conjunction with the M261 rocket pods, to include such possibilities of three
missile launchers and one rocket pod, or a single missile launcher and a single rocket pod in the case of reducing
overall gross weight.
The HMMS provides various levels of automation for managing the missile inventory, allowing the crew to focus
on targeting and engagement of ground targets while minimizing the duration the AH-64D is un-masked and
exposed to enemy detection and weapons fire. AGM-114 missiles may be employed by either crewmember when
using the HMD or FCR as the selected sight, or by the CPG when using the TADS. However, only specific missile
types (SAL or RF) may be employed depending on the selected sight within the crewstation.
•    HMD. When the selected sight is HMD, only Semi-Active Laser (SAL) AGM-114 missiles may be selected and
     fired from the crewstation. When employed by the CPG, an offboard source of laser designation is required.
     When employed by the Pilot, an offboard laser designation is required or the CPG may provide designation
     using the TADS.
•    FCR. When the selected sight is FCR, only Radio Frequency (RF) AGM-114 missiles may be selected and
     fired from the crewstation.
•    TADS. When the CPG’s selected sight is TADS, either SAL or RF missiles may be selected and fired,
     depending on the CPG’s Weapon (WPN) page settings.
AGM-114K Semi-Active Laser-homing (SAL) Missile
The AGM-114 family of anti-tank missiles entered service in the early 1980’s alongside the AH-64A. The laser-
guided Hellfire missiles were proven to be much more capable compared to the wire-guided BGM-71 TOW missiles
which they were to replace, with the ability to be guided to a target by the launching platform or by any other
target designation system capable of emitting a matching laser code. In addition, the AGM-114’s increased range,
speed, and its ability to employ one of several post-launch trajectories added to its versatility on the battlefield.
The first generation of missiles, commonly referred to as “Basic Hellfire” variants, included the A-, B-, C- and F-
models, and were used to a high degree of success during Operation Desert Storm in 1991.
Although the early variants of the AGM-114 missile were quite successful in combat, development of a second
generation of AGM-114 missiles, commonly referred to as “Hellfire II” variants, entered service in the late 1990’s.
These new AGM-114 variants featured numerous improvements and enhancements over the first generation,
including a new digital autopilot to replace the original analog electronics, an electronic arming fuze,
countermeasure hardening, and an integrated tandem warhead for defeating reactive armor. As a side note, the
AGM-114F did include a second warhead for defeating reactive armor, giving it a noticeable increase in length
compared to other AGM-114 variants, leading to the F-model being referred to as “Interim Hellfire”.




                                                                                                                    Moving Control
                                                                                                                      Surfaces
                                                                                                    Fixed Control
                                                                                                       Surfaces
                                                                               Digital Autopilot,
                                                                                Control Gyros,
                                                                 Tandem,           & Battery
                                                               Shaped-charge
                                                     Warhead     Warhead
                                                      Fuze
                                     Fixed Control
                         Launcher       Surfaces
            Gimbaled     Umbilical
          Laser Seeker
                                               AGM-114K Hellfire missile

The AGM-114K was the first model of “Hellfire II” variants produced. Like the initial “Basic Hellfire”, the laser
frequency and post-launch trajectory are selectable from the cockpit and are immediately uploaded through the
missile’s umbilical, giving the aircrew the ability to rapidly configure the missile as needed. This flexibility, along
with the AGM-114K’s tandem shaped-charge warhead, which is capable of defeating any known armor on the
battlefield, makes the “Kilo” a versatile precision-strike weapon.
The AGM-114K may be employed in either a Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL) or a Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL)
mode. If the missile’s laser seeker detects a laser designation that matches its assigned laser code prior to launch,
regardless of whether that laser designation is provided by the launching aircraft or by an offboard source such
as another aircraft or a ground-based designator, the missile will be launched in LOBL mode.
When tracking a laser designation in LOBL mode the acceptable launch envelope, referred to as the “missile
launch constraints”, is significantly more permissive when compared to LOAL. However, LOBL requires the
launching aircraft have a direct line-of-sight to the target prior to launch, which may expose the aircraft to enemy
detection and weapons fire.
SAL Post-Launch Trajectories
The acceptable launch envelope when firing the missile in LOAL is more restrictive than LOBL to ensure the
missile is fired into the general vicinity of the intended target prior to designation. However, this allows the
launching aircraft to fire the missile while remaining behind cover and hidden from enemy detection. When a SAL
missile is launched while using LOAL, the crew may select one of three trajectories for the missile to utilize while
enroute to the target, depending on the range and any obstructions between the aircraft and the target.
•    High (HI) Trajectory. When employed using a High trajectory, the missile will use a maximum loft climb
     after launch, ascending approximately 1,300 feet above the aircraft within 2,000 meters before leveling off
     and continuing along a level altitude. The High trajectory should be utilized when the missile needs to clear
     significant terrain obstructions between the launching aircraft and the intended target, or to maximize the
     missile’s kinematic range.
•    Low (LO) Trajectory. When employed using a Low trajectory, the missile will use a moderate loft climb
     after launch, ascending approximately 500 feet above the aircraft within 1,000 meters before leveling off
     and continuing along a level altitude. The Low trajectory should be utilized when the missile needs to clear
     low terrain obstructions between the launching aircraft and the intended target, or to increase the missile’s
     kinematic range.
•    Direct (DIR) Trajectory. When employed using a Direct trajectory, the missile will use a minimum loft
     climb after launch, ascending approximately 50 feet above the aircraft within 500 meters, but will continue
     along its launch azimuth in a very slight climb, reaching a peak altitude of 250 feet within 5 kilometers. The
     Direct trajectory should be utilized when there are no terrain obstructions between the launching aircraft
     and the intended target, or if the target is at a relatively close range.
     NOTE: The trajectory option on the WPN page should be set to Direct (DIR) if the missile is intended to be
     employed in a Lock-On-Before-Launch mode. (See Missile Constraints Box for more information.)




                                                                          1,300 ft




                                                    750 ft


                                                                         500 ft


                                 300 ft
                                                             300 ft



                                                                                     50 ft

              LOAL-HI

                                          LOAL-LO

                                                                      LOAL-DIR


                                              SAL Post-Launch Trajectories

Regardless of which trajectory is selected, the AGM-114K will continue along the same azimuth following launch
until it detects a laser designation with a matching laser code, at which point it will dive onto the designated
target. If no laser designation is detected, the missile will gradually lose altitude as its kinematic energy is depleted
and it impacts the ground.
Laser Codes & Missile Channels
The AH-64D allocates laser frequencies using a combination of alphabetical laser codes and preset missile
channels to increase cockpit efficiency. Up to 16 distinct laser frequencies may be programmed and assigned to
laser codes “A” through “R”, excluding I and O to prevent confusion with one and zero respectively. These laser
codes are then allocated amongst other team members to ensure each AH-64D can designate targets
independently of one other, enabling simultaneous laser-guided missile engagements without mutual
interference. (See WPN Code sub-page for more information.)
The pre-programmed laser codes also allow rapid switching of the TADS Laser Rangefinder/Designator (LRFD)
and Laser Spot Tracker (LST) coding, without needing to manually input a 4-digit pulse repetition frequency using
the Keyboard Unit each time a change is required. Although it is rare that an AH-64D crew will need to change
their LRFD code from that which was assigned to their aircraft during a mission, the LST code may be changed
several times throughout the mission, depending on the nature of any target handovers received from other
laser-capable platforms within the battlespace.
Once the laser codes have been programmed and assigned to the TADS LRFD and LST sensors, the appropriate
laser codes must be assigned to the missile channels. Missile channels permit rapid re-coding of SAL missiles
directly from the main WPN page, independently of the ownship’s TADS LRFD and LST code assignments, and
determine which laser designations SAL missiles will scan for and track. (See WPN Channel sub-page for more
information.)




                                                 Laser Frequencies (WPN Frequency sub-page)


Code A            Code C             Code E            Code G            Code J            Code L            Code N            Code Q

         Code B             Code D            Code F            Code H            Code K            Code M            Code P            Code R
                                                       Laser Codes (WPN Code sub-page)




                                                   Missile Channels assigned on
                                                 WPN Missile Channel (CHAN) sub-page
          TADS Codes assigned on
         WPN Code (CODE) sub-page



               LRFD A           LST B                     Channel 1 A        Channel 2 B        Channel 3 C       Channel 4 D
                   LRFD          LT                         Priority          Alternate
                  Trigger      Switch                       Channel           Channel
                     TADS Codes                            Missile Channels (PRI & ALT assigned on WPN page, MSL format)

                                                 Laser Coding & Missile Channels

If the WPN page is displayed in MSL format, any of the four missile channels may be selected as the Priority or
Alternate channels for SAL missile coding. The Priority missile channel determines how the next launched SAL
missile will be coded, as in which laser pulse repetition frequency it will scan for and track. The Alternate missile
channel is only used when the missile mode is set to Ripple (RIPL) and determines how the subsequently launched
SAL missile will be coded. (See WPN Missile format and Missile Modes on the following page for more information.)
Missile Modes
The AH-64’s missile management mode may be set to either Normal, Ripple, or Manual, which dictates the
manner in which the next and subsequent missiles are selected and coded for laser designations. For more
information regarding Manual mode, see WPN Missile format.
In Normal mode, each missile that is launched is coded to a single missile channel (set as the Priority channel on
the WPN page), meaning each missile searches for and tracks laser designations of a single laser pulse frequency.

                     1st Missile                            2nd Missile                   3rd Missile                       4th Missile


                             Code A                                   Code A                      Code A                            Code A


                                                 Normal (NORM) Missile Mode

When set to Ripple mode, each missile that is launched is coded to one of two missile channels (set as the Priority
and Alternate channels on the WPN page), which automatically cycles between the two channels every time a
missile is fired. This allows missiles to be employed against two separate laser pulse frequencies that are providing
simultaneous target designations without needing to manually switch the Priority missile channel between each
pull of the weapon trigger.

                     1st Missile                            2nd Missile                   3rd Missile                        4th Missile


                             Code A                                   Code B                      Code A                             Code B

                                                    Ripple (RIPL) Missile Mode

It should be noted that the selected missile mode only provides a means of managing how each subsequent
missile is coded prior to launch, and does not directly correlate with how targets are designated, or whether the
target is designated by the launching aircraft, another aircraft in the vicinity, or a ground-based designator. In
the figure below, the aircraft launching in NORM mode may or may not be the source of laser designation against
the intended target. NORM mode simply results in each missile being coded to the Priority missile channel.

                                                                  A
                                                                                                        A
                                           A
                                                                                                            B
                                                                                      A


                                                                                          B



                 NORM


                                   Each missile is fired on the                                The Priority and Alternate missile
                                     Priority missile channel                  RIPL            channels automatically swap after
                                                                                                each pull of the weapon trigger




                                        Normal (NORM) and Ripple (RIPL) Modes

Likewise, the aircraft launching in RIPL mode may or may not be one of the sources of laser designation against
the intended targets. Either of the designation sources could be provided by the launching aircraft, another
aircraft in the vicinity, or a ground-based designator. RIPL mode simply results in the cycling of the Priority and
Alternate channels following each launch to permit engagement of multiple targets using two designation sources.
SAL Missile Constraints Box
The key piece of symbology associated with employing the AGM-114K is the Missile Constraints Box displayed
within the crewmember’s sight symbology. The Missile Constraints Box is a steering cue and launch mode indicator
which indicates the launch mode of the missile and whether the missile is within acceptable launch constraints.
                                                           The Missile Constraints Box is longitudinally-scaled and is not a
                                                           virtual symbology element; its displayed location does not
        Aircraft should be turned to the left              correspond with a real-world location that is observed “out-the-
        to launch missile within constraints
                                                           window” like the Head Tracker or Flight Path Vector. The position
                                                           of the Missile Constraints Box is referenced from the LOS Reticle,
                                                           which corresponds to the Missile Datum Line (0° in azimuth and
                                                           elevation from the longitudinal axis of the missile body). However,
                                                           the referenced position of which the Missile Constraints Box
                                                           represents is dependent on whether the missile is in LOBL or LOAL
                   LOS Reticle
                                                           mode; and when in LOAL mode, which post-launch trajectory has
                                                           been selected by the crewmember.
    Missile
Constraints Box                                 To augment the missiles’ post-launch trajectory and to ensure the
                                                missiles do not strike the ground, the wing pylons articulate in the
                                                vertical axis to maintain the pylon angle of each missile launcher
4° above the inertial horizon when the missiles are actioned. This results in the Missile Datum Line of each missile
being stabilized 4° above the horizon regardless of the aircraft pitch attitude.
Lock-On-Before-Launch Mode (LOBL)
When the missile seeker detects a laser designation that matches its assigned laser code, the missile enters LOBL
mode. When in LOBL mode, the Missile Constraints Box corresponds with the position of the missile’s seeker, in
azimuth and elevation, relative to the Missile Datum Line.
The maximum allowable offset angle when the missile is in LOBL mode is 20°, ensuring the missile will be able
to maintain track on the laser designation after launch; otherwise, the Constraints Box will be displayed as invalid,
indicating the missile is outside of launch constraints. (See Missile Constraints Box Format for more information.)




                                                                                            Wing pylons articulate to maintain missile
                                                                                             launchers 4° above the inertial horizon




                                                                                                                  4°


                                                                                                         Head
                                                                                                        Tracker

                                                                                        TADS
                                                                                      LOS Reticle



                        The position of the Missile Constraints
                          Box within the sight symbology is             Missile
                        displayed relative to the LOS Reticle,                                       Missile seeker’s position relative
                                                                    Constraints Box
                       which represents the Missile Datum Line                                          to the Missile Datum Line



                                                SAL Missile Constraints Box – LOBL
Lock-On-After-Launch Mode, Direct Trajectory (LOAL-DIR)
When the missile seeker is not detecting a laser designation that matches its assigned laser code, the missile is
in LOAL mode. If the post-launch trajectory is set to DIR, the missile seeker is slaved to the crewmember’s
selected sight and the Missile Constraints Box corresponds with the position of the selected sight (HMD or TADS),
in azimuth and elevation, relative to the Missile Datum Line.
When the CPG pulls the LRFD trigger on the TEDAC Right Handgrip to the 2nd detent to designate the target, the
seeker is de-slaved, allowing the missile to track the laser designation from the launching aircraft. When the LRFD
trigger is released, the missile seeker is once again slaved to the crewmember’s selected sight.
The maximum allowable offset angle when the missile is in LOAL mode is 7.5°. This ensures the missile is fired
in the vicinity of the target location and that the missile’s flight path will carry it close enough for the seeker to
detect a laser designation after launch. Otherwise, the Constraints Box will be displayed as invalid, indicating the
missile is outside of launch constraints. (See Missile Constraints Box Format for more information.)




                                                                                       Wing pylons articulate to maintain missile
                                                                                        launchers 4° above the inertial horizon




                                                                                                             4°


                                                                                                    Head
                                                                                                   Tracker

                                                                                   TADS
                                                                                 LOS Reticle



                     The position of the Missile Constraints       Missile
                       Box within the sight symbology is       Constraints Box
                     displayed relative to the LOS Reticle,                                       Position of the selected sight
                    which represents the Missile Datum Line                                    relative to the Missile Datum Line



                                      SAL Missile Constraints Box – LOAL-DIR

Lock-On-After-Launch Mode, Low/High Trajectory (LOAL-LO or LOAL-HI)
When the missile seeker is not detecting a laser designation that matches its assigned laser code, the missile is
in LOAL mode. If the post-launch trajectory is set to LO or HI, the missile seeker is caged directly ahead and the
Missile Constraints Box corresponds with the position of the acquisition source (ACQ), in azimuth and elevation,
relative to the Missile Datum Line when the ACQ is set to a point within the navigational database. If the ACQ is
not set to a point from the database, the Constraints Box will be displayed as invalid and be positioned at the
LOS Reticle, indicating the launch constraints are unknown.
The Missile Constraints Box indicates the azimuth to which the aircraft should be aligned to launch the missile
toward the point set as the crewmember’s ACQ. These trajectories are typically used when launching a laser-
guided AGM-114 toward a target that will be designated by an offboard designation source; in which the target
coordinates have been relayed to the launching aircraft in advance. (See Remote Fire for more information.)
The maximum allowable offset angle when the missile is in LOAL mode is 7.5°. This ensures the missile is fired
in the vicinity of the target location and that the missile’s flight path will carry it close enough for the seeker to
detect a laser designation after launch. Otherwise, the Constraints Box will be displayed as invalid, indicating the
missile is outside of launch constraints. (See Missile Constraints Box Format for more information.)
                                                       Missile Seeker is caged straight              Position of the point set as ACQ
                                                       ahead along Missile Datum Line               relative to the Missile Datum Line




                                                                                                                  4°


                                                                                                        Head
                                                                                                                        Target
                                                                                                       Tracker
                                                                                                                         Point
                                                                                        TADS
                                                                                      LOS Reticle

                                                                                                  Missile
                                     The position of the Missile Constraints                  Constraints Box
                                       Box within the sight symbology is
                                     displayed relative to the LOS Reticle,                               Missile Constraints Box
                                    which represents the Missile Datum Line                            provides steering toward ACQ



                              SAL Missile Constraints Box – LOAL-LO or LOAL-HI



SAL Missile Constraints Box Format
The Missile Constraints Box is displayed in four formats to indicate the missile’s launch mode (LOBL or LOAL) and
whether the missile is within acceptable launch constraints (Valid or Invalid).
                                    If the missile seeker is not tracking a laser designation that matches its assigned
                                    laser code, the missile will launch in Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL) mode.
     LOAL Mode       LOAL Mode
    Valid Launch   Invalid Launch   If the missile seeker is tracking a laser designation that matches its assigned
    Constraints      Constraints    laser code, the missile will launch in Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL) mode.
                                    If the missile is within acceptable launch constraints and no Weapon Inhibit
                                    messages are displayed within the High Action Display, the Missile Constraints
                                    Box will be displayed as Valid.

     LOBL Mode       LOBL Mode      If the missile is outside acceptable launch constraints or any Weapon Inhibit
    Valid Launch   Invalid Launch   messages are displayed within the High Action Display, the Missile Constraints
    Constraints      Constraints
                                    Box will be displayed as Invalid.
The acceptable launch constraints for SAL missiles are dependent on the launch mode and the selected LOAL
trajectory (if applicable).
•      LOBL Constraints. Missile seeker LOS is offset ≤ 20° Missile Datum Line.
•      LOAL-DIR Constraints. Selected sight (HMD or TADS LOS) is offset ≤ 7.5° from Missile Datum Line.
•      LOAL-LO or LOAL-HI Constraints. Line-of-sight (LOS) to the location of the point currently set as the
       acquisition source (ACQ) is offset ≤ 7.5° from Missile Datum Line.
SAL Missile Weapon Inhibits
The following conditions will inhibit the SAL missiles from being fired. Performance inhibits may be overridden by
pulling the trigger to the 2nd detent. Safety inhibits cannot be overridden.
Performance Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       The required weapon aiming
                                                           If tactically feasible, engage the target at a closer
    BAL LIMIT          solution exceeds the ballistics
                                                           range.
                       processing capability.
                                                           Wait for the missile launchers to reach the optimum
                       The position of the missile         launch position.
                       launcher(s) is ≥10° from the        If inhibit message remains, missiles may still be fired
  PYLON ANGLE
                       optimum launch position or the      but the missile launcher positions should be visually
                       pylon position is unknown.          confirmed to ensure the appropriate considerations
                                                           may be made for a successful engagement.
                       The commanded position of the
                                                           Adjust the aircraft pitch attitude as necessary to bring
  PYLON LIMIT          missile launcher(s) exceeds the
                                                           the articulation range of the wing pylons to +4° above
   (IN FLIGHT)         pylon articulation limits.
                                                           the inertial horizon.
                       (+4° to -15°).
                       The pitch, roll, and/or yaw rates
   RATE LIMIT                                            Stabilize the aircraft attitude prior to launch.
                       are excessive.
                       The roll angle of the aircraft is
   ROLL LIMIT                                              Reduce the roll attitude of the aircraft prior to launch.
                       excessive.

                       When the missile is in LOBL         Adjust the heading or pitch attitude of the aircraft to
    SKR LIMIT          mode, the missile seeker has        bring the target within the missile seeker field-of-view.
                       reached a gimbal limit.             (e.g., turn toward the Missile Constraints box).
                       When the missile is in LOAL         Adjust the heading of the aircraft to bring the target
                       mode, the target position           position closer to the aircraft centerline.
   YAW LIMIT
                       relative to the aircraft heading
                       is excessive.                       (e.g., turn toward the Missile Constraints box).


Safety Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       Vertical acceleration is <0.5 G;
                       the main rotor blades may           Reduce the severity of the current maneuver to
  ACCEL LIMIT
                       obstruct the trajectory of the      increase the positive G load on the aircraft.
                       missile when fired.
                       The firing of a rocket salvo is     The missile may be fired 2 seconds after the rocket
   ALT LAUNCH
                       already in progress.                salvo is complete.
                                                           The missile is not tracking the TADS laser designation,
                       The TADS LRFD is firing and the     possibly due to atmospheric obscurance between the
                       difference between the SAL          aircraft and the target such as dust or smoke.
 BACK SCATTER
                       missile seeker line-of-sight and    Release the laser trigger to slave the missile seeker
                       the TADS line-of-sight is >2°.      back to the TADS line-of-sight and attempt to
                                                           designate again.
                                                      If tactically feasible, instruct the crewmember that has
             The gun is out of coincidence            actioned the gun to de-action in order to permit the
             from the weapon aiming                   firing of missiles.
GUN OBSTRUCT solution and may obstruct the
             trajectory of missiles fired from        A different missile may be manually selected by setting
             the inboard wing pylons.                 the Mode to MAN and pressing the Missile Advance
                                                      button.
                  The line-of-sight of the selected
 LOS INVALID                                          Select a different sight for engagement.
                  sight is invalid or has failed.
                  The SAL priority missile channel
                  is set to NONE in NORM or RIPL      Select a priority missile channel for SAL engagement.
 MSL NOT RDY      mode.                               Press the Missile Advance button to select the next
                  A missile has not been selected     missile in MAN mode.
                  in MAN mode.
                  The aircraft is on the ground
                                                      If inhibit message remains, the corresponding wing
                  (weight-on-wheels) and the
PYLON ERROR                                           pylons may have experienced a failure and the missiles
                  missile launcher positions are
                                                      should be de-actioned.
                  unknown.
                  The commanded position of the
 PYLON LIMIT      missile launcher(s) exceeds the
                                                      The missiles should be de-actioned.
 (ON GROUND)      pylon articulation limits.
                  (+4° to -5°).
                  The master armament state is
     SAFE         currently set to SAFE; weapons      Set the A/S button on the Armament Panel to ARM.
                  cannot be fired.
WPN Missile (MSL) Format – SAL Missile Settings
When SAL missiles are selected for employment within the crewstation, the WPN page will display SAL missile
settings when set to MSL format.
NOTE: The only SAL missile variant of the AGM-114 missile family that is simulated in DCS: AH-64D is the AGM-
114K, which is of the Hellfire II series of sub-variants. As a result, only SAL2 missile icons will be displayed and
available for employment.




              1. Priority Channel                                                               5. Type Select


            2. Alternate Channel                                                                6. Mode Select


                   3. SAL Select                                                                7. Trajectory Select



     4. Missile Channels Status                                                                 8. RF Missile Icon


                                                                                                9. SAL Missile Icon
           10. Missile Counter-
          Countermeasures Mode




1.    Priority Channel. Displays the missile channel selection menu for selecting one of the four missile channels
      as the Priority channel, with the current channel selection boxed and displayed as “PRI”. This setting is
      common between crewstations.
      •       Channel 1. Missile channel 1 will be selected as the Priority channel.
              The next SAL missile to be fired will be coded to the laser code assigned
              to channel 1.
      •       Channel 2. Missile channel 2 will be selected as the Priority channel.
              The next SAL missile to be fired will be coded to the laser code assigned
              to channel 2.
      •       Channel 3. Missile channel 3 will be selected as the Priority channel.
              The next SAL missile to be fired will be coded to the laser code assigned
              to channel 3.
      •       Channel 4. Missile channel 4 will be selected as the Priority channel.
              The next SAL missile to be fired will be coded to the laser code assigned
              to channel 4.
      •       NONE. No missile channels will be selected as the Priority channel. SAL missiles will not be coded and
              are inhibited from launch. ALT channel selection (VAB L2) is inhibited and automatically set to NONE.
      NOTE: A missile channel cannot be selected as both the Priority and Alternate channels simultaneously. If
      the Alternate channel is selected as Priority, the Priority and Alternate channels will simply be swapped.
2.   Alternate Channel. Displays the missile channel selection menu for selecting one of the four missile
     channels as the Alternate channel, with the current channel selection boxed and displayed as “ALT”. This
     setting is common between crewstations.
     When the Mode is set to RIPL, SAL missiles will be coded in an alternating
     sequence between the two missile channels designated as Priority and
     Alternate.
     •    Channel 1. Missile channel 1 will be selected as the Alternate channel.
     •    Channel 2. Missile channel 2 will be selected as the Alternate channel.
     •    Channel 3. Missile channel 3 will be selected as the Alternate channel.
     •    Channel 4. Missile channel 4 will be selected as the Alternate channel.
     •    NONE. No missile channels will be selected as the Alternate channel.
          RIPL mode is inhibited from selection within the MODE selection menu
          (VAB R2).
     NOTE: A missile channel cannot be selected as both the Priority and Alternate
     channels simultaneously. If the Priority channel is selected as Alternate, the Priority and Alternate channels
     will simply be swapped.
3.   SAL Select. Selects the sub-variant of SAL missiles to be employed, between Basic Hellfire (SAL1), Hellfire
     II (SAL2), or automatic selection between the two sub-variants. (N/I)
4.   Missile Channels Status. Displays the laser code assignments to each of the four missile channels and
     which channels are designated as Priority (PRI, white box) and Alternate (ALT, green box).
5.   Type Select. Displays the selected missile type for employment. This setting is independent between
     crewstations and is contextually dependent on the selected sight within the crewstation.
     •    SAL. SAL missiles are selected for employment from the crewstation. The High Action Display will
          display relevant symbology for SAL missile employment and the WPN page will display SAL missile
          settings when set to MSL format.
          o    If the selected sight is set to HMD, SAL is automatically selected as the missile type and
               crewmember selection will be inhibited.
     •    RF. RF missiles are selected for employment from the crewstation. The High Action Display will display
          relevant symbology for RF missile employment and the WPN page will display RF missile settings when
          set to MSL format.
          o    If the selected sight is set to FCR, RF is automatically selected as the missile type and crewmember
               selection will be inhibited.
6.   Mode Select. Selects the mode of missile inventory management. This setting is common between
     crewstations.
     •    RIPL. Missile inventory, coding, and launch sequencing is managed automatically. Missile launches will
          be alternated between each wing station to maintain center-of-gravity, as appropriate.
          o    The first three missiles that are designated for launch will be coded in an alternating sequence,
               with the first and third missiles coded to the Priority channel and the second missile coded to the
               Alternate channel. As each missile is fired, subsequent missiles are progressively coded in the
               same alternating sequence.
     •    NORM. Missile inventory, coding, and launch sequencing is managed automatically. Missile launches
          will be alternated between each wing station to maintain center-of-gravity, as appropriate.
          o    The first three missiles that are designated for launch will be coded to the Priority channel. As
               each missile is fired, subsequent missiles are progressively coded to the Priority channel.
     •    MAN. Missile inventory, coding, and launch sequencing is managed manually by the aircrew. Missile
          launches may lead to asymmetric loading and may cause center-of-gravity issues.
          o    A single missile is selected and coded. The Missile Advance button on the Collective Mission Grip
               or the TEDAC Right Handgrip may be used to select the next missile for launch. As each missile
               is fired, the Missile Advance button must be used to select and code the next missile.
7.   Trajectory Select. Selects the post-launch trajectory that will be employed by the SAL missile when fired
     in Lock-On After Launch (LOAL) mode. This setting is independent between crewstations.
     •    HI. If the missile seeker does not detect a laser designation, the missile will employ a high-altitude loft
          trajectory along its launch azimuth.
     •    LO. If the missile seeker does not detect a laser designation, the missile will employ a low-altitude loft
          trajectory along its launch azimuth.
     •    DIR. If the missile seeker does not detect a laser designation, the missile will employ a direct trajectory
          with minimal loft along its launch azimuth.
8.   RF Missile Icon. Indicates an AGM-114L missile is loaded onto the corresponding missile launcher rail. The
     missile icon appearance and text label indicate the operational state and status of the missile. (See RF Missile
     Type Settings for more information.)
9.   SAL Missile Icon. Indicates an AGM-114K missile is loaded onto the corresponding missile launcher rail.
     The missile icon appearance and text label indicate the operational state and status of the missile.
     •    A SAL2 missile is loaded           •    A solid missile icon is             •    A hollow, white, flashing
          onto the corresponding                  displayed when the WPN                   missile icon indicates the
          missile launcher rail.                  page is in MSL format.                   next missile to be fired.
     •    No    laser   code      is         •    Laser code “A” is                   •    Laser code “A” is
          assigned. Missile is in a               assigned. Missile is in a                assigned. Missile is in a
          Standby status.                         Ready status.                            Tracking status.

10. Missile Counter-Countermeasures Mode. Not implemented.
SAL Missile Weapon Status Messages
The following messages will be displayed in the High Action Display based on current missile status or weapon
page settings when missiles are actioned and the missile type is set to SAL.

    WEAPON
                    CONDITION
    STATUS
                    Missiles coded to the Priority and Alternate missile channels are tracking corresponding
   2 CHAN TRK
                    laser designations in RIPL mode. Missiles are in LOBL mode.
                    A missile coded to the Alternate missile channel is tracking a corresponding laser
 ALT CHAN TRK
                    designation in RIPL mode. Missile is in LOBL mode.
    DIR MAN         LOAL trajectory is set to DIR. Missile management mode is set to MAN.
   DIR NORM         LOAL trajectory is set to DIR. Missile management mode is set to NORM.
    DIR RIPL        LOAL trajectory is set to DIR. Missile management mode is set to RIPL.
                    8 seconds has elapsed since the last launch of a SAL missile and one or more SAL
   FIRE MSLS        missiles are remaining onboard the aircraft and set to the Priority missile channel that
                    matches the laser code set to the TADS LRFD.
                    The remaining time of flight (in seconds) for the next SAL missile that was set to a
   HF TOF=##
                    Priority channel that matches the laser code set to the TADS LRFD.
     HI MAN         LOAL trajectory is set to HI. Missile management mode is set to MAN.
    HI NORM         LOAL trajectory is set to HI. Missile management mode is set to NORM.
     HI RIPL        LOAL trajectory is set to HI. Missile management mode is set to RIPL.
                    12 seconds time of flight remains for the next SAL missile that was set to a Priority
 LASE ## TRGT       channel that matches the laser code set to the TADS LRFD, requiring terminal guidance
                    be provided by the TADS LRFD.
     LO MAN         LOAL trajectory is set to LO. Missile management mode is set to MAN.
    LO NORM         LOAL trajectory is set to LO. Missile management mode is set to NORM.
     LO RIPL        LOAL trajectory is set to LO. Missile management mode is set to RIPL.
                    A launch has been commanded of the next SAL missile that was set to a Priority channel
  MSL LAUNCH
                    that matches the laser code set to the TADS LRFD.
   MSL SELECT       Missiles are actioned but the Priority missile channel is set to NONE.
   MSL TYPE?        Missiles are actioned but no missiles of the selected type (SAL or RF) are available.
  NO MISSILES       Missiles are actioned but no SAL or RF missiles are available.
                    A missile coded to the Priority missile channel is tracking a corresponding laser
 PRI CHAN TRK
                    designation in MAN, NORM, or RIPL mode. Missile is in LOBL mode.
    WEAPON?         The weapon trigger has been pulled but no weapon has been actioned.
Laser-guided Hellfire Engagement (LOBL)
When employing a SAL missile in Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL) mode, the TADS LRFD is used by the CPG to
continuously designate the target prior to missile launch and throughout the missile’s flight until it impacts the
target. TADS LMC and/or IAT targeting modes may be used to assist the CPG in stabilizing the TADS LOS Reticle
on the target. When missiles are actioned in the CPG crewstation, the Missile Constraints Box will also be displayed
in the Pilot crewstation to ensure the aircraft is maneuvered to within acceptable launch constraints.
To engage a target with a SAL missile in LOBL mode, using the TADS as the selected sight to self-designate:
1.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
     Right Handgrip)
                                                                                                           6. TYPE (VAB R1)
2.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.                                      9. ARM Status               MODE (VAB R2)
                                                    6. PRI (VAB L1)                                           TRAJ (VAB R3)
3.   CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
     appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for
     acquiring the target.
     •     If the target is visually acquired by
           either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
           or GHS.
     •     If the target is stored as a point
           within the navigational database,
           set ACQ to the corresponding point.                                                        3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)

4.    CPG (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
     and then press again to de-slave when
                                                   2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     the TADS has finished slewing.
5.   CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
     Right. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
6.    CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
     (WPN page)
     •     TYPE (VAB R1) – SAL.
     •     © MODE (VAB R2) – NORM or MAN.
     •     TRAJ (VAB R3) – DIR.
     •     © PRI (VAB L1) – Verify Priority
                                                                                                      10. LMC or IAT
           missile channel is set to the same
           laser code as the LRFD.
7.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “DIR
     NORM” or “DIR MAN”. (High Action
     Display)
8.   CPG   Sight Status – Verify “REMOTE” is
     not displayed. (High Action Display)
9.    CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
     (Armament Panel)                                                                                 3. ACQ Select




                                                   1. Sight Select TADS   8. “REMOTE” not displayed    7. Verify “DIR NORM”
10.    CPG If the target or aircraft are moving,
      engage TADS targeting modes to
      stabilize the TADS on target.
      •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and
            employ the Sight Manual Tracker.
                                                                                   14. Align Missile Constraints
                                                          11. Fire LRFD              Box within parameters
      •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT.
11.   CPG LRFD Trigger – Pull and hold, 2nd
      detent. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
12.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “PRI CHAN
      TRK”. (High Action Display)
13.    CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Missile Constraints Box –
      “Constraints.”
                                                      15. Weapon Inhibits
14.   PLT Missile Constraints Box – Align
      toward the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic
            inputs in the direction of the Missile                                  12. Verify “PRI CHAN TRK”
            Constraints Box.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
            the direction of the Missile
            Constraints Box.
15.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •     ACCEL LIMIT
      •     ALT LAUNCH
      •     BACK SCATTER
      •     GUN OBSTRUCT
      •     MSL NOT RDY
      •     PYLON ERROR
      •     BAL LIMIT
      •     PYLON ANGLE
      •     PYLON LIMIT
      •     RATE LIMIT
      •     ROLL LIMIT
      •     SKR LIMIT
16.   CPG Weapon Trigger – Pull. (TEDAC Left
      Handgrip)
17.   CPG   Weapon Status – Verify “MSL LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
18.   CPG LRFD Trigger – Maintain designation, 2nd detent, until the missile impacts the target. (TEDAC Right
      Handgrip)
Laser-guided Hellfire Engagement (LOAL, DIR Trajectory)
When employing a SAL missile in Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL) mode, the TADS LRFD is used by the CPG to
designate the target after missile launch and throughout the remainder of the missile’s flight until it impacts the
target. TADS LMC and/or IAT targeting modes may be used to assist the CPG in stabilizing the TADS LOS Reticle
on the target. When missiles are actioned in the CPG crewstation, the Missile Constraints Box will also be displayed
in the Pilot crewstation to ensure the aircraft is maneuvered to within acceptable launch constraints.
To engage a target with a SAL missile in LOAL-DIR mode, using the TADS as the selected sight to self-designate:
1.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
     Right Handgrip)
                                                                                                                6. TYPE (VAB R1)
2.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.                                        9. ARM Status                  MODE (VAB R2)
                                                    6. PRI (VAB L1)                                                TRAJ (VAB R3)
3.   CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
     appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for
     acquiring the target.
     •     If the target is visually acquired by
           either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
           or GHS.
     •     If the target is stored as a point
           within the navigational database,
           set ACQ to the corresponding point.                                                           3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)

4.    CPG (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
     and then press again to de-slave when
                                                   2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     the TADS has finished slewing.
5.   CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
     Right. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
6.    CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
     (WPN page)
     •     TYPE (VAB R1) – SAL.
     •     © MODE (VAB R2) – NORM or MAN.
     •     TRAJ (VAB R3) – DIR.
     •     © PRI (VAB L1) – Verify Priority                10. LMC or IAT                          12. Align Missile Constraints
           missile channel is set to the same                                                        Box within parameters
           laser code as the LRFD.
7.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “DIR
     NORM” or “DIR MAN”. (High Action
     Display)
8.   CPG   Sight Status – Verify “REMOTE” is
     not displayed. (High Action Display)
9.    CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
                                                     13. Weapon Inhibits                                   3. ACQ Select
     (Armament Panel)




                                                   1. Sight Select TADS     8. “REMOTE” not displayed      7. Verify “DIR NORM”
10.    CPG If the target or aircraft are moving,
      engage TADS targeting modes to
      stabilize the TADS on target.
      •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and
            employ the Sight Manual Tracker.                                              16. Fire LRFD to designate
                                                                                            the target no later than
      •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT.                                              “LASE # TRGT” is displayed

11.   CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Missile Constraints Box –
      “Constraints.”
12.    PLT Missile Constraints Box – Align
      toward the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic
            inputs in the direction of the Missile
            Constraints Box.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
            the direction of the Missile
            Constraints Box.
13.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •     ACCEL LIMIT
      •     ALT LAUNCH
      •     BACK SCATTER
      •     GUN OBSTRUCT
      •     MSL NOT RDY
      •     PYLON ERROR
      •     BAL LIMIT
      •     PYLON ANGLE
      •     PYLON LIMIT
      •     RATE LIMIT
      •     ROLL LIMIT
      •     YAW LIMIT
14.   CPG Weapon Trigger – Pull. (TEDAC Left
      Handgrip)
15.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify            “MSL
      LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
16.   CPG   LRFD Trigger – Pull, 2nd detent, after the missile clears the missile rail but no later than “LASE # TRGT”
      is displayed in the Weapon Status field, and hold until the missile impacts the target. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
Laser-guided Hellfire Engagement (Rapid Fire)
When employing SAL missiles using Rapid Fire against multiple targets, the TADS LRFD is used by the CPG to
designate each target in sequence while multiple missiles are in flight simultaneously. After the first missile
impacts its target, the laser designation is shifted to the next target, which will divert the next missile while in
flight. The TADS Multi-Target Tracker may be used to assist the CPG in shifting the TADS LOS Reticle to each
subsequent target. (See TADS Targeting Modes for more information)
To rapidly engage multiple targets with SAL missiles, using the TADS as the selected sight to self-designate:
1.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
     Right Handgrip)
                                                                                                               6. TYPE (VAB R1)
2.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.                                        9. ARM Status                 MODE (VAB R2)
                                                    6. PRI (VAB L1)                                               TRAJ (VAB R3)
3.   CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
     appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for
     acquiring the target.
     •     If the target is visually acquired by
           either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
           or GHS.
     •     If the target is stored as a point
           within the navigational database,
           set ACQ to the corresponding point.                                                           3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)

4.    CPG (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
     and then press again to de-slave when
                                                    2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     the TADS has finished slewing.
5.   CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
     Right. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
6.    CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
     (WPN page)
     •     TYPE (VAB R1) – SAL.
     •     © MODE (VAB R2) – NORM or MAN.
     •     TRAJ (VAB R3) – DIR.
     •     © PRI (VAB L1) – Verify Priority            10. IAT on next target                      14. Align Missile Constraints
           missile channel is set to the same                                                        Box within parameters
           laser code as the LRFD.
7.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “DIR
     NORM” or “DIR MAN”. (High Action
     Display)
8.   CPG   Sight Status – Verify “REMOTE” is
     not displayed. (High Action Display)
9.    CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
     (Armament Panel)                                 15. Weapon Inhibits                                  3. ACQ Select




                                                   1. Sight Select TADS     8. “REMOTE” not displayed      7. Verify “DIR NORM”
10.    CPG If the targets or aircraft are moving,
      engage TADS targeting modes to
      stabilize the TADS on target.
      •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and
            employ the Sight Manual Tracker.
      •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT on
            subsequent targets using MTT.
11.    CPG LRFD Trigger – Pull and hold, 2nd
      detent, if engaging in LOBL mode.
      (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
12.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “PRI CHAN                                                   20. Fire next missile no
                                                                                             earlier than “FIRE MSLS”
      TRK” if engaging in LOBL mode. (High
      Action Display)
13.    CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Missile Constraints Box –
      “Constraints.”
14.    PLT Missile Constraints Box – Align
      toward the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic
            inputs in the direction of the Missile
            Constraints Box.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
                                                                          22. Shift LRFD
            the direction of the Missile                                  designation to
            Constraints Box.                                               next target

15.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •     ACCEL LIMIT
      •     ALT LAUNCH
      •     BACK SCATTER
      •     GUN OBSTRUCT
      •     MSL NOT RDY
      •     PYLON ERROR
      •     BAL LIMIT
      •     PYLON ANGLE
      •     PYLON LIMIT
      •     RATE LIMIT
      •     ROLL LIMIT
      •     SKR LIMIT
      •     YAW LIMIT
16.   CPG   Weapon Trigger – Pull. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
17.   CPG   Weapon Status – Verify “MSL LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
18.   CPG  LRFD Trigger – Pull and hold after the missile clears the missile rail and hold, 2nd detent, if not already
      lasing in LOBL mode. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
19.   CPG   Weapon Status – Verify “FIRE MSLS” 8 seconds after the first missile launch. (High Action Display)
20.   CPG   Weapon Trigger – Pull. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
21.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify           “MSL
      LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
22.    CPG When the first missile impacts the
      first target, shift the TADS LOS Reticle to
      the next target while continuing to hold
      the LRFD Trigger. (TEDAC Right
      Handgrip)
      •    Manual tracking – Use Sight Manual
           Tracker to shift TADS LOS Reticle to
           next target.
      •    Automatic tracking – Use IAT/OFS
           switch to shift TADS LOS Reticle to
           next target. (See Image Auto-Track
           for more information.)
23.    CPG LRFD      Trigger     –      Maintain
      designation, 2nd detent, until the second
      missile impacts the second target.
      (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
NOTE: A minimum of 8 seconds is required between missile launches to ensure the TADS LOS Reticle may be
shifted to the next target with sufficient time to guide the next missile to its intended target. However, this is
based on the assumption that each target is relatively close to the next. If the targets are widely spaced, the CPG
should increase the interval between missile launches to ensure there is sufficient time to shift the laser
designation to the next target before the missile reaches the designation.
A good rule of thumb is to only use the Rapid Fire technique if each target is simultaneously visible within the
same TADS field-of-view that will be used for laser designation, and to ensure that each subsequent target is at
the same range or further than the previous target.
Laser-guided Hellfire Engagement (Remote Fire, LO or HI Trajectory)
When employing a SAL missile using Remote Fire, the missile is fired in Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL) mode
toward a target location, after which an offboard source of laser designation provides terminal guidance onto the
intended target. Remote Fire is conducted in similar fashion to an artillery fire mission, in which the designating
platform relays the target location to which the munition should be delivered and the designator’s laser code.
To engage a target with a SAL missile in LOAL-LO or LOAL-HI mode, with another platform remotely providing
terminal guidance to the missile:
1.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
     Right Handgrip)
                                                                                                           7. TYPE (VAB R1)
2.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.                                     10. ARM Status               MODE (VAB R2)
                                                    5. CHAN (VAB T1)                                          TRAJ (VAB R3)
3.    CPG Determine      the    appropriate
     acquisition source (ACQ) for acquiring
     the target.
     •     COORD (VAB T5) – Select.
                                                    7. PRI (VAB L1)
     •     Point (VAB L1-L6) – Select; or use
           paging controls to locate target
           point within the database.
     NOTE: If the target location is not                                                             3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)
     already present in the navigational
     database, the target point must be
     received via the datalink or manually
                                                   2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     input on the POINT sub-page. (See the
     Datalink chapter or TSD Point sub-page
     for more information.)
4.   CPG SLAVE button – Press, and evaluate
     Navigation range to target.
     NOTE: If range to target exceeds 8
     kilometers, instruct the Pilot to re-
     position the aircraft as necessary prior to
     launch.
5.   CPG CHAN (VAB T1) – Select. (WPN
     page)
     •     © CHANNEL (VAB T2-T5) – Select
           any un-used missile channel.
     •     © Code Selection – Select the laser
           code that corresponds with the
           designating platform.
     NOTE: If the designating platform is
     using a laser code that is not already
     present on the CHAN sub-page, the code
     must be manually input on the FREQ sub-                4. Range Source                           3. ACQ Select

     page. (See WPN Frequency sub-page for
     more information.)
6.   CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
     Right. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)                  1. Sight Select TADS   9. “REMOTE” is displayed   8. Verify “HI NORM”
7.     CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
      (WPN page)
      •     TYPE (VAB R1) – SAL.
      •     © MODE (VAB R2) – NORM or MAN.
                                                        12. Align Missile Constraints
      •     TRAJ (VAB R3) – LO or HI.                     Box within parameters

      •     © PRI (VAB L1) – Select, and set
            the missile channel corresponding
            with the designating platform as
            Priority.
8.     CPG Weapon Status – Verify “LO NORM”
      or “LO MAN”; or “HI NORM” or “HI MAN”.
      (High Action Display)
9.    CPG Sight Status – Verify “REMOTE” is             13. Weapon Inhibits

      displayed. (High Action Display)
10.    CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
      (Armament Panel)
                                                              17. Verify “HF TOF=##”
11.   CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Missile Constraints Box –
      “Constraints.”
12.    PLT Missile Constraints Box – Align
      toward the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic
            inputs in the direction of the Missile
            Constraints Box.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in
            the direction of the Missile
            Constraints Box.
13.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit                   19. Verify the designating
                                                        platform is lasing the target
      messages are displayed:                              for terminal guidance

      •     ACCEL LIMIT
      •     ALT LAUNCH
      •     GUN OBSTRUCT
      •     MSL NOT RDY
      •     PYLON ERROR
      •     BAL LIMIT
      •     PYLON ANGLE
      •     PYLON LIMIT
      •     RATE LIMIT
      •     ROLL LIMIT
      •     YAW LIMIT
14.   PLT / CPG   Verify the designating platform is ready to designate the target.
15.   CPG   Weapon Trigger – Pull. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
16.   CPG   Sight Status – Verify “MSL LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
17.   PLT / CPG   Notify designating platform that the missile has been launched and the approximate time of flight.
18.   CPG   Sight Status – Observe “LASE # TRGT”. (High Action Display)
19.   PLT / CPG   Verify the designating platform is lasing the target for terminal guidance.
Laser-guided Hellfire Engagement (Ripple Fire)
When employing SAL missiles using Ripple (RIPL) mode against multiple targets, the missile management logic
will automatically cycle the Priority and Alternate channels each time a missile is launched, allowing each missile
to be guided by two separate sources of laser designation. Ripple Fire may conducted using a combination of
several missile engagement techniques:
•    Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL). One or both laser designators are lasing prior to launch.
•    Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL). One or both laser designators begin lasing after launch.
•    Remote Fire. One or both missiles are being remotely guided by an offboard source of laser designation.
•    Rapid Fire. Multiple missiles may be guided by each source of laser designation, with the designating
     platforms shifting laser designations to subsequent targets following each preceding missile impact.
In each case, the launching aircraft may or may not be providing one of the sources of laser designation. However,
regardless of which platforms are providing terminal guidance to the SAL missiles, it is critical that the Priority
and Alternate channels correspond with the correct laser codes, and that sufficient coordination between the
launching platform and designating platform(s) is performed for a successful engagement. As an example in the
procedure below, the launching aircraft will designate for the first missile while a second AH-64D team member
will designate for the second missile. Both aircraft will begin designation prior to launch in LOBL mode to ensure
each missile is tracking their corresponding laser codes.
To rapidly engage multiple targets with SAL missiles, using the TADS as the selected sight to self-designate for
the first missile while another platform designates for the second missile:
1.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
     Right Handgrip)
                                                                                                     6. TYPE (VAB R1)
2.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.                                     8. ARM Status          MODE (VAB R2)
                                                    6. PRI (VAB L1)                                     TRAJ (VAB R3)
3.   CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
     appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for
     acquiring the target.
     •     If the target is visually acquired by
           either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
           or GHS.
                                                   6. ALT (VAB L2)
     •     If the target is stored as a point
           within the navigational database,
           set ACQ to the corresponding point.                                                  3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)

4.    CPG (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
     and then press again to de-slave when
                                                   2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     the TADS has finished slewing.
5.   CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
     Right. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
6.    CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
     (WPN page)
     •     TYPE (VAB R1) – SAL.
     •     © MODE (VAB R2) – RIPL.
     •     TRAJ (VAB R3) – DIR.
     •     © PRI (VAB L1) – Verify Priority missile channel is set to the same laser code as the LRFD.
      •     © ALT (VAB L2) – Verify Alternate
            missile channel is set to the same
            laser code as the team member that
            will be designating the second
            target.
7.    CPG  Weapon Status – Verify “DIR RIPL”.                                                              9. LMC or IAT

      (High Action Display)
8.     CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
      (Armament Panel)
9.     CPG If the targets or aircraft are moving,
      engage TADS targeting modes to
      stabilize the TADS on target.
      •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and
            employ the Sight Manual Tracker.                                                              3. ACQ Select

      •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT on
            each target using MTT.
10.   PLT / CPG Instruct the team member to
      begin designating their target.                 1. Sight Select TADS    8. “REMOTE” not displayed    7. Verify “DIR RIPL”

11.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “ALT CHAN
      TRK” is displayed after team member
      begins designating. (High Action Display)
12.   CPG LRFD Trigger – Pull and hold, 2nd
      detent. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
                                                                                                   15. Align Missile Constraints
13.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify “2 CHAN                    12. Fire LRFD                            Box within parameters
      TRACK”. (High Action Display)
      NOTE: If “PRI CHAN TRK” is displayed in
      the Weapon Status field of the High
      Action Display, the first missile to be
      launched is tracking a source of laser
      designation. If “ALT CHAN TRK” is
      displayed, the second missile to be
      launched is tracking a source of laser
      designation. If “2 CHAN TRACK” is                 16. Weapon Inhibits
      displayed, both sources of laser
      designation are being tracked by the
      corresponding missiles.
14.    CPG Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
                                                                                                    13. Verify “2 CHAN TRACK”
      with the Missile Constraints Box –
      “Constraints.”
15.   PLT   Missile Constraints Box – Align toward the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic inputs in the direction of the Missile Constraints Box.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in the direction of the Missile Constraints Box.
16.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •    ACCEL LIMIT
      •    ALT LAUNCH
      •    BACK SCATTER
      •    GUN OBSTRUCT
      •    MSL NOT RDY
      •    PYLON ERROR
      •    BAL LIMIT
      •    PYLON ANGLE
      •    PYLON LIMIT
      •    RATE LIMIT
      •    ROLL LIMIT
      •    SKR LIMIT
      •    YAW LIMIT
17.   CPG Weapon Trigger – Pull to launch first
      missile. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
18.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify         “MSL
      LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
19.    CPG Weapon Trigger – Pull to launch
      second missile. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
20.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify         “MSL
      LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
21.    PLT / CPG Notify the designating team
      member that the missiles have been
      launched.
22.    CPG LRFD     Trigger    –     Maintain
      designation, 2nd detent, until the first
      missile impacts the target being
      designated by the ownship’s TADS.
      (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
AGM-114L Radio Frequency (RF) Missile
The AGM-114L was the first and only model of Hellfire missile that was designed to utilize radar-based guidance
in lieu of laser guidance. The missile itself utilizes the same components and features of the AGM-114K, including
the digital autopilot and integrated tandem warhead for defeating reactive armor, but replaced the forward nose
section with a millimeter-wave radar seeker and its associated electronics. Like the “Kilo”, the “Lima” was designed
to destroy 21st century main battle tanks and other heavy armor. But unlike the “Kilo”, the “Lima” was specifically
developed to be used in conjunction with the newly fielded AH-64D.




                                                                                                                    Moving Control
                                                                                                                      Surfaces
                                                                                                    Fixed Control
                                                                                                       Surfaces
                                                                               Digital Autopilot,
                                                                                Control gyros,
                                                                 Tandem,           & Battery
                                                               Shaped-charge
                                                     Warhead     Warhead
                                                      Fuze
                                     Fixed Control
                         Launcher       Surfaces
            Gimbaled     Umbilical
          Radar Seeker


The forward section of the “Lima” is occupied by an active-radar seeker that can detect and track moving or
stationary ground targets, with a limited capacity to engage slow-moving air targets such as other helicopters.
Although the missile is most effective when employed using the AN/APG-78 Fire Control Radar (FCR), the AGM-
114L may also be employed when using the AN/ASQ-170 Target Acquisition Designation Sight (TADS). Prior to
launch, the missile receives a handover of the target location, whether the target location data was generated by
the FCR or the TADS, at which time it utilizes inertial guidance to navigate to its target.
When initially powered, the AGM-114L requires an alignment of its inertial guidance system to ensure it can
properly navigate to its target. An “inertial handover” of attitude and linear velocity is provided by the AH-64D’s
INU to the RF missiles as a means of rapid alignment, after which the missile is ready to receive a target handover.
However, due to the increased amount of electronics within the “Lima” compared to the “Kilo”, the missiles may
potentially overheat if the missile remains powered for extended periods of time. To mitigate this risk, the AH-
64D automatically manages the missile power amongst all RF missiles loaded on the weapon stations. The
automatic missile power logic will only keep a portion of the RF missile inventory powered at any given time; and
will cycle power to the next sub-set of the missile inventory every 10 minutes to permit the remaining missiles to
cool while keeping a number of RF missiles ready for immediate engagement.
(See WPN Missile format for more information regarding missile power management.)
Just as in the case of the AGM-114K, the AGM-114L may be employed in either a Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL)
mode or a Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL) mode. However, the electronics within the AGM-114L missile itself
performs an automatic determination of which mode it should utilize, based on the nature of the target handover
it receives. The aircrew does not have any direct control over which mode the missile defaults to, but it is possible
to inhibit the RF missiles from utilizing LOBL mode, if necessary.
RF LOBL/LOAL Selection Logic
Unlike the SAL missile variants, the RF missile performs its own determination of which launch mode (LOBL or
LOAL) is optimal for target acquisition, based on the nature of the target handover it receives.
Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL). LOBL is used to increase the likelihood of a successful engagement if the
target is moving or is at a close range to the aircraft (<2.5 km). If the missile determines the optimal mode is
LOBL, which will be indicated by “LOBL” being displayed in the Weapon Status field of the crewmember’s High
Action Display, it will immediately activate its onboard radar seeker and scan the vicinity of the target location in
an attempt to acquire and track its target. If a target is successfully acquired, “RF MSL TRACK” will be displayed
in the High Action Display.
•      If the target is stationary but less than 1 km in range, there is insufficient time to acquire the target after
       launch and LOBL is necessary for a successful engagement. If target acquisition is unsuccessful, “NO
       ACQUIRE” will be displayed in the High Action Display, and engagement should not be attempted.
•      If the target is stationary and between 1 and 2.5 km in range, there may be insufficient time to acquire the
       target after launch and LOBL increases the likelihood of a successful engagement. If target acquisition is
       unsuccessful, “LOAL” will be displayed in the High Action Display to indicate that LOAL is acceptable.
•      If the target is moving at any range, LOBL is necessary for a successful engagement. If target acquisition is
       unsuccessful, “NO ACQUIRE” will be displayed in the High Action Display, and engagement should not be
       attempted.
If target acquisition has failed and it is desired to make another attempt to acquire the target prior to launch, the
crewmember should de-action the missile system, which will erase the target handover data from the missile.
The missiles may then be actioned once more and another target handover may be attempted. However, if
ambient temperatures are high, multiple and repeated attempts to force the missile to activate its onboard radar
and acquire a target may increase the likelihood of the missile overheating.
NOTE: The “LOBL” or “LOAL” messages displayed in the Weapon Status field of the High Action Display indicate
the launch mode that the missile has entered; “LOBL” does not indicate the missile has acquired its target when
in a LOBL state. If “LOBL” is still displayed when the RF missile is launched, prior to “RF MSL TRACK” being
displayed and accompanied by a large Missile Constraints Box, the missile will launch in a LOAL state and may
not successfully acquire the target after launch. (See RF Missile Constraints Box for more information)
      Moving target                                              LOBL

    Stationary target   LOBL     LOBL or LOAL                                 LOAL




                    0.5    1.0                  2.5                     Target Range (km)                       8.0

                                                LOBL & LOAL Selection Logic

Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL). LOAL is used if LOBL is not required to ensure a successful engagement, if
the target cannot be acquired prior to launch and there is sufficient time to acquire the target after launch, or if
LOBL INHIBIT is enabled on the WPN page. If the missile determines the optimal mode is LOAL, which will be
indicated by “LOAL” being displayed in the Weapon Status field of the crewmember’s High Action Display, it
should be launched as soon as the target handover is complete to ensure a successful engagement.
•      If the target is stationary and between 1 and 2.5 km in range, and LOBL is unsuccessful, “LOAL” will be
       displayed in the High Action Display to indicate that LOAL is acceptable.
•      If the target is stationary and greater than 2.5 km in range, “LOAL” will be displayed in the High Action
       Display to indicate that LOAL is acceptable.
RF Post-Launch Trajectories
When an RF missile is launched, the missile will utilize one of two trajectories based on the missiles ability to
acquire and track the target. If the missile cannot acquire or maintain a track on the target, it will utilize an off-
axis flight profile to increase its radar resolution of the target amongst the ground clutter. Otherwise, the missile
will use a direct flight profile toward the target.
•    Doppler Beam Sharpening (DBS) Trajectory. When employing an off-axis flight profile, the RF missile
     leverages a radar processing principle known as Dopper beam sharpening to increase the radar processing
     resolution in order to acquire or maintain track of its target. A DBS trajectory is more likely to occur when
     the target is at sufficient range in which such a maneuver is possible, or when the missile is employed in
     LOAL launch mode. (See Doppler Beam Sharpening on the following page for more information.)
•    Direct Trajectory. When employed against targets that are easily acquired and tracked, or against targets
     that are at close range with insufficient maneuver space to perform a DBS trajectory, the missile will use a
     direct trajectory toward the target.




                                           RF Post-Launch Trajectories

NOTE: The RF missile may impact obstructions when utilizing a DBS trajectory after launch, such as when
employed near high terrain or tall urban structures. If necessary, the nose of the aircraft may be offset to either
side of the target azimuth to force the missile to execute a DBS trajectory in the corresponding direction.
                                  Target              Target                     Target
                                 Azimuth             Azimuth                    Azimuth



               Missile will                                                                    Missile will
              continue DBS                                                                    continue DBS
                to the left                                                                    to the right

                                                Missile may DBS to
                                                 either direction

               Aircraft nose                                                                 Aircraft nose
            offset to the left                                                            offset to the right
            of target azimuth                                                             of target azimuth




                                           DBS Trajectory Direction
Doppler Beam Sharpening (DBS)
Doppler beam sharpening is a method of processing received radar returns to produce a higher resolution radar
map and is used in many applications in the world today, even outside of military aviation. Typical real-beam
radar mapping is limited in resolution, whereas Doppler beam sharpening uses differences in radial velocity to
achieve a more detailed radar image. However, Doppler beam sharpening is limited by the relative aspect angle
of the radar returns in relation to the movement of the transmitting radar antenna across the surface.
As the radar antenna moves across the
surface, whether it is mounted to an aircraft
like the F-16 or a missile like the AGM-114L,
radar returns are received from terrain and
objects such as vegetation, structures, or
vehicles. Even if all detected objects are
stationary, the velocity of the missile itself
generates a measurable shift in the frequency
of the electromagnetic radar energy reflected
back toward the missile seeker; a Doppler                                                      Doppler beam sharpening is
                                                                                                ineffective directly within
effect. However, radar reflections that are                                                      the missile’s flight path
received from either side of the missile’s track
across the surface will generate a lower
Doppler shift due to their lower radial velocity                                             Radial velocities from Doppler
compared to those directly in front of the                                                    returns will vary relative to
missile. The greater the angular offset from the                                                 the missile flight path

missile’s flight path, the lower the measured
radial velocity.
As the radar returns are processed for these
small differences in Doppler shift, the returns                                                    Velocity Components

from any location within the radar image can                                                              Relative Velocity

be calculated and further separated into                                                                  Angular Velocity
distinct points to account for the deviations in                                                          Radial Velocity
radial velocity. This results in a more refined
and higher resolution radar image.                        Doppler Beam Sharpening Processing Method
Since Doppler beam sharpening relies on a
sufficient difference in Doppler frequency within a measurable area, such calculations cannot be performed when
the radar is scanning an area directly in front of the missile’s flight path (nor directly abeam). As a result, Doppler
beam sharpening is rendered ineffective unless the scanned area is sufficiently offset to either side of the missile’s
flight path. When Doppler beam sharpening is necessary to acquire and track a given target, the AGM-114L will
fly an off-axis DBS trajectory to permit this processing method.
RF Missile Constraints Box
The key piece of symbology associated with employing the AGM-114L is the Missile Constraints Box displayed
within the crewmember’s sight symbology. The Missile Constraints Box is a steering cue and launch mode indicator
which indicates the launch mode of the missile and whether the missile is within acceptable launch constraints.
                                                          The Missile Constraints Box is longitudinally-scaled and is not a
                                                          virtual symbology element; its displayed location does not
        Aircraft should be turned to the left             correspond with a real-world location that is observed “out-the-
        to launch missile within constraints
                                                          window” like the Head Tracker or Flight Path Vector. The position
                                                          of the Missile Constraints Box is referenced from the LOS Reticle,
                                                          which corresponds to the Missile Datum Line (0° in azimuth and
                                                          elevation from the longitudinal axis of the missile body). However,
                                                          the referenced position of which the Missile Constraints Box
                                                          represents is either the target location relative to the Missile
                   LOS Reticle
                                                          Datum Line; or ,specifically in the case when TADS is the selected
                                                          sight and a target handover has not yet been performed, the
    Missile                                               Missile Constraints Box is derived from the position of the TADS
Constraints Box                                           turret relative to the Missile Datum Line.
                                               To augment the missiles’ post-launch trajectory and to ensure the
missiles do not strike the ground, the wing pylons articulate in the vertical axis to maintain the pylon angle of
each missile launcher 4° above the inertial horizon when the missiles are actioned. This results in the Missile
Datum Line of each missile being stabilized 4° above the horizon regardless of the aircraft pitch attitude.
Lock-On-Before-Launch Mode (LOBL), Missile Tracking (RF MSL TRACK)
If the missile is in LOBL mode and is tracking a target with its onboard seeker, the Missile Constraints Box
corresponds with the position of the missile’s seeker, in azimuth and elevation, relative to the Missile Datum Line.
The maximum allowable offset angle for the RF missile in LOBL mode is 20° for targets at a range of 1 km or
greater, or 5° for targets at ranges less than 1 km; otherwise, the Constraints Box will be displayed as invalid,
indicating the missile is outside of launch constraints. (See Missile Constraints Box Format for more information.)




                                                                                               Wing pylons articulate to keep missile
                                                                                              launchers 4° above the inertial horizon




                                                                                                                    4°



                                                               Missile Seeker                           Head
                                                                                                       Tracker

                                                                                  TADS
                                                                                LOS Reticle

                The position of the Missile Constraints
                  Box within the sight symbology is
                displayed relative to the LOS Reticle,                                              Missile seeker’s position relative
                                                                Missile
               which represents the Missile Datum Line                                                 to the Missile Datum Line
                                                            Constraints Box



                              RF Missile Constraints Box – LOBL and tracking a target
Lock-On-After-Launch Mode (LOAL), Target Handover Complete
If the missile has received a target handover and is in LOAL mode, the Missile Constraints Box corresponds with
the location of the target, in azimuth and elevation, relative to the Missile Datum Line.
The maximum allowable offset angle for the RF missile in LOAL mode is 20° for targets at a range of 1 kilometer
or greater; otherwise, the Constraints Box will be displayed as invalid, indicating the missile is outside of launch
constraints. (See Missile Constraints Box Format for more information.)




                                                          Target handover from                   Wing pylons articulate to keep missile
                                                        TADS has been completed                 launchers 4° above the inertial horizon




                                                                                                                      4°



                                                                                                          Head
                                                                                                         Tracker

                                                                                    TADS
                                                                                  LOS Reticle

                    The position of the Missile Constraints
                      Box within the sight symbology is             Missile
                    displayed relative to the LOS Reticle,                                                  Target location relative to
                                                                Constraints Box
                   which represents the Missile Datum Line                                                   the Missile Datum Line



                        RF Missile Constraints Box – LOAL with a successful target handover



RF Missile Constraints Box Format
The Missile Constraints Box is displayed in four formats to indicate the missile’s launch mode (LOBL or LOAL) and
whether the missile is within acceptable launch constraints (Valid or Invalid).
                                            If the missile seeker is not tracking a target after receiving a target handover,
                                            the missile will be launched in Lock-On-After-Launch (LOAL) mode.
     LOAL Mode           LOAL Mode
    Valid Launch       Invalid Launch       If the missile seeker acquired and is tracking a target, the missile will be
    Constraints          Constraints        launched in Lock-On-Before-Launch (LOBL) mode.
                                            If the missile is within acceptable launch constraints and no Weapon Inhibit
                                            messages are displayed within the High Action Display, the Missile Constraints
                                            Box will be displayed as Valid.
     LOBL Mode           LOBL Mode          If the missile is outside acceptable launch constraints or any Weapon Inhibit
    Valid Launch       Invalid Launch       messages are displayed within the High Action Display, the Missile Constraints
    Constraints          Constraints
                                            Box will be displayed as Invalid.
•      LOBL Constraints (< 1 km). Missile seeker LOS is offset ≤ 5° from the Missile Datum Line.
•      LOBL Constraints (≥ 1 km). Missile seeker LOS is offset ≤ 20° from the Missile Datum Line.
•      LOAL Constraints (≥ 1 km). Line-of-sight (LOS) to the target is offset ≤ 20° from the Missile Datum Line.
RF Missile Weapon Inhibits
The following conditions will inhibit the RF missiles from being fired. Performance inhibits may be overridden by
pulling the trigger to the 2nd detent. Safety inhibits cannot be overridden.
Performance Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       The required weapon aiming
                                                           If tactically feasible, engage the target at a closer
    BAL LIMIT          solution exceeds the ballistics
                                                           range.
                       processing capability.
                                                           Wait for the missile launchers to reach the optimum
                       The position of the missile         launch position.
                       launcher(s) is ≥10° from the        If inhibit message remains, missiles may still be fired
  PYLON ANGLE
                       optimum launch position or the      but the missile launcher positions should be visually
                       pylon position is unknown.          confirmed to ensure the appropriate considerations
                                                           may be made for a successful engagement.
                       The commanded position of the
                                                           Adjust the aircraft pitch attitude as necessary to bring
  PYLON LIMIT          missile launcher(s) exceeds the
                                                           the articulation range of the wing pylons to +4° above
   (IN FLIGHT)         pylon articulation limits.
                                                           the inertial horizon.
                       (+4° to -15°).
                       The pitch, roll, and/or yaw rates
   RATE LIMIT                                            Stabilize the aircraft attitude prior to launch.
                       are excessive.
                       The roll angle of the aircraft is
   ROLL LIMIT                                              Reduce the roll attitude of the aircraft prior to launch.
                       excessive.
                                                           Adjust the heading or pitch attitude of the aircraft to
                       The missile seeker has reached      bring the target within the missile seeker field-of-view.
    SKR LIMIT
                       a gimbal limit.
                                                           (e.g., turn toward the Missile Constraints box).
                       When the missile is in LOAL         Adjust the heading of the aircraft to bring the target
                       mode, the target position           position closer to the aircraft centerline.
   YAW LIMIT
                       relative to the aircraft heading
                       is excessive.                       (e.g., turn toward the Missile Constraints box).


Safety Inhibits
     INHIBIT           CONDITION                           CORRECTIVE ACTION
                       Vertical acceleration is <0.5 G;
                       the main rotor blades may           Reduce the severity of the current maneuver to
  ACCEL LIMIT
                       obstruct the trajectory of the      increase the positive G load on the aircraft.
                       missile when fired.
                       The firing of a rocket salvo is     The missile may be fired 2 seconds after the rocket
   ALT LAUNCH
                       already in progress.                salvo is complete.
                                                           If tactically feasible, instruct the crewmember that has
              The gun is out of coincidence                actioned the gun to de-action in order to permit the
              from the weapon aiming                       firing of missiles.
 GUN OBSTRUCT solution and may obstruct the
              trajectory of missiles fired from            A different missile may be manually selected by setting
              the inboard wing pylons.                     the Mode to MAN and pressing the Missile Advance
                                                           button.
              The line-of-sight of the selected
LOS INVALID                                       Select a different sight for engagement.
              sight is invalid or has failed.
              No RF missiles have received an
                                                  Ensure MSL PWR is set to ALL or AUTO to permit RF
              inertial alignment from the
                                                  missiles to receive inertial alignment.
MSL NOT RDY   aircraft.
                                                  Press the Missile Advance button to select the next
              A missile has not been selected
                                                  missile in MAN mode.
              in MAN mode.
              The aircraft is on the ground
                                                  If inhibit message remains, the corresponding wing
              (weight-on-wheels) and the
PYLON ERROR                                       pylons may have experienced a failure and the missiles
              missile launcher positions are
                                                  should be de-actioned.
              unknown.
              The commanded position of the
PYLON LIMIT   missile launcher(s) exceeds the
                                                  The missiles should be de-actioned.
(ON GROUND)   pylon articulation limits.
              (+4° to -5°).
              The master armament state is
   SAFE       currently set to SAFE; weapons      Set the A/S button on the Armament Panel to ARM.
              cannot be fired.
WPN Missile (MSL) Format – RF Missile Settings
When RF missiles are selected for employment within the crewstation, the WPN page will display RF missile
settings when set to MSL format.




                                                                                                 4. Type Select

           1. Missile Power
                                                                                                 5. Mode Select
          Management Mode




                                                                                                 6. RF Missile Icon
              2. LOBL Inhibit
                                                                                                 7. SAL Missile Icon
         3. 2nd Target Inhibit




1.   Missile Power Management Mode. When the Mode is set to NORM, selects the power management
     setting for all AGM-114L missiles loaded on the aircraft. This setting is common between crewstations.
     •       ALL. All RF missiles are powered on. All RF missiles perform an inertial alignment and self-test, and
             are ready to receive target handovers, but may overheat if left in this state for an extended period.
     •       AUTO. Power to RF missiles is automatically managed based on missile inventory quantity. Sub-sets
             of the missile inventory are powered and aligned in 10-minute intervals. After 10 minutes have elapsed,
             the missiles are powered off and the next sub-set of the inventory is powered and aligned. This ensures
             that a portion of the inventory is ready to receive target handovers while mitigating the risk of missiles
             overheating.
             o      If 8 or more RF missiles are loaded, 4 missiles are kept in a “Ready” state.
             o      If 4 to 7 RF missiles are loaded, 2 missiles are kept in a “Ready” state.
             o      If 2 or 3 RF missiles are loaded, 1 missile is kept in a “Ready” state.
             o      If 1 RF missile is loaded, the missile will be powered on to a “Ready” state when either crewstation
                    actions missiles with TYPE (VAB R1) set to RF. If the missiles are de-actioned or if the TYPE is set
                    to SAL, the singular RF missile will be powered off.
     •       NONE. All RF missiles are powered off. All RF missiles remain unaligned and are unable to receive
             target handovers, but are prevented from overheating.
2.   LOBL Inhibit. RF missiles are inhibited from emitting radar signals prior to launch. This will prevent AGM-
     114L missiles from entering LOBL mode or tracking assigned targets prior to launch.
3.   2nd Target Inhibit. Not implemented.
4.   Type Select. Displays the selected missile type for employment. This setting is independent between
     crewstations and is contextually dependent on the selected sight within the crewstation.
     •    SAL. SAL missiles are selected for employment from the crewstation. The High Action Display will
          display relevant symbology for SAL missile employment and the WPN page will display SAL missile
          settings when set to MSL format.
          o    If the selected sight is set to HMD, SAL is automatically selected as the missile type and
               crewmember selection will be inhibited.
     •    RF. RF missiles are selected for employment from the crewstation. The High Action Display will display
          relevant symbology for RF missile employment and the WPN page will display RF missile settings when
          set to MSL format.
          o    If the selected sight is set to FCR, RF is automatically selected as the missile type and crewmember
               selection will be inhibited.
5.   Mode Select. Selects the mode of missile inventory management. This setting is common between
     crewstations.
     •    NORM. Missile inventory, power management, and launch sequencing is managed automatically.
          Missile launches will be alternated between each wing station to maintain center-of-gravity, as
          appropriate.
          o    Missile power management will be in accordance with the MSL PWR selection (VAB L1-L3).
     •    MAN. Missile inventory, power management, and launch sequencing is managed manually by the
          aircrew. Missile launches may lead to asymmetric loading and may cause center-of-gravity issues.
          Improper power management may lead to missile over-temperature conditions.
          o    A single missile is selected and powered. The Missile Advance button on the Collective Mission
               Grip or the TEDAC Right Handgrip may be used to select the next missile for launch. As each
               missile is fired, the Missile Advance button must be used to select and power the next missile.
6.   RF Missile Icon. Indicates an AGM-114L missile is loaded onto the corresponding missile launcher rail. The
     missile icon appearance and text label indicate the operational state and status of the missile.
     •    An RF missile is loaded           •    A solid missile icon is            •    A hollow, white, flashing
          onto the corresponding                 displayed when the WPN                  missile icon indicates the
          missile launcher rail.                 page is in MSL format.                  next missile to be fired.
     •    Missile is in a Standby           •    Missile is powered and in          •    Next missile to be fired is
          status while a built-in-               a Ready status.                         in a Tracking status.
          test is performed.
     •    Missile is powered and
          indicating it is in an over-
          temperature status.

7.   SAL Missile Icon. Indicates an AGM-114K missile is loaded onto the corresponding missile launcher rail.
     The missile icon appearance and text label indicate the operational state and status of the missile. (See SAL
     Missile Type Settings for more information.)
RF Missile Weapon Status Messages
The following messages will be displayed in the High Action Display based on current missile status or weapon
page settings when missiles are actioned and the missile type is set to RF.

     INHIBIT        CONDITION
   HF TOF=##        The remaining time of flight (in seconds) for the next RF missile.
    LOAL MAN        The next-to-launch RF missile is in LOAL mode. Missile management mode is set to MAN.
                    The next-to-launch RF missile is in LOAL mode. Missile management mode is set to
   LOAL NORM
                    NORM.
                    LOBL INHIBIT has been enabled on the WPN page. The next-to-launch RF missile is
  LOBL INHIBIT
                    forced to LOAL mode.
                    The next-to-launch RF missile is in LOBL mode and attempting to acquire a target. Missile
    LOBL MAN
                    management mode is set to MAN.
                    The next-to-launch RF missile is in LOBL mode and attempting to acquire a target. Missile
   LOBL NORM
                    management mode is set to NORM.
  MSL LAUNCH        A launch has been commanded of the next RF missile.
   MSL TYPE?        Missiles are actioned but no missiles of the selected type (SAL or RF) are available.
                    The next-to-launch missile requires LOBL for a successful engagement but has failed to
  NO ACQUIRE
                    acquire at target. Launch should not be attempted.
  NO MISSILES       Missiles are actioned but no SAL or RF missiles are available.
 RF MSL TRACK       The next-to-launch missile is in LOBL mode and is tracking a target.
    WEAPON?         The weapon trigger has been pulled but no weapon has been actioned.
Radar-guided Hellfire Engagement (TADS)
When employing an RF missile while using the TADS to generate targeting data, the target is designated by the
TADS LRFD for 3 seconds prior to missile launch. TADS LMC and/or IAT targeting modes should be used to assist
the CPG in stabilizing the TADS LOS Reticle on the target, which will increase the accuracy of the target data sent
to the missile. When missiles are actioned in the CPG crewstation, the Missile Constraints Box will also be displayed
in the Pilot crewstation to ensure the aircraft is maneuvered to within acceptable launch constraints.
To engage a target with an RF missile while using the TADS to generate a target handover:
1.   CPG Sight Select switch – TADS. (TEDAC
     Right Handgrip)
2.   CPG   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.          6. MSL PWR                    8. ARM Status              6. TYPE (VAB R1)
                                                    (VAB L1 or L2)                                              MODE (VAB R2)
3.   CPG (Optional)        Determine     the
     appropriate acquisition source (ACQ) for
     acquiring the target.
     •     If the target is visually acquired by
           either crewmember, set ACQ to PHS
           or GHS.
     •     If the target is stored as a point
           within the navigational database,
           set ACQ to the corresponding point.                                                          3. ACQ Select (VAB R6)

4.   CPG  (Optional) SLAVE button – Press,
     and then press again to de-slave when
                                                    2. WPN Fixed Action Button
     the TADS has finished slewing.
5.   CPG Weapon Action Switch (WAS) –
     Right. (TEDAC Left Handgrip)
6.    CPG Weapon settings – Verify or select.
     (WPN page)
     •     TYPE (VAB R1) – RF.
     •     © MODE (VAB R2) – NORM or MAN.
     •     © MSL PWR (VAB R1 or R2) – ALL
           or AUTO.
7.   CPG Sight Status – Verify “TARGET
                                                             10. Fire LRFD                            9. IAT on target
     DATA?” is displayed. (High Action
     Display)
8.    CPG A/S button – Verified in ARM.
     (Armament Panel)
9.    CPG If the target or aircraft are moving,
     engage TADS targeting modes to
     stabilize the TADS on target.
     •     Manual tracking - Engage LMC and             1. Sight Select TADS                             3. ACQ Select

           employ the Sight Manual Tracker.
     •     Automatic tracking - Engage IAT.

                                                                             7. “TARGET DATA?” is displayed
10.    CPG LRFD Trigger – Pull and hold for 3
      seconds, 2nd detent, until “TARGET
      DATA?” is removed from the Sight Status
      field. (TEDAC Right Handgrip)
      NOTE: When “TARGET DATA?” is
      removed from the Sight Status field, the
      LRFD trigger may be released.
Launch Mode Selection (LOBL/LOAL)
After the target data has been received, the
RF missile will automatically select LOBL or
LOAL mode based on the nature of the target
data itself. (See RF LOBL/LOAL Selection Logic
for more information.)
If the missile is attempting to lock on to a
target, “LOBL NORM” or “LOBL MAN” will be
displayed within the Weapon Status field of
the High Action Display.
If the missile successfully acquires a target in
LOBL mode, “RF MSL TRACK” will be displayed            10. “TARGET DATA?” not displayed      10. “LOBL NORM” when scanning
in the Weapon Status field.
If the missile fails to acquire a target that is
moving or is less 1 kilometer in range, “NO
ACQUIRE” will be displayed in the Weapon
Status field. The missile may still be fired in
LOAL mode, but the missile may not hit the              11. Missile Constraints Box
target. The missiles should be de-actioned to          shown in LOBL format when                  13. Align Missile Constraints
erase the target handover and re-actioned to            a target has been acquired                  Box within parameters
attempt another target handover.
If the missile is not attempting to lock on to a
target or has failed to acquire a stationary
target between 1 and 2.5 kilometers in range,
“LOAL NORM” or “LOAL MAN” will be displayed
within the Weapon Status field.
11.    CPG Weapon Status – Verify “RF MSL
                                                       14. Weapon Inhibits
      TRACK”, “LOAL NORM”, or “LOAL MAN”.
      (High Action Display)
      NOTE: “LOBL INHIBIT” may also be
      displayed if enabled on the WPN page.
                                                                             11. Verify “RF MSL TRACK” prior to launch in LOBL
12.   CPG  Instruct the Pilot to align the aircraft
      with the Missile Constraints Box – “Constraints.”
13.   PLT   Missile Constraints Box – Align toward the HMD LOS Reticle.
      •     Running/Diving Fire – Apply cyclic inputs in the direction of the Missile Constraints Box.
      •     Hover Fire – Apply pedal inputs in the direction of the Missile Constraints Box.
14.   CPG Weapon Inhibit messages – Verify
      no Safety or Performance inhibit
      messages are displayed:
      •    ACCEL LIMIT
      •    ALT LAUNCH
      •    BACK SCATTER
      •    GUN OBSTRUCT
      •    MSL NOT RDY
      •    PYLON ERROR
      •    BAL LIMIT
      •    PYLON ANGLE
      •    PYLON LIMIT
      •    RATE LIMIT
      •    ROLL LIMIT
      •    SKR LIMIT
      •    YAW LIMIT
15.   CPG Weapon Trigger – Pull. (TEDAC Left
      Handgrip)
16.   CPG Weapon Status – Verify         “MSL
      LAUNCH”. (High Action Display)
      NOTE: When engaging a target with an
      RF missile in LOAL mode, the Pilot should
      align the aircraft within launch
      constraints and the CPG should fire the
      missile as soon as possible after the
      target handover is complete, signified by
      “TARGET DATA?” being removed from
      the Sight Status field of the High Action
      Display.
WEAPON HAND CONTROLS
Either crewmember may employ any aircraft weapon system independently of the other crewstation. However,
only the Copilot/Gunner can use the TADS to provide laser guidance for the AGM-114K Hellfire missile.


Cyclic & Collective Controls
The Pilot and Copilot/Gunner Cyclic and Collective Mission Grips include identical controls for weapons
employment. However, the CPG’s cyclic weapon trigger is only activated if the CPG actions a weapon using the
Weapon Action Switch on the cyclic.




                                                                     Weapon Action
                                                                      Switch (WAS)




                                                                              Weapon Trigger
                                                                                (Guarded)




             Missile Advance




TEDAC Controls
The CPG’s TEDAC weapon trigger is only activated if the CPG actions a weapon using the Weapon Action Switch
on the TEDAC Left Handgrip.

              Weapon Action Switch (WAS)




Weapon Trigger
(opposite side)


                                                                                               Missile Advance
                                                                                               (opposite side)
AIRCRAFT
SURVIVABILITY
EQUIPMENT (ASE)




AIRCRAFT SURVIVABILITY
   EQUIPMENT (ASE)
AIRCRAFT SURVIVABILITY EQUIPMENT
The AH-64D features a comprehensive suite of active and passive defensive systems that are designed to ensure
the survival of the aircraft while operating at NOE (Nap-Of-the-Earth) altitudes in a high threat environment. The
various defensive systems installed on the aircraft are known collectively as Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE).




The ASE kit installed on the AH-64D includes a combined radar and laser warning receiver (RLWR), an electronic
radar jamming system (ECM), a missile warning system (CMWS), chaff and flare countermeasures dispensers,
infrared suppression integrated into the engine exhausts, and a Wire Strike Protection System (WSPS) installed
on the forward fuselage and underside.
NOTE: The ECM system is not implemented at this time.


                        ECM Receive Antenna       WSPS Blade   LWR Detector (both sides)                        RWR Antennas (2x)


          ECM Transmit Antenna
                                                                              CMWS Detector
                                                                               (both sides)
  WSPS Blade
                                                                                              Flare Dispenser
                                                                                                (both sides)




                                    WSPS Blades



   CMWS Detector
    (both sides)


   RWR Antenna (both sides)                                     LWR Detector (both sides)     RWR Antenna           Chaff Dispenser



                                  AH-64D Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE)
Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) Page
The primary threat warning indications are integrated into the Tactical Situation Display’s ASE “footprint”;
however, the crew can also view the threat environment on a decluttered “footprint” on the ASE page. The ASE
page also allows the crew to initialize and configure individual ASE systems.
                               1. Chaff Status    2. Aircraft Heading   3. Threat Warning Count




          4. Chaff Mode                                                                           5. ASE Autopage Setting




             6. Ownship                                                                           7. ASE Footprint




      8. Chaff Inventory




                                                 9. Command Heading

1.   Chaff Status. Displays the state of the chaff dispenser. Pressing VAB T1 will toggle the state between SAFE
     and ARM.
     •     SAFE. Chaff dispensing is inhibited. The status will default to SAFE with aircraft weight-on-wheels and
           inhibited from selection.
     •     ARM. Chaff may be dispensed by either crewstation.
2.   Aircraft Heading. Displays the current heading of the aircraft.
3.   Threat Warning Count. Displays the total number of threats displayed around the ASE footprint.
     •     RFI. Indicates the number of radar threats detected by the RFI and displayed on the outside of the
           ASE footprint, up to a maximum of 10. This field will be blank if the FCR mast-mounted assembly is
           not installed.
     •     RLWR. Indicates the number of radar and/or laser threats detected by the RLWR and displayed on
           the inside of the ASE footprint, up to a maximum of 7.
4.   Chaff Mode. Displays the chaff dispense mode. Pressing VAB L1 will toggle the state between PROGRAM
     and MANUAL.
     •     PROGRAM. A single chaff program will be dispensed if the chaff dispenser is armed and the Chaff
           button is pressed on the Cyclic Grip in either crewstation. The chaff program may be edited on the ASE
           Utility page.
     •    MANUAL. An individual chaff cartridge will be dispensed if the chaff dispenser is armed and the Chaff
          button is pressed on the Cyclic Grip in either crewstation.
5.   ASE Autopage Setting. Displays the ASE autopage setting for the crewstation. Pressing VAB R1 will display
     an expanded selection of autopage options.
     •    SEARCH. If a new threat is detected, the TSD will be autopaged if the ASE or TSD pages are not
          already displayed within the crewstation.
     •    ACQUISITION. If a detected threat elevates to ACQUISITION, the TSD will be autopaged if the ASE
          or TSD pages are not already displayed within the crewstation.
     •    TRACK. If a detected threat elevates to TRACK, the TSD will be autopaged if the ASE or TSD pages
          are not already displayed within the crewstation.
     •    OFF. ASE autopaging is disabled.
6.   Ownship. Represents the present position of the aircraft.
7.   ASE Footprint. Displays the relative bearings of detected radar and laser threats around the ownship.
     Radar and/or laser threats detected by the RLWR are displayed around the inside of the ASE footprint. Radar
     threats detected by the RFI (if the FCR mast-mounted assembly is installed) are displayed around the outside
     of the ASE footprint.
8.   Chaff Inventory. Indicates the number of remaining chaff cartridges onboard, up to a maximum of 30.
9.   Heading to Waypoint. Displays the heading to the next point in the route.
ASE Utility (UTIL) Sub-page
The ASE Utility page allows the crew to initialize the RLWR, set the RLWR voice mode, and configure the chaff
dispenser settings.
                                   1. Chaff Status




           2. Chaff Mode


          3. Burst Count


         4. Burst Interval


          5. Salvo Count                                                                 8. RLWR Power


         6. Salvo Interval                                                               9. RLWR Voice Mode


            7. Cartridges
                Input




1.   Chaff Status. Displays the state of the chaff dispenser. Pressing VAB T1 will toggle the state between SAFE
     and ARM.
     •     SAFE. Chaff dispensing is inhibited. The status will default to SAFE with aircraft weight-on-wheels and
           will be inhibited from selection.
     •     ARM. Chaff may be dispensed by either crewstation.
2.   Chaff Mode. Displays the chaff dispense mode. Pressing VAB L1 will toggle the state between PROGRAM
     and MANUAL.
     •     PROGRAM. A single chaff program will be dispensed if the chaff dispenser is armed and the Chaff
           button is pressed on the Cyclic Grip in either crewstation.
     •     MANUAL. An individual chaff cartridge will be dispensed if the chaff dispenser is armed and the Chaff
           button is pressed on the Cyclic Grip in either crewstation.
3.   Burst Count. Sets the number of chaff cartridges dispensed within each salvo of the chaff program.
     Pressing VAB L2 will display an expanded selection of burst count options of 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, and 8 cartridges.
4.   Burst Interval. Sets the time interval between individual chaff cartridges dispensed within each salvo of
     the chaff program. Pressing VAB L3 will display an expanded selection of burst interval options of 0.1, 0.2,
     0.3, and 0.4 seconds.
5.   Salvo Count. Sets the number of salvos dispensed within each chaff program. Pressing VAB L4 will display
     an expanded selection of salvo count options of 1, 2, 4, 8, and CONTINUOUS. When set to CONTINUOUS,
     salvos will be dispensed in accordance with the remainder of the chaff program settings until the chaff
     dispenser is depleted or the chaff is set to SAFE status.
6.   Salvo Interval. Sets the time interval between each salvo dispensed within the chaff program. Pressing
     VAB L5 will display an expanded selection of salvo interval options of 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, and RANDOM. When
     set to RANDOM, the interval between each salvo will be randomly selected.
7.   Cartridges Input. Activates the KU for inputting the current chaff cartridge quantity, if necessary.
8.   RLWR Power. Enables/Disables power to the Radar/Laser Warning System.
9.   RLWR Voice Mode. Displays the voice warning mode of the Radar/Laser Warning System. Pressing VAB
     L5 will toggle the mode between NORM and TERSE.
     •    NORM. The RLWR will report radar and laser threats by threat classification, clock direction, and
          lethality when initially detected. If any detected threat elevates in lethality, the RLWR will repeat the
          audio report to include the current clock direction and increased lethality.
                    o    Audio report of a laser threat: “Laser ranging, 1 o’clock.”
                    o    Initial audio report of an SA-8 radar: “SA-8, 1 o’clock, searching.”
                    o    Updated audio report of an SA-8 radar: “SA-8, 1 o’clock, tracking.”
     •    TERSE. The RLWR will report radar and laser threats by threat type and lethality only when initially
          detected. If any detected threat elevates in lethality, the RLWR will repeat the audio report to include
          the increased lethality.
                    o    Audio report of a laser threat: “Laser ranging.”
                    o    Initial audio report of an SA-8 radar: “Radar searching.”
                    o    Updated audio report of an SA-8 radar: “Radar tracking.”
RADAR & LASER SIGNAL DETECTING SETS
The AN/APR-39A(V)4 provides detection of threat radar emissions by using a series of external antennas to
passively detect and identify radar signals. The AN/AVR-2A provides detection of threat laser emissions by using
a series of external detectors to passively detect and classify laser sources. As the combined RLWR system, the
APR-39 and AVR-2 provide threat indications to the aircrew by displaying threat symbols on the TSD and ASE
pages. In addition, the RLWR generates audio voice warnings describing the type of threat, threat direction, and
what mode the radar or laser is operating, allowing the crew to remain focused outside for obstructions to flight
or searching for enemy targets.
Like the TSD, the ASE page provides a singular footprint for the combined indications of the RLWR and RFI (if
equipped with an FCR mast-mounted assembly). The display is an azimuth-only top-down display, with RLWR
threat symbols displayed within the inside of the ASE footprint. The nature of the threat is indicated by the type
of symbol and label, and the severity of the threat is indicated by enhancements placed around the symbol itself.



        F/A-18 airborne radar        Laser Rangefinder             SA-8 SAM radar                     Laser Designator
           in Search mode                                           in Track mode




          Naval air defense           SA-15 SAM radar                                ZSU-23-4 radar
        radar in Search mode           in Search mode                                in Track mode




                                  MPD ASE Page (Left) and TSD Page (Right)

        •      New threat detected. A new radar or laser threat is displayed in a bolded symbol format for 3
               seconds following initial detection.
        •      Radar in Search mode. A radar signal in               •      Laser Rangefinder. A laser source
               search mode.                                                 emitting in a range-finding mode.
        •      Radar in Track mode. A radar signal in                •      Laser Designator. A laser source
               target tracking mode.                                        emitting in a target designation mode.
        •      Radar in Launch mode. A radar signal                  •      Laser Beam-Rider. A laser source
  (Flashing)   in missile guidance mode.                       (Flashing)   emitting in a beam-riding guidance mode.
        •      Fixed-Wing Radar. A radar signal
               identified as an airborne platform.
        •      Threat signal lost. A threat that is no longer detected will be displayed in partial intensity for 10
               seconds before being removed from the RLWR “footprint”.
COMMON MISSILE WARNING SYSTEM
The AN/AAR-57 Common Missile Warning System (CMWS) provides detection of threat missiles via a series of
external detectors to passively detect missiles after launch. The system displays the threat direction to the Pilot
via the Control Indicator Display, along with an audio threat alert to the crew. The AAR-57 is also capable of
automatically dispensing flare countermeasures without crew interaction; however, the crew retains the ability to
manually dispense flares by pressing the cyclic-mounted FLARE button in either crewstation.
As a post-production modification to the AH-64D, the CMWS utilizes the ADF audio channel to provide audio
threat alerts to each crewstation. As such, the ADF knob on the Communications Panel controls the volume of
CMWS threat alerts within the crewstation, independently of the RLWR volume.
The CMWS/NAV switch on the CMWS Control Panel in the Pilot crewstation is used to switch the ADF audio
channel between radio signals received by the AN/ARN-49 Automatic Direction Finder and the CMWS. The Pilot
should ensure this switch is set to the CMWS position if operating in a hostile area where missile threats are
expected.


  1. Control Indicator Display                                                               3. No function




           2. Power/Test Knob                                                                4. LAMP Knob




          5. ARM/SAFE Switch                                                                 7. JETTISON Switch



          6. CMWS/NAV Switch                                                                 8. BYPASS/AUTO Switch


                                   CMWS Control Panel (Pilot crewstation only)

1.    Control Indicator Display. Displays the current inventory of chaff and flare countermeasures onboard
      the aircraft, direction of detected missile threats, and system status.
2.    Power/Test Knob. Enables/disables power to the CMWS and initiates a Built-In-Test (BIT) sequence.
      •       OFF. Disables power to the CMWS.
      •       ON. Enables power to the CMWS. A BIT will automatically be performed after the CMWS initializes.
      •       TEST. Manually initiates a BIT of the CMWS.
3.    AUDIO Knob. No function.
4.    LAMP Knob. Adjusts the brightness of the Control Indicator Display.
5.    ARM/SAFE Switch. Arms flare dispensers for automatic or manual dispensing. Flare dispensing is inhibited
      with aircraft weight-on-wheels regardless of the switch position.
      •       SAFE. Flare dispensing is inhibited.
      •       ARM. Flares may be automatically dispensed upon detection of a missile threat or manually dispensed
              by either crewstation.
6.   CMWS/NAV Switch. Sets the ADF audio channel in both crewstations to the CMWS or ADF receiver.
     •    CMWS. The ADF audio channel will relay threat alert audio from the CMWS. While providing threat
          alert audio, the crew will be unable to monitor radio signals received by the ADF.
     •    NAV. The ADF audio channel will relay radio audio from the ADF receiver. While providing ADF radio
          audio, the crew will be unable to receive threat alert audio from the CMWS.
7.   JETTISON Switch (Guarded). Jettisons all flares from the tail-mounted flare dispensers in an emergency.
     The CMWS does not need to be armed to initiate a jettison of flares.
8.   BYPASS/AUTO Switch. Enables/disables automatic flare dispensing as commanded by the CMWS. Missile
     threat alert audio is provided regardless of switch position.
     •    BYPASS. Automatic dispensing commands by the CMWS are bypassed. Flares will only by dispensed
          if the FLARE button on either Cyclic Grip is pressed.
     •    AUTO. Automatic dispensing commands by the CMWS are enabled. Flares may be automatically
          dispensed by the CMWS when missile threats are detected, or manually dispensed if the FLARE button
          on either Cyclic Grip is pressed.


                                                                             11. Quadrant Arrows
                9. Flare Inventory
                                                                             12. Dispense Indicator

               10. Chaff Inventory
                                                                             13. Ready Indicator




                                    CMWS Control Panel Indicator
                                                  Display
9.   Flare Inventory. Indicates the number of remaining flare cartridges onboard, up to a maximum of 60.
     When all flares have been depleted, the flare inventory will alternate between “0” and “OUT”.
10. Chaff Inventory. Indicates the number of remaining chaff cartridges onboard, up to a maximum of 30.
    When all chaff cartridges have been depleted, the flare inventory will alternate between “0” and “OUT.
11. Quadrant Arrows. When illuminated, indicates the direction of threat missile detection(s).
12. Dispense Indicator. When illuminated, indicates dispensing of flares or chaff is in progress.
13. Ready Indicator. When illuminated, indicates system is in a “ready” state for flare dispensing (CMWS
    ARM/SAFE switch is in the ARM position and the aircraft is not weight-on-wheels).
COUNTERMEASURES DISPENSERS
The AH-64D is equipped with three expendable countermeasures dispensers: a single M-141 dispenser for chaff
and two Improved Countermeasure Dispensers (ICMD) for flares. Due to each dispenser’s mounted location and
orientation, the countermeasures loaded in each dispenser are not interchangeable between chaff and flares.




Chaff Dispenser
The M-141 chaff dispenser is mounted on the left side of the tail boom and can hold 30 chaff cartridges. Chaff
cartridges may be dispensed individually in MANUAL mode, or sequentially when in PROGRAM mode. The
dispenser mode is toggled between MANUAL and PROGRAM on the ASE or ASE UTIL pages, and the chaff program
may be edited on the ASE UTIL page as well.
The chaff dispenser can only be set to ARM when the aircraft is airborne. If the aircraft is weight-on-wheels, the
chaff dispenser is automatically set to SAFE and inhibited from dispensing.


                                                       Chaff Dispenser




Either crewmember may arm the chaff dispenser or configure the chaff settings, which are common between
each crewstation, and either crewmember may dispense chaff by pressing the Chaff button on the Cyclic Grip.
The chaff quantity and ARM/SAFE status is also indicated on the WPN page.
Flare Dispensers
A pair of Improved Countermeasures Dispensers (ICMD) are mounted on opposing sides of the tail boom and
each can hold 30 flare cartridges. Flares may be dispensed automatically by the CMWS itself or manually by either
crewmember when the CMWS BYPASS/AUTO switch on the CMWS Control Panel is set to the AUTO position. If
the switch is set to the BYPASS position, automatic flare dispensing is bypassed and may only be manually
dispensed by the aircrew by pressing the Flare button on the Cyclic Grip.
The flare dispensers are only armed when the aircraft is airborne. If the aircraft is weight-on-wheels, the flare
dispensers will be inhibited from dispensing, regardless of the position of the CMWS ARM/SAFE switch on the
CMWS Control Panel in the Pilot crewstation.


                        Flare dispensers (both sides)




The flare dispensers utilize a pre-set flare program, which can only be modified by an external panel by ground
support crews when the engines are off. Flares are dispensed using this program regardless of whether the
dispensing is commanded automatically by the CMWS or manually by the aircrew.
The flare program may be edited on the Aircraft Additional Properties tab within the Mission Editor, or from the
cockpit by utilizing the player kneeboard. The available program options include Burst Count, Burst Interval, Salvo
Count, Salvo Interval, and Minimum Time Between Programs.



  Aircraft Additional
    Properties tab
ASE HAND CONTROLS
Either crewmember may manually dispense chaff and flares. Either crewmember may configure and arm the
chaff dispenser; however, only the Pilot has access to the CMWS Control Panel to arm the flare dispensers.


Cyclic & Collective Controls
The Pilot and Copilot/Gunner Cyclic Grips include buttons for dispensing chaff
and flares.




                                                                                 Chaff Dispense


                                                                                 Flare Dispense
“GEORGE” AI




     “GEORGE” AI
“GEORGE” AI
The AH-64D is operated by two crewmembers: a Pilot (PLT) and a Copilot/Gunner (CPG). The DCS: AH-64D
module supports multicrew capability, where two players can occupy the two seats in a multiplayer session for
cooperative play. To accommodate a single-player experience, a player may utilize “George” AI, a virtual
crewmember that allows players to manage mission-critical items in the crewstation that the player is not
occupying.




Unless specifically disabled in the Mission Editor options, George AI will always be present in the opposite
crewstation from the player. When the player enters an AH-64D in DCS, they will be placed in the aft Pilot
crewstation while George AI occupies the front CPG crewstation. If the player moves to the CPG crewstation,
George will occupy the Pilot crewstation.
George may be directed by keyboard commands or a 4-way hat switch on the player’s joystick. As an AI
crewmember, George is more than simply a means of interacting with the controls and systems in the crewstation
that the player is not occupying. George is designed to mimic the real-life procedures used by AH-64D crew
members, which permits players to direct and coordinate the AI crewmember actions in a similar manner to
interacting with another person, albeit in a more limited capacity. When a player directs George AI via a command
or control input, they are directing George to perform “tasks” rather than simple “actions”. These tasks could be
as basic as toggling the laser designator on and off to begin/cease target designation, or they may be as complex
as following a sequence of waypoints to navigate a route at low altitude into a battle position.
As George is simulating a real crewmember, some commands may not result in an immediate or apparent reaction
from George. This simulates the time needed to communicate the command over the intercom and the
commanded action(s) to be performed by a real crewmember. Many commands carry several implied actions
beyond what the command itself entails. These will be described throughout this chapter.
NOTE: George will continue to be refined throughout the Early Access process and will receive new features on
a periodic basis.
AH-64D AI Controls Structure
The AI controls are divided into two categories: AI Helper Commands and AI Helper Controls.
AI Helper Commands. Simple but immediate commands that may be given to George at any time, such as
“Consent To Fire” or “Request Aircraft Control.” These commands do not require the George AI Helper Interface
to be displayed.
AI Helper Controls. Complex commands that are contextual based on the current mode of the George AI Helper
Interface, such as commanding George as the CPG to action a specific weapon or commanding George as the
Pilot to fly along the current route. These controls are only available when the AI Helper Interface is displayed.
The AI Helper Interface responds to short and long presses of the interface controls to perform different functions.
A short press is held down for less than 0.5 seconds, and a long press is held down for more than 0.5 seconds.
Under the AH-64D Pilot and AH-64D CPG aircraft control modes, the AH-64D George AI Helper input functions
category contains the input command entries for the AI Helper Commands that are available from each respective
AH-64D crewstation and the input command entry for displaying the George AI Helper Interface.

                       Aircraft Control Mode        Input Functions                 Input Command Entries




Under the AH-64D George AI Helper aircraft control mode, input command entries may be programmed to
navigate and utilize the George AI Helper Interface. These commands may be dual-bound to any command
entries that are already bound within the AH-64D Pilot or AH-64D CPG control modes; however, these commands
will take priority when the AI Helper Interface is displayed.
For example, if a 4-way hat switch is bound to the Sight Select switch under AH-64D Pilot and to the George AI
Helper Interface under AH-64D George AI Helper, the 4-way hat switch will perform its function as the Sight
Select switch when the AI Helper Interface is hidden, but will function as the AI Helper Controls switch when the
AI Helper Interface is shown.

                       Aircraft Control Mode        Input Functions                 Input Command Entries




To control George from either crewstation, the George AI Helper Interface Up/Down/Left/Right and
George AI Interface Hide commands will need to be bound under AH-64D George AI Helper aircraft control
mode; as will the George AI Helper Interface Show/Hide Menu command entry under AH-64D Pilot and
AH-64D CPG aircraft control modes.
AH-64D AI Helper Commands
The George AI Helper Interface is not required to be displayed to utilize the commands listed below.
Consent To Fire. If George (as the CPG) is tracking a target, this command will give George clearance to fire
his assigned weapon at that target, even if his ROE is set to Hold Fire. This command is only available when the
Player is occupying the Pilot seat.
George AI Helper Interface – Show/Hide. Displays the AI Helper Interface and enables the input command
entries within the AH-64D George AI Helper aircraft control mode. It is recommended that this command is bound
to the same button as George AI Helper Interface – Hide under AH-64D George AI Helper aircraft control
mode to allow the AI Helper Interface to be toggled between shown/hidden with the same input.
Request Aircraft Control. When flying without another player, this command transfers aircraft control to
George (as the Pilot) or returns it to the player (as the CPG). George cannot accept aircraft control when
performing CPG duties. This command is only available when the player is occupying the CPG seat.
When flying with another player in multi-crew, this command transfers the flight controls from the other player.
For example, if the Pilot is flying the helicopter and the Copilot/Gunner presses this button to request control; if
the Pilot accepts the handoff the CPG’s cyclic stick will un-stow, and the Pilot’s flight controls will become inactive.
NOTE: If George AI is disabled in the Mission Editor, the player will be required to fly the aircraft at all times,
regardless of which seat the player is occupying at any point in the mission.
TADS Store Target. If George (as the CPG) is tracking a target with the TADS, this command will direct George
to store a Target point (T##) using the STORE/UPDT switch on the TEDAC Left Handgrip. If George is not already
lasing, he will momentarily fire the LRFD to get accurate range data before storing the location as a Target point.
This command is only available when the Player is occupying the Pilot seat.
NOTE: This command may also be used while the Target List is displayed to store multiple Target points.


AH-64D AI Helper Controls
The commands listed below will only function when the George AI Helper Interface is displayed.
George AI Helper Interface – Hide. Hides the on-screen AI Helper Interface and disables the input command
entries within the AH-64D George AI Helper aircraft control mode. It is recommended that this command is bound
to the same button as George AI Helper Interface – Hide under AH-64D George AI Helper aircraft control
mode to allow the AI Helper Interface to be toggled between shown/hidden with the same input.
George AI Helper Interface – Down. Performs the function associated with the Down action, given the
current Interface mode.
George AI Helper Interface – Left. Performs the function associated with the Left action, given the current
Interface mode.
George AI Helper Interface – Right. Performs the function associated with the Right action, given the current
Interface mode.
George AI Helper Interface – Up. Performs the function associated with the Up action, given the current
Interface mode.
See the command list of AI Helper Controls in the Player-as-CPG or Player-as-PLT sections of this chapter for
more information.
PLAYER-AS-CPG “GEORGE” AI CONTROLS
When the player is in the Copilot/Gunner (CPG) crewstation, pressing the George AI Helper Interface –
Show/Hide command will display a horizontal situation indicator that can be used as a directional reference for
giving commands to George (as the Pilot).


              1. Desired Heading                                                       3. Desired Heading



                                                                                       4. Radar/Barometric
         2. Desired Ground Speed
                                                                                        Altitude Indicator


             5. Ownship Heading
                                                                                       6. Desired Heading Bug


                7. Bearing to
            Navigation Fly-To Cue                                                      8. Ownship




                                                                                       9. Relative Bearing Scale
             10. Compass Wheel




           11. AI Interface Mode



                                          Player-as-CPG AI Interface

1.   Desired Heading. Displays the heading that George has been commanded to maintain.
2.   Desired Ground Speed. Displays the ground speed that George has been commanded to maintain.
3.   Desired Altitude. Displays the altitude that George has been commanded to maintain.
4.   Radar/Barometric Altitude Indicator. Displays the altitude reference that George will use to maintain
     the desired altitude.
     •      R. George will maintain the desired radar altitude above ground level (AGL).
     •      B. George will maintain the desired barometric altitude above mean sea level (MSL).
5.   Ownship Heading. Displays the current heading of the ownship on the compass wheel.
6.   Desired Heading Bug. Displays the heading that George has been commanded to maintain relative to the
     ownship heading on the compass wheel.
7.   Bearing to Navigation Fly-To Cue. Displays the bearing to the Navigation Fly-To Cue relative to the
     ownship heading on the compass wheel.
8.   Ownship. Indicates the aircraft orientation relative to the compass wheel and associated bearing indicators.
9.   Relative Bearing Scale. Displays bearings relative to the desired heading bug at the 3 o’clock, 6 o’clock,
     and 9 o’clock positions.
10. Compass Wheel. Displays the magnetic heading reference around the ownship.
11. AI Interface Mode. Displays the current mode of the George AI Helper Interface.
    •    FLT. The AI Interface is set to “Flight” mode, which is used to direct specific flight parameters for
         George to fly.
         o    Assign a ground speed to achieve and maintain.
         o    Assign a heading to turn toward and maintain.
         o    Assign an altitude to achieve and maintain.
         o    Turn the aircraft toward the direction the player (as the CPG) is looking.
    •    H-B. The AI Interface is set to “Hover/Bob-up” mode, which is used to direct George to maneuver the
         aircraft while in a stationary hover, such as when occupying a battle position.
         o    Translate the aircraft forward/backward/left/right across the surface at low speed.
         o    Assign a hover altitude to achieve and maintain.
         o    Turn the aircraft toward the direction the player (as the CPG) is looking.
         NOTE: H-B mode is only available when the aircraft is below 30 knots ground speed. When above 30
         knots ground speed, this mode will be skipped, and the AI Interface Mode will proceed from FLT directly
         to CMBT.
    •    CMBT. The AI Interface is set to “Combat” mode, which is used to direct George in performing combat
         mission-related tasks.
         o    Perform an immediate break turn to the 3 o’clock, 6 o’clock, or 9 o’clock directions.
         o    Align the aircraft heading to the azimuth of the TADS sensor turret.
         o    Navigate along the current route and come to a hover at the final waypoint.
    •    CMWS. The AI Interface is set to “Common Missile Warning System” mode. This mode directs George
         to change the settings on the CMWS control panel in the Pilot crewstation.
         o    Arm/Safe the flare dispensers.
         o    Enable/disable automatic dispensing of flares.
When CMWS mode is entered, an
additional circular interface element
will be displayed to the player as a
directional reference for giving
commands, showing the current
                                                                   12. ARM/SAFE Switch
settings of the CMWS control panel.
The text color of the AI Helper                                  13. BYPASS/AUTO Switch
Interface text corresponds with the
Arm/Safe status of the CMWS in the
same color pattern as the A/S button
on the Armament Panel.

                                                   Player-as-CPG AI Interface - CMWS mode

12. ARM/SAFE Switch. Displays the position of the ARM/SAFE switch on the CMWS control panel.
    •    SAFE Flare dispensers are safed.
    •    ARMED Flare dispensers are armed.
13. BYPASS/AUTO Switch. Displays the position of the BYPASS/AUTO switch on the CMWS control panel.
    •    AUTO. Flares will be dispensed automatically when threats are detected by the CMWS.
    •    BYPASS. Flares will not be dispensed when threats are detected by the CMWS.
Player-as-CPG AI Helper Controls
The AI Helper Controls are contextual based on the current mode of the AI Helper Interface. The actions listed
below correspond with the commands issued by the player when occupying the Copilot/Gunner crewstation.
 MODE                COMMAND            ACTION
 FLT                 Left      Short    If >30 knots, changes the AI Interface mode to CMBT.
 FLIGHT                                 If <30 knots, changes the AI Interface mode to H-B.
 PARAMETERS
                               Long     Moves desired heading bug left. After the button is released,
                                        commands George to turn the helicopter to the new heading.
                     Right     Short    Commands George to turn the helicopter toward the direction you
                                        are looking.
                               Long     Moves desired heading bug right. After the button is released,
                                        commands George to turn the helicopter to the new heading.

                     Up        Short    Increases the desired speed in the GS window. After a short delay,
                                        George will accelerate the helicopter to the new speed.

                               Long     Increases the desired altitude in the ALT window. After the button is
                                        released, George will increase the helicopter’s altitude. If set to
                                        <1,420 feet AGL, George will hold the radar altitude. If set ≥1,420
                                        feet AGL, George will hold the barometric altitude.

                     Down      Short    Decreases the desired speed in the GS window. After a short delay,
                                        George will decelerate the helicopter to the new speed.
                                        (H-B Interface mode becomes available if speed decreases below 30
                                        knots.)

                               Long     Decreases the desired radar altitude in the ALT window. After the
                                        button is released, George will decrease the helicopter’s altitude. If
                                        set to <1,420 feet AGL, George will hold the radar altitude. If set
                                        ≥1,420 feet AGL, George will hold the barometric altitude.
 H-B                 Left      Short    Changes the AI Interface mode to CMBT.
 HOVER/BOB-UP
 MANEUVERS                     Long     George translates the helicopter to the left while the button is held.

                     Right     Short    Same function as FLT mode.

                               Long     George translates the helicopter to the right while the button is held.
                     Up        Short    George increases hover altitude by 10 feet.

                               Long     George translates the helicopter forward while the button is held.

                     Down      Short    George decreases hover altitude by 10 feet.

                               Long     George translates the helicopter backward while the button is held.
 CMBT                Left      Short    Changes the AI Interface mode to CMWS.
 COMBAT TASKS
                               Long     Commands George to perform a 90° turn to the left to evade or
                                        more quickly re-attack.

                     Right     Short    Commands George to fly a direct path to the current Navigation
                                        Direct-To Cue. If the point is part of a route, George will continue
                                        along that route in sequence. If the point is not part of a route, or is
                             the final point in the route, George will come to a hover at that
                             location.
                     Long    Commands George to perform a 90° turn to the right to evade or
                             more quickly re-attack.

             Up      Short   Commands George to turn the aircraft to the heading of the TADS
                             LOS reticle. This is useful for starting an attack run, bringing the
                             helicopter into Hellfire launch constraints, or aligning the Rocket
                             Steering Cursor.
                     Long    No Function.

             Down    Short   No Function.
                     Long    Commands George to perform a 180° turn to evade or turn away
                             after an attack.
CMWS         Left    Short   Changes the AI Interface mode to FLT.
CMWS PANEL
SETTINGS             Long    No Function.

             Right   Short   No Function.

                     Long    No Function.

             Up      Short   Toggles flare dispensers arming state between ARM and SAFE.

                     Long    No Function.

             Down    Short   Toggles flare dispense mode between AUTO and BYPASS.

                     Long    No Function.
PLAYER-AS-PLT “GEORGE” AI CONTROLS
When the player is in the Pilot (PLT) crewstation, pressing the George AI Helper Interface – Show/Hide
command will display a circular interface element as a directional reference for giving commands to George (as
the Copilot/Gunner). The associated AI Helper Controls direct George where to search for targets and, when
appropriate, to assign a weapon with which George should engage the currently tracked target. Additional settings
will be displayed within the interface depending on which weapon, if any, has been assigned to George.
The text color of the AI Helper Interface corresponds with the Rules Of Engagement (ROE) setting that George
(as the CPG) has been commanded to adhere to.
Weapons Hold George will fire his assigned weapon at the target that he is currently tracking after the player
has pressed the “Consent To Fire” AI Helper Command. After firing one burst from the gun or one missile, George
will not fire again until a subsequent “Consent To Fire” command is given.
Weapons Free George will engage the target that he is currently tracking until the target is destroyed or his
assigned weapon is depleted. George will also fire rockets in COOP mode if the Rocket Steering Cursor is aligned.
  1. CPG’s Assigned Weapon           2. TADS LRFD State             3. TADS SLAVE State           4. CPG’s Gun BURST LIMIT Setting




 Player-as-PLT AI Interface – NO WPN format                              Player-as-PLT AI Interface – GUN format
  5. CPG’s Missile     6. CPG’s SAL Missile      7. CPG’s SAL Missile                       8. CPG’s Rocket       9. CPG’s Rocket
   TYPE Setting        Employment Method             TRAJ Setting                         INVENTORY Setting         QTY Setting




 Player-as-PLT AI Interface – HELLFIRE format                           Player-as-PLT AI Interface – RKTS format
1.   CPG’s Assigned Weapon. Displays the weapon that has been assigned to George (as the CPG).
     •   NO WPN. George will de-action all weapons but will continue to track his assigned target.
     •   GUN. George will action the 30mm gun and prepare to engage his assigned target.
     •   HELLFIRE. George will action the AGM-114 missiles and prepare to engage his assigned target.
     •   RKTS. George will action the 2.75-inch unguided rockets and prepare to engage his assigned target.
2.   TADS LRFD State. Displays the commanded state of the TADS Laser Rangefinder/Designator.
     •   NOT LASING. George has been commanded to stop firing the LRFD.
     •   LASING. George has been commanded to designate his assigned target with the LRFD.
3.   TADS SLAVE State. Displays the commanded state of the SLAVE button when George is using the TADS.
     •   UNSLAVED. The TADS is not slaved to the CPG’s ACQ source.
     •   SLAVED. The TADS is slaved to the CPG’s ACQ source.
4.   CPG’s Gun BURST LIMIT Setting. Displays the CPG’s BURST LIMIT setting when the gun has been
     assigned to George (as the CPG). (See Area Weapon System for more information.)
         o    Weapons Hold. George will wait for a Consent to Fire command from the player. Once consent
              has been given by the player, he will fire a single burst from the gun when firing parameters have
              been met.
         o    Weapons Free. George will begin firing the gun after being assigned a target to track when firing
              parameters have been met.
5.   CPG’s Missile TYPE Setting. Displays the CPG’s missile TYPE setting when the missiles have been assigned
     to George (as the CPG).
     •   SAL2. George will select semi-active laser-homing (SAL) AGM-114K missiles.
     •   RF. George will select fire-and-forget radio frequency (RF) AGM-114L missiles.
6.   CPG’s SAL Missile Employment Method. Displays the employment method that George will utilize when
     commanded to select AGM-114K SAL missiles. (See Hellfire Modular Missile System for more information.)
     •   LOBL. George will employ a Lock-On-Before-Launch method after being assigned a target to track.
         o    Weapons Hold. George will begin lasing immediately after being assigned a target to track and
              wait for a Consent To Fire command from the player. Once consent has been given by the player,
              he will launch a missile when acceptable launch parameters have been met.
         o    Weapons Free. George will begin lasing immediately after being assigned a target to track and
              then fire a missile when acceptable launch parameters have been met.
     •   LOAL. George will employ a Lock-On-After-Launch method after being assigned a target to track.
         o    Weapons Hold. George will wait for a Consent To Fire command from the player. Once consent
              has been given by the player, he will launch a missile when acceptable launch parameters have
              been met. After the missile has been launched, he will begin lasing his assigned target.
         o    Weapons Free. George will fire a missile after being assigned a target to track and when
              acceptable launch parameters have been met. After the missile has been launched, he will begin
              lasing his assigned target.
     NOTE: This option is only available when George has been commanded to utilize DIR for his TRAJ setting.
     If the TRAJ option is set to LO or HI, the employment method will remain in LOAL and cannot be changed.
7.   CPG’s SAL Missile TRAJ Setting. Displays the CPG’s TRAJ setting when the missiles have been assigned
     to George (as the CPG) and he has been commanded to select AGM-114K SAL missiles.
     NOTE: This option is only available when George has been commanded to utilize LOAL for his SAL missile
     employment method. If the employment method is to LOBL, the TRAJ option will remain in DIR and cannot
     be changed.
8.   CPG’s Rocket INVENTORY Setting. Displays the CPG’s rocket INVENTORY setting when the rockets have
     been assigned to George (as the CPG).
9.   CPG’s Rocket QTY Setting. Displays the CPG’s rocket QTY setting when the rockets have been assigned
     to George (as the CPG).
     •    HE. George will select M151 or M229 high explosive rockets.
     •    ILL. George will select M257 battlefield illumination rockets.
     •    SMK. George will select M274 target practice smoke rockets.


Player-as-PLT AI Helper Controls
The AI Helper Controls are contextual based on the current mode of the AI Helper Interface. The actions listed
below correspond with the commands issued by the player when occupying the Pilot crewstation.
 MODE                 COMMAND            ACTION
 TARGET               Left      Short     Cycles George’s weapon NO WPN→GUN→HELLFIRE→RKTS
 DESIGNATION
 /WEAPON                        Long      HELLFIRE: toggles TYPE between SAL2 and RF.
 CONTROL                                  RKTS: cycles TYPE of HE→ILL→SMK.
                                          (Only missile/rocket types that are loaded onboard will be displayed)

                      Right     Short    NO WPN: toggles between NOT LASING and LASING the target.
                                         GUN: cycles BURST LIMIT of 10→20→50→100→ALL.
                                         HELLFIRE: toggles between LOBL and LOAL. (If DIR is selected)
                                         RKTS: cycles QTY of 1→2→4→8→12→24→ALL.

                                Long      HELLFIRE: cycles TRAJ of DIR→LO→HI. (If LOAL is selected)

                      Up        Short     Commands George to slave the TADS to Pilot Helmet Sight (PHS)
                                          and search along designated line of sight for targets.
                                          If potential targets are detected, a Target List will be displayed.

                                Long      Toggles George’s rules of engagement (ROE) between “Weapons
                                          Hold” and “Weapons Free”. “Weapons Hold” is the default ROE
                                          state.

                      Down      Short     Commands George to stop tracking the current target. George will
                                          slave the TADS to Fixed Forward (FXD).

                                Long      Commands George to repeat the previous search and regenerate the
                                          Target List if applicable.

 TARGET LIST          Left      Short     Cancels Target List selection without assigning a target to George.
 SELECTION/
 TARGET ID                      Long      Enables Target List filtering.
                                          (Excludes friendlies if enemy or unknown contacts are detected)

                      Right     Short     Commands George to track the current target within the Target List.
                                 Long     Disables Target List filtering.
                                          (Displays all detected contacts, including friendlies.)

                      Up         Short    Moves Target List selection up.

                                 Long     Commands George to increase sensor magnification to the next
                                          TADS Field-Of-View setting.

                      Down       Short    Moves Target List selection down.

                                 Long     Commands George to decrease sensor magnification to the previous
                                          TADS Field-Of-View setting.



AI Target Acquisition & Tracking
The player uses the HMD LOS Reticle within the IHADSS Flight Symbology to direct George to an area on the
battlefield to scan for potential targets.
After looking at the desired area, the player presses Up-Short while the AI Interface is displayed. George will set
his ACQ source to Pilot Helmet Sight (PHS) and press SLAVE to slew the TADS to the location. Once the TADS
has aligned to the Pilot Helmet Sight, George will press SLAVE a second time and announce that he has “de-
slaved” the TADS. At this point, the player may move their head away from the desired area as necessary.
This process may take several moments, during which time the player must maintain their HMD LOS Reticle on
the location they are intending for George to scan for potential targets. If the player moves the HMD LOS Reticle
elsewhere before George has confirmed the TADS has been de-slaved, George will begin scanning in a different
location than originally intended. If George detects any targets with the TADS, he will generate a Target List.
NOTE: Any time George is commanded to scan an area for potential targets via Up-Short while the A/S button
on the Armament Panel is set to SAFE, he will set the button to ARM, which will permit the TADS LRFD to fire for
gaining accurate range to target. When commanded to stop tracking his target and slave the TADS back to fixed
forward via Down-Short, he will set the A/S button back to SAFE.


Weapon Employment
If George is assigned a weapon and is tracking a target, George will prepare the weapon system for engagement
against that target, in accordance with the directed weapon settings, up to actually firing the weapon. When
George is ready to fire the weapon, he will either wait for a Consent To Fire AI Helper Command from the player
(if ROE is set to Weapons Hold), or he will immediately begin engaging the target if acceptable weapon release
parameters have been met (if ROE is set to Weapons Free).


Pilot-Commanded Laser Designation
When George is tracking a target with NO WPN assigned, the player may order him to designate the target with
the TADS LRFD by pressing Right-Short while the AI interface is displayed. This may be used if the player intends
to employ AGM-114K laser-guided missiles from the Pilot crewstation while George provides laser guidance.
AI Combat Identification (CID)
While occupying the Copilot/Gunner crewstation, George is capable of identifying military units and equipment
on the battlefield and whether they are friend or foe. This process is known as Combat Identification, or CID.
The speed and accuracy at which George performs CID may vary based on the DCS mission settings, the distance
to the target, the target aspect, and whether the type of equipment is exclusive to one or multiple coalitions.
As is the case with many gameplay options within DCS, George’s CID ability level may be forced to adhere to a
specific type of behavior within the AH-64D Additional Properties tab of the Mission Editor, or it may be configured
based on a combination of F10 View Options and Label settings.
AI IFF Detection Mode. Sets the level of
Identification-Friend-or-Foe (IFF) that George will
utilize when detecting and identifying potential
targets.
•     Auto. The ability of George to determine the type
      of target and its coalition affiliation will be derived
      from the combination of F10 View Options and
      Labels settings. These settings themselves may
      be enforced by the mission or may be determined
      by the player’s personal preferences set on the
      Gameplay tab within the DCS Options.
•     Simple. No factors affect George’s ability to
      determine the type of target or its coalition
      affiliation. Upon detection of a target, George will
      instantly determine (without error) the type of
      target and whether the target is friendly or
      hostile.
•     Label Only. Identification logic factors affect
      George’s ability to determine the type of target,         Mission Editor – Additional Properties tab
      but they do not affect his ability to determine the
      coalition affiliation. Upon detection of a target, George will attempt to determine the type of target, which
      is affected by the aspect and angular size of the target within the sensor field-of-view; and will then instantly
      determine (without error) whether the target is friendly or hostile.
•     Realistic. Identification logic factors affect George’s ability to determine the type of target and the coalition
      affiliation. Upon detection of a target, George will attempt to correctly determine the type of target, which
      is affected by the aspect and angular size of the target within the sensor field-of-view; and will then attempt
      to determine whether the target is friendly or hostile, with the potential for a false identification.
When the AI IFF Detection Mode is set to Auto, George will use Simple, Label Only, or Realistic IFF modes
based on the matrix logic shown below.

                                                                     F10 VIEW OPTIONS

                                          All / Allies Only / Fog of War                 My A/C / Map Only

                     Full
                  Abbreviated                       Simple                                   Simple

     LABELS       Symbol Only
    SETTINGS
                                                    Simple                                 Label Only

                   Dot Neutral
                    No Labels                       Simple                                  Realistic
Combat Identification Process
George will perform the Combat Identification process in four steps. As each step is performed for a given contact,
the level of detail displayed within the Target List will be updated accordingly.
1.   Contact Detection. A contact is detected and initially classified as either GROUND,
     AIR, or NAVAL.
2.   Unit Classification. A contact is further classified by the general type of unit, such as
     ARMORED, AAA, HELICOPTER, etc.
3.   Equipment Recognition. A contact is recognized by determining the type of
     equipment, such as BMP-3, ZSU-23-4, Mi-24, etc.
4.   Target Identification. The recognized type of equipment is compared to the list of
     equipment used by each coalition to determine coalition affiliation.
If Simple IFF mode is used, all four steps are performed instantly and without error.
If Label Only IFF mode is used, identification factors will affect George’s ability in performing steps 1-3, but step
4 will be performed instantly and without error after steps 1-3 have been performed.
If Realistic IFF mode is used, identification factors will affect George’s ability in performing each step.


Combat Identification Factors
The following factors may affect George’s ability to identify a contact’s type or its coalition affiliation, depending
on the AI IFF Detection Mode.
Angular Size. Angular size of the contact is measured from the point of view of the CPG through the TADS. As
the range to the contact decreases, the greater the angular size of the contact within the TADS sensor, and the
easier it is for George to identify the equipment type.
Aspect. Angular size automatically includes aspect dependence. Vehicles that are head-on within the TADS
sensor will have a smaller angular size, hindering the ability for George to identify the contact compared to a
contact that is being viewed from the side at the same range.
Coalition Order Of Battle. When the type of equipment is determined (e.g., a BMP-3 vs an M2A1), the
equipment type is compared to the equipment known to be employed by either coalition, also known as the Order
Of Battle. If only one coalition uses the type of equipment, the contact is identified as friendly or enemy based
on the corresponding coaltion. If multiple coalitions use the type of equipment, there is a chance that the final
identification may be incorrectly identified as friendly or enemy.


Sensors
Currently, George will only use the TADS FLIR sensor, which carries no restrictions for target acquisition during
night missions. Any contacts of the required angular size within the TADS sensor video will be detected by George
when he is directed to scan an area for targets.
George AI will utilize multiple zoom levels as appropriate in an attempt to recognize each contact in the designated
area within a reasonable period of time. However, if there are enough contacts within the sensor field-of-view,
George may not be able to identify each of them before presenting the Target List to the player.
When the Target List is displayed, the player may select specific Target List entries to direct George to focus the
TADS at that contact. During this time, George will continue to perform Combat Identification and update the
Target List accordingly as he works through each step of the identification process, which may be further
enhanced by directing George to increase the TADS sensor magnification while focused on a given contact.
Target List
If George (as the CPG) detects any targets after being commanded to scan an area of the battlefield with the
TADS, he will generate a Target List. The list will be sorted according to target priority, with the highest priority
targets such as air defenses shown at the top of the list, and the lowest priority targets such as unarmed vehicles
and support equipment shown at the bottom.
As the player (as the Pilot) scrolls up or down through the
Target List, George will slew the TADS sensor turret to the
corresponding target location. If the target identification
process has not been completed for the target, George will
resume the process when the target is within the sensor
field-of-view. The player may monitor and even assist with
this process by commanding George to zoom in or out by
pressing Up-Long or Down-Long respectively via the AI
Helper Controls.
By default, the Target List will only display targets that have
been identified as enemies or as unknown types, or remove
unknown targets that are subsequently identified as friendly.
The player may display detected friendly units amongst the
list by pressing Right-Long via the AI Helper Controls while
the AI Interface is displayed; or may switch back to only
enemy/unknown targets by pressing Left-Long. If no
enemies or unknown targets are detected, friendlies will
automatically be displayed to aid in preventing fratricide
(friendly fire).
NOTE: The player may command George to engage a target that George has identified as friendly. Care should
be taken when operating areas near the frontline in which friendly and enemy positions are not well known, as
George has the potential to incorrectly identify a friendly unit as enemy or an enemy unit as a friendly.
When the Target List is presented to the player (as the Pilot), targets will be displayed using the AI Color Scheme
that is chosen on the Special tab within the DCS Options.
•    NATO. Targets will be colored based on their hostility status, regardless of their coalition color.

          o    Unit belongs to Hostile Coalition

          o    Unit belongs to Friendly Coalition

          o    Unit belongs to Neutral Coalition

          o    Coalition affiliation is unknown.

•    Coalition color. The Target List will display all targets in accordance with their assigned coalition.

          o    Unit belongs to Red Coalition

          o    Unit belongs to Blue Coalition

          o    Unit belongs to Neutral Coalition

          o    Coalition affiliation is unknown.
ADDITIONAL “GEORGE” AI FEATURES
Some additional features and important notes regarding George are listed below.
•    During a cold start, George will close his cockpit canopy when the player closes theirs, or after the APU is
     powered on, whichever comes first. George will also power on the TADS and boresight the CPG IHADSS.
•    George may be configured to automatically take over the flight controls when the player switches from the
     Pilot seat to the Copilot/Gunner seat. (See the Special Tab in the DCS Fundamentals chapter for more
     information.)
•    When George assumes control of the aircraft, he will attempt to maintain the current flight parameters until
     ordered to do otherwise.
•    George will not ground taxi. When the player is occupying the Copilot/Gunner seat, George may be directed
     to takeoff by increasing the Desired Altitude above zero, or order him to land by decreasing the Desired
     Altitude to zero. Once airborne, the FLT and H-B modes may be used to direct George to fly, hover, or
     translate in any direction. This can be useful to hover taxi around a FARP or airfield or maneuver the aircraft
     within a battle position.
•    When the player is occupying the Pilot seat and George is tracking a target, he will automatically laser
     designate the tracked target if required for his assigned weapon within the engagement parameters.
•    George is not immortal. If the player “dies”, George cannot occupy the player’s position to resume the
     mission.


AI Mission Editor Options
Mission creators may configure several additional options that affect the behavior of George during a mission.
These options are displayed within the Aircraft Additional Properties tab for the AH-64D BLK.II.
AI IFF Detection Mode. Sets the level of Identification-
Friend-or-Foe that George will utilize when detecting,
acquiring, and identifying potential targets. Depending on         Aircraft Additional
                                                                     Properties tab
the selection, F10 View Options and Labels selections will
affect the level George is able to identify whether a contact
is friendly or enemy, and what type of target it is. (See AI
Combat Identification for more information)
Track Air Targets. When checked, George (as the CPG) will
include aircraft as potential targets when generating the
Target List. If this option is un-checked, George will ignore
helicopter and fixed-wing aircraft when performing sensor
scans of the battlefield.
AI Disabled. When checked, this option will disable all
George AI Interface functions.
•    As the CPG, George will not scan for targets, will not
     use the TADS laser rangefinder/designator, and will not
     action any weapons.
•    As the Pilot, George will not fly the aircraft.
If the player is flying the DCS AH-64D by himself or herself in single-player, they will need to perform all duties
as necessary, which will usually require switching between seats.
AI HELPER CONTROLS

                       S Increase Airspeed                                          S Slave TADS to ACQ PHS
                       L Increase Altitude                                          L Toggle ROE Mode




                                W




                                                                                               W
 S CMBT/H-B Mode*                             S Designate Turn    S CPG WPN Cycle                            S WPN/Laser Setting
                          A
                              FLT       D                                                A               D
 L Turn Left                                  L Turn Right        L MSL/RKT Type                             L MSL TRAJ Select




                                                                                               S
                                S

                       S Decrease Airspeed                                          S Slave TADS to ACQ FXD
                       L Decrease Altitude                                          L Repeat Previous Search


                       S Increase Altitude 10 ft                                    S Target Select Up
                       L Translate Forward                                          L Next TADS FOV
                                W




                                                                                               W
 S CMBT Mode                                  S Designate Turn    S Cancel Target            Target          S Track Target
                          A
                              H-B       D                                                A               D
 L Translate Left                             L Translate Right   L Filter Friendlies         List           L Show All Units
                                S




                                                                                               S
                       S Decrease Altitude 10 ft                                    S Target Select Down
                       L Translate Backward                                         L Previous TADS FOV


                    S Align Heading to TADS
                                W




    S CMWS Mode                              S Fly DIR/Route
                         A
                              CMBT      D

    L Break Left 90°                         L Break Right 90°
                                S




                       L 180° Evasion Turn


                       S CMWS Arm/Safe
                                W




        S FLT Mode       A
                              CMWS
                                S




                       S CMWS Auto/Bypass


S Short press (<0.5 sec)            * H-B     mode is not         WEAPONS TIGHT (Default ROE; Player consent required)
L    Long press (>0.5 sec)            available >30 knots         WEAPONS FREE (CPG will engage tracked target at will)
APPENDICES




    APPENDICES
APPENDIX A – ABBREVIATED CHECKLISTS
Procedures
Abbreviated checklists for performing start-up, ground taxi, takeoff, landing, and shutdown procedures.


Aircraft Start
Once the interior checks are complete, perform the following:
1.    PLT   MSTR IGN switch – BATT (or EXT PWR if external power is to be used).
2.    PLT   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
3.    PLT & CPG   ICS system – Check to verify communications between crewstations.
4.    PLT & CPG   INTR LT PRESS-TO-TEST button – Press and hold; verify all signal lights illuminate.
5.    PLT / CPG   MSTR WARN, MSTR CAUT, and EUFD – Check for any malfunction indications.
6.    PLT   FIRE DET/EXTG TEST switch held to position 1 – Both crewmembers check for correct indications.
7.    CPG   FIRE DET/EXTG TEST switch held to position 2 – Both crewmembers check for correct indications.
8.    PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU start sequence.

9.    PLT   EUFD advisory column – Verify “APU ON” message is displayed.

10.   PLT   MSTR IGN – BATT (if external power was used prior to APU start).
Once the APU has been started and the MPDs have initialized, perform the following:
11.   PLT & CPG   Canopy door – Close.
12.   PLT / CPG   DTU page – Select MASTER LOAD to upload DTC data to the aircraft systems. (N/I)
13.   PLT & CPG   Aircraft systems – Initialize and configure remaining options as appropriate for mission.
14.   PLT   Standby Attitude Indicator – Uncage.
15.   PLT   RTR BRK switch – OFF (or LOCK if performing a Rotor Lock start).
16.   PLT   EXT LT ANTI-COL switch – WHT for day, or RED for night.
17.   PLT   First engine – Start as follows:
      •     ENG START switch – START.
      •     POWER lever – IDLE, at first indication of NG increase and if TGT is less than 80° C.
18.   PLT   Second Engine – Repeat the steps above after first engine start sequence is complete.
19.   PLT   RTR BRK switch – OFF.
20.   PLT   POWER levers – Advance both POWER levers smoothly to FLY.
21.   PLT   NP and NR – Verify 101%.
22.   PLT   MSTR WARN, MSTR CAUT, and EUFD – Monitor for any malfunction indications.
23.   PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU shutdown sequence.
Ground Taxi
Prior to initiating ground taxi, perform the following:
1.    PLT / CPG    Chocks removed – Verify.
2.    PLT / CPG    Bleed Air – On.
3.    PLT / CPG    ANTI-ICE – As required.
4.    PLT   EXT LT panel – As required.
5.    PLT & CPG    Searchlight – As required.
6.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – Release by applying wheel brake pressure; ensure PARK BRAKE handle is inward.
During ground taxi, perform the following:
7.    PLT / CPG    TAIL WHEEL button – Unlock; “UNLOCK” light is illuminated.
8.    PLT & CPG    Wheel brakes – Check in each crew station.
9.    PLT / CPG    ENG page – Check; ensure NP and NR 101%, all indications green.
10.   PLT / CPG    FLT page – Check; update altimeter if necessary.
11.   PLT   Pilot standby instruments – Check; update standby altimeter if necessary.


Before Takeoff
Perform the following prior to lifting up to a hover or initiating takeoff from the ground:
1.    1PLT & CPG   Weapons systems – Check the following:
      •     A/S button – “SAFE” light is illuminated.
      •     GND ORIDE button – Off; “ON” light is not illuminated.
      •     Weapons not actioned – Verify.
2.    PLT / CPG    TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
3.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – As desired (Ensure released unless operating on uneven or sloped terrain).
4.    PLT & CPG    POWER levers – Ensure both POWER levers are set to FLY.
5.    PLT / CPG    Systems – Check as follows:
      •     FUEL page – Verify options set as appropriate.
      •     Fuel quantity – Check; verify sufficient fuel is onboard the aircraft for the mission.
      •     EUFD – Check; clear of Warnings and Cautions.
      •     Engine and flight instruments – Check.
      •     ASE – As required.
      •     Avionics – As desired (Transponder/Radios on COM page; Navigation on TSD page).
6.    PLT   Hover Power Check – Perform. (see Hover Power Check for more information.)
Before Landing
Prior to landing, perform the following:
1.    PLT & CPG   Weapons systems – Check the following:
      •     A/S button – “SAFE” light is illuminated.
      •     GND ORIDE button – Off; “ON” light is not illuminated.
      •     Weapons not actioned – Verify.
2.    PLT / CPG   ASE – As required.
3.    PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
4.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – Ensure brakes are released, PARK BRAKE handle is inward.


After Landing
After landing, perform the following:
1.    PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Unlock as necessary for ground taxi.
2.    PLT   EXT LT – Set exterior lighting in accordance with local procedures.
3.    PLT / CPG   Avionics – As desired (COM/TSD pages).
      •     Transponder – STBY.
      •     Communications – As appropriate; verify on EUFD.


Aircraft Shutdown
Once stationary in designated parking location, perform the following:
1.    PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU start sequence.

2.    PLT / CPG   TAIL WHEEL button – Verify locked; “UNLOCK” light is not illuminated.
3.    PLT   PARK BRAKE – Brakes set; PARK BRAKE handle is pulled outward.
Prior to retarding the POWER levers to IDLE, verify the “APU ON” advisory message is displayed on the EUFD.
4.     PLT POWER levers – Retard both POWER levers to IDLE; press EUFD Stopwatch button to start a timer for
      a 2-minute engine cooldown.
5.    PLT   Standby Attitude Indicator – Cage.
6.    PLT   CMWS Power/Test knob – OFF.
7.    PLT & CPG   NVS Mode switch – OFF.
8.    PLT   ACM switch – OFF.
9.    CPG   ACM button – Disable ACM.
10.   CPG   TDU Mode knob – OFF.
11.   PLT / CPG   DMS SHUT DOWN page – MASTER OFF.
12.   PLT   POWER levers – OFF after 2 minutes have elapsed on EUFD stopwatch.
13.   PLT   RTR BRK switch – BRK after NR has decreased below 50%.
14.   PLT   Stabilator – Manually set the stabilator angle to 0°.
15.   PLT   Searchlight – STOW.
16.   PLT   RTR BRK switch – OFF after main rotor has stopped.
17.   PLT   EXT LT – All exterior lighting to OFF.
18.   PLT & CPG   INTR LT – All interior lighting to OFF.
19.   PLT   APU button – Press and release to initiate APU shutdown sequence.
20.   PLT   MSTR IGN – OFF.


Navigation
Abbreviated checklists for adding/editing/deleting/storing points, selecting a point for direct navigation,
selecting/editing/deleting a route, tuning the ADF to an NDB, or editing an NDB preset.


Adding a Point on the TSD
To quickly add a point using the “cursor drop” method, perform the following:
1.    TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.    POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.    ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.    Point Type (VAB L3-L6) – Select WP, HZ, CM, or TG as desired.
5.    MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Slew to desired location on TSD.
6.    MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Press.


To add a point using the Keyboard Unit, perform the following:
1.    TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.    POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.    ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.    ABR (T4) – Select, as required.
5.    Point Type (VAB L3-L6) – Select WP, HZ, CM, or TG as desired.
6.    IDENT> (VAB L1) – Select.
7.    Input identifier data using the KU, and press ENTER on the KU.
8.    Input free text data using the KU, and press ENTER on the KU.
9.    Input location data using the KU, and press ENTER on the KU.
10. Input altitude data using the KU, and press ENTER on the KU.
Editing a Point on the TSD
To edit a point using the Keyboard Unit, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the point index of the point to be edited into the KU.
     or
3.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the point to be edited on TSD.
4.   EDIT (VAB L3) – Select.
5.   FREE> (VAB L1) – Select.
6.   If the existing free text is desired, simply press ENTER on the KU. If different free text data is desired, input
     new free text, and press ENTER on the KU.
7.   If the existing location is desired, simply press ENTER on the KU. If different location data is desired, input
     new location, and press ENTER on the KU.
8.   If the existing altitude is desired, simply press ENTER on the KU. If different altitude data is desired, input
     new altitude, and press ENTER on the KU.


Deleting a Point on the TSD
To delete a point, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the point index of the point to be deleted into the KU.
     or
3.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the point to be deleted on TSD.
4.   DEL (VAB L4) – Select.
5.   YES (VAB L3) – Select to confirm deletion.
     or
5.   NO (VAB L4) – Select to abort deletion.


Storing a Point on the TSD
To store a point at the current aircraft position, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
3.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
4.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as desired.
5.   NOW (VAB L1) - Select.
To store a point at the CPG’s HMD line-of-sight using an Automatic range, perform the following:
1.   Sight Select switch – HMD.
2.   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
3.   MANRNG (VAB B6) – Select, enter “A” on the KU, and press ENTER.
4.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
5.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
6.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
7.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as desired.
8.   Position the HMD LOS Reticle over the desired location.
9.   STORE/UPDT switch – STORE.

To store a point at the CPG TADS line-of-sight using a laser range, perform the following:
1.   NVS Mode switch – OFF, if applicable.
2.   Sight Select switch – TADS.
3.   Sight Manual Tracker – Position the TADS LOS Reticle over the desired location.
4.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
5.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
6.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
7.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as desired.
8.   ARM/SAFE button – ARM.
9.   LRFD trigger – 1st detent for ranging.
10. STORE/UPDT switch – STORE.

To store a point at the CPG TADS line-of-sight using an Automatic range, perform the following:
1.   NVS Mode switch – OFF, if applicable.
2.   Sight Select switch – TADS.
3.   WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
4.   MANRNG (VAB B6) – Select, enter “A” on the KU, and press ENTER.
5.   Sight Manual Tracker – Position the TADS LOS Reticle over the desired location.
6.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
7.   POINT (VAB B6) – Select.
8.   STO (VAB L5) – Select.
9.   TYPE (VAB L6) – Select WP or TG as desired.
10. STORE/UPDT switch – STORE.
Creating a Route on the TSD
To add points to a new route, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the point index of the point to be added into the KU (e.g., “W11”,
     “H05”, “C51”, etc).
     or
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the point to be added on TSD.
5.   Route Point (VAB R5) – Select the button adjacent to the route “END” identifier to place the point at the
     start of the route.
6.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the point index of the next point to be added into the KU (e.g., “W11”,
     “H05”, “C51”, etc).
     or
6.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the next point to be added on TSD.
7.   The Route Scroll buttons (VAB R1/R6) may be used as necessary to advance up (or down) within the route
     sequence.
8.   Route Point (VAB R2-R5) – Select the button adjacent to the route “END” identifier to place the next point
     at the end of the route.


Creating a Direct Route on the TSD
To create a direct route to a point, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   DIR (VAB L5) – Select.
4.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the point index of the point to be added into the KU (e.g., “W11”,
     “H05”, “C51”, etc).
     or
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the point to be removed on TSD.
     or, if the point is part of the current route
4.   Route Scroll (VAB R1/R6) – Select, as necessary.
5.   Route Points (VAB R2-R5) – Select the button that corresponds with the point desired for creating a direct
     route.
Editing a Route on the TSD
To insert a point into the current route, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   ADD (VAB L2) – Select.
4.   POINT> (VAB L1) – Select and input the point index of the point to be inserted into the KU (e.g., “W11”,
     “H05”, “C51”, etc).
     or
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the point to be inserted on TSD.
5.   Route Points (VAB R2-R5) – Select the button that corresponds with the desired location within the route to
     which the point will be inserted.

To remove a point from the current route, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   DEL (VAB L4) – Select.
4.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the point to be removed on TSD.
     or
4.   Route Scroll (VAB R1/R6) – Select, as necessary.
5.   Route Points (VAB R2-R5) – Select the button that corresponds with the point that to be removed.


Selecting a New Route
To select a new route for navigation, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   RTM (VAB B6) – Select.
4.   NEW (VAB L4) – Verify boxed.
5.   Paging Controls (VAB B2/B3) – Select as necessary to view the available route sequences.
6.   Route Select (VAB T1-T5) – Select the desired route sequence.
7.   REVERSE ROUTE (VAB R5) – Select as necessary, depending on the direction the route is intended to be
     flown.


Deleting a Route
To select a route for deletion, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   RTE (VAB B5) – Select.
3.   RTM (VAB B6) – Select.
4.   DEL (VAB L5) – Select
5.   Paging Controls (VAB B2/B3) – Select as necessary to view the available route sequences.
6.   Route Select (VAB T1-T5) – Select the route sequence that is intended for deletion.
7.   YES (VAB L4) – Select to confirm deletion.
     or
7.   NO (VAB L5) – Select to abort deletion.


Tuning the ADF to a Manual Frequency
To tune the ADF to a manual frequency, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   INST (VAB L1) – Select.
4.   FREQ> (VAB L3) – Select and input the manual frequency using the KU.


Tuning the ADF to a Preset Frequency
To tune the ADF to a preset frequency, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   INST (VAB L1) – Select.
3.   UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
4.   Preset (VAB L2-L6, R2-R6) – Select as desired.
5.   TUNE (VAB T5) – Select.


Editing an ADF Preset
To edit an ADF preset using the KU, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   INST (VAB L1) – Select.
3.   UTIL (VAB T6) – Select.
4.   Preset (VAB L2-L6, R2-R6) – Select as desired.
5.   ID> (VAB B4) – Select and input the desired 3-character identifier on the KU.
6.   FREQ> (VAB B5) – Select and input the desired preset frequency on the KU.
Radio Communications
Abbreviated checklists for tuning radios to preset or manual frequencies, via the EUFD or the MPD COM page.


Tuning a Radio to a Preset using an MPD
To assign a preset to a radio using an MPD, perform the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   Preset (VAB L1-L5, R1-R5) – Select as desired.
3.   RADIO (VAB T1-T5) – Select as desired.
4.   TUNE Mode (VAB B2) – Set as PRI or STBY as desired.
5.   TUNE Select (VAB B6) – Select SC.


Tuning a Radio to a Preset using the EUFD
To assign a preset to a radio using the EUFD, perform the following:
1.   EUFD Preset button – Press to display the preset list
2.   RTS rocker switch – Select radio to tune.
3.   WCA rocker switch – Select preset frequency from preset list.
4.   EUFD Enter button – Press.


Manually Tuning a Radio using an MPD
To manually tune a VHF frequency, perform the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   VHF> (VAB L1) – Select and input the frequency on the KU.

To manually tune a UHF frequency, perform the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   UHF> (VAB L2) – Select and input the frequency on the KU.

To manually tune an FM frequency, perform the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   FM1> (VAB L3) – Select and input the frequency on the KU.
     or
3.   FM2> (VAB L4) – Select and input the frequency on the KU.
To manually tune an HF frequency, perform the following:
1.   COM Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   MAN (VAB B2) – Select.
3.   HF RECV – FREQ> (VAB R1) – Select and input the receive frequency on the KU.
4.   HF XMIT – FREQ> (VAB R3) – Select and input the transmit frequency on the KU.


Combat Employment
Abbreviated checklists for performing pre-combat checks, selecting acquisition sources, engaging targets with
each weapon system, and post-engagement procedures.


Performing Pre-Combat Checks
When approaching the Forward Edge of Battle Area (FEBA), the following should be considered:
1.   Weapons – Set Armament panel to ARM and ensure weapons are properly configured for the mission.
2.   ASE – Arm defensive systems on the ASE page and CMWS control panel.
3.   IFF (N/I) – Ensure Identification Friend-or-Foe systems are configured.
4.   Lights – Off (or set Formation lighting as appropriate).
5.   Recorder (N/I) – Configure and set appropriately.
6.   MPDs – Select TSD phase and pages as desired.


Selecting an Acquisition Source
To select an acquisition source from the ACQ expanded menu, perform the following:
1.   TSD or WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   ACQ (VAB R6) – Select.
3.   Select desired ACQ source from expanded menu options.

To select an existing point as an acquisition source directly from the TSD, perform the following:
1.   TSD Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   CAQ (VAB R5) – Select.
3.   MPD Cursor Controller/Enter – Select the desired point on TSD.

To select an existing point as an acquisition source from the database, perform the following:
1.   TSD or WPN Fixed Action Button – Press.
2.   COORD (VAB T5) – Select.
3.   WPTHZ (VAB T1) or CTRLM (VAB T2) – Select if necessary.
4.   Use paging controls (VAB B2/B3) – Select.
     or
4.   SRCH> (VAB B4) – Select and enter data with KU.
5.   Point select (VAB L1-L6) – Select the desired point.


Engaging a Target with 30mm Area Weapon System
To engage a target with the 30mm Area Weapon System (AWS) perform the following:
1.   Sight select – TADS or HMD as desired and verify in HAD Sight Select Status field.
2.   Weapon – Weapon Action Switch (WAS)-Forward to GUN.
3.   A/S button – ARM (Performed by crewmember not on the controls).
4.   Range – Set as desired or verify in the HAD Range/Range Source field.
5.   Messages – Verify no inhibit messages are displayed. Verify “ROUNDS ####” is displayed in the HAD
     Weapon Status field.
6.   Fire – Squeeze weapon trigger to 1st detent (2nd detent to override performance inhibits).


Engaging a Target with 2.75-inch Unguided Rockets
To engage a target with independent (HMD) rockets perform the following:
1.   Sight select – HMD and verify in HAD Sight Select Status field.
2.   Weapon – Weapon Action Switch (WAS)-Left to RKT.
3.   A/S button – ARM (Performed by crewmember not on the controls).
4.   Range – Set as desired or verify in the HAD Range/Range Source field.
5.   Messages – Verify no inhibit messages are displayed. Verify “RKT NORM” is displayed in the HAD Weapon
     Status field.
6.   Fire – Squeeze weapon trigger to 1st detent (2nd detent to override performance inhibits).

To engage a target with cooperative (COOP) rockets perform the following:
1.   PLT   Sight select – HMD and verify in HAD Sight Select Status field.
2.   CPG   Sight select – TADS and verify in HAD Sight Select Status field.
3.   PLT   Weapon – Cyclic Weapon Action Switch (WAS)-Left to RKT.
4.   CPG   Weapon – TEDAC Left Handgrip Weapon Action Switch (WAS)-Left to RKT.
5.   PLT / CPG   A/S button – ARM (Performed by crewmember not on the controls).
6.   CPG   Range – Set as desired or verify in the HAD Range/Range Source field.
7.   PLT & CPG Messages – Verify no inhibit messages are displayed. Verify “COOP” is displayed in HAD Weapon
     Control field and “RKT NORM” is displayed in the HAD Weapon Status field.
8.   PLT   Fire – Squeeze cyclic weapon trigger to 1st detent (2nd detent to override performance inhibits).


Engaging a Target with AGM-114K Laser-Guided Hellfire Missile
To engage a target with a laser-guided Hellfire perform the following:
1.   CPG   Sight select – TADS and verify in HAD Sight Select Status field.
2.   CPG   Weapon – Weapon Action Switch (WAS)-Right to MSL and select SAL as missile TYPE.
3.   CPG   A/S button – ARM.
4.   CPG   Range – Set as desired or verify in the HAD Range/Range Source field.
5.   CPG (If launching LOAL) Messages – Verify no inhibits are displayed. Verify trajectory and mode is displayed
     as desired in HAD Weapon Status field.
6.   CPG   (If launching LOBL) Designate – Pull and hold LRFD trigger, 2nd detent.
7.   CPG  (If launching LOBL) Messages – Verify no inhibits are displayed. Verify “PRI CHAN TRK” is displayed in
     the HAD Weapon Status field.
8.   PLT   Maneuver as necessary to ensure aircraft is within missile launch constraints.
9.   CPG   Fire – Pull weapon trigger to 1st detent (2nd detent to override performance inhibits).


Engaging a Target with AGM-114L Radar-Guided Hellfire Missile
To engage a target with a radar-guided Hellfire perform the following:
1.   CPG   Sight select – TADS and verify in HAD Sight Select Status field.
2.   CPG   Weapon – Weapon Action Switch (WAS)-Right to MSL and select RF as missile TYPE.
3.   CPG   A/S button – ARM.
4.   CPG Range – Laser designate, 2nd detent, and verify in the HAD Range/Range Source field, until “TARGET
     DATA?” is removed from HAD Sight Status field.
5.    CPG (If launching LOBL) Messages – Verify no inhibits are displayed. Verify “RF MSL TRK” is displayed in
     the HAD Weapon Status field.
6.   CPG   (If launching LOAL) Messages – Verify no inhibits are displayed.
7.   PLT   Maneuver as necessary to ensure aircraft is within missile launch constraints.
8.   CPG   Fire – Pull weapon trigger to 1st detent (2nd detent to override performance inhibits).


Performing Post-Engagement Procedures
Following an engagement, the crewmember should:
1.   Ensure finger is off the weapon trigger.
2.   Ensure weapon is de-actioned.
3.   A/S button – SAFE, as desired (Performed by crewmember not on the controls).
APPENDIX B – ASE THREAT SYMBOLS
The Tactical Situation Display (TSD) and Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) pages provide the crew with
warning indications of radar and laser threats in azimuth, accompanied by audio alerts.
The threat symbols under the “ASE” column correspond with how the radar or laser threat will appear on the
Tactical Situation Display (TSD) and Aircraft Survivability Equipment (ASE) pages.
The quoted words or phrases under the “AUDIO” column correspond with the associated audio alert that will be
heard over the ICS when the radar or laser threat is detected.
Air defense radar systems are further identified by their type in small font under the “RADAR SYSTEMS” column.
The table below lists the definition of each type abbreviation following the radar system’s designation/name to
identify the radar’s function within their respective air defense units.

 TYPE      DESCRIPTION                                    TYPE    DESCRIPTION
 CWAR      Continuous-Wave Acquisition Radar              STR     Search and Tracking Radar
 EWR       Early Warning Radar                            TAR     Target Acquisition Radar
 FCR       Fire Control Radar                             TI      Target Illumination
 RR        Ranging Radar                                  TTR     Target Tracking Radar
 SR        Surveillance Radar



Air Defense Radar Systems
 ASE AUDIO THREAT TYPE                            AIR DEFENSE SYSTEM          RADAR SYSTEMS

                                                                              1L13 “BOX SPRING” SR/EWR
 S R
        “Radar”   Surveillance radar                                          5G66 “TALL RACK” SR/EWR
                                                                              AN/FPS-117 “SEEK IGLOO”              SR/EWR

                                                  S-75, S-125, S-200          P-19 “FLAT FACE B” SR/TAR
 T R
        “Radar”   Target acquisition radar        S-200, S-300                ST-68U “TIN SHIELD” TAR
                                                  PPRU-M1                     9S80M1 “DOG EAR” TAR

   2                                                                          SNR-75 “FAN SONG”        TTR
        “SA-2”    SA-2 air defense battery        S-75
                                                                              RD-75 Amazonka RR
   3
        “SA-3”    SA-3 air defense battery        S-125                       SNR-125 “LOW BLOW”         TTR

   5
        “SA-5”    SA-5 air defense battery        S-200                       5N62 “SQUARE PAIR”        TTR/TI

   6
        “SA-6”    SA-6 air defense battery        2K12 Kub                    1S91 “STRAIGHT FLUSH”           TAR/TI

   7                                                                          HQ-7 ACU TAR
        “HQ-7”    CSA-7/HQ-7B air defense unit    Hóng Qí-7
                                                                              Type 345 TTR
   8
        “SA-8”    SA-8 air defense unit           9K33 Osa                    “LAND ROLL”    TAR/TTR

                                                                              64N6E “BIG BIRD” TAR
 1 0
        “SA-10”   SA-10 air defense battery       S-300PS                     5N66M “CLAM SHELL” TAR
                                                                              30N6E “FLAP LID” TTR

 1 1                                                                          9S18M1 “SNOW DRIFT”            TAR
        “SA-11”   SA-11 air defense battery       9K37M Buk-M1
                                                                              9S35 “FIRE DOME” TTR
 1 3
        “SA-13”   SA-13 air defense unit          9K35 Strela-10M3            9S86 “SNAP SHOT”     RR
 1 5
       “SA-15”     SA-15 air defense unit                 9K331 Tor-M1              “SCRUM HALF”    TAR/TTR

 S 6
        “2S6”      SA-19 air defense unit                 2S6M Tunguska             1RL144 “HOT SHOT”         TAR/TTR

 Z U
        “ZSU”      ZSU-23-4 air defense gun unit          ZSU-23-4 Shilka           RPK-2 “GUN DISH”      FCR

 A A
        “Gun”      Air defense gun battery                S-60, KS-19               SON-9 “FIRE CAN”      FCR

 G S                                                      Flakpanzer Gepard         MPDR-12 TAR / Albis FCR
        “Gun”      Self-propelled air defense gun unit
                                                          M163 Vulcan ADS           AN/VPS-2 RR

 R A                                                                                Rapier PU SR
       “Rapier”    Rapier air defense unit                Rapier FSA
                                                                                    DN 181 Blindfire    TTR

 R O                                                      Roland TÜR                MPDR-3002S SR
       “Roland”    Roland air defense unit
                                                          Marder Roland             MPDR-16 TAR / DOMINO-30 TTR
                                                                                    AN/MPQ-50 TAR
 H K
       “Hawk”      Hawk air defense battery               MIM-23B I-Hawk            AN/MPQ-46 TTR
                                                                                    AN/MPQ-55 CWAR
 P T
       “Patriot”   Patriot air defense battery            MIM-104C Patriot PAC-2    AN/MPQ-53 STR
 S A
        “SAM”      NASAMS air defense battery             NASAMS 2                  AN/MPQ-64F1 Sentinel        STR

 N V
       “Radar”     Naval air defense system



Airborne Radar Systems
ASE     AUDIO          AIRCRAFT              ASE    AUDIO         AIRCRAFT         ASE    AUDIO         AIRCRAFT
 1 9                                         J F                                   F 4
       “Fixed Wing”    MiG-19                      “Fixed Wing”   JF-17                  “Fixed Wing”   F-4
 2 1                                         2 9                                   F 5
       “Fixed Wing”    MiG-21                      “Fixed Wing”   J-11                   “Fixed Wing”   F-5
 2 3                                         5 0                                   1 4
       “Fixed Wing”    MiG-23                      “Fixed Wing”   KJ-2000                “Fixed Wing”   F-14
 2 4                                                                               1 5
       “Fixed Wing”    Su-24                                                             “Fixed Wing”   F-15
 2 5                                         F 1                                   1 6
       “Fixed Wing”    MiG-25                      “Fixed Wing”   Mirage F1              “Fixed Wing”   F-16
 2 9                                         M 2                                   1 8
       “Fixed Wing”    MiG-29                      “Fixed Wing”   Mirage 2000            “Fixed Wing”   F/A-18
 2 9                                         F 2                                   E 2
       “Fixed Wing”    Su-27                       “Fixed Wing”   Tornado GR4            “Fixed Wing”   E-2
 2 9                                                                               E 3
       “Fixed Wing”    Su-33                                                             “Fixed Wing”   E-3
 3 0
       “Fixed Wing”    Su-30
 3 1
       “Fixed Wing”    MiG-31
 3 4
       “Fixed Wing”    Su-34
 5 0
       “Fixed Wing”    A-50
Other Threat Symbols
ASE         AUDIO            TYPE                                 THREATS
 MM
      “Fixed Wing, Launch”   Air-to-air missile radar detected    Active radar-homing (ARH) air-to-air missiles
        “Laser Ranging”      Laser rangefinder detected           Tank/IFV guns, electro-optical fire control sensors
      “Laser Designating”    Laser designator detected            ATGMs, electro-optical fire control sensors
        “Laser Beaming”      Laser beam-rider guidance detected   ATGMs, electro-optical missile guidance sensors
APPENDIX C – ABR PAGE POINT TABLES
The Abbreviation (ABR) sub-page provides the crew a library of aircraft point symbols that can be added to the
TSD for the purposes of navigation, increasing situational awareness, or as a method of cueing sensors. This
page can be accessed via the TSD Point or TSD Utility sub-pages and can provide a quick look-up of required
IDENT codes for inputting new points.
In the tables below, icons with “AAA” associated with the point symbol will display the three-character free text
of that point directly on the TSD itself; whereas other points will only display the point’s index within the database.


Waypoints (WPTHZ)
 SYMBOL IDENT NAME                                           DESCRIPTION
                CC     Communications Check Point            A radio message should be sent upon arrival/crossing

                LZ     Landing Zone                          Helicopter landing or pickup location of ground troops

                PP     Passage Point                         Passage across friendly front line positions

                RP     Release Point                         Final point of navigation route

                SP     Start Point                           First point of navigation route

                WP     Waypoint                              Point used for navigation or routing



Hazards (WPTHZ)
 SYMBOL IDENT NAME                                           DESCRIPTION
                TO     Tower, Over 1000’                     Vertical tower hazard >1000 feet AGL

                TU     Tower, Under 1000’                    Vertical tower hazard <1000 feet AGL

                WL     Wires, Power                          Tall linear wire hazard

                WS     Wires, Telephone/Electric             Short linear wire hazard



General Control Measures (CTRLM)
 SYMBOL IDENT NAME                                           DESCRIPTION
                AP     Air Control Point                     Point used for control or timing of aircraft movement

                AG     Airfield, General                     Large airfield without navigational aids

                AI     Airfield, Instrumented                Large airfield with navigational aids

                AL     Lighted Airport                       Small lighted airfield

                F1     Artillery Firing Point 1              1st portion of Artillery Firing Point (i.e., AB1___)

                F2     Artillery Firing Point 2              2nd portion of Artillery Firing Point (i.e., ___234)
         AA   Assembly Area              Rear area for assembly of friendly forces

         BN   Battalion                  Battalion echelon, below Brigade but above Company

         BP   Battle Position            Position used for engaging enemy forces

         BR   Bridge/Gap                 Bridge across an obstacle or a passable gap in terrain

         BD   Brigade                    Brigade echelon, below Division but above Battalion

         CP   Checkpoint                 Reference point used for maneuver and orientation

         CO   Company                    Company echelon, below Battalion but above Platoon

         CR   Corps                      Corps echelon, above Division but below U.S. Army

         DI   Division                   Division echelon, above Brigade but below Corps

         FF   FARP, Fuel only            Forward Arming & Refueling Point with fuel

         FM   FARP, Ammo only            Forward Arming & Refueling Point with munitions

         FC   FARP, Fuel and Ammo        Forward Arming & Refueling Point with fuel/munitions

         FA   Forward Assembly Area      Forward area for assembly of friendly forces

         GL   Ground Light/Small Town    Visual reference point used for navigation/orientation

         HA   Holding Area               Brief holding area while enroute to/from mission area

         NB   NBC Area                   Nuclear, Biological, or Chemical contaminated area

         ID   Datalink Subscriber        ID and position of datalink network subscriber

         BE   NDB Symbol                 Non-Directional Beacon navigational aid

         RH   Railhead Point             Location for loading/unloading cargo from trains

         GP   Regiment/Group             Regiment echelon, above Battalion but below Division

         US   U.S. Army                  U.S. Army echelon, above Corps



Friendly Control Measures (CTRLM)
SYMBOL IDENT NAME                        DESCRIPTION
         AD   Friendly Air Defense       Friendly air defense unit/command position

         AS   Friendly Air Assault       Friendly helicopter-borne infantry unit position

         AV   Friendly Air Cavalry       Friendly scout/cavalry helicopter position

         AB   Friendly Airborne          Friendly paratrooper unit position

         AM   Friendly Armor             Friendly armor unit position

         CA   Friendly Armored Cavalry   Friendly recon/cavalry ground unit position
        MA    Friendly Aviation Maintenance     Friendly helicopter maintenance unit position

         CF   Friendly Chemical                 Friendly chemical unit position

         DF   Friendly Decontamination          Friendly decontamination site

         EN   Friendly Engineers                Friendly engineer unit position

        FW    Friendly Electronic Warfare       Friendly electronic warfare unit position

        WF    Friendly Fixed Wing               Friendly fixed-wing airbase/staging area

         FL   Friendly Field Artillery          Friendly artillery/MLRS firing position

        AH    Friendly Attack Helicopter        Friendly attack helicopter position

         FG   Friendly Helicopter, General      Friendly cargo/utility helicopter position

        HO    Friendly Hospital                 Friendly medical facility/trauma care station

         FI   Friendly Infantry                 Friendly infantry unit position

         MI   Friendly Mechanized Infantry      Friendly mechanized infantry/motor rifle unit position

        MD    Friendly Medical                  Friendly medical unit position/aid station

         TF   Friendly Tactical Operations Center Friendly headquarters/command unit position

         FU   Friendly Unit                     Generic friendly unit position/marker



Enemy Control Measures (CTRLM)
SYMBOL IDENT NAME                               DESCRIPTION
         ES   Enemy Air Assault                 Enemy helicopter-borne infantry unit position

         EV   Enemy Air Cavalry                 Enemy scout/cavalry helicopter position

         ED   Enemy Air Defense                 Enemy air defense unit/command position

         EB   Enemy Airborne                    Enemy paratrooper unit position

         EC   Enemy Armored Cavalry             Enemy recon/cavalry ground unit position

         AE   Enemy Armor                       Enemy armor unit position

        ME    Enemy Aviation Maintenance        Enemy helicopter maintenance unit position

         CE   Enemy Chemical                    Enemy chemical unit position

         DE   Enemy Decontamination             Enemy decontamination site

         EE   Enemy Engineers                   Enemy engineer unit position

        WR    Enemy Electronic Warfare          Enemy electronic warfare unit position

         EF   Enemy Field Artillery             Enemy artillery/MLRS firing position
        WE    Enemy Fixed Wing                Enemy fixed-wing airbase/staging area

         EK   Enemy Attack Helicopter         Enemy attack helicopter position

        HG    Enemy Helicopter, General       Enemy cargo/utility helicopter position

         EH   Enemy Hospital                  Enemy medical facility/trauma care station

         EI   Enemy Infantry                  Enemy infantry unit position

        EM    Enemy Mechanized Infantry       Enemy mechanized infantry/motor rifle unit position

         EX   Enemy Medical                   Enemy medical unit position/aid station

         ET   Enemy Tactical Operations Center Enemy headquarters/command unit position

         EU   Enemy Unit                      Generic enemy unit position/marker



Target (TGT/THRT)
SYMBOL IDENT NAME                             DESCRIPTION
         TG   Target Point                    Target reference point



Threats (TGT/THRT)
SYMBOL IDENT NAME                             DESCRIPTION
         AX   AMX-13 Air Defense Gun

         AS   Aspide SAM System

        AD    Friendly Air Defense Unit       Generic 8 km threat ring

        GP    Gepard Air Defense Gun          Flakpanzer Gepard 30mm SPAAA vehicle

         G1   Growth 1                        Generic 1 km threat ring

         G2   Growth 2                        Generic 2 km threat ring

         G3   Growth 3                        Generic 3 km threat ring

         G4   Growth 4                        Generic 4 km threat ring

        SD    Spada SAM System

         83   M1983 Air Defense Gun

         U    Unknown Air Defense Unit        Insurgent technical vehicle w/ 23mm AA gun

         S6   2S6/SA-19 Air Defense Unit      2S6M Tunguska SAM/SPAAA vehicle

         AA   Air Defense Gun                 S-60 57mm AA battery w/ SON-9 fire control radar

        GU    Generic Air Defense Unit        Generic 5 km threat ring
MK   Marksman Air Defense Gun

SB   Sabre Air Defense Gun

GS   Self-Propelled Air Defense Gun   ZSU-57-2 57mm SPAAA vehicle

GT   Towed Air Defense Gun            ZU-23-2 23mm AA emplacement

ZU   ZSU-23-4 Air Defense Gun         ZSU-23-4 23mm SPAAA vehicle

NV   Naval Air Defense System

SR   Battlefield Surveillance Radar   Early warning/search radar, 100km threat ring

TR   Target Acquisition Radar         PPRU-M1 Sborka air defense coordination radar

70   RBS-70 SAM System

BP   Blowpipe SAM System

BH   Bloodhound SAM System

CH   Chapparal SAM System             M48 SAM vehicle

CT   Crotale SAM System               HQ-7 SAM battery

C2   CSA-2/1/X SAM System

HK   Hawk SAM System                  MIM-23B SAM battery

JA   Javelin SAM System

PT   Patriot SAM System               MIM-104C SAM battery

RE   Redeye SAM System

RA   Rapier SAM System                Rapier FSA SAM battery

RO   Roland SAM System                Marder Roland SAM vehicle

1    SA-1 SAM System

2    SA-2 SAM System                  S-75 SAM battery

3    SA-3 SAM System                  S-125 SAM battery

4    SA-4 SAM System

5    SA-5 SAM System                  S-200 SAM battery

6    SA-6 SAM System                  2K12 Kub SAM battery

7    SA-7 SAM System

8    SA-8 SAM System                  9K33 Osa SAM vehicle

9    SA-9 SAM System                  9K31 Strela-1 SAM vehicle
10   SA-10 SAM System            S-300PS SAM battery

11   SA-11 SAM System            9K37M Buk-M1 battery

12   SA-12 SAM System

13   SA-13 SAM System            9K13 Strela-10M3 SAM vehicle

14   SA-14 SAM System

15   SA-15 SAM System            9K331 Tor-M1 SAM vehicle

16   SA-16 SAM System            Igla/Igla-S MANPADS position [used for SA-18 threat]

17   SA-17 SAM System

SM   SAMP SAM System

SC   SATCP SAM System

SP   Self-Propelled SAM System

SH   Shahine/R440 SAM System

SS   Starstreak SAM System

TC   Tigercat SAM System

ST   Stinger SAM System          Avenger SAM vehicle/Stinger MANPADS position

SA   Towed SAM System            NASAMS 2 SAM battery

VU   Vulcan Air Defense Gun      M163 Vulcan SPAAA vehicle
APPENDIX D – FREQUENTLY ASKED
QUESTIONS (FAQ)
What version of the AH-64D does the DCS: AH-64D simulate?
DCS: AH-64D simulates an AH-64D Block 2 in service with the United States Army between the years of 2005-
2010, with a specific equipment configuration that was common (but not exclusive) within that time period. The
specific avionics version that is being modeled is Lot 9.1, which was fielded to U.S. Army AH-64D Block 2 aircraft
in 2005, along with additional equipment that was fielded to the U.S Army fleet between 2005 and 2007.


What is the difference between an AH-64D equipped with a mast-mounted Fire Control
Radar and an AH-64D without the FCR?
There is very little difference between these aircraft configurations. The presence (or absence) of the FCR mast-
mounted assembly does not denote a different model of AH-64 but is simply a removeable sensor system (much
like a targeting pod on a strike fighter). When the FCR system is removed, the aircraft will still perform and
operate the same, albeit with less overall gross weight and more limited sensor/targeting options to the crew.
Further, while the U.S. Army has operated AH-64D's with a mixed fleet of FCR and non-FCR aircraft, some
countries have operated exclusively FCR-equipped AH-64D variants (such as the United Kingdom's Army Air
Corps), or exclusively non-FCR-equipped variants (such as the Royal Netherlands Air Force).


What is the difference between the Pilot Night Vision System (PNVS) and the Target
Acquisition Designation Sight (TADS)?
The PNVS is a FLIR-only steerable turret that is designed to aid the Pilot in the back seat while flying in total
darkness. The TADS is a multi-sensor steerable turret that allows the Copilot/Gunner in the front seat to target
and designate enemy locations and vehicles for the aircraft’s weapon systems. The TADS can also be used to fly
in total darkness and serves as a backup to the PNVS in this regard. Either crewmember can select either the
PNVS or the TADS FLIR sensors for flying, but neither sensor can be used by both crewmembers at the same
time.
(See Night Vision Systems for more information.)


Can the PNVS be used to aim weapons?
The PNVS is simply a Forward-Looking Infrared (FLIR) sensor that provides a video underlay to the crewmember
using it for flying at night; it is not a sight and it does not perform targeting nor aim any weapon systems. In
such an instance where the Pilot is using the PNVS, the Pilot can be sight-selected to HMD while using the PNVS,
and the HMD does aim weapon systems while the PNVS provides video imagery of the surroundings.


Can the TADS be used by the Pilot in the backseat?
The TADS can be used in one of two ways: as a sight for targeting or as a sensor for flying. In the case of the
former, only the Copilot/Gunner in the front seat can directly control the TADS for the purposes of targeting and
aiming of weapon systems. In the case of the latter, the TADS FLIR can also be used as a night-flying sensor
using the NVS Sensor Select switch on the Collective Flight Grip. Because of this, either crewmember can select
the TADS as their NVS sensor, but only the Copilot/Gunner can select the TADS as their sight for targeting.
(See Night Vision Systems for more information.)
What is the difference between the Pilot Night Vision System (PNVS) and night vision
goggles?
The PNVS is a steerable Forward-Looking Infrared (FLIR) turret that follows the helmet movements of the Pilot
and transmits a thermal-based video of the environment to the Pilot's Helmet Display Unit (HDU). This system
displays the thermal environment through various shades of brightness to distinguish varying levels of heat
emissions from objects within the FLIR's field of view. Night vision goggles on the other hand amplify light sources
and reflected light from the environment to allow a human eye to distinguish detail and contrast.


Why can I see IR pointers when using night vision goggles, but I cannot see them when
using the TADS or PNVS?
Typical night vision goggles (such as the AN/AVS-6 goggles simulated in the DCS: AH-64D) amplify visible and
near-infrared light to a level that can be used by the human eye to distinguish detail and contrast. Because of
this, devices that transmit light in the near-infrared spectrum (such as IR beacons or IR pointers) can be seen by
individuals wearing NVG's; whereas some FLIR systems that operate on different portions of the IR spectrum,
such as the AH-64D PNVS and TADS turrets, cannot.


Why can’t night vision goggles be used at the same time as the Helmet Display Unit
(HDU)?
The HDU itself physically interferes with the proper wear of the AN/AVS-6 night-vision goggles. However, more
importantly, the use of NVG’s and the HDU simultaneously can often present circumstances where the two devices
are not properly aligned and can incur aiming errors when employing the helicopter sensors or weapon systems.
For this reason, use of the two devices in such a manner is a prohibited practice for U.S. Army crewmembers.


Is an IR pointer and a laser designator the same?
No, an IR pointer is a tightly focused beam of light that continuously emits in the near-infrared spectrum, whereas
a laser designator employs a coded pulse of laser energy that can be detected by compatible sensors or weapon
systems that are scanning for that precise laser pulse sequence.


Why does the horizon line in the IHADSS symbology not coincide with the real horizon?
The IHADSS allows the crewmembers to maintain situational awareness of the majority of the AH-64D's flight
state, sensors, and weapon systems, regardless of where the crewmember is looking at any given time. Either
crewmember can look independently of the helicopter's flight path or nose direction without losing key pieces of
data necessary to fly and fight. This allows the Pilot on the controls to be looking back over his/her shoulder
while in a steep pitch-back turn and still have full awareness of the aircraft's attitude and flight state; or be
scanning out to either side for threats or obstacles while flying slowly at nap-of-the-earth altitudes just feet over
the treetops.
When viewing the horizon line (and/or pitch ladder in Cruise mode), the Line-Of-Sight (LOS) Reticle – or central
crosshairs – within the symbology represents the nose of the aircraft, much like the watermark on a cockpit
attitude indicator. If the artificial horizon line bisects the LOS reticle, the helicopter's pitch attitude is level with
the horizon.
(See Symbology Elements for more information.)
Why is the AH-64D’s gun called the Area Weapon System?
The AWS was designed primarily as a close-in defensive weapon system when directed by a crewmember’s
helmet sight to provide suppression against immediate threats to the aircraft or the team. However, the AWS can
also be effectively used as an offensive weapon against light armor, soft-skinned vehicles, or personnel; especially
when directed by the TADS as the sight.


Why does my range source keep switching to a Manual range when I action the gun?
As described above, the gun is designed to be used as a close-in defensive weapon system when employed by
the aircrew’s helmet sights. As such, when a crewmember’s selected sight is HMD (Helmet Mounted Display), the
range source will automatically revert to the Manual range (as set on the WPN page) whenever that crewmember
actions the gun. This prevents an un-intended ranging value from being used when hasty, close-in fires are
needed. As an example, if the crewmember had a Nav range to a target 4 kilometers away, the gun would
attempt to elevate for a ballistic solution of 4,000 meters, and the rounds would impact a location much further
than anticipated. For this reason, it is wise to set a Manual range value on the WPN page that you are proficient
with in engaging targets at close range.
However, this does not prevent the crewmember from setting a different range source such as an Automatic or
Navigation range after the gun is actioned.


Why does the Rocket Steering Cursor not behave as a conventional Continuously
Computed Impact Point (CCIP) reticle?
The Aerial Rocket Sub-system on the AH-64D was designed to be employed as "aerial rocket artillery", making a
team of AH-64D's akin to a hovering MLRS battery. Because unguided rockets can only be employed using ballistic
trajectories (like bullets), the accuracy of the weapon is heavily determined by what sighting method is used to
generate a targeting solution. With CCIP targeting methods, the target must not only be visible to the naked eye,
but any adjustments made to the aimpoint must also be precise enough and distinguishable to the crew in order
for such corrections to unguided munition trajectories to be effective. At longer ranges, the very thickness of any
symbology elements of a CCIP reticle itself on a HUD or helmet display may be the difference of several hundred
meters. For this reason, CCIP reticles are only effective at relatively close ranges, and within visual range of the
naked eye.
In order to engage ground targets with unguided rockets beyond normal visual ranges on the battlefield, and
with such aimpoint accuracy that can be distinguishable at such ranges, the Rocket Steering Cursor is employed
to enable the crew in aligning the helicopter with the required targeting solution for rocket delivery. While used
in Cooperative mode, a secondary advantage to the Rocket Steering Cursor is that the Pilot can use the symbology
to align the helicopter with the required targeting solution provided by the Copilot/Gunner while the Pilot
continues to scan the surrounding terrain for immediate threats, without ever looking in the direction the aircraft
nose is pointed for rocket delivery. Further, since the TADS itself can be slaved to a set of three-dimensional
coordinates, the Rocket Steering Cursor allows the crew to deliver rockets to an area target from behind cover
without having a direct line-of-sight (LOS) to the target.


Why doesn’t the DCS: AH-64D have Stinger or Sidewinder air-to-air missiles?
The DCS: AH-64D is simulating a U.S. Army AH-64D. U.S. Army AH-64’s have never been equipped or capable of
firing Stinger or Sidewinder missiles, despite a small number of weapons tests conducted with such missiles.
There are several “growth” provisions within the AH-64D cockpit controls (such as an Air-To-Air weapon select
position and a missile Cage button) to support future additions of such capability to the AH-64D, however the
avionics of AH-64D’s in U.S. Army service have never supported such weapon systems.
What is a “sight” and how do I determine which one I should use in a tactical situation?
There are three possible “sights” that can be selected to directly aim a weapon or generate a targeting solution
in the AH-64D. These selections are the Helmet-Mounted Display (HMD), the Target Acquisition Designation Sight
(TADS), or the optionally-mounted Fire Control Radar (FCR). Any of these three sight selections can be used by
the Copilot/Gunner, but only HMD and FCR are available to the Pilot. The sight currently selected by the
crewmember will be displayed in the bottom-left corner of the IHADSS symbology.
Each sight used by the AH-64D has both advantages and disadvantages that must be known and evaluated for
any given tactical situation. For example, the TADS is very useful for long-range target identification and
designation for Hellfire missiles, however it may not be the quickest method for engaging a target that is at close-
range. On the other hand, the HMD is very useful for rapidly engaging targets at close-range simply by using the
crewmember’s helmet-tracking capabilities, but the HMD is less accurate than the TADS and cannot designate
targets for missile engagement.
(See Sights and Sensors for more information.)


What is an “acquisition source” or “ACQ” and how do I determine which one I should use
in a tactical situation?
An acquisition source can quickly orient a crewmember’s selected sight to either a point in space relative to the
aircraft nose or a set of three-dimensional coordinates on the battlefield. The purpose of the acquisition source
is to reduce the time needed to manually search and acquire a target with any given sight. In the case of the
TADS or FCR, these sights will physically slew to the location of the selected acquisition source. In the case of
the HMD, the crewmember will receive cueing indications in their helmet symbology of where they should look
to point their head toward the selected acquisition source (in lieu of a robotic arm physically grabbing their head
and forcibly turning it in the correct direction).
As is the case with sight selections, choosing the best acquisition source in any given situation is key to reducing
the time it takes to search, acquire, and engage enemy targets.
(See Acquisition Sources for more information.)


How do I enter a set of MGRS coordinates if a JTAC or other ground unit gives me MGRS
in 4-, 6- or 10-digit formats?
The AH-64D will only accept MGRS coordinates in an 8-digit format. If coordinates are entered using a 4-, 6- or
10-digit MGRS format, the Keyboard Unit (KU) will not accept this entry and the KU display will simply flash to
indicate an invalid data entry. If given a 4-digit or 6-digit MGRS location, simply append zeros to the easting and
northing to achieve the number of required digits, such as 12001200 when given “1212” or 12301230 when given
“123123”. Conversely, when given a 10-digit MGRS coordinate, simply remove the 5th digit from both the easting
and northing to achieve the required 8-digit format, such as 12341234 when given “1234512345”
APPENDIX E – GLOSSARY OF TERMS
AA     Anti-Aircraft.
AAA    Anti-Aircraft Artillery.
A/C    Aircraft; MPD fixed action button or COLOR BAND option on the TSD>MAP page.
ACK    Acknowledge; regarding the automatic acknowledgement that is transmitted by the datalink
       modem to the originator of a datalink message after reception.
ACM    Automatic Control Mode; automatic gain control of the FLIR sensors.
ACQ    Acquisition source; method of cueing sensors or sights to locations on the battlefield.
ADF    Automatic Direction Finder; a receive-only radio antenna for determining relative bearing to
       radio transmissions.
ADU    Air Defense Unit.
AGL    Above Ground Level; altitude above the surface directly underneath the aircraft as indicated
       by the radar altimeter.
ALT    Alternate missile channel; the laser code to which the follow-on SAL missile is scanning when
       missile system is set to RIPL mode of operation.
APC    Armored Personnel Carrier.
APU    Auxiliary Power Unit; a small gas turbine engine that powers the accessory section of the
       main transmission (which provides generator power and hydraulic pressure) and provides
       pneumatic pressure to the air turbine starter of each main engine.
ARH    Active Radar-Homing missile.
ARS    Aerial Rocket Subsystem; the M261 rocket launchers and associated aircraft interface
       systems.
ASE    Aircraft Survivability Equipment; the suite of sensors and external components designed to
       enhance the survivability of the aircraft.
ASN    Assign; format of the BAM sub-page of the TSD in which a crewmember assigns other AH-
       64D Primary members to specific Priority Fire Zones (PFZ).
ATGM   Anti-Tank Guided Missile.
ATM    Air Targeting Mode; a mode of the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
AWS    Area Weapon System; the M230 gun, its turret, the ammunition handling system, and
       associated aircraft interface systems.
AWT    Air Weapons Team; the smallest fighting echelon of AH-64’s within a unit, comprising two
       AH-64 helicopters.
AZ     Azimuth; regarding angular direction along the horizontal plane, either in relative azimuth
       from the aircraft nose or relative azimuth from North.
BAM    Battle Area Management; sub-page of the TSD which provides a means of creating, editing,
       and deleting Priority Fire Zones (PFZ) and No Fire Zones (NFZ), or transmitting them to other
       flight members.
BDA    Battle Damage Assessment; a tactical report in which the SHOT files of the ownship are
       transmitted to other Primary members across the datalink network.
BIT      Built-In Test; self-diagnostic test that can provide indications to equipment or system
         malfunctions.
BRU      Boresight Reticle Unit; scope-like device mounted on top of the glareshield in each
         crewstation that provides a reticle to align the HMD LOS crosshairs during an IHADSS
         boresight procedure.
C/S      Callsign; the 3- to 5-character alphanumeric designation of a datalink subscriber within a
         network.
CG       Center-of-Gravity; the average location of the weight of an aircraft, around which the force
         of gravity appears to act.
CHAN     Channel; one of four possible missile channels set on the WPN page for SAL missile guidance,
         of which at least one needs to be set as the PRI channel, and another may be set as ALT;
         corresponds to one of 16 laser code presets.
COM      Communications; MPD fixed action button.
COOP     Cooperative; a mode of rocket employment in which the CPG uses the TADS to provide a
         targeting solution for the PLT during a rocket engagement.
COORD    Coordinate; an MPD sub-page accessed via the WPN or TSD pages to view detailed
         information of any Point, Line, Area, Shot-At or FARM files stored within the database.
CPG      Copilot/Gunner; the crewmember occupying the front crewstation.
C-SCAN   Continuous Scan; a scan mode of the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
CTR      Center; regarding the TSD option to center or de-center the TSD relative to the ownship
         position.
CTRLM    Control Measure; a Point type within the database used to control the positioning of the
         flight, aid in navigation, or provide situational awareness on the battlefield.
DE       Dual Engine power or Dual Engine operations.
DEL      Delete; an option to remove data corresponding with the page, format, or data field to which
         the option pertains.
DIR      Direct; LOAL trajectory option on WPN page in MSL format, or a method of navigation directly
         to a Point within the database independent of the currently selected route (accessed via the
         TSD>RTE page).
DL       Datalink; a modem-based communications network that relays digital data between aircraft
         using radio transceivers.
DTED     Digital Terrain Elevation Data; stored data within the aircraft memory of the surface elevation
         above sea level of any location or set of coordinates at ground level.
DTV      Day Television; a passive sensor within the TADS for electro-optical-based targeting at
         medium- to long-ranges.
DVO      Direct View Optics; a passive sensor within the TADS for optical-based targeting, but was
         removed from the AH-64D fleet and is not present in aircraft equipped with the M-TADS
         upgrade, despite the switch option being present on the LHG.
ECS      Environmental Control System; provides temperature management for the EFAB
         compartments, TADS and PNVS turrets, and crewstations.
EFAB     Extended Forward Avionics Bays; equipment bays that run alongside the fuselage from just
         aft of the TADS turret to underneath each stub wing and provide storage and mounting to
         much of the aircraft avionics.
EGI    Embedded GPS/INS; a navigational device that uses a combination of inertial measurement
       devices coupled with a Global Positioning System for enhanced accuracy and calibration
       correction.
EL     Elevation; regarding angular direction within the vertical plane, either in relative elevation
       from the aircraft nose or relative elevation above or below the horizon.
ELEV   Elevation; regarding the COLOR BAND option on the TSD>MAP page.
ENDR   Endurance; indication of the flight time remaining based on fuel quantity on board and
       current burn rate.
ENG    Engine; regarding Engine 1 or Engine 2 on the cockpit panels and displays.
ETA    Estimated Time of Arrival; the clock time (Local or Zulu) at which the aircraft will arrive at
       the designated reference point.
ETE    Estimated Time Enroute; the amount of time (duration) it will take the aircraft to travel to a
       reference point or a certain distance.
EUFD   Enhanced Up-Front Display; LED display under the glareshield of each crewstation that
       displays active Warnings, Cautions and Advisories; radio, transponder and modem
       configurations; total fuel quantity; system time; and a stopwatch function.
FARM   Fuel/Ammo/Rockets/Missiles; a tactical report in which the fuel and munitions onboard the
       ownship are transmitted to other Primary members across the datalink network.
FARP   Forward Arming and Refueling Point; a location relatively close to the combat area or
       objective that can provide rearming and/or refueling services.
FAT    Free Air Temperature; an indication of the ambient air temperature as directly read by probes
       outside the aircraft unaffected by nearby component heating.
FCR    Fire Control Radar; sight selection option, acquisition source option, MPD fixed action button,
       or the FCR component of the MMA.
FLIR   Forward-Looking Infrared; a passive sensor within the PNVS and TADS for navigating under
       darkness/low-visibility conditions, or thermal-based targeting at short- to long-ranges (TADS
       FLIR only).
FMC    Flight Management Computer; provides enhanced aircrew control of the aircraft via the
       SCAS.
FOR    Field-Of-Regard; the large box within the High Action Display (HAD) that indicates the slew
       limits of the crewmember’s selected sight or NVS sensor, as well as the relative direction of
       the crewmember’s acquisition source.
FOV    Field-Of-View; the small box within the FOR that indicates the current azimuth and elevation
       of the crewmember’s selected sight or NVS sensor.
FPV    Flight Path Vector; airplane-shaped symbology within the HMD flight symbology that
       indicates the three-dimensional flight direction of the aircraft when above 5 knots of 3D
       ground speed.
FTR    Force Trim Release; when pressed, the magnetic brake system on each crewstation cyclic
       and pedals releases; suspends any active hold mode inputs to the flight control servos.
FXD    Fixed; acquisition source option, AWS mode of operation, or NVS mode of operation.
GRBX   Gearbox; regarding the Intermediate Gearbox (IGB) or the Tail Rotor Gearbox (TGB), both
       of which are mounted to the vertical stabilizer.
GEN    Generator; regarding Generator 1 or Generator 2 on the cockpit panels and displays.
GHS         Gunner Helmet Sight; acquisition source option.
GPS         Global Positioning System; constellation of United States Government-owned satellites that
            provide radio-based precise navigation and timing signals to receivers anywhere in the world.
G-S         Ground Stow; regarding the “RKT G-S” indication of the weapon pylons manually selected to
            GND STOW on the WPN>UTIL page when a crewmember actions rockets.
GTM         Ground Targeting Mode; a mode of the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
GWT         Gross Weight; the current total weight of the aircraft to include fuel, munitions, expendables
            such as chaff and flares, and crew.
HAD         High Action Display; the bottom portion of each crewmember’s HMD, TADS or FCR
            symbology that provide key information regarding sight and acquisition source selection,
            range data, sight and weapon data, and any messages that affect successful engagement
            using the currently actioned weapon.
HDD         Head Down Display; button on RHG that has no function on TEDAC-equipped aircraft.
HDU         Helmet Display Unit; the physical device that is clipped to the crewmember’s IHU that
            projects symbology and video onto a combiner lens in front of the right eye.
HIT         Health Indicator Test; regarding a check of an engine’s expected performance by comparing
            its current TGT at a set torque output to a baseline TGT for a given pressure altitude (PA)
            and free air temperature (FAT).
HMD         Helmet Mounted Display; sight selection option to utilize the IHADSS for sensor cueing or
            weapon aiming.
IAFS        Internal Auxiliary Fuel System (aka “Robbie tank”); an assembly manufactured by Robinson
            Fuel Systems that can be mounted in place of the standard ammunition magazine; can hold
            100 gallons of fuel along with 242 rounds of 30x113mm ammunition.
IAS         Indicated Airspeed or Knots Indicated Airspeed (KIAS); airspeed measured directly within
            the pitot-static system.
IAT         Image Auto Track; an automatic tracking mode of the ASQ-170 TADS that uses image
            contrast to control turret slew.
ICS         Inter-Communication System; regarding the audio communication system between each
            crewstation.
ID          Identification; the 1- or 2-character alphanumeric address of a datalink subscriber within a
            network.
IDENT       Identification; regarding the button on the communications panel that highlights the aircraft
            position to air traffic controllers via an additional signal via the transponder Mode 3A.
IFF         Identification Friend or Foe; a series of coded replies sent via the transponder antennas to
            interrogating IFF transmitters to indicate that the aircraft is friendly.
IFV         Infantry Fighting Vehicle.
IGN ORIDE   Ignition Override; motors the T701C engines using the air turbine starters but inhibits the
            ignitors from firing to prevent combustion.
IHADSS      Integrated Helmet And Designation Sight System; the entire system that tracks the position
            of each crewmember’s IHU, generates symbology for display on the HDU, and processes
            weapon solutions based on sighting through the HMD.
IHU         Integrated Helmet Unit; the crewmember’s flight helmet with integrated helmet position
            tracking sensors.
IMC       Instrument Meteorological Conditions; weather conditions exist in which visual separation
          from terrain, obstacles and other aircraft cannot be achieved through visual means; requires
          navigational aids to fly safely.
IN        Inches; regarding the UNIT setting on the FLT page that displays the barometric pressure
          setting in inches of Mercury.
INU       Inertial Navigation Unit; a navigational device that uses inertial measurement devices to
          output attitude, velocity, and position information.
KM        Kilometer; regarding the UNIT setting on the FLT page that displays navigational distances,
          TSD range scale, and TSD grid-lines in kilometers.
KU        Keyboard Unit; device in each crewstation for inputting data into the avionics; includes
          calculator functions for basic arithmetic.
LAT       Latitude; regarding the North/South portion of a set of Lat/Long coordinates.
LB        Pound; regarding the unit of weight measurement in determining the aircraft gross weight
          and/or fuel quantity on board.
HMMS      Hellfire Modular Missile System; the M299 missile launchers and associated aircraft interface
          systems.
LHG       Left Handgrip; the CPG left TEDAC handgrip.
LMC       Linear Motion Compensation; a toggleable slew logic within the ASQ-170 TADS that allows
          the CPG to adjust and maintain continuous turret slew rates instead of using raw MAN TRK
          controller inputs.
LN        Line; a method of drawing PF or NF zones on the BAM sub-page of the TSD.
LOAL      Lock-On After Launch; the AGM-114 Hellfire missile will lock on to a target designation or
          achieve a target track after the missile has been launched.
LOBL      Lock-On Before Launch; the AGM-114 Hellfire missile will lock on to a target designation or
          achieve a target track prior to the missile being launched.
LONG      Longitude; regarding the East/West portion of a set of Lat/Long coordinates.
LRFD      Laser Rangefinder/Designator; an active ranging sensor within the TADS; designates targets
          for weapons utilizing SAL guidance.
LST       Laser Spot Tracker; a passive sensor within the TADS for detecting laser designations from
          other platforms.
MAN       Manual; missile management mode of operation.
MANPADS   Man Portable Air Defense System.
MANRG     Manual Range; regarding the option to set a manual range value for ballistic solutions using
          the WPN page MANRG option.
MB        Millibars; regarding the UNIT setting on the FLT page that displays the barometric pressure
          setting in millibars.
MBR DIR   Member Directory; COM sub-page in which all pre-planned network subscribers are listed.
MBT       Main Battle Tank.
MGRS      Military Grid Reference System; a UTM-derived coordinate system that divides each UTM grid
          zone into a series of square identifiers that measure 100 kilometers wide, and is in
          widespread use by various military services in many nations.
MMA      Mast-Mounted Assembly; the entire assembly that includes the FCR, RFI and de-rotational
         mount on top of the main rotor mast.
MPD      Multi-Purpose Display; one of two primary displays in each crewstation.
M-PNVS   Modernized PNVS; an upgraded version of the AAQ-11 PNVS that includes a next-generation
         FLIR (part of the M-TADS upgrade).
MPS      Mission Planning System; a type of text message that has been pre-composed prior to a
         mission through the use of a mission planning computer.
MSG      Message; COM sub-pages in which messages or files may be sent or received across a
         datalink network.
MSL      Missile or Mean Sea Level; WAS option of the HMMS or altitude above Mean Sea Level as
         indicated by the barometric altimeter.
M-TADS   Modernized TADS; an upgraded version of the ASQ-170 TADS system that includes a next-
         generation FLIR along with enhanced tracking, processing and boresighting functions.
MTT      Multi-Target Tracker; regarding the ability to set automatic tracking onto multiple targets
         using the ASQ-170 IAT function.
NAK      No Acknowledgement; an advisory displayed on the EUFD that indicates the ownship’s
         modem did not receive an acknowledgement of reception from the modems of all network
         subscribers to which a datalink message was addressed.
NDB      Non-Directional Beacon; an omni-directional radio navigational aid that can be tuned by the
         ADF receiver.
NET      Network; COM sub-page that permits crewmembers to add, edit, or delete individual
         subscribers from the selected datalink network.
NF       No Fire; format of the BAM sub-page of the TSD that allows a crewmember to create, delete,
         or activate individual No Fire Zones on the TSD.
NFZ      No Fire Zone; a geographical area set on the BAM sub-page of the TSD that precludes target
         prioritization by the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
NG       RPM speed of the gas generator stage (sometimes referred to as N1 stage or gas producer
         stage) as measured from the accessory gearbox of each T701C engine.
NGB      Nose Gearbox; regarding the gearbox mounted to the front of each engine that redirects
         shaft horsepower into the main transmission.
NM       Nautical Mile; regarding the UNIT setting on the FLT page that displays navigational
         distances, TSD range scale, and TSD grid-lines in nautical miles.
NOE      Nap-Of-the-Earth; a mode of terrain flight in which the aircraft flies as close to the ground
         as possible with varying airspeeds and altitudes.
NORM     Normal; missile management mode of operation, gun mode of operation, or NVS mode of
         operation.
NP       RPM speed of the power turbine stage (sometimes referred to as N2 stage) as measured
         from the power turbine shaft of each T701C engine.
NR       RPM speed of the AH-64D powertrain system as measured from the main transmission.
NTS      Next-To-Shoot; the current target being engaged when using the APG-78 Fire Control Radar
         as the selected sight.
NVG      Night Vision Goggles; AN/AVS-6 aviator night vision goggles.
NVS        Night Vision System; the PNVS or TADS being utilized as an aided pilotage system to a
           crewmember.
OPER       Operate; sets the selected system or device to operational status.
ORIG DIR   Originator Directory; COM sub-page in which all pre-planned originator identification
           configurations are listed.
ORIG ID    Originator Identification; COM sub-page in which the digital identification settings may be
           configured to uniquely identify the ownship on a datalink network.
PA         Pressure Altitude; the altitude above the standard datum plane, which is the point where the
           atmospheric barometric pressure is 29.92 inches of mercury or 1013.2 millibars (not to be
           confused with true altitude as reported by the barometric altimeter when corrected for non-
           standard temperature/pressure via the Kollsman window).
PEN        Penetration; time delay setting on the WPN page for the M433 fuze when used in conjunction
           with the 6RC rocket type selection.
PERF       Performance page; provides key performance-related data of the helicopter given current or
           predicted pressure altitude (PA), free air temperature (FAT) and gross weight (GW).
PF         Priority Fire; format of the BAM sub-page of the TSD that allows crewmembers to create,
           delete, or activate PFZs on the TSD.
PFZ        Priority Fire Zone; a geographical area set on the BAM sub-page of the TSD that affects
           target prioritization by the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
PHS        Pilot Helmet Sight; acquisition source option.
PLRT       Polarity; toggles FLIR sensor between White-Hot and Black-Hot brightness scales.
PLT        Pilot; the crewmember occupying the aft crewstation.
PNVS       Pilot Night Vision System; the top sensor turret on the nose consisting of a FLIR sensor.
PP         Present Position; the 3-dimensional position of the ownship or a tactical report in which the
           present position of the ownship is transmitted to other Primary members across the datalink
           network.
PRI        Priority missile channel or Primary member; the laser code to which the next to fire SAL
           missile is scanning or a datalink network subscriber that is designated to receive Primary
           datalink messages.
RPSI       Pounds per Square Inch; unit of measurement of pressure within the various oil and hydraulic
           systems of the AH-64D.
PTT        Push-To-Talk; initiates radio transmission when activated.
RAD ALT    Radar Altimeter; uses radar pulses transmitted by a ventral-mounted radio antenna below
           the aircraft to measure absolute altitude above ground level (AGL).
REC        Receive; option presented on the main TSD page to receive a report, a point, or a file residing
           in the datalink buffer.
RF         Radio Frequency missile; the AGM-114L air-to-surface missile that utilizes active radar
           guidance.
RFHO       RF Hand-Over; method of receiving a target location for an AGM-114L missile engagement
           via the datalink.
RFI        Radar Frequency Interferometer; acquisition source option or the RFI component of the
           MMA.
RHG     Right Handgrip; the CPG right TEDAC handgrip.
RIPL    Ripple; missile management mode of operation.
RJAM    Radar Jammer; regarding the ALQ-136 electronic countermeasure (ECM) device.
RKT     Rocket; WAS option of the ARS.
RMAP    Radar Mapping Mode; a mode of the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
RLWR    Radar/Laser Warning Receiver; regarding the combined components and functions of the
        APR-39 Radar Signal Detecting Set and the AVR-2 Laser Detecting Set.
RPT     Report; sub-page of the TSD for sending or requesting reports to/from flight members via
        the datalink.
RQST    Request; a datalink message in which the ownship sends a query for a tactical report to be
        transmitted from Primary members across a datalink network.
RST     Reset; regarding the generator reset switches in the Pilot cockpit, which permits the Pilot to
        reset generator power when the MPDs are not operational due to lack of DC power.
RTE     Route; sub-page of the TSD within which the crew can edit routes or set direct routes to
        individual points.
RTM     Route Menu; sub-page of the TSD within which the crew can select or delete routes.
RTS     Radio Transmit Select; voice radio controls on the cyclic and EUFD.
RVW     Review; regarding the review of data, messages or points that reside within the aircraft
        memory.
SAL     Semi-Active Laser missile; the AGM-114 family of air-to-surface missiles (excluding the AGM-
        114L) that utilize semi-active laser guidance.
SAM     Surface-to-Air Missile; individual missile or SAM-equipped air defense emplacement/battery.
SCAS    Stability and Command Augmentation System; the system that enhances the stability of the
        aircraft for weapons delivery, increases the maneuverability of the aircraft at lower airspeeds,
        and provides hold mode functionality for decreased pilot workload.
SE      Single Engine power or Single Engine operations.
SFR     Specific Fuel Range; a calculation of speed across the surface divided by the fuel flow rate.
SHOT    Shot-At; a TSD sub-page that displays the locations of all AGM-114 missile engagements
        conducted by the ownship in addition to any SHOT files within BDA reports received from
        Primary members across a datalink network.
SINC    SINCGARS; Single Channel Ground and Airborne Radio System family of radios used by
        militaries of the United States and NATO members that permit secure voice and data radio
        transmissions between a wide number of military units.
SKR     Seeker; acquisition source option utilizing a SAL missile tracking a laser designation matching
        the PRI missile channel or an RF missile tracking a target in LOBL mode.
SMDL    Secure Modem Datalink; a modem-based datalink network which exchanges short bursts of
        data across voice radios onboard the aircraft.
SP      System Processor; commands all subsystem initiated tests, monitors system status and
        faults, and processes information for display.
SPAAA   Self-Propelled Anti-Aircraft Artillery.
SPQ        Super Quick; minimal time delay setting on the WPN page for the M433 fuze when used in
           conjunction with the 6RC rocket type selection.
SQL        Squelch; a function that suppresses the audio output of a radio system until a signal is
           received that exceeds the set squelch threshold.
S-SCAN     Single Scan; a scan mode of the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
STAB       Stabilator; regarding the movable horizontal tail plane mounted to the end of the tailboom
           that provides additional attitude control in the pitch axis.
STBY       Standby; sets the selected system or device to standby status.
STO        Store; regarding the STO format of the TSD POINT sub-page to perform a position store of
           a location designated by the CPG HMD or TADS line-of-sight, or a fly-over store using the
           aircraft position.
SUB        Subscriber; a network member that has been designated to receive datalink messages from
           the ownship.
SYM        Symbology; regarding any characters, shapes or symbols that are displayed to the crew to
           represent quantifiable data, provide feedback regarding system status, or indicate current
           settings/selections/modes of operation.
TADS       Target Acquisition Designation Sight; sight selection option, acquisition source option, or the
           bottom sensor turret on the nose consisting of FLIR, DTV, LST, and LRFD.
TAS        True Airspeed or Knots True Airspeed (KTAS); the speed of the aircraft through an air mass,
           corrected for air density that affects the measurement of indicated airspeed.
TDU        TEDAC Display Unit; the video screen component of the TEDAC assembly.
TEDAC      TADS Electronic Display And Control; the assembly that includes both TEDAC grips (LHG and
           RHG) and the TDU.
TGT        Turbine Gas Temperature or Target; temperature of the hot expanding gases entering the
           power turbine stage of the T701C as measured between the 2 nd stage of the gas generator
           section and the 1st stage nozzle of the power turbine section; or a tactical report in which
           FCR target data is transmitted to other Primary members across the datalink network.
TGT/THRT   Target/Threat; a Point type within the database used to designate targets for engagement,
           or locations of air defense threats.
TOF        Time Of Flight; the duration of time a munition is in the air toward its intended ballistic
           solution, target or impact point.
TPM        Terrain Profile Mode; a mode of the APG-78 Fire Control Radar.
TQ         Torque; the measurement of engine power applied to the transmission as measured from
           the power turbine shaft of each T701C engine.
TRAJ       Trajectory; regarding the selection of DIR (Direct), LO (Low), or HI (High) LOAL trajectory
           options on the WPN page in MSL format.
TRK        Track; regarding the Hellfire missile tracking in LOBL mode.
TRN        Terrain; acquisition source option via the TSD page.
TRP        Target Reference Point; a geographic location (that can typically be identified through visual
           or optical means) from which fires can be referenced and, if necessary, adjusted.
TSD        Tactical Situation Display, MPD fixed action button.
TSE     Target State Estimator; processing logic that provides lead angle ballistic compensation
        against moving ground targets when using TADS as the selected sight while employing a
        continuous laser designation.
UPDT    Update; regarding the STORE/UPDT button on the CPG left TEDAC grip pressed to perform
        a navigational position update.
UTM     Universal Transverse Mercator; a grid coordinate system from which the Military Grid
        Reference System (MGRS) is derived.
VID     Video; MPD fixed action button.
VMC     Visual Meteorological Conditions; weather conditions exist in which visual separation from
        terrain, obstacles and other aircraft can be achieved through visual means; does not require
        navigational aids.
VNE     Velocity Never Exceed; an airspeed that, if exceeded, may cause structural damage to the
        AH-64D.
VSSE    Velocity Safe Single Engine; the minimum airspeed at which the AH-64D can maintain level
        flight with one engine inoperative.
WAS     Weapon Action Switch; pronounced “Woz” or “Wahz”, or used as a verb as “WASing”, a
        crewmember selects or “actions” one of the three available weapon systems for engaging
        their intended target.
WCA     Warnings, Cautions, Advisories.
WPN     Weapon; MPD fixed action button.
WPTHZ   Waypoint/Hazard; a Point type within the database used for navigation, routing or to
        designate locations of hazards to flight such as towers and wires.
WSPS    Wire Strike Protection System; assortment of devices mounted to the external fuselage to
        guide wires around key portions of the airframe and into sharp blades to aid in severing the
        unseen wire obstacles that may be encountered during low-altitude flight.
XMIT    Transmit; regarding the FCR transmitting while performing scans of the surrounding
        battlespace or transmitting a datalink message.
XMSN    Transmission; regarding the main transmission.
XPNDR   Transponder; regarding the APX-118 transponder.
ZN      Zone; sets the number of PFZs to be drawn on the BAM sub-page of the TSD when in PF
        format.
APPENDIX F – FORMULAS
Use these calculation and conversion formulas for pre-mission planning or while in flight. Desired resultants are
bolded.


Speed/Time/Distance Calculations
Ground Speed Required (knots) = (Distance ÷ Minutes) × 60
Time of Flight (mins) = (Distance ÷ Ground Speed) × 60


Fuel/Endurance Calculations
Bingo Fuel (lbs) = (Time of Flight ÷ 60) × Fuel LB/HR
Objective Time (mins) = ([Total Fuel − Bingo Fuel] ÷ Fuel LB/HR) × 60


Fuel/Range Calculations
Specific Fuel Range (SFR) Factor = Ground Speed ÷ Fuel LB/HR
Flight Range (NM) = SFR × Total Fuel


Distance Conversion
km to NM = [km] ÷ 1.85
NM to km = [NM] × 1.85


Altitude/Elevation Conversion
Feet to Meters = [ft] ÷ 3.281
Meters to Feet = [m] × 3.281


Latitude/Longitude Conversion
DDD-MM-SS.SS to DDD-MM.MMM

          SS.SS ÷ 60 =          .MMM
DDD-MM.MMM to DDD-MM-SS.SS

        .MMM      × 60 =        SS.SS
Good hunting!
The Eagle Dynamics SA team
EAGLE DYNAMICS SA © 2022
